“And where, bhikkhus, is the faculty of faith to be seen?
“And where, bhikkhus, is the faculty of mindfulness to be seen?
“And where, bhikkhus, is the faculty of wisdom to be seen?
“And who are those who crossed the swamp, The realm of Death so hard to cross?
“And who, bhikkhus, is the person that has fully understood?
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call it consciousness?
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call it feeling?
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call it form?
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call it perception?
“And why, bhikkhus, do you call them volitional formations?
“And why, friend, has the Blessed One declared this?”
“And, bhikkhus, from what are sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair born?
“And, Master Gotama, when a being has laid down this body but has not yet been reborn in another body, what does Master Gotama declare to be its fuel on that occasion?”
“And, venerable sir, how does identity view not come to be?”
“And, venerable sir, when he has again and again strived in such a way, again and again recollected in such a way, again and again concentrated his mind in such a way, again and again understood with wisdom in such a way, that noble disciple gains complete faith thus: ‘As to these things that previously I had only heard about, now I dwell having contacted them with the body and, having pierced them through with wisdom, I see.’
“Answer it, friend Isidatta.”
“Answer it, friend Isidatta.” 
“Answering rightly, friend, one should answer: ‘The scent belongs to the flower.’”
“Any deed that is slackly done, Any corrupted vow, A holy life that breeds suspicion, Does not yield great fruit.” 
“Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all consciousness should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all consciousness should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all consciousness should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near— having seen all consciousness as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self,’ one is liberated by nonclinging.
“Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—having seen all consciousness as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self,’ one is liberated by nonclinging.
“Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—having seen all consciousness as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self,’ one is liberated by nonclinging.
“Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—one sees all consciousness as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—one sees all consciousness as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—one sees all consciousness as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of form whatsoever, bhikkhu, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—one sees all form as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of form whatsoever, Radha, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—one sees all form as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of form whatsoever, Rahula, whether past, future, or present … far or near—having seen all form as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self,’ one is liberated by nonclinging.
“Any kind of form whatsoever, Rahula, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—having seen all form as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self,’ one is liberated by nonclinging.
“Any kind of form whatsoever, Rahula, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—one sees all form as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of form whatsoever, Rahula, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—one sees all form as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’ “Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—one sees all consciousness as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Any kind of form whatsoever, Suradha, whether past, future, or present … far or near—having seen all form as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self,’ one is liberated by nonclinging.
“Ardent” connotes energy, “clearly comprehending” implies wisdom.
“Are forms permanent or impermanent?… Is eye-consciousness … Is eye-contact … Is any feeling that arises with eye-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant—permanent or impermanent?…
“Are forms permanent or impermanent?… Is eye-consciousness...
“Are they to be praised who venerate him, The best of men, faring for the good of humans?” 
“Are those who are immoral and of bad character practising wrongly or rightly?”
“Are those who prattle empty falsehood virtuous or immoral?” 
“Aren’t these the five aggregates subject to clinging, venerable sir: that is, the form aggregate subject to clinging, the feeling aggregate subject to clinging, the perception aggregate subject to clinging, the volitional formations aggregate subject to clinging, the consciousness aggregate subject to clinging?”
“Aren’t these things to be understood by seeing them with wisdom?”
“Aren’t these things to be understood by seeing them with wisdom?”
“Arouse your energy, strive on!…
“As a king intent on waging war
“As aging and death are rolling in on me, venerable sir, what else should be done but to live by the Dhamma, to live righteously, and to do wholesome and meritorious deeds?
“As an old horse of no more use
“As cool water in a desolate place
“As for the other people who remain—
“As he explores he understands thus: ‘Acquisition has craving as its source, craving as its origin; it is born and produced from craving.
“As he explores he understands thus: ‘The many diverse kinds of suffering that arise in the world aging-and-death: this suffering has acquisition as its source, acquisition as its origin; it is born and produced from acquisition.
“As he explores he understands thus: ‘Whatever in the world has a pleasant and agreeable nature: it is here that this craving arises when it arises; it is here that it settles when it settles down.’
“As he teaches them, they listen
“As he thoroughly investigates he understands thus: ‘The many diverse kinds of suffering that arise in the world aging-and-death: this suffering has birth as its source, birth as its origin; it is born and produced from birth.
“As he thoroughly investigates he understands thus: ‘Volitional formations have ignorance as their source, ignorance as their origin; they are born and produced from ignorance.
“As if smitten by a sword, As if his head were on fire, A bhikkhu should wander mindfully
“As if smitten by a sword, As if his head were on fire, A bhikkhu should wander mindfully
“As if smitten by a sword, As if his head were on fire, A bhikkhu should wander mindfully
“As if smitten by a sword, As if his head were on fire, A bhikkhu should wander mindfully
“As if, having lifted a rock with your head, You sought a foothold in the abyss;
“As its own fruit brings destruction
“As its own fruit brings destruction
“As kusa-grass, wrongly grasped, Only cuts one’s hand, So the ascetic life, wrongly taken up, Drags one down to hell.
“As the Buddhas say that form is not the soul, How then does one obtain this body?
“As the carter who left the highway, A road with an even surface, And entered upon a rugged bypath
“As the fragrant red lotus Kokanada
“As the moon shines in a cloudless sky, As the sun shines devoid of stain, So you, Aṅgirasa, O great sage, Outshine the whole world with your glory.”
“As to that end of the world, friend, where one is not born, does not age, does not die, does not pass away, and is not reborn—I say that it cannot be known, seen, or reached by travelling.” 
“As to the various views that arise in the world, householder, ‘The world is eternal’ …—these as well as the sixty-two speculative views mentioned in the Brahmajala: when there is identity view, these views come to be; when there is no identity view, these views do not come to be.”
“As to those beings who fare amidst form, And those who abide in the formless, And those peaceful attainments too:
“As to those beings who fare amidst form, And those who abide in the formless—
“As we understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, venerable sir, the mother’s milk that we have drunk as we roamed and wandered on through this long course—this alone is more than the water in the four great oceans.”
“As we understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, venerable sir, the stream of blood that we have shed when we were beheaded as we roamed and wandered on through this long course—this alone is more than the water in the four great oceans.”
“As we understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, venerable sir, the stream of tears that we have shed as we roamed and wandered through this long course, weeping and wailing because of being united with the disagreeable and separated from the agreeable—this alone is more than the water in the four great oceans.”
“As when a seed is sown in a field
“As you dwell in the forest all alone
“Ascetics are placid in the world;
“Ask not of birth but ask of conduct:
“Ask, friend Sariputta.
“Association with superior persons, venerable sir, is a factor for stream-entry.
“At present, bhikkhus, this Mount Vepulla is called Vepulla, and at present these people are called Magadhans.
“Attained to the end of all kamma, Liberated in the extinction of acquisitions, That Blessed One is my Teacher:
“Be patient, Venerable Kassapa, women are foolish.” 
“Be quiet, Uttarika, Be quiet, Punabbasu!
“Because his mind was overcome and obsessed by gain, honour, and praise, Devadatta’s bright nature was cut off….”
“Because his mind was overcome and obsessed by gain, honour, and praise, Devadatta’s wholesome nature was cut off….”
“Because his mind was overcome and obsessed by gain, honour, and praise, Devadatta’s wholesome root was cut off....” 
“Because of attending carelessly, You, sir, are eaten by your thoughts.
“Because of not seeing as they are
“Because that financier householder provided the paccekabuddha Tagarasikhi with almsfood, as a result of that kamma he was reborn seven times in a good destination, in the heavenly world.
“Because this is unbeneficial, irrelevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and does not lead to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
“Because, friend, this is beneficial, relevant to the fundamentals of the holy life, and leads to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
“Because, venerable sir, the bhikkhus have attacked me on all sides with sharp words.” 
“Behold him of perfect name, The seer of the subtle goal, The giver of wisdom, unattached
“Behold this Dhamma hard to comprehend:
“Being asked thus, Ananda, you should answer in such a way.”
“Being asked thus, bhikkhus, you should answer those wanderers of other sects in such a way.”
“Being asked thus, bhikkhus, you should answer those wanderers of other sects in such a way.”
“Being asked thus, bhikkhus, you should answer those wanderers of other sects in such a way.”
“Being asked thus, bhikkhus, you should answer those wanderers of other sects in such a way.”
“Being asked thus, bhikkhus, you should answer those wanderers of other sects in such a way.”
“Being asked thus, venerable sir, I would answer in such a way.”
“Being contacted by that same painful feeling, he harbours aversion towards it.
“Being contacted by that same painful feeling, he harbours no aversion towards it.
“Beings who perceive what can be expressed
“Better for me is the staff I use
“Better left undone is the misdeed, A deed that later brings repentance.
“Bhikkhu, if a bhikkhu has abandoned lust for the form element, with the abandoning of lust the basis is cut off: there is no support for the establishing of consciousness.
“Bhikkhu, if one has an underlying tendency towards something, then one is measured in accordance with it;  if one is measured in accordance with something, then one is reckoned in terms of it.
“Bhikkhu, if one has an underlying tendency towards something, then one is reckoned in terms of it.
“Bhikkhu, if one teaches the Dhamma for the purpose of revulsion towards aging-and-death, for its fading away and cessation, one is fit to be called a bhikkhu who is a speaker on the Dhamma.
“Bhikkhu, if one teaches the Dhamma for the purpose of revulsion towards birth … for the purpose of revulsion towards ignorance, for its fading away and cessation, one is fit to be called a bhikkhu who is a speaker on the Dhamma.
“Bhikkhu, if one teaches the Dhamma for the purpose of revulsion towards feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, for its fading away and cessation, one can be called a bhikkhu who is a speaker on the Dhamma.
“Bhikkhu, if one teaches the Dhamma for the purpose of revulsion towards form, for its fading away and cessation, one can be called a bhikkhu who is a speaker on the Dhamma.
“Bhikkhu, if one teaches the Dhamma for the purpose of revulsion towards the ear...
“Bhikkhu, if one teaches the Dhamma for the purpose of revulsion towards the eye, for its fading away and cessation, one can be called a bhikkhu who is a speaker on the Dhamma.
“Bhikkhu, in clinging one is bound by Mara; by not clinging one is freed from the Evil One.” 
“Bhikkhu, in conceiving one is bound by Mara; by not conceiving one is freed from the Evil One.”
“Bhikkhu, in seeking delight one is bound by Mara; by not seeking delight one is freed from the Evil One.”
“Bhikkhu, knowledge of suffering, knowledge of the origin of suffering, knowledge of the cessation of suffering, knowledge of the way leading to the cessation of suffering: this is called true knowledge, bhikkhu, and it is in this way that one has arrived at true knowledge.
“Bhikkhu, not knowing suffering, not knowing the origin of suffering, not knowing the cessation of suffering, not knowing the way leading to the cessation of suffering: this is called ignorance, bhikkhu, and it is in this way that one is immersed in ignorance.
“Bhikkhu, the light element is discerned in dependence on darkness.
“Bhikkhu, the Venerable Sariputta has thoroughly penetrated that element of the Dhamma by the thorough penetration of which, if I were to question him about that matter with various terms and with various methods for up to seven days and nights, for up to seven days and nights he would be able to answer me with various terms and with various methods.” 
“Bhikkhu, there is no form that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself.
“Bhikkhu, there is no form … no feeling … no perception … no volitional formations … no consciousness that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself.”
“Bhikkhu, there is no form, no feeling, no perception, no volitional formations, no consciousness that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself.”
“Bhikkhu, though someone might say: ‘Apart from form, apart from feeling, apart from perception, apart from volitional formations, I will make known the coming and going of consciousness, its passing away and rebirth, its growth, increase, and expansion’—that is impossible.
“Bhikkhu, when a bhikkhu knows and sees the eye as impermanent, ignorance is abandoned by him and true knowledge arises.
“Bhikkhu, when one knows and sees the eye as impermanent, identity view is abandoned.”… 
“Bhikkhu, when one knows and sees the eye as impermanent, ignorance is abandoned and true knowledge arises.
“Bhikkhu, when one knows and sees the eye as impermanent, the view of self is abandoned.”… 
“Bhikkhu, when one knows and sees the eye as impermanent, wrong view is abandoned.
“Bhikkhu, when one knows and sees the eye as nonself, the fetters are uprooted.
“Bhikkhu, when one knows and sees the eye as nonself, the underlying tendencies are uprooted.
“Bhikkhu, whether one says, ‘What now are volitional formations, and for whom are there these volitional formations?’ or whether one says, ‘Volitional formations are one thing, the one for whom there are these volitional formations is another’—both these assertions are identical in meaning; they differ only in the phrasing.
“Bhikkhu, whether one says, ‘What now is aging-and-death, and for whom is there this aging-and-death?’ or whether one says, ‘Aging-and-death is one thing, the one for whom there is this aging-and-death is another’—both these assertions are identical in meaning; they differ only in the phrasing.
“Bhikkhu, whether one says, ‘What now is birth, and for whom is there this birth?’ or whether one says, ‘Birth is one thing, the one for whom there is this birth is another’—both these assertions are identical in meaning; they differ only in the phrasing….
“Bhikkhu, whether one says, ‘What now is existence, and for whom is there this existence?’ or whether one says, ‘Existence is one thing, the one for whom there is this existence is another’—both these assertions are identical in meaning; they differ only in the phrasing….
“Bhikkhu, why don’t you recite Dhamma-stanzas, Living in communion with other bhikkhus?
“Bhikkhu, you should abandon desire for whatever appears tantalizing.”…
“Bhikkhu, you should abandon desire for whatever does not belong to self.”… 
“Bhikkhu, you should abandon desire for whatever is impermanent.”
“Bhikkhu, you should abandon desire for whatever is nonself.” … 
“Bhikkhu, you should abandon desire for whatever is suffering.” …
“Bhikkhunis, a noble disciple who possesses four things is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu might approach families with the thought: ‘When among others’ families, how could I possibly think: “May they give to me, not hold back!… May they give me respectfully, not casually!”?’
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu sees as impermanent form which is actually impermanent: that is his right view.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu sees as impermanent the ear which is actually impermanent… the mind which is actually impermanent: that is his right view….
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu sees as impermanent the eye which is actually impermanent: that is his right view.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should await his time mindful and clearly comprehending.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should dwell mindful and clearly comprehending.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should dwell mindful and clearly comprehending.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should dwell mindful and clearly comprehending.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should dwell mindful and clearly comprehending: this is our instruction to you.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should dwell mindful.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should dwell mindful.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu who is skilled in seven cases and a triple investigator is called, in this Dhamma and Discipline, a consummate one, one who has fully lived the holy life, the highest kind of person.
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu who is skilled in these seven cases and a triple investigator is called, in this Dhamma and Discipline, a consummate one, one who has fully lived the holy life, the highest kind of person.”
“Bhikkhus, a noble disciple who possesses four things has transcended all fear of a bad destination, of the nether world.
“Bhikkhus, a noble disciple who possesses four things has transcended all fear of a bad destination.
“Bhikkhus, a noble disciple who possesses four things is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.
“Bhikkhus, a noble disciple who possesses four things is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.
“Bhikkhus, a noble disciple who possesses four things is said to be rich, with much wealth and property, of great fame.
“Bhikkhus, a noble disciple who possesses four things is said to be rich, with much wealth and property.
“Bhikkhus, abandon desire and lust for form.
“Bhikkhus, all is burning.
“Bhikkhus, all is impermanent….
“Bhikkhus, all is subject to aging….
“Bhikkhus, all is subject to birth.
“Bhikkhus, all is weighed down.
“Bhikkhus, although a wheel-turning monarch, having exercised supreme sovereign rulership over the four continents, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world, in the company of the devas of the Tavatiṁsa realm, and there in the Nandana Grove, accompanied by a retinue of celestial nymphs, he enjoys himself supplied and endowed with the five cords of celestial sensual pleasure, still, as he does not possess four things, he is not freed from hell, the animal realm, and the domain of ghosts, not freed from the plane of misery, the bad destinations, the nether world.
“Bhikkhus, an instructed noble disciple does not think: ‘When what does not exist does what not come to be?
“Bhikkhus, an instructed noble disciple does not think: ‘When what exists does what come to be?
“Bhikkhus, as swift as that man is, still swifter are the sun and moon.
“Bhikkhus, as to external factors, I do not see any other factor that is so helpful for the arising of the seven factors of enlightenment as this: good friendship.
“Bhikkhus, as to internal factors, I do not see any other factor that is so helpful for the arising of the seven factors of enlightenment as this: careful attention.
“Bhikkhus, as to those ascetics and brahmins who do not understand these things, the origin of these things, the cessation of these things, and the way leading to the cessation of these things: what are those things that they do not understand, whose origin they do not understand, whose cessation they do not understand, and the way leading to whose cessation they do not understand?
“Bhikkhus, as to those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: it is impossible that they will abide having transcended aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, attend carefully to feeling … to perception … to volitional formations … to consciousness….
“Bhikkhus, attend carefully to form.
“Bhikkhus, attend carefully to the ear...
“Bhikkhus, attend carefully to the eye.
“Bhikkhus, based upon the Himalayas, the king of mountains, the nagas nurture their bodies and acquire strength.
“Bhikkhus, based upon the Himalayas, the king of mountains, the nagas nurture their bodies and acquire strength.
“Bhikkhus, before his enlightenment, while he was still a bodhisatta, not yet fully enlightened, it occurred to Vipassı̄, the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One: ‘Alas, this world has fallen into trouble, in that it is born, ages, and dies, it passes away and is reborn, yet it does not understand the escape from this suffering aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, before my enlightenment, while I was still a bodhisatta, not yet fully enlightened, it occurred to me: ‘Alas, this world has fallen into trouble, in that it is born, ages, and dies, it passes away and is reborn, yet it does not understand the escape from this suffering aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, before my enlightenment, while I was still a bodhisatta, not yet fully enlightened, it occurred to me: ‘Alas, this world has fallen into trouble, in that it is born, ages, and dies, it passes away and is reborn, yet it does not understand the escape from this suffering aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, before my enlightenment, while I was still a bodhisatta, not yet fully enlightened, it occurred to me: ‘What is the gratification, what is the danger, what is the escape in the case of form?
“Bhikkhus, before my enlightenment, while I was still a bodhisatta, not yet fully enlightened, it occurred to me: ‘What is the gratification, what is the danger, what is the escape in the case of the eye?
“Bhikkhus, before my enlightenment, while I was still a bodhisatta, not yet fully enlightened, it occurred to me: ‘What now is the cause and condition for the development of the bases for spiritual power?’
“Bhikkhus, before my enlightenment, while I was still a bodhisatta, not yet fully enlightened, it occurred to me: “What now is feeling?
“Bhikkhus, before my enlightenment, while I was still a bodhisatta, not yet fully enlightened, the thought occurred to me: ‘What is the path and practice for the development of the bases for spiritual power?’
“Bhikkhus, before my enlightenment, while I was still a bodhisatta, not yet perfectly enlightened, it occurred to me: ‘What is the gratification, what is the danger, what is the escape in the case of the earth element?
“Bhikkhus, being stirred is a disease, being stirred is a tumour, being stirred is a dart.
“Bhikkhus, being stirred is a disease, being stirred is a tumour, being stirred is a dart.
“Bhikkhus, by careful attention, by careful right striving, I have arrived at unsurpassed liberation, I have realized unsurpassed liberation.
“Bhikkhus, by directly knowing and fully understanding form, by becoming dispassionate towards it and abandoning it, one is capable of destroying suffering.
“Bhikkhus, by directly knowing and fully understanding the all, by developing dispassion towards it and abandoning it, one is capable of destroying suffering.
“Bhikkhus, by frequently giving attention to things that are a basis for sensual lust, unarisen sensual desire arises and arisen sensual desire increases and expands.
“Bhikkhus, by frequently giving attention to things that are a basis for the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, the unarisen enlightenment factor of mindfulness arises and the arisen enlightenment factor of mindfulness comes to fulfilment by development….
“Bhikkhus, by having developed and cultivated how many faculties does a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declare final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being’?”
“Bhikkhus, by having developed and cultivated how many faculties does a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declare final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being’?”
“Bhikkhus, by having developed and cultivated how many faculties does a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declare final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being’?”
“Bhikkhus, by having developed and cultivated how many faculties does a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declare final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being’?”
“Bhikkhus, by possessing three qualities, a bhikkhu lives full of happiness and joy in this very life, and he has laid a foundation  for the destruction of the taints.
“Bhikkhus, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life I enter and dwell in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for myself with direct knowledge.
“Bhikkhus, concentration by mindfulness of breathing, when developed and cultivated, is of great fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus, concentration by mindfulness of breathing, when developed and cultivated, leads to the abandoning of the fetters.”
“Bhikkhus, craving for forms is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for craving for forms … for craving for mental phenomena is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for eye-consciousness … for mind-consciousness is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for eye-contact … for mind-contact is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for feeling born of eye-contact … for feeling born of mind-contact is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for form … for feeling … for perception … for volitional formations … for consciousness is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for forms is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for perception of forms … for perception of mental phenomena is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for the earth element … for the water element … for the heat element … for the air element … for the space element … for the consciousness element is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for the eye is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, desire and lust for volition regarding forms … … for volition regarding mental phenomena is a corruption of the mind.
“Bhikkhus, Devadatta’s gain, honour, and praise arose to his own downfall and destruction.
“Bhikkhus, devas and humans delight in forms, take delight in forms, rejoice in forms.
“Bhikkhus, develop concentration.
“Bhikkhus, develop concentration.
“Bhikkhus, develop concentration.
“Bhikkhus, develop concentration.
“Bhikkhus, develop concentration.
“Bhikkhus, develop concentration.
“Bhikkhus, develop the path and the way that leads to the cessation of craving.
“Bhikkhus, develop the path and the way that leads to the destruction of craving.
“Bhikkhus, did you hear an old jackal howling at the flush of dawn?”
“Bhikkhus, did you hear an old jackal howling at the flush of dawn?”
“Bhikkhus, do not be envious of Devadatta’s gain, honour, and praise.
“Bhikkhus, do not engage in disputatious talk, saying: ‘You don’t understand this Dhamma and Discipline.
“Bhikkhus, do not engage in the various kinds of pointless talk, that is, talk about kings, thieves, and ministers of state; talk about armies, dangers, and wars; talk about food, drink, garments, and beds; talk about garlands and scents; talk about relations, vehicles, villages, towns, cities, and countries; talk about women and talk about heroes; street talk and talk by the well; talk about those departed in days gone by; rambling chitchat; speculation about the world and about the sea; talk about becoming this or that.
“Bhikkhus, do not reflect in an evil unwholesome way: ‘The world is eternal’ or ‘The world is not eternal’; or ‘The world is finite’ or ‘The world is infinite’; or ‘The soul and the body are the same’ or ‘The soul is one thing, the body is another’; or ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“Bhikkhus, do not think evil unwholesome thoughts; that is, sensual thought, thought of ill will, thought of harming.
“Bhikkhus, do you develop mindfulness of breathing?”
“Bhikkhus, do you remember the Four Noble Truths taught by me?”
“Bhikkhus, do you remember the Four Noble Truths taught by me?” 
“Bhikkhus, do you see any shaking or trembling in this bhikkhu’s body?”
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise, bitter, vile, obstructive to achieving the unsurpassed security from bondage.
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise, bitter, vile, obstructive to achieving the unsurpassed security from bondage.
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise, bitter, vile, obstructive to achieving the unsurpassed security from bondage.
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise....
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dreadful are gain, honour, and praise….
“Bhikkhus, dwell with your minds well established in the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, dwell with yourselves as an island, with yourselves as a refuge, with no other refuge; with the Dhamma as an island, with the Dhamma as a refuge, with no other refuge.
“Bhikkhus, even Vassa and Bañña of Ukkala, proponents of noncausality, of the inefficacy of action, and of nihilism, did not think that these three pathways of language, pathways of designation, pathways of description should be criticized or scorned.
“Bhikkhus, eye-consciousness is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, eye-contact is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, feeling born of eye-contact is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, for a clansman who has gone forth out of faith, this is what accords with the Dhamma: he should dwell contemplating impermanence in form … … he is freed from suffering, I say.”
“Bhikkhus, for a clansman who has gone forth out of faith, this is what accords with the Dhamma: he should dwell engrossed in revulsion towards form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, for the fool, hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving, this body has originated.
“Bhikkhus, for the fool, hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving, this body has thereby originated.
“Bhikkhus, for the wise man, hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving, this body has originated.
“Bhikkhus, for the wise man, hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving, this body has thereby originated.
“Bhikkhus, for those who look up at the crest of the standard of Sakka, lord of the devas; or of Pajapati, the deva-king; or of Varuṇa, the deva-king; or of Isana, the deva-king, whatever fear or trepidation or terror they may have may or may not be abandoned.
“Bhikkhus, form is burning, feeling is burning, perception is burning, volitional formations are burning, consciousness is burning.
“Bhikkhus, form is hot embers, feeling is hot embers, perception is hot embers, volitional formations are hot embers, consciousness is hot embers.
“Bhikkhus, form is impermanent, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“Bhikkhus, form is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, form is impermanent, feeling is impermanent, perception is impermanent, volitional formations are impermanent, consciousness is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, form is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, form is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, form is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, form is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, form is impermanent….
“Bhikkhus, form is nonself, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“Bhikkhus, form is nonself, feeling is nonself, perception is nonself, volitional formations are nonself, consciousness is nonself.
“Bhikkhus, form is nonself.
“Bhikkhus, form is nonself.
“Bhikkhus, form is nonself.
“Bhikkhus, form is suffering, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“Bhikkhus, form is suffering, feeling is suffering, perception is suffering, volitional formations are suffering, consciousness is suffering.
“Bhikkhus, form is suffering.
“Bhikkhus, form is suffering.
“Bhikkhus, forms are impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, forms are impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, forms are impermanent… mental phenomena are impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, forms are nonself … mental phenomena are nonself.
“Bhikkhus, forms are nonself.
“Bhikkhus, forms are suffering … mental phenomena are suffering.
“Bhikkhus, forms are suffering.
“Bhikkhus, forms...
“Bhikkhus, forms...
“Bhikkhus, forms...
“Bhikkhus, forms...
“Bhikkhus, forms...
“Bhikkhus, forms...
“Bhikkhus, gain, honour, and praise, I say, are an obstacle even for a bhikkhu who is an arahant, one with taints destroyed.”
“Bhikkhus, growing in five areas of growth, a woman noble disciple grows with a noble growth, and she acquires the essence, acquires the best, of this bodily existence.
“Bhikkhus, have you seen the picture called ‘Faring On’?” 
“Bhikkhus, I am freed from all snares, both celestial and human.
“Bhikkhus, I do not dispute with the world; rather, it is the world that disputes with me.
“Bhikkhus, I do not say of all bhikkhus that they still have work to do with diligence in regard to the six bases for contact, nor do I say of all bhikkhus that they do not have work to do with diligence in regard to the six bases for contact.
“Bhikkhus, I do not see any other order of living beings so diversified as those in the animal realm.
“Bhikkhus, I do not see even one other thing by means of which the unarisen Noble Eightfold Path arises and the arisen Noble Eightfold Path goes to fulfilment by development so effectively as by this: accomplishment in virtue...
“Bhikkhus, I do not see even one other thing by means of which the unarisen Noble Eightfold Path arises and the arisen Noble Eightfold Path goes to fulfilment by development so effectively as by this: accomplishment in virtue...
“Bhikkhus, I do not see even one other thing by means of which the unarisen Noble Eightfold Path arises and the arisen Noble Eightfold Path goes to fulfilment by development so effectively as by this: good friendship.
“Bhikkhus, I do not see even one other thing by means of which the unarisen Noble Eightfold Path arises and the arisen Noble Eightfold Path goes to fulfilment by development so effectively as by this: good friendship.
“Bhikkhus, I do not see even one other thing that, when developed and cultivated, leads to the abandoning of the things that fetter so effectively as this: the seven factors of enlightenment.
“Bhikkhus, I have been dwelling in part of the abode in which I dwelt just after I became fully enlightened.
“Bhikkhus, I have been dwelling in part of the abode in which I dwelt just after I became fully enlightened.
“Bhikkhus, I have spoken of two kinds of feelings by method of exposition….
“Bhikkhus, I say that the destruction of the taints is for one who knows and sees, not for one who does not know and does not see.
“Bhikkhus, I say that the destruction of the taints is for one who knows and sees, not for one who does not know and does not see.
“Bhikkhus, I say that the destruction of the taints is for one who knows and sees, not for one who does not know and does not see.
“Bhikkhus, I say that the end of the world cannot be known, seen, or reached by travelling.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the danger in form.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the danger in the earth element.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the danger in the eye.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the escape from form.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the escape from the earth element.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the escape from the eye.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the gratification in form.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the gratification in the earth element.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the gratification in the eye.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the gratification in … the danger in … the escape from feeling … from perception … from volitional formations … from consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the gratification in … the danger in … the escape from the ear … the nose … the tongue … the body … the mind.
“Bhikkhus, I set out seeking the gratification in … the danger in … the escape from the water element...
“Bhikkhus, I will exhort you by the example of Kassapa or one who is similar to Kassapa.
“Bhikkhus, I will exhort you by the example of Kassapa or one who is similar to Kassapa.
“Bhikkhus, I will exhort you by the example of Kassapa or one who is similar to Kassapa.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach the way that is suitable for attaining Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you a Dhamma exposition on the theme of burning.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you a Dhamma exposition on the theme of the hundred and eight.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you a Dhamma exposition on the theme of the one who declares the exertion to become secure from bondage.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you about one who dwells negligently, and about one who dwells diligently.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you about one who is subject to decline, about one who is not subject to decline, and about the six mastered bases.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you about the devas of the cloud-dwelling order.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you about the devas of the gandhabba order.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you agitation through clinging and nonagitation through nonclinging.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you agitation through clinging and nonagitation through nonclinging.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you asceticism and the fruits of asceticism.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you asceticism and the goal of asceticism.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you brahminhood and the fruits of brahminhood.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you brahminhood and the goal of brahminhood.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you dependent origination and dependently arisen phenomena.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you dependent origination and I will analyse it for you.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you dependent origination.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you forty-four cases of knowledge.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you identity, the origin of identity, the cessation of identity, and the way leading to the cessation of identity.”
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you misery and the root of misery.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you new and old kamma, the cessation of kamma, and the way leading to the cessation of kamma.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you noble right concentration with its supports and its accessories.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you restraint and nonrestraint.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you seven things that lead to nondecline.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you seventy-seven cases of knowledge.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you spiritual power, the basis for spiritual power, the development of the bases for spiritual power, and the way leading to the development of the bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the all.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the burden, the carrier of the burden,  the taking up of the burden, and the laying down of the burden.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the destination and the path leading to the destination.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the development of the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the Dhamma for abandoning all through direct knowledge and full understanding.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the Dhamma for abandoning all.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the Dhamma for the exhaustion of all clinging.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the Dhamma for the exhaustion of all clinging.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the Dhamma for the full understanding of all clinging.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the diversity of elements.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the diversity of elements.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the dyad.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the establishment of mindfulness, and the development of the establishment of mindfulness, and the way leading to the development of the establishment of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the five aggregates and the five aggregates subject to clinging.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the fragile and the unfragile.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the holy life and the fruits of the holy life.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the holy life and the goal of the holy life.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the inferior person and the one who is worse than the inferior person.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the inferior person and the superior person.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the Noble Eightfold Path and I will analyse it for you.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the nutriment and the denourishment in regard to the five hindrances and the seven factors of enlightenment.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the one practising wrongly and the one practising rightly.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the origin and the passing away of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the origin and the passing away of the world.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the origination and the passing away of the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the path crushing the army of Mara.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the path that partakes of penetration.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the seven factors of enlightenment.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the taintless and the path leading to the taintless.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the things that can be clung to and the clinging.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the things that can be clung to and the clinging.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the things that fetter and the fetter.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the things that fetter and the fetter.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the truth and the path leading to the truth….
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the unconditioned and the path leading to the unconditioned.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the unconditioned and the path leading to the unconditioned.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the unconditioned and the path leading to the unconditioned.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the uninclined and the path leading to the uninclined.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the way leading to the origination of identity and the way leading to the cessation of identity.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the way that is appropriate for uprooting all conceivings.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the way that is suitable for attaining Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the way that is suitable for uprooting all conceivings.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the way that is suitable for uprooting all conceivings.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the wrong way and the right way.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the wrong way and the right way.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you things that should be fully understood and also full understanding.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you things that should be fully understood, full understanding, and the person that has fully understood.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you unwholesome states and wholesome states.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you wrong practice and right practice.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you wrongness and rightness.
“Bhikkhus, I wish to go into seclusion for half a month.
“Bhikkhus, I wish to go into seclusion for three months.
“Bhikkhus, I wish to go into seclusion for three months.
“Bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu does not understand as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape, in the case of these six bases for contact, then he has not lived the holy life; he is far away from this Dhamma and Discipline.”
“Bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu gains concentration, gains one-pointedness of mind based upon desire, this is called concentration due to desire.
“Bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu has abandoned lust for the form element, with the abandoning of lust the basis is cut off: there is no support for the establishing of consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu has abandoned lust for the form element, with the abandoning of lust the basis is cut off: there is no support for the establishing of consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, if a person immersed in ignorance generates a meritorious volitional formation, consciousness fares on to the meritorious; if he generates a demeritorious volitional formation, consciousness fares on to the demeritorious; if he generates an imperturbable volitional formation, consciousness fares on to the imperturbable.
“Bhikkhus, if any bhikkhu understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering,’ and then an ascetic or brahmin comes along—whether from the east, the west, the north, or the south—seeking an argument, searching for an argument, thinking: ‘I will refute his thesis,’ it is impossible that he could make that bhikkhu shake, quake, or tremble.
“Bhikkhus, if anyone should speak thus: ‘Without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of suffering as it really is, without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the origin of suffering as it really is, without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the cessation of suffering as it really is, without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering as it really is, I will completely make an end to suffering’—this is impossible.
“Bhikkhus, if anyone should speak thus: ‘Without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of suffering as it really is, without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the origin of suffering as it really is, without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the cessation of suffering as it really is, without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering as it really is, I will completely make an end to suffering’—this is impossible.
“Bhikkhus, if gain, honour, and praise come upon a bhikkhu while he is a trainee, one who has not yet reached his mind’s ideal, this is an obstacle for him.
“Bhikkhus, if gain, honour, and praise come upon a bhikkhunı̄ while she is still a trainee, one who has not yet reached her mind’s ideal, this is an obstacle for her.
“Bhikkhus, if in any bhikkhu or bhikkhunı̄ desire or lust or hatred or delusion or aversion of mind should arise in regard to forms cognizable by the eye, such a one should rein in the mind from them thus: ‘This path is fearful, dangerous, strewn with thorns, covered by jungle, a  deviant path, an evil path, a way beset by scarcity.
“Bhikkhus, if one were to say of anything ‘a heap of the wholesome,’ it is about the four establishments of mindfulness that one could rightly say this.
“Bhikkhus, if one’s clothes or head were ablaze, what should be done about it?”
“Bhikkhus, if someone were to give away a hundred pots of food as charity in the morning, a hundred pots of food as charity at noon, and a hundred pots of food as charity in the evening, and if someone else were to develop a mind of lovingkindness even for the time it takes to pull a cow’s udder, either in the morning, at noon, or in the evening, this would be more fruitful than the former.
“Bhikkhus, if there were no gratification in feeling … in perception … in volitional formations … in consciousness, beings would not become enamoured with it … but because there is an escape from consciousness, beings escape from it.
“Bhikkhus, if there were no gratification in form, beings would not become enamoured with it; but because there is gratification in form, beings become enamoured with it.
“Bhikkhus, if there were no gratification in the ear … … in the nose … in the tongue … in the body … in the mind, beings would not become enamoured with it … but because there is an escape from the mind, beings escape from it.
“Bhikkhus, if there were no gratification in the earth element, beings would not become enamoured with it; but because there is gratification in the earth element, beings become enamoured with it.
“Bhikkhus, if there were no gratification in the eye, beings would not become enamoured with it; but because there is gratification in the eye, beings become enamoured with it.
“Bhikkhus, if there were no gratification in the water element … in the heat element...
“Bhikkhus, if this earth element were exclusively pleasurable, immersed in pleasure, steeped in pleasure, and if it were not steeped in suffering, beings would not experience revulsion towards it.
“Bhikkhus, if this earth element were exclusively suffering, immersed in suffering, steeped in suffering, and if it were not steeped in pleasure, beings would not become enamoured with it.
“Bhikkhus, if this water element were exclusively pleasurable … if this heat element were exclusively pleasurable … if this air element were exclusively pleasurable, immersed in pleasure, steeped in pleasure, and if it were not steeped in suffering, beings would not experience revulsion towards it.
“Bhikkhus, if this water element were exclusively suffering … if this heat element were exclusively suffering … if this air element were exclusively suffering, immersed in suffering, steeped in suffering, and if it was not steeped in pleasure, beings would not become enamoured with it.
“Bhikkhus, if wanderers of other sects ask you: ‘For what purpose, friends, is the holy life lived under the ascetic Gotama?’—being asked thus, you should answer them thus: ‘It is, friends, for the abandoning of the fetters...
“Bhikkhus, if wanderers of other sects ask you: ‘For what purpose, friends, is the holy life lived under the ascetic Gotama?’—being asked thus, you should answer them thus: ‘It is, friends, for the fading away of lust that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.’
“Bhikkhus, if wanderers of other sects ask you: ‘For what purpose, friends, is the holy life lived under the ascetic Gotama?’—being asked thus, you should answer those wanderers thus: ‘It is, friends, for the full understanding of suffering that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.’
“Bhikkhus, if wanderers of other sects ask you: ‘In what dwelling, friends, did the Blessed One generally dwell during the rains residence?’—being asked thus, you should answer those wanderers thus: ‘During the rains residence, friends, the Blessed One generally dwelt in the concentration by mindfulness of breathing.’
“Bhikkhus, ignorance is the forerunner in the entry upon unwholesome states, with shamelessness and fearlessness of wrongdoing following along.
“Bhikkhus, in dependence on an element there arises a perception, there arises a view, there arises a thought.” 
“Bhikkhus, in regard to forms cognizable by the eye, if in any bhikkhu or bhikkhunı̄ lust does not exist and has been abandoned, if hatred does not exist and has been abandoned, if delusion does not exist and has been abandoned, then even prominent forms that enter into range of the eye do not obsess the mind, not to speak of those that are trifling.
“Bhikkhus, in regard to forms cognizable by the eye, if in any bhikkhu or bhikkhunı̄ lust still exists and has not been abandoned, if hatred still exists and has not been abandoned, if delusion still exists and has not been abandoned, then even trifling forms that enter into range of the eye obsess the mind, not to speak of those that are prominent.
“Bhikkhus, in the evening the lion, the king of beasts, comes out from his lair.
“Bhikkhus, in the Himalayas, the king of mountains, there are rugged and uneven zones where neither monkeys nor human beings can go; there are rugged and uneven zones where monkeys can go but not human beings; there are even and delightful regions where both monkeys and human beings can go.
“Bhikkhus, in the past a tortoise was searching for food along the bank of a river one evening.
“Bhikkhus, in the past, when Sakka, lord of the devas, was a human being, he adopted and undertook seven vows by the undertaking of which he achieved the status of Sakka.
“Bhikkhus, in the past, when Sakka, lord of the devas, was a human being, he adopted and undertook seven vows by the undertaking of which he achieved the status of Sakka….”
“Bhikkhus, in the past, when Sakka, lord of the devas, was a human being, he gave a rest house; therefore he is called Vasava.
“Bhikkhus, in the past, when Sakka, lord of the devas, was a human being, he gave gifts considerately; therefore he is called Sakka.
“Bhikkhus, in the past, when Sakka, lord of the devas, was a human being, he gave gifts in city after city; therefore he is called Purindada, the Urban Giver.
“Bhikkhus, in the past, when Sakka, lord of the devas, was a human being, he was a brahmin youth named Magha; therefore he is called Maghava.
“Bhikkhus, is there a method by means of which a bhikkhu who is a trainee, standing on the plane of a trainee, might understand: ‘I am a trainee,’ while a bhikkhu who is one beyond training, standing on the plane of one beyond training, might understand: ‘I am one beyond training’?”
“Bhikkhus, is there a method of exposition by means of which the five faculties become the five powers and the five powers become the five faculties?”
“Bhikkhus, it is a gain for you, it is well gained by you, that you have obtained the opportunity for living the holy life.
“Bhikkhus, it is because he has developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power that a bhikkhu, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.
“Bhikkhus, it is because one has developed and cultivated the seven factors of enlightenment that one is called ‘prosperous.’
“Bhikkhus, it is because one has developed and cultivated the seven factors of enlightenment that one is called ‘wise and alert.’
“Bhikkhus, it is because one has not developed and cultivated the seven factors of enlightenment that one is called ‘an unwise dolt.’
“Bhikkhus, it is because one has not developed and cultivated the seven factors of enlightenment that one is called ‘poor.’
“Bhikkhus, it is by possessing these three qualities that a bhikkhu lives full of happiness and joy in this very life, and he has laid the foundation for the destruction of the taints.”
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite: those of a good disposition come together and unite with those of a good disposition.
“Bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite: those of an inferior disposition come together and unite with those of an inferior disposition.
“Bhikkhus, it is in dependence on the diversity of elements that there arises the diversity of contacts.
“Bhikkhus, it is in dependence on the diversity of elements that there arises the diversity of contacts.
“Bhikkhus, it is in dependence on the diversity of elements that there arises the diversity of contacts; in dependence on the diversity of contacts that there arises the diversity of feelings.
“Bhikkhus, it is in dependence on the diversity of elements that there arises the diversity of contacts; in dependence on the diversity of contacts that there arises the diversity of feelings.
“Bhikkhus, it is in dependence on the diversity of elements that there arises the diversity of perceptions …  … in dependence on the diversity of quests that there arises the diversity of gains.
“Bhikkhus, it is in dependence on the diversity of elements that there arises the diversity of perceptions …...
“Bhikkhus, it is in dependence on the diversity of elements that there arises the diversity of perceptions; in dependence on the diversity of perceptions that there arises the diversity of intentions; in dependence on the diversity of intentions that there arises the diversity of desires; in dependence on the diversity of desires that there arises the diversity of passions; in dependence on the diversity of passions that there arises the diversity of quests.
“Bhikkhus, it is not because of the power of beauty, or the power of wealth, or the power of relatives, or the power of sons, that with the breakup of the body, after death, a woman is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
“Bhikkhus, just as a blue, red, or white lotus is born in the water and grows up in the water, but having risen up above the water, it stands unsullied by the water, so too the Tathagata was born in the world and grew up in the world, but having overcome the world, he dwells unsullied by the world.” 
“Bhikkhus, just as a pot that has been turned upside down gives up its water and does not take it back, so a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path gives up evil unwholesome states and does not take them back.
“Bhikkhus, just as a pot without a stand is easily knocked over, while one with a stand is difficult to knock over, so the mind without a stand is easily knocked over, while the mind with a stand is difficult to knock over.
“Bhikkhus, just as a pot...
“Bhikkhus, just as a stick thrown up into the air falls now on its bottom, now on its top, so too as beings roam and wander on, hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving, now they go from this world to the other world, now they come from the other world to this world.
“Bhikkhus, just as all petty princes are the vassals of a wheel-turning monarch, and the wheel-turning monarch is declared to be their chief, so too...”
“Bhikkhus, just as all the rafters of a peaked house lead to the roof peak and converge upon the root peak, and all are removed when the roof peak is removed, so too all unwholesome states are rooted in ignorance and converge upon ignorance, and all are uprooted when ignorance is uprooted.
“Bhikkhus, just as all the rafters of a peaked house lean towards the roof peak, slope towards the roof peak, converge upon the roof peak, and the roof peak is declared to be their chief, so too...” 
“Bhikkhus, just as all the rafters of a peaked house slant, slope, and incline towards the roof peak, so too, when a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the seven factors of enlightenment, he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as among animals the lion, the king of beasts, is declared to be their chief, that is, with respect to strength, speed, and courage, so too, among the states conducive to enlightenment the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief, that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.
“Bhikkhus, just as among fragrant heartwoods red sandalwood is declared to be their chief, so too, among the states conducive to enlightenment the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief, that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.
“Bhikkhus, just as heat is generated and fire is produced from the conjunction and friction of two fire-sticks, but when the sticks are separated and laid aside the resultant heat ceases and subsides;  so too, these three feelings are born of contact, rooted in contact, with contact as their source and condition.
“Bhikkhus, just as heat is generated and fire is produced from the conjunction and friction of two fire-sticks, but when the sticks are separated and laid aside the resultant heat ceases and subsides; so too, in dependence on a contact to be experienced as pleasant … … a contact to be experienced as painful … a contact to be experienced joyously … a contact to be experienced with displeasure … a contact to be experienced with equanimity, the equanimity faculty arises….
“Bhikkhus, just as heat is generated and fire is produced from the conjunction and friction of two fire-sticks, but with the separation and laying aside of the sticks the resultant heat ceases and subsides; so too, in dependence on a contact to be experienced as pleasant…acontact to be experienced as painful…a contact to be experienced as neither-painful-nor-pleasant, a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling arises….
“Bhikkhus, just as in the autumn, when the sky is clear and cloudless, the sun, ascending in the sky, dispels all darkness from space as it shines and beams and radiates, so too …” 
“Bhikkhus, just as in the place where these great rivers meet and converge—namely, the Ganges, the Yamuna, the Aciravati, the Sarabhū, and the Mahi—it is not easy to take the measure of the water there thus: ‘There are so many gallons of water’ … but rather it is reckoned as an incalculable, immeasurable, great mass of water; so too, when a noble disciple possesses these four streams of merit … it is reckoned as an incalculable, immeasurable, great mass of merit.”
“Bhikkhus, just as it is easy for burglars to assail those families that have many women and few men, so too it is easy for nonhuman beings to assail a bhikkhu who has not developed and cultivated the liberation of mind by lovingkindness.
“Bhikkhus, just as it is not easy to take the measure of the water in the great ocean thus: ‘There are so many gallons of water,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of gallons of water,’ or ‘There are so many thousands of gallons of water,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of thousands of gallons of water,’ but rather it is reckoned as an incalculable, immeasurable, great mass of water; so too, when a noble disciple possesses these four streams of merit … it is reckoned as an incalculable, immeasurable, great mass of merit.”
“Bhikkhus, just as the footprints of all living beings that walk fit into the footprint of the elephant, and the elephant’s footprint is declared to be the chief among them, that is, with respect to size, so too whatever wholesome states there are, they are all rooted in diligence, converge upon diligence, and diligence is declared to be the chief among them.
“Bhikkhus, just as the footprints of all living beings that walk fit into the footprint of the elephant, and the elephant’s footprint is declared to be their chief by reason of its size, so too, among the steps that lead to enlightenment, the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief, that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.
“Bhikkhus, just as the radiance of all the stars does not amount to a sixteenth part of the radiance of the moon, and the radiance of the moon is declared to be their chief, so too...”
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the five powers slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the five powers slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the five spiritual faculties slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the five spiritual faculties slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the four bases for spiritual power slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the four establishments of mindfulness slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the four jhanas slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the four right strivings slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the seven factors of enlightenment slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges slants...
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Ganges … … whatever great rivers there are … all slant, slope, and incline towards the ocean, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
“Bhikkhus, just as the river Yamuna...
“Bhikkhus, just as this body, sustained by nutriment, subsists in dependence on nutriment and does not subsist without nutriment, so too the five hindrances, sustained by nutriment, subsist in dependence on nutriment and do not subsist without nutriment.
“Bhikkhus, just as this body, sustained by nutriment, subsists in dependence on nutriment and does not subsist without nutriment, so too the seven factors of enlightenment, sustained by nutriment, subsist in dependence on nutriment and do not subsist without nutriment.
“Bhikkhus, just as various winds blow in the sky: winds from the east, winds from the west, winds from the north, winds from the south, dusty winds and dustless winds, cold winds and hot winds, mild winds and strong winds; so too, various feelings arise in this body: pleasant feeling arises, painful feeling arises, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling arises.”
“Bhikkhus, just as various winds blow in the sky—easterly winds, westerly winds, northerly winds, southerly winds, dusty winds and dustless winds, cold winds and hot winds, gentle winds and strong winds —so too, when a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path, then for him the four establishments of mindfulness go to fulfilment by development; the four right strivings go to fulfilment by development; the four bases for spiritual power go to fulfilment by development; the five spiritual faculties go to fulfilment by development; the five powers go to fulfilment by development; the seven factors of enlightenment go to fulfilment by development.
“Bhikkhus, just as whatever kinds of seed and plant life attain to growth, increase, and expansion, all do so based upon the earth, established upon the earth, so too, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path, and thereby he attains to growth, increase, and expansion in states.
“Bhikkhus, just as whatever strenuous deeds are done, are all done based upon the earth, established upon the earth, so too, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the four right strivings.
“Bhikkhus, just as whatever strenuous deeds are done, are all done based upon the earth, established upon the earth, so too, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path.
“Bhikkhus, just as whatever strenuous deeds are done...”
“Bhikkhus, just as, among the trees of Jambudipa the rose-apple tree is declared to be their chief, so too, among the states conducive to enlightenment the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief, that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.
“Bhikkhus, just as, among the trees of the asuras the trumpet-flower tree is declared to be their chief, so too, among the states conducive to enlightenment the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief … … that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.”
“Bhikkhus, just as, among the trees of the supaṇṇas the silk-cotton tree is declared to be their chief, so too, among the states conducive to enlightenment the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief …  … that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.”
“Bhikkhus, just as, among the trees of the Tavatiṁsa devas the coral tree is declared to be their chief, so too, among the states conducive to enlightenment the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief, that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.
“Bhikkhus, just as, in the last month of the hot season, when a mass of dust and dirt has swirled up, a great rain cloud out of season disperses it and quells it on the spot; so too, when a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path, whenever evil unwholesome states arise, he disperses them and quells them on the spot.
“Bhikkhus, just as, of all fragrant flowers, the jasmine is declared to be their chief, so too...”
“Bhikkhus, just as, of all fragrant heartwoods, red sandalwood is declared to be their chief, so too...”
“Bhikkhus, just as, of all fragrant roots, black orris is declared to be their chief, so too...”
“Bhikkhus, just as, of all woven cloths, Kasian cloth is declared to be their chief, so too whatever wholesome states there are, they are all rooted in diligence, converge upon diligence, and diligence is declared to be the chief among them.
“Bhikkhus, just as, when a great rain cloud has arisen, a strong wind intercedes to disperse and quell it; so too, when a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path, whenever evil unwholesome states have arisen, he intercedes to disperse and quell them.
“Bhikkhus, just as, when rain pours down in thick droplets on a mountain top, the water flows down along the slope and fills the cleft, gullies, and creeks; these being filled fill up the pools; these being filled fill up the lakes; these being filled fill up the streams; these being filled fill up the rivers; and these being filled fill up the great ocean; so too, for a noble disciple, these things—confirmed confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, and the virtues dear to the noble ones—flow onwards and, having gone beyond, they lead to the destruction of the taints.” 
“Bhikkhus, Kassapa approaches families like the moon—drawing back the body and mind, always acting like a newcomer, without impudence towards families.
“Bhikkhus, Kassapa approaches families with such a thought….
“Bhikkhus, Kassapa teaches the Dhamma to others with the thought: ‘The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One….
“Bhikkhus, King Ajatasattu of Magadha has evil friends, evil companions, evil comrades.
“Bhikkhus, make an exertion in seclusion.
“Bhikkhus, make an exertion in seclusion.
“Bhikkhus, make an exertion in seclusion.
“Bhikkhus, make an exertion in seclusion.
“Bhikkhus, make an exertion in seclusion.
“Bhikkhus, many aeons have elapsed and gone by.
“Bhikkhus, mindfulness of breathing, when developed and cultivated, is of great fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus, mindfulness of breathing, when developed and cultivated, is of great fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus, now the bhikkhus dwell using blocks of wood as cushions; they are diligent and ardent in striving.
“Bhikkhus, now the Licchavis dwell using blocks of wood as cushions; they are diligent and ardent in exercise.
“Bhikkhus, on one occasion I was dwelling at Uruvela on the bank of the river Nerañjara under the Goatherd’s Banyan Tree just after I became fully enlightened.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past a cat stood by an alley or a drain or a rubbish bin watching for a little mouse, thinking: ‘When this little mouse comes out for food, right there I will grab it and eat it.’
“Bhikkhus, once in the past a certain man set out from Rajagaha and went to the Sumagadha Lotus Pond, thinking: ‘I will reflect about the world.’  He then sat down on the bank of the Sumagadha Lotus Pond reflecting about the world.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past a hawk suddenly swooped down and seized a quail.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past a number of seers who were virtuous and of good character had settled down in leaf huts along the shore of the ocean.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past a number of seers who were virtuous and of good character had settled down in leaf huts in a tract of forest.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past an acrobat set up his bamboo pole and addressed his apprentice Medakathalika thus: ‘Come, dear Medakathalika, climb the bamboo pole and stand on my shoulders.’
“Bhikkhus, once in the past in this same Rajagaha there was a poor man, a pauper, an indigent.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past Sakka, lord of the devas, instructing the Tavatiṁsa devas in the Sudhamma assembly hall, on that occasion recited this verse:
“Bhikkhus, once in the past the asuras marched against the devas.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past the Dasarahas had a kettle drum called the Summoner.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past the devas and the asuras were arrayed for battle.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past the devas and the asuras were arrayed for battle.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past the devas and the asuras were arrayed for battle.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past there was a great lake in a forest, with bull elephants dwelling in its vicinity.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past there was a king name Aruṇava whose capital was named Aruṇavati.
“Bhikkhus, once in the past, when Sakka, lord of the devas, was alone in seclusion, the following reflection arose in his mind: ‘Though someone may be my sworn enemy, I should not transgress even against him.’
“Bhikkhus, one might look on equanimously at one’s blazing clothes or head, paying no attention to them, but so long as one has not made the breakthrough to the Four Noble Truths as they really are, in order to make the breakthrough one should arouse extraordinary desire, make an extraordinary effort, stir up zeal and enthusiasm, be unremitting, and exercise mindfulness and clear comprehension.
“Bhikkhus, one thing is very helpful for the arising of the Noble Eightfold Path.
“Bhikkhus, one thing is very helpful for the arising of the Noble Eightfold Path.
“Bhikkhus, one thing is very helpful for the arising of the Noble Eightfold Path.
“Bhikkhus, one thing is very helpful for the arising of the Noble Eightfold Path.
“Bhikkhus, one thing, when developed and cultivated, is of great fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus, one who does not know and see as it really is aging-and-death … volitional formations, their origin, their cessation, and the way leading to their cessation, should make an exertion … arouse a desire … arouse enthusiasm … be unremitting … arouse ardour … apply energy … practise perseverance … practise mindfulness … practise clear comprehension … practise diligence in order to know this as it really is.”
“Bhikkhus, one who does not know and see as it really is aging-and-death … volitional formations, their origin, their cessation, and the way leading to their cessation, should practise the training in order to know this as it really is.”
“Bhikkhus, one who does not know and see as it really is aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation, should search for a teacher in order to know this as it really is.
“Bhikkhus, one who does not know and see as it really is birth … existence … clinging … craving … feeling … contact...
“Bhikkhus, one who is engaged is unliberated; one who is disengaged is liberated.
“Bhikkhus, one who seeks delight in form seeks delight in suffering.
“Bhikkhus, one who seeks delight in the earth element seeks delight in suffering.
“Bhikkhus, one who seeks delight in the eye seeks delight in suffering.
“Bhikkhus, perception of forms is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, possessing the ten powers and the four grounds of self-confidence, the Tathagata claims the place of the chief bull of the herd, roars his lion’s roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Brahma-wheel thus:  ‘Such is form, such its origin, such its passing away; such is feeling, such its origin, such its passing away; such is perception, such its origin, such its passing away; such are volitional formations, such their origin, such their passing away; such is consciousness, such its origin, such its passing away.
“Bhikkhus, possessing the ten powers and the four grounds of self-confidence, the Tathagata claims the place of the chief bull of the herd, roars his lion’s roar in the assemblies, and sets rolling the Brahma-wheel thus: ‘Such is form......
“Bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, exercises supreme sovereignty and rulership over the Tavatiṁsa devas; therefore he is called lord of the devas.
“Bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, thinks of a thousand matters in a moment; therefore he is called Sahassakkha, Thousand-eyed.
“Bhikkhus, Sakka’s wife is the asura maiden named Suja; therefore he is called Sujampati, Suja’s husband.
“Bhikkhus, sensual thought arises with a source, not without a source; thought of ill will arises with a source, not without a source; thought of harming arises with a source, not without a source.
“Bhikkhus, so long as noble knowledge has not arisen in the noble disciple, there is as yet no stability of the four faculties, no steadiness of the four faculties.
“Bhikkhus, so long as the sun and moon have not arisen in the world, for just so long there is no manifestation of great light and radiance, but then blinding darkness prevails, a dense mass of darkness; for just so long day and night are not discerned, the month and fortnight are not discerned, the seasons and the year are not discerned.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a fisherman would cast a baited hook into a deep lake, and a fish on the lookout for food would swallow it.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a foolish, incompetent, unskilful cook were to present a king or a royal minister with various kinds of curries: sour, bitter, pungent, sweet, sharp, mild, salty, bland.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a man were to cut up whatever grass, sticks, branches, and foliage there is in this Jambudipa and collect them into a single heap.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a man would throw a yoke with a single hole into the great ocean, and there was a blind turtle which would come to the surface once every hundred years.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a sheaf of barley were set down at a crossroads.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a spike of rice or a spike of barley were rightly directed and were pressed upon by the hand or the foot.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a spike of rice or a spike of barley were rightly directed and were pressed upon by the hand or the foot.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a spike of rice or a spike of barley were wrongly directed and were pressed upon by the hand or the foot.
“Bhikkhus, suppose a tree were slanting, sloping, and inclining towards the east.
“Bhikkhus, suppose in a house or hall with a peaked roof, opposite a window facing east, the sun was rising.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a man would draw out two or three drops of water from the great ocean.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a man would draw out two or three drops of water from the great ocean.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a man would place on Sineru, the king of mountains, seven grains of gravel the size of mung beans.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a man would place on Sineru, the king of mountains, seven grains of gravel the size of mung beans.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a man would place on the Himalayas, the king of mountains, seven grains of gravel the size of mustard seeds.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a man would place on the Himalayas, the king of mountains, seven grains of gravel the size of mustard seeds.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a man would place seven little balls of clay the size of jujube kernels on the great earth.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that a man would place seven little balls of clay the size of jujube kernels on the great earth.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that in the place where these great rivers meet and converge—that is, the Ganges, the Yamuna, the Aciravati, the Sarabhū, and the Mahı̄—a man would draw out two or three drops of water.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that in the place where these great rivers meet and converge—that is, the Ganges, the Yamuna, the Aciravati, the Sarabhū, and the Mahı̄—their water would be destroyed and eliminated except for two or three drops.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that in the place where these great rivers meet and converge—that is, the Ganges, the Yamuna, the Aciravati, the Sarabhū, and the Mahi—a man would draw out two or three drops of water.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that in the place where these great rivers meet and converge—that is, the Ganges, the Yamuna, the Aciravati, the Sarabhū, and the Mahi—their water would be destroyed and eliminated except for two or three drops.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that on hearing, ‘The most beautiful girl of the land!
“Bhikkhus, suppose that Sineru, the king of mountains, would be destroyed and eliminated except for seven grains of gravel the size of mung beans.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that the great earth would be destroyed and eliminated except for seven little balls of clay the size of jujube kernels.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that the great earth would be destroyed and eliminated except for seven little balls of clay the size of jujube kernels.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that the great ocean would be destroyed and eliminated except for two or three drops of water.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that the great ocean would be destroyed and eliminated except for two or three drops of water.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that the Himalayas, the king of mountains, would be destroyed and eliminated except for seven grains of gravel the size of mustard seeds.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that the Himalayas, the king of mountains, would be destroyed and eliminated except for seven grains of gravel the size of mustard seeds.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that this great earth had become one mass of water, and a man would throw a yoke with a single hole upon it.
“Bhikkhus, suppose that this river Ganges was carrying along a great lump of foam.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there is a guest house.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there is a guest house.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there was a mountain river sweeping downwards, flowing into the distance with a swift current.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there was a pond fifty yojanas long, fifty yojanas wide, and fifty yojanas deep, full of water, overflowing so that a crow could drink from it, and a man would draw out some water from it on the tip of a blade of kusa grass.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there was a sharp-pointed spear, and a man would come along thinking: ‘I will bend back this sharp-pointed spear with my hand or fist, twist it out of shape, and twirl it around.’
“Bhikkhus, suppose there were a man with a life span of a hundred years, who could live a hundred years.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there were a pond fifty yojanas long, fifty yojanas wide, and fifty yojanas deep, full of water, overflowing so that a crow could drink from it, and a man would draw out some water from it on the tip of a blade of kusa grass.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there were a seafaring ship bound with rigging that had been worn out in the water for six months.
“Bhikkhus, suppose there were four firm-bowed archers, trained, dexterous, experienced, standing in each of the four directions.
“Bhikkhus, that bhikkhu gains at will, without trouble or difficulty, that concentration through the development and cultivation of which no shaking or trembling occurs in the body, and no shaking or trembling occurs in the mind.
“Bhikkhus, that clinging is neither the same as these five aggregates subject to clinging, nor is the clinging something apart from the five aggregates subject to clinging.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of craving for forms … of craving for mental phenomena is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of eye-consciousness … of mind-consciousness is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of eye-contact … of mind-contact is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of feeling born of eye-contact … of feeling born of mind-contact is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of form is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of form … of feeling … of perception … of volitional formations … of consciousness is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of forms … of sounds … of odours … of tastes … of tactile objects … of mental phenomena is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of perception of forms … of perception of mental phenomena is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of the earth element is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of the earth element … of the water element … of the heat element … of the air element … of the space element … of the consciousness element is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of the eye is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of the eye is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the arising, continuation, production, and manifestation of volition regarding forms … of volition regarding mental phenomena is the arising of suffering, the continuation of disease, the manifestation of aging-and-death.
“Bhikkhus, the bhikkhu Moggallana, desiring to stir up a sense of urgency in you, made the Mansion of Migara’s Mother shake, quake, and tremble with his toe.
“Bhikkhus, the brahmins proclaim a way called ‘going upwards.’
“Bhikkhus, the clansman Puṇṇa was wise.
“Bhikkhus, the Dhamma has thus been well expounded by me, elucidated, disclosed, revealed, stripped of patchwork.
“Bhikkhus, the earth element is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is impermanent, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is impermanent...
“Bhikkhus, the eye is nonself … the mind is nonself.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is nonself, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is nonself.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is nonself.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is suffering … the mind is suffering.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is suffering, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is suffering.
“Bhikkhus, the eye is suffering.
“Bhikkhus, the eye … the mind of the future will be impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, the eye … the mind of the past was impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, the eye … the mind of the present is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, the eye...
“Bhikkhus, the eye...
“Bhikkhus, the eye...
“Bhikkhus, the eye...
“Bhikkhus, the eye...
“Bhikkhus, the eye...
“Bhikkhus, the eye...
“Bhikkhus, the four stations of consciousness should be seen as like the earth element.
“Bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple understands as it really is the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.”
“Bhikkhus, the lay follower Dighavu was wise.
“Bhikkhus, the ocean receding causes the rivers to recede; the rivers receding cause the streams to recede; the streams receding cause the lakes to recede; the lakes receding cause the pools to recede.
“Bhikkhus, the ocean surging causes the rivers to surge; the rivers surging cause the streams to surge; the streams surging cause the lakes to surge; the lakes surging cause the pools to surge.
“Bhikkhus, the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, liberated by nonclinging through revulsion towards form, through its fading away and cessation, is called a Perfectly Enlightened One.
“Bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling does not understand as it really is the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling does not understand as it really is the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling feels a pleasant feeling, a painful feeling, and a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“Bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling might experience revulsion towards this body composed of the four great elements; he might become dispassionate towards it and be liberated from it.
“Bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling speaks of ‘the ocean, the ocean.’
“Bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling speaks of ‘the ocean, the ocean.’
“Bhikkhus, there are five kinds of suffering peculiar to women, which women experience but not men.
“Bhikkhus, there are five powers of a woman.
“Bhikkhus, there are five powers of a woman…....
“Bhikkhus, there are five powers of a woman…....
“Bhikkhus, there are five situations that are difficult to obtain for a woman who has not done merit.
“Bhikkhus, there are five situations that are easy to obtain for a woman who has done merit.
“Bhikkhus, there are forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“Bhikkhus, there are forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“Bhikkhus, there are huge trees with tiny seeds and huge bodies, encirclers of other trees, and the trees which they encircle become bent, twisted, and split.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five aggregates subject to clinging.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five aggregates subject to clinging.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five aggregates subject to clinging.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five aggregates subject to clinging.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five aggregates subject to clinging.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five cords of sensual pleasure.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five corruptions of gold, corrupted by which gold is neither malleable nor wieldy nor radiant but brittle and not properly fit for work.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five higher fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five hindrances.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five kinds of seeds.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five lower fetters.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five obstructions, hindrances, corruptions of the mind, weakeners of wisdom.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five powers of a woman … the power of virtue.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five powers of a woman.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five powers of a woman...
“Bhikkhus, there are these five powers.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four bonds.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four divine tracks of the devas for the purification of beings who have not been purified, for the cleansing of beings who have not been cleansed.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four divine tracks of the devas for the purification of beings who have not been purified, for the cleansing of beings who have not been cleansed.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four elements.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four elements.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four elements.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four factors for stream-entry.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four floods.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four floods.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four jhanas.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of clinging?
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of meditators.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that have already come to be and for the assistance of those about to come to be.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that have already come to be and for the assistance of those about to come to be.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that have already come to be and for the assistance of those about to come to be.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four kinds of nutriment for the maintenance of beings that have already come to be and for the assistance of those about to come to be.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four knots.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four modes of generation of nagas.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four modes of generation of nagas….
“Bhikkhus, there are these four modes of generation of supaṇṇas.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four modes of generation of supaṇṇas….
“Bhikkhus, there are these Four Noble Truths.
“Bhikkhus, there are these Four Noble Truths.
“Bhikkhus, there are these Four Noble Truths.
“Bhikkhus, there are these Four Noble Truths.
“Bhikkhus, there are these Four Noble Truths.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four portions.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four streams of merit, streams of the wholesome, nutriments of happiness.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four streams of merit, streams of the wholesome, nutriments of happiness.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four streams of merit, streams of the wholesome, nutriments of happiness.
“Bhikkhus, there are these four streams of merit.… What four?
“Bhikkhus, there are these four streams of merit.… What four?
“Bhikkhus, there are these seven elements.
“Bhikkhus, there are these seven underlying tendencies.
“Bhikkhus, there are these six faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these six faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these six faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these six faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these six faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three discriminations.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three faculties.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three feelings.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three feelings.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three feelings.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three feelings.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three feelings.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three feelings.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three feelings.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three feelings.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three feelings.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three kinds of barrenness.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three kinds of craving.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three kinds of existence.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three kinds of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three kinds of thirst.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three kinds of trouble.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three searches.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three searches.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three searches.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three searches.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three searches.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three searches.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three stains.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three taints.
“Bhikkhus, there are these three taints.
“Bhikkhus, there are two kinds of fools: one who does not see a transgression as a transgression; and one who, when another is confessing a transgression, does not pardon him in accordance with the Dhamma.
“Bhikkhus, there are world interstices, vacant and abysmal regions of blinding darkness and gloom, where the light of the sun and moon, so powerful and mighty, does not reach.”
“Bhikkhus, there exists a hell named the Great Conflagration.
“Bhikkhus, there is carnal rapture, there is spiritual rapture, there is rapture more spiritual than the spiritual.
“Bhikkhus, there may be alteration in the four great elements … but there cannot be alteration in the noble disciple who possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones.
“Bhikkhus, there may be alteration in the four great elements—in the earth element, the water element, the heat element, the air element—but there cannot be alteration in the noble disciple who possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha.
“Bhikkhus, these are these Four Noble Truths.
“Bhikkhus, these eight things, developed and cultivated, if unarisen do not arise apart from the appearance of a Tathagata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
“Bhikkhus, these eight things, developed and cultivated, if unarisen do not arise apart from the Discipline of a Fortunate One.
“Bhikkhus, these eight things, purified, cleansed, flawless, free from corruptions, if unarisen do not arise apart from the appearance of a Tathagata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
“Bhikkhus, these eight things, purified, cleansed, flawless, free from corruptions, if unarisen do not arise apart from the Discipline of a Fortunate One.
“Bhikkhus, these eight things, when developed and cultivated, lead to going beyond from the near shore to the far shore.
“Bhikkhus, these five faculties, developed and cultivated, if unarisen do not arise apart from the appearance of a Tathagata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
“Bhikkhus, these five faculties, developed and cultivated, if unarisen do not arise apart from the Discipline of a Fortunate One.
“Bhikkhus, these five faculties, when developed and cultivated, lead to the abandoning of the fetters.
“Bhikkhus, these five faculties, when developed and cultivated, lead to the destruction of the taints.
“Bhikkhus, these five faculties, when developed and cultivated, lead to the full understanding of the course.
“Bhikkhus, these five faculties, when developed and cultivated, lead to the uprooting of the underlying tendencies.
“Bhikkhus, these five hindrances are makers of blindness, causing lack of vision, causing lack of knowledge, detrimental to wisdom, tending to vexation, leading away from Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, these four bases for spiritual power, when developed and cultivated, are noble and emancipating; they lead the one who acts upon them out to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, these four bases for spiritual power, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus, these four bases for spiritual power, when developed and cultivated, are of great fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus, these four bases for spiritual power, when developed and cultivated, lead to going beyond from the near shore to the far shore.
“Bhikkhus, these four bases for spiritual power, when developed and cultivated, lead to utter revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, these four establishments of mindfulness, when developed and cultivated, are noble and emancipating; they lead the one who acts upon them out to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, these four establishments of mindfulness, when developed and cultivated, lead to going beyond from the near shore to the far shore.
“Bhikkhus, these four establishments of mindfulness, when developed and cultivated, lead to utter revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, these four kinds of nutriment have what as their source, what as their origin, from what are they born and produced?
“Bhikkhus, these four things are actual, unerring, not otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, these four things, when developed and cultivated, lead to extensiveness of wisdom … to vastness of wisdom … to depth of wisdom … to the state of unequalled wisdom … to breadth of wisdom … to abundance of wisdom … to quickness of wisdom … to buoyancy of wisdom … to joyousness of wisdom … … to swiftness of wisdom … to sharpness of wisdom … to penetrativeness of wisdom.
“Bhikkhus, these four things, when developed and cultivated, lead to greatness of wisdom.
“Bhikkhus, these four things, when developed and cultivated, lead to the realization of the fruit of once-returning.
“Bhikkhus, these four things, when developed and cultivated, lead to the realization of the fruit of stream-entry.
“Bhikkhus, these seven factors of enlightenment are nonobstructions, nonhindrances, noncorruptions of the mind; when developed and cultivated they lead to the realization of the fruit of true knowledge and liberation.
“Bhikkhus, these seven factors of enlightenment, developed and cultivated, if unarisen do not arise apart from the appearance of a Tathagata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One.
“Bhikkhus, these seven factors of enlightenment, developed and cultivated, if unarisen do not arise apart from the Discipline of a Fortunate One.
“Bhikkhus, these seven factors of enlightenment, when developed and cultivated, are noble and emancipating; they lead the one who acts upon them out to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, these seven factors of enlightenment, when developed and cultivated, lead to going beyond from the near shore to the far shore.
“Bhikkhus, these seven factors of enlightenment, when developed and cultivated, lead to growth, to nondecline.
“Bhikkhus, these seven factors of enlightenment, when developed and cultivated, lead to utter revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, these six bases for contact—if untamed, unguarded, unprotected, unrestrained—are bringers of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, these six bases for contact—if well tamed, well guarded, well protected, well restrained—are bringers of happiness.
“Bhikkhus, these three feelings are born of contact, rooted in contact, with contact as their source and condition.
“Bhikkhus, these three feelings are impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, subject to vanishing, subject to fading away, subject to cessation.
“Bhikkhus, these two extremes should not be followed by one who has gone forth into homelessness.
“Bhikkhus, this assembly appears to me empty now that Sariputta and Moggallana have attained final Nibbana.
“Bhikkhus, this body is not yours, nor does it belong to others.
“Bhikkhus, this concentration by mindfulness of breathing, when developed and cultivated, is peaceful and sublime, an ambrosial pleasant dwelling, and it disperses and quells right on the spot evil unwholesome states whenever they arise.
“Bhikkhus, this Dhamma has been taught by me discriminately.
“Bhikkhus, this holy life is lived without students and without a teacher.
“Bhikkhus, this holy life is lived without students and without a teacher.
“Bhikkhus, this is the forerunner and precursor of the rising of the sun, that is, the dawn.
“Bhikkhus, this is the forerunner and precursor of the rising of the sun, that is, the dawn.
“Bhikkhus, this is the forerunner and precursor of the rising of the sun, that is, the dawn.
“Bhikkhus, this is the forerunner and precursor of the rising of the sun, that is, the dawn.
“Bhikkhus, this is the forerunner and precursor of the rising of the sun, that is, the dawn.
“Bhikkhus, this is the forerunner and precursor of the rising of the sun, that is, the dawn.
“Bhikkhus, this is the forerunner and precursor of the rising of the sun, that is, the dawn.
“Bhikkhus, this is the forerunner and precursor of the rising of the sun, that is, the dawn.
“Bhikkhus, this is the lowest form of livelihood, that is, gathering alms.
“Bhikkhus, this is the one-way path for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow and lamentation, for the passing away of pain and displeasure, for the achievement of the method, for the realization of Nibbana, that is, the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, this Kassapa is content with any kind of almsfood … with any kind of lodging … with any kind of medicinal requisites … and if he gets them he uses them without being tied to them, uninfatuated with them, not blindly absorbed in them, seeing the danger in them, understanding the escape.
“Bhikkhus, this Kassapa is content with any kind of robe, and he speaks in praise of contentment with any kind of robe, and he does not engage in a wrong search, in what is improper, for the sake of a robe.
“Bhikkhus, this life span of human beings is short.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
“Bhikkhus, this saṁsara is without discoverable beginning….
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who do not understand as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five aggregates subject to clinging: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who do not understand as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five aggregates subject to clinging: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins….
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who recollect their manifold past abodes all recollect the five aggregates subject to clinging or a certain one among them.
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who regard self in various ways all regard the five aggregates subject to clinging, or a certain one among them.
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not fully understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who do not fully understand birth...
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who do not understand birth...
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand as it really is ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they look up at the face of another ascetic or brahmin, thinking: ‘This worthy is surely one who really knows, who really sees.’
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering’; who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, enter and dwell, in this very life, in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of gain, honour, and praise: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of gain, honour, and praise: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics….
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand birth … existence … clinging … craving … feeling … contact...
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand gain, honour, and praise, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics....
“Bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand the earth element, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who do not understand the water element...
“Bhikkhus, those bhikkhus who are accomplished in virtue, accomplished in concentration, accomplished in wisdom, accomplished in liberation, accomplished in the knowledge and vision of liberation: even the sight of those bhikkhus is helpful, I say; even listening to them...
“Bhikkhus, those bhikkhus who are arahants, whose taints are destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached their own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, and are completely liberated through final knowledge: they too dwell contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, unified, with limpid mind, concentrated, with one-pointed mind, detached from the body.
“Bhikkhus, those bhikkhus who are newly ordained, not long gone forth, recently come to this Dhamma and Discipline, should be exhorted, settled, and established by you in the development of the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, those bhikkhus who are newly ordained, not long gone forth, recently come to this Dhamma and Discipline, should be exhorted, settled, and established by you in the development of these four establishments of mindfulness.”
“Bhikkhus, those bhikkhus who are trainees, who have not attained their mind’s ideal, who dwell aspiring for the unsurpassed security from bondage: for them concentration by mindfulness of breathing, when developed and cultivated, leads to the destruction of the taints.
“Bhikkhus, those bhikkhus who are trainees, who have not attained their mind’s ideal, who dwell aspiring for the unsurpassed security from bondage: they too dwell contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, unified, with limpid mind, concentrated, with one-pointed mind, in order to fully understand the body as it really is.
“Bhikkhus, those for whom you have compassion and who think you should be heeded—whether friends or colleagues, relatives or kinsmen— these you should exhort, settle, and establish for making the breakthrough to the Four Noble Truths as they really are.
“Bhikkhus, those for whom you have compassion and who think you should be heeded—whether friends or colleagues, relatives or kinsmen—these you should exhort, settle, and establish in the development of the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Bhikkhus, those for whom you have compassion and who think you should be heeded—whether friends or colleagues, relatives or kinsmen—these you should exhort, settle, and establish in the four factors of stream-entry.
“Bhikkhus, those for whom you have compassion and who think you should be heeded—whether friends or colleagues, relatives or kinsmen—these you should exhort, settle, and establish in the four factors of stream-entry.
“Bhikkhus, those for whom you have compassion … these you should exhort, settle, and establish in the development of these four establishments of mindfulness.”
“Bhikkhus, those who have neglected the four bases for spiritual power have neglected the noble path leading to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, those who have neglected the Noble Eightfold Path have neglected the noble path leading to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, those who have neglected the seven factors of enlightenment have neglected the noble path leading to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, those who have neglected these four establishments of mindfulness have neglected the noble path leading to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, those who have neglected … who have undertaken these four bases for spiritual power have undertaken the noble path leading to the complete destruction of suffering.”
“Bhikkhus, those who have neglected … who have undertaken these seven factors of enlightenment have undertaken the noble path leading to the complete destruction of suffering.”
“Bhikkhus, though someone might say: ‘Apart from form, apart from feeling, apart from perception, apart from volitional formations, I will make known the coming and going of consciousness, its passing away and rebirth, its growth, increase, and expansion’—that is impossible.
“Bhikkhus, though someone might say: ‘Apart from form, apart from feeling, apart from perception, apart from volitional formations, I will make known the coming and going of consciousness, its passing away and rebirth, its growth, increase, and expansion’—that is impossible.
“Bhikkhus, though Uddaka Ramaputta was not himself a knowledge-master, he declared: ‘I am a knowledge-master.’
“Bhikkhus, though Uddaka Ramaputta was not himself a knowledge-master, he declared: ‘I am a knowledge-master.’… But here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu speaking rightly might say:
“Bhikkhus, thought of renunciation arises with a source, not without a source; thought of non-ill will arises with a source, not without a source; thought of harmlessness arises with a source, not without a source.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, by completely transcending the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, I enter and dwell in the cessation of perception and feeling.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, by completely transcending the base of nothingness, I enter and dwell in the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ I enter and dwell in the base of nothingness.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ I enter and dwell in the base of the infinity of consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, I recollect my manifold past abodes, that is, one birth, two births, three births, four births, five births, ten births, twenty births, thirty births, forty births, fifty births, a hundred births, a thousand births, a hundred thousand births, many aeons of world-contraction, many aeons of world-expansion, many aeons of world-contraction and expansion thus: ‘There I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life span; passing away from there, I was reborn elsewhere, and there too I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life span; passing away from there, I was reborn here.’
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, I understand the minds of other beings and persons, having encompassed them with my own mind.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, I wield the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, I become many; having been many, I become one; I appear and vanish; I go unhindered through a wall, through a rampart, through a mountain as though through space; I dive in and out of the earth as though it were water; I walk on water without sinking as though it were earth; seated cross-legged, I travel in space like a bird; with my hand I touch and stroke the moon and sun so powerful and mighty; I exercise mastery with the body as far as the brahma world.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I enter and dwell in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and displeasure, I enter and dwell in the fourth jhana, which is neither painful nor pleasant and includes the purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, with the complete transcendence of perceptions of forms, with the passing away of perceptions of sensory impingement, with nonattention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ I enter and dwell in the base of the infinity of space.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, with the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, I hear both kinds of sounds, the divine and human, those that are far as well as near.
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I see beings passing away and being reborn, inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and I understand how beings fare on according to their kamma thus: ‘These beings who engaged in misconduct of body, speech, and mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong view, and undertook actions based on wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell; but these beings who engaged in good conduct of body, speech, and mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right view, and undertook action based on right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.’
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, with the fading away as well of rapture, I dwell equanimous, and mindful and clearly comprehending, I experience happiness with the body; I enter and dwell in the third jhana of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
“Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, with the subsiding of thought and examination, I enter and dwell in the second jhana, which has internal confidence and unification of mind, is without thought and examination, and has rapture and happiness born of concentration.
“Bhikkhus, true knowledge is the forerunner in the entry upon wholesome states, with a sense of shame and fear of wrongdoing following along.
“Bhikkhus, Uddaka Ramaputta used to make this declaration:
“Bhikkhus, volition regarding forms is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Bhikkhus, what are the forty-four cases of knowledge?
“Bhikkhus, what do you think which is more: the little bit of soil that I have taken up in my fingernail or this great earth?”
“Bhikkhus, what do you think, do you regard form thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
“Bhikkhus, what do you think, do you regard form thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self’?”
“Bhikkhus, what do you think, what kind of bhikkhu is worthy to be a visitor of families, and what kind of bhikkhu is not worthy to be a visitor of families?”
“Bhikkhus, what do you think, which is more: the little bit of soil that I have taken up in my fingernail or this great earth?”
“Bhikkhus, what one intends, and what one plans, and whatever one has a tendency towards: this becomes a basis for the maintenance of consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, what one intends, and what one plans, and whatever one has a tendency towards: this becomes a basis for the maintenance of consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, whatever Arahants, Perfectly Enlightened Ones, in the past fully awakened to things as they really are, all fully awakened to the Four Noble Truths as they really are.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics and brahmins in the past regarded that in the world with a pleasant and agreeable nature as impermanent, as suffering, as nonself, as a disease, as fearful: they abandoned craving.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics and brahmins in the past regarded that in the world with a pleasant and agreeable nature as permanent, as happiness, as self, as healthy, as secure: they nurtured craving.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past abandoned the three discriminations, all did so because they had developed and cultivated the seven factors of enlightenment.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past fully awakened to things as they really are, all fully awakened to the Four Noble Truths as they really are.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past generated spiritual power completely, all did so because they had developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past generated spiritual power in part, all did so because they had developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past revealed themselves as having fully awakened to things as they really are, all revealed themselves as having fully awakened to the Four Noble Truths as they really are.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past were of great spiritual power and might, all were so because they had developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past wielded the various kinds of spiritual power, such that: having been one, they became many … they exercised mastery with the body as far as the brahma world—all did so because they had developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past … in the future … at present are of great spiritual power and might, all are so because they have developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power.”
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past … in the future … at present generate spiritual power completely, all do so because they have developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power.” 
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past … in the future … at present generate spiritual power in part, all do so because they have developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power.”
“Bhikkhus, whatever ascetics or brahmins in the past … in the future … at present wield the various kinds of spiritual power … all do so because they have developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power.”
“Bhikkhus, whatever beings there are—whether those without feet or those with two feet or those with four feet or those with many feet, whether consisting of form or formless, whether percipient, nonpercipient, or neither percipient nor nonpercipient—the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, is declared to be the chief among them.
“Bhikkhus, whatever beings there are—whether those without feet or those with two feet or those with four feet or those with many feet—…”
“Bhikkhus, whatever bhikkhus in the past … in the future … at present … enter and dwell in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, … all do so because they have developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power.”
“Bhikkhus, whatever bhikkhus in the past, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life entered and dwelt in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, all did so because they had developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power.
“Bhikkhus, whatever clansmen in the past rightly went forth from the household life into homelessness and made the breakthrough to things as they really are, all made the breakthrough to the Four Noble Truths as they really are.
“Bhikkhus, whatever clansmen in the past rightly went forth from the household life into homelessness, all did so in order to make the breakthrough to the Four Noble Truths as they really are.
“Bhikkhus, whatever desire there is for form, whatever lust, delight, craving, whatever engagement and clinging, mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies— abandon them.
“Bhikkhus, whatever desire there is for form, whatever lust, delight, craving—abandon it.
“Bhikkhus, whatever is not yours, abandon it.
“Bhikkhus, whatever is not yours, abandon it.
“Bhikkhus, whatever is not yours, abandon it.
“Bhikkhus, whatever living beings there are which assume the four postures—sometimes walking, sometimes standing, sometimes sitting, sometimes lying down—all assume the four postures based upon the earth, established upon the earth.
“Bhikkhus, whatever states there are that are wholesome, partaking of the wholesome, pertaining to the wholesome, they are all rooted in careful attention, converge upon careful attention, and careful attention is declared to be the chief among them.
“Bhikkhus, whatever states there are that are wholesome, partaking of the wholesome, pertaining to the wholesome, they are all rooted in diligence, converge upon diligence, and diligence is declared to be the chief among them.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu does not dwell devoted to development, even though such a wish as this might arise in him: ‘Oh, that my mind might be liberated from the taints by nonclinging!’ yet his mind is not liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu dwells devoted to development, even though no such wish as this might arise in him: ‘Oh, that my mind might be liberated from the taints by nonclinging!’ yet his mind is liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is established in one thing, the five faculties are developed, well developed in him.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is making a thorough investigation, in what way should he thoroughly investigate for the utterly complete destruction of suffering?” 
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is practising in accordance with the Dhamma, this is what accords with the Dhamma: he should dwell contemplating impermanence in form … … he is freed from suffering, I say.”
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is practising in accordance with the Dhamma, this is what accords with the Dhamma: he should dwell engrossed in revulsion towards form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu understands as they really are the origin and the passing away of all states whatsoever that entail suffering, then sensual pleasures have been seen by him in such a way that as he looks at them sensual desire, sensual affection, sensual infatuation, and sensual passion do not lie latent within him in regard to sensual pleasures; then he has comprehended a mode of conduct and manner of dwelling in such a way that as he conducts himself thus and as he dwells thus, evil unwholesome states of covetousness and displeasure do not flow in upon him.
“Bhikkhus, when a man possesses five factors he is extremely agreeable to a woman.
“Bhikkhus, when a man possesses five factors he is extremely disagreeable to a woman.
“Bhikkhus, when a man possesses one power, he abides with a woman under his control.
“Bhikkhus, when a noble disciple possesses four things, the devas are elated and speak of his similarity.
“Bhikkhus, when a noble disciple thus understands as they really are the origin and the passing away of the world, he is then called a noble disciple who is accomplished in view, accomplished in vision, who has arrived at this true Dhamma, who sees this true Dhamma, who possesses a trainee’s knowledge, a trainee’s true knowledge, who has entered the stream of the Dhamma, a noble one with penetrative wisdom, one who stands squarely before the door to the Deathless.”
“Bhikkhus, when a woman possesses five factors she is extremely agreeable to a man.
“Bhikkhus, when a woman possesses five factors she is extremely disagreeable to a man.
“Bhikkhus, when a woman possesses five qualities she dwells confident at home.
“Bhikkhus, when a woman possesses three qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, she is generally reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“Bhikkhus, when altruistic joy is developed...”
“Bhikkhus, when compassion is developed...”
“Bhikkhus, when equanimity is developed...” 
“Bhikkhus, when Kassapa approaches families his mind does not get caught, held fast, or bound amidst families, thinking: ‘May those desiring gains acquire gains, may those desiring merits make merits!’ He is as elated and happy over the gains of others as he is over his own gains.
“Bhikkhus, when lovingkindness is developed...”
“Bhikkhus, when mindfulness of breathing is developed …”
“Bhikkhus, when one attends carefully, the unarisen enlightenment factor of mindfulness arises and the arisen enlightenment factor of mindfulness goes to fulfilment by development...
“Bhikkhus, when one attends carelessly, unarisen sensual desire arises and arisen sensual desire increases and expands; unarisen ill will arises and arisen ill will increases and expands; unarisen sloth and torpor arise and arisen sloth and torpor increase and expand; unarisen restlessness and remorse arise and arisen restlessness and remorse increase and expand; unarisen doubt arises and arisen doubt increases and expands.
“Bhikkhus, when one attends carelessly, unarisen sensual desire arises and arisen sensual desire increases and expands; when one attends carelessly, unarisen ill will arises and arisen ill will increases and expands; when one attends carelessly, unarisen sloth and torpor arise and arisen sloth and torpor increase and expand; when one attends carelessly, unarisen restlessness and remorse arise and arisen restlessness and remorse increase and expand; when one attends carelessly, unarisen doubt arises and arisen doubt increases and expands.
“Bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating danger in things that can be clung to, craving ceases.
“Bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating danger in things that can fetter, craving ceases.
“Bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating gratification in things that can be clung to, craving increases.
“Bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating gratification in things that can be clung to, craving increases.
“Bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating gratification in things that can fetter, craving increases.
“Bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating gratification in things that can fetter, craving increases.
“Bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating gratification in things that can fetter, there is a descent of consciousness.
“Bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating gratification in things that can fetter, there is a descent of name-and-form.
“Bhikkhus, when speech possesses four factors, then it is well spoken, not badly spoken, and it is blameless, not blameworthy among the wise.
“Bhikkhus, when the instructed noble disciple is contacted by a painful feeling, he does not sorrow, grieve, or lament; he does not weep beating his breast and become distraught.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a bloated corpse is developed …”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a fissured corpse is developed …”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a livid corpse is developed...”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a skeleton is developed and cultivated, it is of great fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a skeleton is developed and cultivated, it leads to a great sense of urgency.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a skeleton is developed and cultivated, it leads to dwelling in great comfort.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a skeleton is developed and cultivated, it leads to great good.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a skeleton is developed and cultivated, it leads to great security from bondage.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a skeleton is developed and cultivated, one of two fruits is to be expected: either final knowledge in this very life or, if there is a residue of clinging, the state of nonreturning.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of a worm-infested corpse is developed...”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of abandonment...”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of cessation is developed and cultivated, it is of great fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of cessation is developed and cultivated, it leads to great good … to great security from bondage … to a great sense of urgency … to dwelling in great comfort.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of cessation is developed and cultivated, one of two fruits is to be expected: either final knowledge in this very life or, if there is a residue of clinging, the state of nonreturning.
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of death...”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of dispassion...”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of foulness...”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of impermanence is developed and cultivated, it eliminates all sensual lust, it eliminates all lust for existence, it eliminates all ignorance, it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’ 
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of impermanence …”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of nondelight in the entire world …”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of nonself in what is suffering...”
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of suffering in the impermanent...” 
“Bhikkhus, when the perception of the repulsiveness of food...”
“Bhikkhus, when the uninstructed worldling is being contacted by a painful feeling, he sorrows, grieves, and laments; he weeps beating his breast and becomes distraught.
“Bhikkhus, when the uninstructed worldling makes the statement, ‘In the great ocean there is a bottomless abyss,’ he makes such a statement about something that is nonexistent and unreal.
“Bhikkhus, when there are hands, picking up and putting down are discerned.
“Bhikkhus, when there are hands, there is picking up and putting down….
“Bhikkhus, when these seven factors of enlightenment have been developed and cultivated in this way, seven fruits and benefits may be expected.
“Bhikkhus, when wanderers of other sects speak thus, they should be asked: ‘Friends, how is the liberation of the mind by lovingkindness developed?
“Bhikkhus, when wanderers of other sects speak thus, they should be asked: ‘Friends, is there a method of exposition by means of which the five hindrances become ten, and the seven factors of enlightenment become fourteen?’
“Bhikkhus, when wanderers of other sects speak thus, they should be asked: ‘Friends, when the mind becomes sluggish, which factors of enlightenment is it untimely to develop on that occasion, and which factors of enlightenment is it timely to develop on that occasion?
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, do the fetters, adherences, and shackles arise?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, do the fetters, adherences, shackles, and holding arise?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does identity view arise?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does one regard things thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘I might not be, and it might not be for me; I will not be, it will not be for me’?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘I might not be, and it might not be for me; I will not be, it will not be for me′?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘That which is the self is the world; having passed away, that I shall be—permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change’?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘That which is the self is the world; having passed away, that I shall be—permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change′?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The soul and the body are the same’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The soul is one thing, the body another’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The Tathagata exists after death’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The winds do not blow, the rivers do not flow, pregnant women do not give birth, the moon and sun do not rise and set but stand as steady as a pillar’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The winds do not blow, the rivers do not flow, pregnant women do not give birth, the moon and sun do not rise and set but stand as steady as a pillar’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The winds do not blow, the rivers do not flow, pregnant women do not give birth, the moon and sun do not rise and set but stand as steady as a pillar’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The winds do not blow, the rivers do not flow, pregnant women do not give birth, the moon and sun do not rise and set but stand as steady as a pillar′?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The world is eternal′?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The world is finite’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The world is infinite’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘The world is not eternal’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘There are these seven bodies that are unmade, not brought forth, uncreated, without a creator, barren, steady as mountain peaks, steady as pillars.
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘There is no cause or condition for the defilement of beings; beings are defiled without cause or condition.
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing presented in charity; no fruit or result of good and bad actions; no this world, no other world; no mother, no father; no beings who are reborn spontaneously; no ascetics and brahmins faring and practising rightly in the world who, having realized this world and the other world for themselves by direct knowledge, make them known to others.
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does such a view as this arise: ‘When one acts or makes others act, when one mutilates or makes others mutilate, when one tortures or makes others inflict torture, when one inflicts sorrow or makes others inflict sorrow, when one oppresses or makes others inflict oppression, when one intimidates or makes others inflict intimidation, when one destroys life, takes what is not given, breaks into houses, plunders wealth, commits burglary, ambushes highways, seduces another’s wife, utters falsehood—no evil is done by the doer.
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does the thought occur: ‘I am superior’ or ‘I am equal’ or ‘I am inferior’?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does view of self arise?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, by adhering to what, does wrong view arise?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, do pleasure and pain arise internally?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what exists, by clinging to what, do pleasure and pain arise internally?” 
“Bhikkhus, when what is present … does such a view as this arise: ‘The self both consists of form and is formless, and is unimpaired after death’?”…
“Bhikkhus, when what is present … does such a view as this arise: ‘The self is both happy and miserable and is unimpaired after death’?”…
“Bhikkhus, when what is present … does such a view as this arise: ‘The self is exclusively happy and is unimpaired after death’?”… 
“Bhikkhus, when what is present … does such a view as this arise: ‘The self is exclusively miserable and is unimpaired after death’?”…
“Bhikkhus, when what is present … does such a view as this arise: ‘The self is formless and is unimpaired after death’?”…
“Bhikkhus, when what is present … does such a view as this arise: ‘The self is neither happy nor miserable and is unimpaired after death’?”…
“Bhikkhus, when what is present … does such a view as this arise: ‘The self neither consists of form nor is formless, and is unimpaired after death’?”…
“Bhikkhus, when what is present … … does such a view as this arise: ‘The self consists of form and is unimpaired after death’?”… 
“Bhikkhus, whether for a layperson or one gone forth, I do not praise the wrong way.
“Bhikkhus, whether for a layperson or one gone forth, I praise the right way.
“Bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu dwells thus, mindful and clearly comprehending, diligent, ardent, and resolute, if there arises in him a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“Bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu dwells thus, mindful and clearly comprehending, diligent, ardent, and resolute, if there arises in him a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“Bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu dwells thus, mindful and clearly comprehending, diligent, ardent, and resolute, if there arises in him a painful feeling, he understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me a painful feeling.
“Bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu dwells thus, mindful and clearly comprehending, diligent, ardent, and resolute, if there arises in him a painful feeling, he understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me a painful feeling.
“Bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu dwells thus, mindful and clearly comprehending, diligent, ardent, and resolute, if there arises in him a pleasant feeling, he understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me a pleasant feeling.
“Bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu dwells thus, mindful and clearly comprehending, diligent, ardent, and resolute, if there arises in him a pleasant feeling, he understands thus: ‘There has arisen in me a pleasant feeling.
“Bhikkhus, with ignorance as condition, volitional formations; with volitional formations as condition, consciousness … Such is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
“Bhikkhus, with ignorance as condition, volitional formations; with volitional formations as condition, consciousness….
“Bhikkhus, with the manifestation of a wheel-turning monarch comes the manifestation of seven gems.
“Bhikkhus, without directly knowing and fully understanding form, without becoming dispassionate towards it and abandoning it, one is incapable of destroying suffering.
“Bhikkhus, without directly knowing and fully understanding the all, without developing dispassion towards it and abandoning it, one is incapable of destroying suffering.
“Bhikkhus, without directly knowing and fully understanding the all, without developing dispassion towards it and abandoning it, one is incapable of destroying suffering.
“Bhikkhus, without directly knowing and fully understanding the eye, without developing dispassion towards it and abandoning it, one is incapable of destroying suffering.
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is impermanent.”…
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is nonself.”…
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire and lust for whatever is suffering.”…
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is impermanent….
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is nonself.” … 
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is nonself….
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is nonself….
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is suffering.” …
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is suffering….
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon desire for whatever is suffering….
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon lust for whatever is impermanent.
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon lust for whatever is impermanent.” …
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon lust for whatever is nonself.” …
“Bhikkhus, you should abandon lust for whatever is suffering.” …
“Bhikkhus, you should approach families like the moon— drawing back the body and mind, always acting like newcomers, without impudence towards families.
“Bhikkhus, ‘I am’ is a palpitation; ‘I am this’ is a palpitation; ‘I shall be’ is a palpitation … ‘I shall be neither percipient nor nonpercipient’ is a palpitation.
“Bhikkhus, ‘I am’ is a perturbation; ‘I am this’ is a perturbation; ‘I shall be’ is a perturbation … ‘I shall be neither percipient nor nonpercipient’ is a perturbation.
“Bhikkhus, ‘I am’ is a proliferation; ‘I am this’ is a proliferation; ‘I shall be’ is a proliferation … ‘I shall be neither percipient nor nonpercipient’ is a proliferation.
“Bhikkhus, ‘I am’ is an involvement with conceit; ‘I am this’ is an involvement with conceit; ‘I shall be’ is an involvement with conceit; ‘I shall not be’ is an involvement with conceit; ‘I shall consist of form’ is an involvement with conceit; ‘I shall be formless’ is an involvement with conceit; ‘I shall be percipient’ is an involvement with conceit; ‘I shall be nonpercipient’ is an involvement with conceit; ‘I shall be neither percipient nor  nonpercipient’ is an involvement with conceit.
“Both the merits and the evil
“Brahmin, many aeons have elapsed and gone by.
“Brahmin, one who abuses his own abuser, who scolds the one who scolds him, who rails against the one who rails at him—he is said to partake of the meal, to enter upon an exchange.
“Brahmin, these five faculties have different domains, different resorts; they do not experience each others’ resort and domain.
“Brahmin, when one dwells with a mind obsessed by sensual lust, overwhelmed by sensual lust, and one does not understand as it really is the escape from arisen sensual lust, on that occasion one neither knows nor sees as it really is one’s own good, or the good of others, or the good of both.
“Brahmin, when one dwells with a mind that is not obsessed by sensual lust, not overwhelmed by sensual lust, and one understands as it really is the escape from arisen sensual lust, on that occasion one knows and sees as it really is one’s own good, and the good of others, and the good of both.
“Breathing in long, he knows: ‘I breathe in long’; or breathing out long, he knows: ‘I breathe out long.’
“But a bhikkhu never sorrows at all, A path-knower practising rightly.
“But a bhikkhu teaches the Dhamma to others with the thought: ‘The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One, directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.
“But are there any people in Uruvelakappa on whose account sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair would not arise in you in such an event?”
“But as to the future, friend?”
“But for the good it is disclosed, It is light here for those who see.
“But have I not already declared, Ananda, that we must be parted, separated, and severed from all who are dear and agreeable to us?
“But having fully understood what can be expressed, One does not conceive ‘one who expresses.’
“But here, headman, a Tathagata arises in the world, an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.
“But here, Upavaṇa, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu experiences the form without experiencing lust for the form.
“But how is it, bhikkhu, that the Blessed One has stated that sensual pleasures are time-consuming, full of suffering, full of despair, and the danger in them is still greater?
“But how is it, dear sir, that by not halting and by not straining you crossed the flood?”
“But how, bhikkhu, do you remember the Four Noble Truths taught by me?”
“But how, bhikkhu, do you remember the Four Noble Truths taught by me?”
“But how, Elder, are you a lone dweller and how do you speak in praise of dwelling alone?”
“But how, venerable sir, shall I refute the doctrine of the ascetic Gotama, who is so powerful and mighty?”
“But I say of those bhikkhus who are trainees, who have not attained their mind’s ideal, who dwell aspiring for the unsurpassed security from bondage, that they still have work to do with diligence in regard to the six bases for contact.
“But if one has removed aggression
“But if they do not accept it from you, then to whom does the food belong?”
“But if with a mind clear and pure
“But if you cannot recall the Buddha, Best in the world, the bull of men, Then you should recall the Dhamma, Emancipating, well expounded.
“But if you cannot recall the Dhamma, Emancipating, well expounded, Then you should recall the Saṅgha, The unsurpassed field of merit.
“But in what way, Ariṭṭha, do you develop mindfulness of breathing?”
“But in what way, dear sir, do you know emancipation, release, seclusion for beings?”
“But is it possible to give a simile, Master Gotama?”
“But is it possible to give a simile, venerable sir?”
“But mindfulness, bhikkhus, I say is always useful.” 
“But now like headmen in a village
“But now like headmen in a village
“But now, Kassapa, the elder bhikkhus are no longer forest dwellers and do not speak in praise of forest dwelling … … they are no longer energetic and do not speak in praise of arousing energy.
“But one here who leads the holy life, Having expelled merit and evil, Who fares in the world with comprehension:
“But that deed is well performed
“But the Blessed One is far away, friend.
“But the instructed noble disciple … does not regard form as self … nor feeling as self … nor perception as self … nor volitional formations as self … nor consciousness as self….
“But the wise, as it were, drink it up—
“But there’s one born in the Sakyan clan, The Enlightened One, without an equal, Conqueror of all, Mara’s subduer, Who everywhere is undefeated, Everywhere freed and unattached, The One with Vision who sees all.
“But these have fallen, claiming ‘We recite.’
“But those who have peace and acquiescence
“But those who understand suffering, Who know too suffering’s origin, And where suffering completely stops, Where it ceases without remainder;
“But we do not see Master Gotama’s yoke or plough or ploughshare or goad or oxen; yet Master Gotama says, ‘I too, brahmin, plough and sow, and when I have ploughed and sown I eat.’”
“But what do you see, Evil One, that you speak thus to me?”
“But what one has done by body, Or by speech or mind:
“But what, chamberlains, is that other confinement to which you are subject, which is even more confining and considered more confining than the former one?”
“But what, venerable sir, is that conflagration more terrible and frightful than that one?”
“But what, venerable sir, is that darkness greater and more frightful than that one?”
“But what, venerable sir, is that one thing?”
“But what, venerable sir, is that precipice steeper and more frightful than that one?”
“But when he has transcended this, The mindful disciple of the Buddha
“But when one has obtained the path
“But when one sees with correct wisdom
“But when sacrifices free from violence
“But when the wise man obtains wealth
“But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness; with the cessation of consciousness, cessation of name-and-form; with the cessation of name-and-form, cessation of the six sense bases; with the cessation of the six sense bases, cessation of contact; with the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling; with the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving; with the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of existence; with the cessation of existence, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair cease.
“But with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance, whatever kinds of contortions, manoeuvres, and vacillations there may be —‘What now is aging-and-death, and for whom is there this aging-and-death?’ or ‘Aging-and-death is one thing, the one for whom there is this aging-and-death is another,’ or ‘The soul and the body are the same,’ or ‘The soul is one thing, the body is another’—all these are abandoned, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could one regard anything thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could pleasure and pain arise internally?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could pleasure and pain arise internally?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could such a view as that arise?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could such a view as that arise?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could such a view as that arise?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could such a view as that arise?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could such a view as that arise?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could such a view as that arise?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could such a view as that arise?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could such a view as that arise?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could the thought occur: ‘I am superior’ or ‘I am equal’ or ‘I am inferior’?”
“But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could wrong view arise.”
“But, Ananda, they pierce something even more difficult to pierce who pierce as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ …; who pierce as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
“But, Anuradha, when the Tathagata is not apprehended by you as real and actual here in this very life, is it fitting for you to declare: ‘Friends, when a Tathagata is describing a Tathagata—the highest type of person, the supreme person, the attainer of the supreme attainment—he describes him apart from these four cases: ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or … ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’?”
“But, bhikkhu, those ascetics and brahmins who understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they do not delight in volitional formations that lead to birth, nor in volitional formations that lead to aging, nor in volitional formations that lead to death, nor in volitional formations that lead to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
“But, bhikkhu, those ascetics and brahmins who understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they do not delight in volitional formations that lead to birth, nor in volitional formations that lead to aging, nor in volitional formations that lead to death, nor in volitional formations that lead to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
“But, bhikkhu, those ascetics and brahmins who understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they do not delight in volitional formations that lead to birth, nor in volitional formations that lead to aging, nor in volitional formations that lead to death, nor in volitional formations that lead to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
“But, bhikkhus, as to that which is called ‘mind’ and ‘mentality’ and ‘consciousness’ —the uninstructed worldling is unable to experience revulsion towards it, unable to become dispassionate towards it and be liberated from it.
“But, bhikkhus, as to those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things, the origin of these things, the cessation of these things, and the way leading to the cessation of these things: what are those things that they understand, whose origin they understand, whose cessation they understand, and the way leading to whose cessation they understand?
“But, bhikkhus, as to those ascetics or brahmins who understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: it is possible that they will abide having transcended aging-and-death.
“But, bhikkhus, by directly knowing and fully understanding the all, by developing dispassion towards it and abandoning it, one is capable of destroying suffering.
“But, bhikkhus, I say that one in whom these five faculties are completely and totally absent is ‘an outsider, one who stands in the faction of worldlings.’” 
“But, bhikkhus, I say this: If you have gone to a forest or to the foot of a tree or to an empty hut, and fear or trepidation or terror should arise in you, on that occasion you should recollect me thus: ‘The Blessed One is an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“But, bhikkhus, if anyone should speak thus: ‘Having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of suffering as it really is, having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the origin of suffering as it really is, having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the cessation of suffering as it really is, having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering as it really is, I will completely make an end to suffering’—this is possible.
“But, bhikkhus, if anyone should speak thus: ‘Having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of suffering as it really is, having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the origin of suffering as it really is, having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the cessation of suffering as it really is, having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering as it really is, I will completely make an end to suffering’—this is possible.
“But, bhikkhus, if wanderers of other sects ask you: ‘What, friends, is that suffering for the full understanding of which the holy life is lived under the ascetic Gotama?’—being asked thus, you should answer them thus: ‘The eye, friends, is suffering: it is for the full understanding of this that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.
“But, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple understands as it really is the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.”
“But, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple understands as it really is the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.”
“But, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple … does not regard form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“But, bhikkhus, the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One, has understood as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of forms.
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who fully understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who fully understand birth … volitional formations, their origin, their cessation, and the way leading to their cessation: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who understand birth...
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of gain, honour, and praise: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these four elements: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these four elements: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand feeling, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics … and they enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things as they really are … in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things as they really are: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things as they really are: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things as they really are: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.” 
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things … in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things … in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things … in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things … in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics and brahmins who understand these things: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who understand as it really is ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they do not look up at the face of another ascetic or brahmin, thinking: ‘This worthy is surely one who really knows, who really sees.’
“But, bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who understand these things: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, enter and dwell, in this very life, in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, bhikkhus, when a Tathagata arises in the world, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One, then there is the manifestation of great light and radiance; then no blinding darkness prevails, no dense mass of darkness; then there is the explaining, teaching, proclaiming, establishing, disclosing, analysing, and elucidating of the Four Noble Truths.
“But, bhikkhus, when one does not intend, and one does not plan, and one does not have a tendency towards anything, no basis exists for the maintenance of consciousness.
“But, bhikkhus, when one does not intend, and one does not plan, and one does not have a tendency towards anything, no basis exists for the maintenance of consciousness.
“But, bhikkhus, when one has understood the impermanence of form, its change, fading away, and cessation, and when one sees as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘In the past and also now all form is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change,’ then sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair are abandoned.
“But, bhikkhus, when the instructed noble disciple is contacted by a painful bodily feeling, he does not sorrow, grieve, or lament; he does not weep and beat his breast and become distraught.
“But, bhikkhus, when the sun and moon arise in the world, then there is the manifestation of great light and radiance; then there is no blinding darkness, no dense mass of darkness; then day and night are discerned, the month and fortnight are discerned, the seasons and year are discerned.
“But, dear sir, when I am so powerful and mighty, what other ascetic or brahmin should I go to attend upon?”
“But, friend Mahanama, for those bhikkhus who are arahants, whose taints are destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached their own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, become completely liberated through final knowledge, the five hindrances have been abandoned, cut off at the root, made like palm stumps, obliterated so that they are no more subject to future arising.
“But, friend Sariputta, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is a nonreturner should carefully attend to?”
“But, friend Sariputta, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is a once-returner should carefully attend to?”
“But, friend Sariputta, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is a stream-enterer should carefully attend to?”
“But, friend Sariputta, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is an arahant should carefully attend to?”
“But, friend, could there be another method of explaining why this has not been declared by the Blessed One?”
“But, friend, could there be another method of explaining why this has not been declared by the Blessed One?”
“But, friend, could there be another method of explaining why this has not been declared by the Blessed One?”
“But, friend, could there be another method of explaining why this has not been declared by the Blessed One?”
“But, friend, if a bhikkhu is practising in accordance with the Dhamma, would it take him long to become an arahant?”
“But, friend, if a bhikkhu is practising in accordance with the Dhamma, would it take him long to become an arahant?”
“But, friend, if a bhikkhu is practising in accordance with the Dhamma, would it take him long to become an arahant?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the abandonment of these four floods?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the abandonment of these four kinds of clinging?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the abandonment of these three taints?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the abandonment of this craving?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the abandonment of this ignorance?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the full understanding of these three feelings?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the full understanding of these three kinds of existence?” 
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the full understanding of these three kinds of suffering?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the full understanding of this identity?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the full understanding of this suffering?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the realization of this arahantship?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the realization of this consolation?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the realization of this Nibbana?”
“But, friend, is there a path, is there a way for the realization of this supreme consolation?”
“But, friend, one who does not delight in clinging, who does not take delight in clinging, who does not rejoice in clinging, and who knows and sees the cessation of clinging as it really is, does not think: ‘The Tathagata exists after death’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“But, friend, one who does not delight in craving, who does not take delight in craving, who does not rejoice in craving, and who knows and sees the cessation of craving as it really is, does not think: ‘The Tathagata exists after death’...
“But, friend, one who does not delight in existence, who does not take delight in existence, who does not rejoice in existence, and who knows and sees the cessation of existence as it really is, does not think: ‘The Tathagata exists after death’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“But, friend, one who does not delight in form...
“But, friend, one who is devoid of lust for form...
“But, friend, one who knows and sees form...
“But, friend, the instructed noble disciple, who is a seer of the noble ones … does not regard form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“But, friend, when the Tathagata is not apprehended by you as real and actual here in this very life, is it fitting for you to declare: ‘As I understand the Dhamma taught by the Blessed One, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed is annihilated and perishes with the breakup of the body and does not exist after death’?”
“But, great king, when a superior man gains abundant wealth, he makes himself happy and pleased, and he makes his mother and father happy and pleased, and his wife and children, and his slaves, workers, and servants, and his friends and colleagues; and he establishes an offering for ascetics and brahmins, one leading upwards, of heavenly fruit, resulting in happiness, conducive to heaven.
“But, householder, how long has it been it since you became a lay follower?”
“But, Master Ananda, is there a path, is there a way for the abandoning of this desire?”
“But, Master Ananda, what is the path, what is the way for the abandoning of this desire?”
“But, Master Gotama, what is it that liberation takes recourse in?”
“But, Master Gotama, what is it that mindfulness takes recourse in?”
“But, Master Gotama, what is it that Nibbana takes recourse in?”
“But, Master Gotama, what is it that the mind takes recourse in?”
“But, Master Gotama, what things, when developed and cultivated, fulfil the four establishments of mindfulness?”
“But, Master Gotama, what things, when developed and cultivated, fulfil the seven factors of enlightenment?”
“But, Master Gotama, what things, when developed and cultivated, fulfil the three kinds of good conduct?” 
“But, Master Gotama, what things, when developed and cultivated, fulfil true knowledge and liberation?”
“But, Phagguna, with the remainderless fading away and cessation of the six bases for contact comes cessation of contact; with the cessation of contact, cessation of feeling; with the cessation of feeling, cessation of craving; with the cessation of craving, cessation of clinging; with the cessation of clinging, cessation of existence; with the cessation of existence, cessation of birth; with the cessation of birth, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair cease.
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunaparanta do give you a blow with a clod, what will you think about that?”
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunaparanta do give you a blow with a rod, what will you think about that?”
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunaparanta do give you a blow with the fist, what will you think about that?”
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunaparanta do stab you with a knife, what will you think about that?”
“But, Puṇṇa, if the people of Sunaparanta do take your life with a sharp knife, what will you think about that?”
“But, Sariputta, if they were to ask you: ‘But, friend Sariputta, what is the source of birth, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?’—being asked thus, how would you answer?”
“But, Sariputta, if they were to ask you: ‘But, friend Sariputta, what is the source of clinging…?
“But, Sariputta, if they were to ask you: ‘But, friend Sariputta, what is the source of existence…?’—being asked thus, how would you answer?”
“But, Sariputta, if they were to ask you: ‘Friend Sariputta, how have you known, how have you seen, that delight in feelings no longer remains present in you?’—being asked thus, how would you answer?” 
“But, Soṇa, those ascetics and brahmins who understand form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who understand feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: these I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“But, venerable sir, can there be diversity in the desire and lust for the five aggregates subject to clinging?”
“But, venerable sir, does the Blessed One recall ever having gone to the brahma world by spiritual power with this body composed of the four great elements?” 
“But, venerable sir, how does identity view come to be?”
“But, venerable sir, how does identity view not come to be?”
“But, venerable sir, how should a bhikkhu know, how should he see, for ignorance to be abandoned by him and true knowledge to arise?”
“But, venerable sir, how should a bhikkhu know, how should he see, for ignorance to be abandoned by him and true knowledge to arise?”
“But, venerable sir, in what are these five aggregates subject to clinging rooted?”
“But, venerable sir, what is the cause and condition for knowledge and vision?
“But, venerable sir, what is the cause and condition for lack of knowledge and vision?
“But, venerable sir, what is the cause and condition for the defilement of beings?
“But, venerable sir, what is the cause and condition for the purification of beings?
“But, venerable sir, what is the one thing which, when developed and cultivated, fulfils four things; and the four things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil seven things; and the seven things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil two things?”
“But, venerable sir, when we hear that the Blessed One will set out from among the Magadhans on tour in the Kasian country, on that occasion there arises in us elation and joy at the thought: ‘The Blessed One will be near to us.’
“But, venerable sir, where does what is given become of great fruit?”
“By austerity and scrupulousness
“By basing your thoughts on the Teacher, On Dhamma, Saṅgha, and your own virtues, You will surely attain to gladness, And rapture and happiness as well.
“By being liberated, it is steady; by being steady, it is content; by being content, he is not agitated.
“By being liberated, it is steady; by being steady, it is content; by being content, one is not agitated.
“By desire is the world bound;
“By directly knowing and fully understanding the eye … the mind … and whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … by developing dispassion towards it and abandoning it, one is capable of destroying suffering.
“By faith one crosses over the flood, By diligence, the rugged sea.
“By having developed and cultivated what things has the Venerable Anuruddha attained to greatness of direct knowledge?”
“By having developed and cultivated what things has the Venerable Anuruddha attained to greatness of direct knowledge?”
“By having developed and cultivated what things has the Venerable Anuruddha attained to greatness of direct knowledge?” 
“By having developed and cultivated what things has the Venerable Aruruddha attained to greatness of direct knowledge?”
“By means of these three kinds of knowledge
“By the following method too, Ananda, it may be understood how the entire holy life is good friendship, good companionship, good comradeship: by relying upon me as a good friend, Ananda, beings subject to birth are freed from birth; beings subject to aging are freed from aging; beings subject to death are freed from death; beings subject to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair are freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
“By the following method too, friend Mahanama, it can be understood how the dwelling of a trainee is one thing and the Tathagata’s dwelling is another.
“By the riverbanks and in the rest house, In the meeting halls and along the roads, People meet and gossip about this:
“By the utter destruction of delight in existence, 
“By this method, friend Mahanama, it can be understood how the dwelling of a trainee is one thing and the Tathagata’s dwelling is another.”
“By what is the world afflicted?
“By what is the world bound?
“By what is the world ensnared?
“By what is the world held in bondage?
“By what is the world led around?
“By what is the world led around?
“By what is the world shut in?
“By what is the world tightly fettered?
“By whom has this being been created?
“Candima has gone for refuge
“Chamberlains, you possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… Moreover, whatever there is in your family that is suitable for giving, all that you share unreservedly among those who are virtuous and of good character.
“Come in, ascetic.”
“Come in, ascetic.”
“Come now, ask others as well, The many ascetics and brahmins, Whether there is found here anything better
“Come, bhikkhus, enter upon the rains wherever you have friends, acquaintances, and intimates in the vicinity of Vesali.
“Come, friends, approach the Blessed One, pay homage to him in my name with your head at his feet, and say: ‘Venerable sir, the bhikkhu Vakkali is sick, afflicted, gravely ill; he pays homage to the Blessed One with his head at his feet.’
“Come, Godha, we should approach the Blessed One.
“Come, good man, approach the Venerable Ananda, pay homage to him in my name with your head at his feet, and say: ‘Venerable sir, the householder Sirivaḍḍha is sick, afflicted, gravely ill; he pays homage to the Venerable Ananda with his head at his feet.’
“Come, good man, approach the Venerable Sariputta, pay homage to him in my name with your head at his feet, and say: ‘Venerable sir, the householder Anathapiṇḍika is sick, afflicted, gravely ill; he pays homage to the Venerable Sariputta with his head at his feet.’
“Come, good man” … …
“Comparing the incomparable and continued existence, The sage relinquished the formation of existence.
“Compassionate for their welfare, The Buddha instructs others.
“Conceit, O brahmin, is your shoulder-load, Anger the smoke, false speech the ashes;
“Concentration by mindfulness of breathing, Ananda, is the one thing which, when developed and cultivated, fulfils the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Consciousness, bhikkhu, while standing, might stand engaged with form … engaged with feeling … engaged with perception … engaged with volitional formations; based upon volitional formations, established upon volitional formations, with a sprinkling of delight, it might come to growth, increase, and expansion.
“Consciousness, bhikkhus, while standing, might stand engaged with form; based upon form, established upon form, with a sprinkling of delight, it might come to growth, increase, and expansion.
“Consciousness, friend Koṭṭhita, is not created by oneself, nor is it created by another, nor is it created both by oneself and by another, nor has it arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another; but rather, with name-and-form as condition, consciousness.” 
“Considering two benefits, venerable sir.
“Considering what benefit do you do this, brahmin?”
“Considering what benefit, Sariputta, does a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed conduct himself in a way that shows supreme honour towards the Tathagata and the Tathagata’s teaching?” 
“Considering your own good, bhikkhus, it is enough to strive for the goal with diligence; considering the good of others, it is enough to strive for the goal with diligence; considering the good of both, it is enough to strive for the goal with diligence.” 
“Contacted, bhikkhus, one feels, contacted one intends, contacted one perceives.
“Contacted, bhikkhus, one feels, contacted one intends, contacted one perceives.
“Covetousness and displeasure” are code words for the first two hindrances, and thus their removal may be understood to imply some success in concentration.
“Craving is what produces a person;
“Craving is what produces a person;
“Deep in wisdom, intelligent, Skilled in the true path and the false, Sariputta, of great wisdom, Teaches the Dhamma to the bhikkhus.
“Deep is the speech you utter, Hard to understand, very hard to grasp.
“Delight comes to one who is miserable, Misery to one filled with delight.
“Delight everywhere has been destroyed, The mass of darkness has been sundered.
“Delightful is Vesali, Ananda.
“Desiring seclusion you entered the woods, Yet your mind gushes outwardly.
“Develop concentration, bhikkhus.
“Develop meditation on the signless, And discard the tendency to conceit.
“Develop the mind on foulness, One-pointed, well concentrated;
“Did Master Kaccana have any conversation with them?”
“Did you earlier arouse energy, thinking, ‘I will go to the park,’ and after you went to the park, did the corresponding energy subside?” 
“Did you earlier make an investigation, ‘Shall I go to the park?’ and after you went to the park, did the corresponding investigation subside?”
“Did you earlier make up your mind, ‘I will go to the park,’ and after you went to the park, did the corresponding resolution  subside?”
“Did you hear and learn anything, venerable sir, in the presence of the Blessed One during this rains?”
“Didn’t it occur to you, householder, to question the Blessed One further as to how one is afflicted in body and afflicted in mind, and how one is afflicted in body but not afflicted in mind?” 
“Didn’t the Blessed One declare you to be a nonreturner, friend?
“Diligence, great king.
“Direct your mind there 
“Do not make a sound, Piyaṅkara, A bhikkhu recites Dhamma-stanzas.
“Do not yield to negligence, Don’t be intimate with sensual delight.
“Do those who are practising wrongly hold wrong view or right view?”
“Do you delight, ascetic?”
“Do you engage in inward exploration, bhikkhus?” 
“Do you have any desire, lust, or affection for those sounds cognizable by the ear … for those odours cognizable by the nose … for those tastes cognizable by the tongue … for those tactile objects cognizable by the body … for those mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that you have not cognized and never cognized before, that you do not cognize and would not think might be cognized?”
“Do you know, dear sir, emancipation, release, seclusion for beings?” 
“Do you lie down in a daze or drunk on poetry?
“Do you regard feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
“Do you regard feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self’?”
“Do you regard the ear thus…?
“Do you regard the ear thus…?
“Do you regard the mind thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self’?”
“Do you see, Susı̄ma: ‘With birth as condition, aging-and-death’?”
“Do you see, Susı̄ma: ‘With existence as condition, birth’?… ‘With clinging as condition, existence’?… … ‘With craving as condition, clinging’?… ‘With feeling as condition, craving’?… ‘With contact as condition, feeling’?… ‘With the six sense bases as condition, contact’?… ‘With name-and-form as condition, the six sense bases’?… ‘With consciousness as condition, name-and-form’?
“Do you see, Susı̄ma: ‘With the cessation of birth comes cessation of aging-and-death’?”
“Do you see, Susı̄ma: ‘With the cessation of existence comes cessation of birth’?… ‘With the cessation of clinging comes cessation of existence’?… ‘With the cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations’?”
“Do you then offer them some food or a meal or a snack?”
“Doesn’t ear-consciousness arise in dependence on the ear and sounds?… Doesn’t mind-consciousness arise in dependence on the mind and mental phenomena?”
“Doing what is proper, dutiful, One with initiative finds wealth.
“Don’t be afraid, Mahanama!
“Don’t be afraid, Mahanama!
“Don’t be afraid, Mahanama!
“Don’t be concerned about this, dear Dighavu.
“Don’t you have a little hut?
“Don’t you know, you fool, That maxim of the arahants?
“Drawing in the mind’s thoughts
“Drawn out, my dear, from hot embers, You wish to plunge into hot embers;
“Drowsiness, lethargy, lazy stretching, Discontent, torpor after meals:
“Drowsiness, lethargy, lazy stretching, Discontent, torpor after meals:
“Drunk on poetry, I used to wander
“Dwell contemplating feelings in feelings internally … externally … internally and externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Dwelling thus mindfully, he discriminates that Dhamma with wisdom, examines it, makes an investigation of it.
“Dwelling thus mindfully, he discriminates that Dhamma with wisdom, examines it, makes an investigation of it.
“Dwelling thus withdrawn, one recollects that Dhamma and thinks it over.
“Earlier I had only heard that the Dhamma
“Either on one’s own initiative, Ananda, one generates that mental volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally; or prompted by others one generates that mental volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
“Either on one’s own initiative, Ananda, one generates that verbal volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally; or prompted by others one generates that verbal volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
“Either on one’s own initiative, Ᾱnanda one generates that bodily volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally; or prompted by others one generates that bodily volitional formation conditioned by which pleasure and pain arise internally.
“Enamoured with their pleasures and wealth, Greedy, dazed by sensual pleasures, They do not realize they have gone too far
“Enamoured with their pleasures and wealth, Greedy, dazed by sensual pleasures, They do not realize they have gone too far
“Endowed with the seven gems, Trained in the threefold training, 
“Endowed with the ten factors, Those great nagas, concentrated, Are the best beings in the world:
“Energy is my beast of burden, Carrying me to security from bondage.
“Enlightened in succession to the Buddha, The elder Koṇḍañña, of strong endeavour, Is one who gains pleasant dwellings, One who often gains the seclusions.
“Enough now with trying to teach
“Enough now, I say, with that external bath.
“Enough, friend Dasaka!
“Enough, headman, let it be!
“Enough, headman, let it be!
“Enough, Vakkali!
“Entering the village early, Returning late in the day, Nagadatta associates too closely with lay folk, Sharing their happiness and suffering.
“Even by howling along the wretched jackal
“Even by this much am I pleased with the Venerable Channa.
“Even if mighty youths, great archers, Trained men, masters of the bow, A thousand such men who do not flee
“Even if these great sal trees, Mahanama, could understand what is well spoken and what is badly spoken, then I would declare these great sal trees to be stream-enterers, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as their destination.
“Even if you make this Vulture Peak
“Even if you would bring ten lamps Kassapa, Still he would not see forms, For he does not have eyes to see.”
“Even in the midst of confinement they find it, “The Dhamma for the attainment of Nibbana—
“Even that picture called ‘Faring On’ has been designed in its diversity by the mind, yet the mind is even more diverse than that picture called ‘Faring On.’ 
“Even those with a dart stuck in the breast
“Even though one mutters many chants, One does not become a brahmin by birth
“Even though one mutters many chants, One does not become a brahmin by birth
“Even though that palace of yours shines
“Exactly so, friend.”
“Exactly so, friends.
“Excellent is the path, friend, excellent is the way for the abandonment of this lust, hatred, and delusion.
“Excellent is the path, friend, excellent is the way for the full understanding of this identity.
“Excellent is the path, friend, excellent is the way for the realization of this arahantship.
“Excellent is the path, friend, excellent is the way for the realization of this Nibbana.
“Experiencing revulsion, he becomes dispassionate.
“Eye-consciousness is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Faith is a person’s partner, And wisdom is what instructs him.
“Faith is a person’s partner;
“Faith is here a man’s best treasure;
“Faith is here a man’s best treasure;
“Faith is the seed, austerity the rain, Wisdom my yoke and plough;
“Faith secures provisions for a journey;
“Falsely, venerable sir.”
“Far from here, madam, is the brahma world
“Feeling is impermanent … Perception is impermanent … Volitional formations are impermanent … Consciousness is impermanent, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“Feeling is impermanent … Perception is impermanent … Volitional formations are impermanent … … Consciousness is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, to vanishing, to fading away, to cessation.
“Feeling is impermanent….
“Feeling is impermanent….
“Feeling is impermanent….
“Feeling is nonself … Perception is nonself … Volitional formations are nonself … Consciousness is nonself, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“Feeling is nonself….
“Feeling is nonself….
“Feeling is nonself….
“Feeling is suffering … Perception is suffering … Volitional formations are suffering … Consciousness is suffering, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“Feeling is suffering….
“Feeling is suffering….
“Feeling … Perception … Volitional formations … Consciousness is a world-phenomenon in the world to which the Tathagata has awakened and broken through.
“Few are those among humankind
“Few are those restrained by a sense of shame
“Fie on you, wretched aging, Aging which makes beauty fade!
“First one’s own mother and father, Then one’s eldest family brother, Then one’s teacher as the fourth:
“First there is the kalala;
“First, Susı̄ma, comes knowledge of the stability of the Dhamma, afterwards knowledge of Nibbana.” 
“Five are asleep when are awake;
“Five cords of sensual pleasure in the world, With mind declared to be the sixth:
“Five hundred bhikkhus have gathered today, The fifteenth day, for purification—
“Food over which verses have been sung
“Food over which verses have been sung
“Food over which verses have been sung
“Foolish people devoid of wisdom
“Foolish people devoid of wisdom
“Fools!
“For a hundred thousand nirabbudas
“For a long time, bhikkhus, you have experienced the death of a father...
“For a long time, venerable sir, I have been a forest dweller and have spoken in praise of forest dwelling; I have been an almsfood eater and have spoken in praise of eating almsfood; I have been a rag-robe wearer and have spoken in praise of wearing rag-robes; I have been a triple-robe user and have spoken in praise of using the triple robe; I have been of few wishes and have spoken in praise of fewness of wishes; I have been content and have spoken in praise of contentment; I have been secluded and have spoken in praise of solitude; I have been aloof from society and have spoken in praise of aloofness from society; I have been energetic and have spoken in praise of arousing energy.” “Considering what benefit, Kassapa, have you long been a forest dweller...
“For a long time, venerable sir, I have wanted to come to see the Blessed One, but I haven’t been fit enough to do so.”
“For a person without blemish, Always in quest of purity, Even a mere hair’s tip of evil
“For as the rain-cloud, thundering, Wreathed in lightning, with a hundred crests, Pours down its rain upon the earth, Flooding both the plain and valley—
“For feeling, it should be said: contact.
“For him there is nothing behind or in front—
“For me too, Mallika, there is no one more dear than myself.”
“For neither one’s own son nor husband, Though dear, can release one from suffering
“For one who desires lofty riches
“For one who desires long life and health, Beauty, heaven, and noble birth, lofty delights
“For one who has taken birth, great king, there is nothing other than aging and death.
“For one who is born there is death;
“For one whose body is tranquil and who is happy the mind becomes concentrated.
“For one whose body is tranquil and who is happy the mind becomes concentrated.
“For one whose mind is uplifted by rapture the body becomes tranquil and the mind becomes tranquil.
“For one whose mind is uplifted by rapture the body becomes tranquil and the mind becomes tranquil.
“For one with sense doors unguarded are vain
“For sure, bhikkhus, when you answer thus you state what has been said by me and do not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact; you explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of your assertion gives ground for criticism.
“For sure, brahmin, in doing so you are doing your duty.
“For sure, headman, when you answered thus you stated what has been said by me and did not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact; you explained in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of your statement gives ground for criticism.
“For that is his thundering
“For the brahmin there is no task to be done, “For the brahmin has done what should be done.
“For the instructed noble disciple who possesses these four things there is no fright, trepidation, or fear of imminent death.”
“For the sake of leading us across the flood
“For the uninstructed worldling who possesses these four things there is fright, trepidation, and fear of imminent death.
“For them merit always increases, Both by day and by night;
“For this has actually been seen by me, It is not merely hearsay:
“For those people who bestow alms, For living beings in quest of merit, Performing merit of the mundane type, A gift to the Saṅgha bears great fruit.”
“For those people who bestow alms, For living beings in quest of merit, Performing merit of the mundane type, Where does a gift bear great fruit?” 
“For those who thus recall the Buddha, The Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, bhikkhus, No fear or trepidation will arise, Nor any grisly terror.”
“For what purpose, friend Sariputta, is the holy life lived under the ascetic Gotama?”
“For what reason?
“For what reason?
“For whom are there no transgressions?
“For whom does merit always increase, Both by day and by night?
“Form is like a lump of foam, Feeling like a water bubble;
“Form, Ananda, is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen, subject to destruction, to vanishing, to fading away, to cessation.
“Form, feeling, and perception, Consciousness, and formations—
“Form, Radha, is impermanent.
“Form, Radha, is Mara.
“Form, Radha, is nonself, feeling is nonself, perception is nonself, volitional formations are nonself, consciousness is nonself.
“Form, Radha, is of a painful nature.
“Form, Radha, is of a selfless nature.
“Form, Radha, is of an impermanent nature.
“Form, Radha, is subject to arising.
“Form, Radha, is subject to cessation.
“Form, Radha, is subject to destruction.
“Form, Radha, is subject to Mara.
“Form, Radha, is subject to vanishing.
“Form, Radha, is suffering, feeling is suffering, perception is suffering, volitional formations are suffering, consciousness is suffering.
“Form, venerable sir, is impermanent; I should abandon desire for it.
“Formerly, friend Sariputta, when I was ignorant, I did hold that pernicious view, but now that I have heard this Dhamma teaching of the Venerable Sariputta I have abandoned that pernicious view and have made the breakthrough to the Dhamma.” 
“Formerly, venerable sir, when I was ill I kept on tranquillizing the bodily formations, but I do not obtain concentration.
“Forms, sounds, odours, tastes, Tactiles and all objects of mind—
“Forms, sounds, tastes, odours, And delightful tactile objects—
“Forms, sounds, tastes, odours, And delightful tactile objects—
“Forms, sounds, tastes, odours, Tactiles, and all mental objects:
“Friend Ananda, as to the wholesome virtues spoken of by the Blessed One, what is the purpose for which they were spoken of by him?”
“Friend Ananda, by the abandoning of how many things and because of possessing how many things are people declared by the Blessed One thus: ‘This one is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination’?”
“Friend Ananda, in many ways this body has been declared, disclosed, and revealed by the Blessed One thus: ‘For such a reason this body is nonself.’
“Friend Ananda, it is just because you wander around with these young bhikkhus who are unguarded in their sense faculties….
“Friend Ananda, it is said, ‘the holy life, the holy life.’
“Friend Ananda, it is said, ‘the holy life, the holy life.’
“Friend Ananda, it is said, ‘the unholy life, the unholy life.’
“Friend Ananda, what is the cause and reason for the decline of the true Dhamma?
“Friend Ananda, what is the cause and reason why the true Dhamma does not endure long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana?
“Friend Anuradha, when a Tathagata is describing a Tathagata—the highest type of person, the supreme person, the attainer of the supreme attainment —he describes him in terms of these four cases: ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’”
“Friend Anuruddha, it is said, ‘A trainee, a trainee.’
“Friend Anuruddha, it is said, ‘One beyond training, one beyond training.’
“Friend Anuruddha, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is a trainee should enter and dwell in?”
“Friend Anuruddha, what are the things that a bhikkhu who is beyond training should enter and dwell in?”
“Friend Anuruddha, your faculties are serene, your complexion is pure and bright.
“Friend Channa, do you regard the eye, eye-consciousness, and things cognizable with eye-consciousness thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?
“Friend Channa, what have you seen and directly known in the eye, in eye-consciousness, and in things cognizable with eye-consciousness, that you regard them thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self’?
“Friend Cunda, we should see the Blessed One about this piece of news.
“Friend Kamabhū, the eye is not the fetter of forms nor are forms the fetter of the eye...
“Friend Koṭṭhita, a bhikkhu who is a nonreturner should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent … as nonself.
“Friend Koṭṭhita, a bhikkhu who is a once-returner should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent … as nonself.
“Friend Koṭṭhita, a bhikkhu who is a stream-enterer should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent … as nonself.
“Friend Koṭṭhita, a bhikkhu who is an arahant should carefully attend to these five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent, as suffering, as a disease, as a tumour, as a dart, as misery, as an affliction, as alien, as disintegrating, as empty, as nonself.
“Friend Koṭṭhita, a virtuous bhikkhu should carefully attend to the five aggregates subject to clinging as impermanent, as suffering, as a disease, as a tumour, as a dart, as misery, as an affliction, as alien, as disintegrating, as empty, as nonself.
“Friend Koṭṭhita, aging-and-death is not created by oneself, nor is it created by another, nor is it created both by oneself and by another, nor has it arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another.
“Friend Koṭṭhita, the eye is not the fetter of forms nor are forms the fetter of the eye, but rather the desire and lust that arise there in dependence on both: that is the fetter there.
“Friend Mahanama, those bhikkhus who are trainees, who have not attained their mind’s ideal, who dwell aspiring for the unsurpassed security from bondage, dwell having abandoned the five hindrances.
“Friend Moggallana, your faculties are serene, your facial complexion is pure and bright.
“Friend Musı̄la, apart from faith, apart from personal preference, apart from oral tradition, apart from reasoned reflection, apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it, does the Venerable Musı̄la have personal knowledge thus: ‘Nibbana is the cessation of existence’?” 
“Friend Musı̄la, apart from faith...
“Friend Musı̄la, apart from faith...
“Friend Sariputta, a bhikkhu who was my co-resident has given up the training and returned to the lower life.”
“Friend Sariputta, for one who thinks, ‘I am the eye’ or ‘The eye is mine’; ‘I am the ear’ or ‘The ear is mine’ … ‘I am the mind’ or ‘The mind is mine,’ there might be alteration of the body or a change of the faculties.
“Friend Sariputta, I am not bearing up, I am not getting better.
“Friend Sariputta, I regard the eye, eye-consciousness, and things cognizable with eye-consciousness thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is because I have seen and directly known cessation in the eye, in eye-consciousness, and in things cognizable with eye-consciousness, that I regard them thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is not that I lack suitable food; I have suitable food.
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘arahantship, arahantship.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘clinging, clinging.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘craving, craving.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘existence, existence.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘feeling, feeling.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘flood, flood.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘identity, identity.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘ignorance, ignorance.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘ignorance, ignorance.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘Nibbana, Nibbana.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘Nibbana, Nibbana.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘Nibbana, Nibbana.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘one who has attained consolation, one who has attained consolation.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘one who has attained supreme consolation, one who has attained supreme consolation.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘suffering, suffering.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘taint, taint.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘true knowledge, true knowledge.’
“Friend Sariputta, it is said, ‘true knowledge, true knowledge.’
“Friend Sariputta, on account of possessing how many things are people declared by the Blessed One to be stream-enterers, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as their destination?” 
“Friend Sariputta, some ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself; some ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, maintain that pleasure and pain are created by another; some ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, maintain that pleasure and pain are created both by oneself and by another; some ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another.
“Friend Sariputta, we wish to go to the western province in order to take up residence there.
“Friend Sariputta, what is difficult to do in this Dhamma and Discipline?”
“Friend Sariputta, who are the proponents of Dhamma in the world?
“Friend Saviṭṭha, apart from faith, apart from personal preference, apart from oral tradition, apart from reasoned reflection, apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it, I know this, I see this: ‘Nibbana is the cessation of existence.’”
“Friend Saviṭṭha, apart from faith, apart from personal preference, apart from oral tradition, apart from reasoned reflection, apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it, I know this, I see this: ‘With birth as condition, aging-and-death.’” 
“Friend Saviṭṭha, apart from faith...
“Friend Saviṭṭha, apart from faith....
“Friend Upavaṇa, can a bhikkhu know for himself: ‘By careful attention the seven factors of enlightenment have been fully perfected by me in such a way that they lead to dwelling in comfort’?”
“Friend Yamaka, do not speak thus.
“Friend!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Friend!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Friend!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Friend!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Friend!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Friend!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Friend, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life I enter and dwell in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for myself with direct knowledge.
“Friend, compared to the Venerable Mahamoggallana we are like a few grains of gravel compared to the Himalayas, the king of mountains.
“Friend, compared to the Venerable Sariputta we are like a few grains of salt compared to a barrel of salt.
“Friend, even if the Teacher himself were to undergo change and alteration, still sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair would not arise in me.
“Friend, it is one who delights in form, who takes delight in form, who rejoices in form, and who does not know and see the cessation of form as it really is, that thinks: ‘The Tathagata exists after death’...
“Friend, it is one who does not know and see form as it really is, who does not know and see its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation, that thinks: ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“Friend, it is one who is not devoid of lust for form, who is not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for form, that thinks: ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“Friend, it is said that one who is not ardent and who is unafraid of wrongdoing is incapable of enlightenment, incapable of Nibbana, incapable of achieving the unsurpassed security from bondage; but one who is ardent and afraid of wrongdoing is capable of enlightenment, capable of Nibbana, capable of achieving the unsurpassed security from bondage.
“Friend, one might just as well think that a bull elephant seven or seven and a half cubits high could be concealed by a palm leaf as think that my six direct knowledges could be concealed.” 
“Friend, one might just as well think that a bull elephant seven or seven and a half cubits high could be concealed by a palm leaf as think that my six direct knowledges could be concealed.” 
“Friend, Sariputta, a bhikkhu who is a trainee should enter and dwell in the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Friend, Sariputta, a bhikkhu who is beyond training should enter and dwell in the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Friend, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’”
“Friend, the Blessed One has not declared this: ‘The Tathagata exists after death.’”
“Friend, the Blessed One has said that pleasure and pain are dependently arisen.
“Friend, though I have clearly seen as it really is with correct wisdom, ‘Nibbana is the cessation of existence,’ I am not an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed.
“Friend, to whatever extent I wish, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I enter and dwell in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion….
“Friend, whenever the Blessed One sets out like that he wishes to dwell alone.
“Friend,” they replied.
“Friends, even though a noble disciple has abandoned the five lower fetters, still, in relation to the five aggregates subject to clinging, there lingers in him a residual conceit ‘I am,’ a desire ‘I am,’ an underlying tendency ‘I am’ that has not yet been uprooted.
“Friends, I do not speak of form as ‘I am,’ nor do I speak of ‘I am’ apart from form.
“Friends, it is as though a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, would pass over the root and trunk of a great tree standing possessed of heartwood, thinking that heartwood should be sought among the branches and foliage.
“Friends, the Blessed One has said that suffering is dependently arisen.
“Friends, the first question that the Blessed One asked me had not been previously considered by me: thus I hesitated over it.
“Friends, the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east.
“Friends, the Venerable Puṇṇa Mantaniputta was very helpful to us when we were newly ordained.
“Friends, the Venerable Puṇṇa Mantaniputta was very helpful to us when we were newly ordained.
“Friends, there are these seven factors of enlightenment.
“Friends, there are wise khattiyas, wise brahmins, wise householders, and wise ascetics who question a bhikkhu when he has gone abroad —for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘What does your teacher say, what does he teach?’
“Friends, these four establishments of mindfulness, when developed and cultivated, lead to the destruction of craving.
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and entered his dwelling after reciting a synopsis in brief without expounding the meaning in detail, that is: ‘Bhikkhus, I say that the end of the world cannot be known, seen, or reached by travelling.
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and entered his dwelling after reciting a synopsis in brief without expounding the meaning in detail, that is: ‘Bhikkhus, I say that the end of the world cannot be known, seen, or reached by travelling.
“Friends, when the Blessed One rose from his seat and entered his dwelling after reciting a synopsis in brief without expounding the meaning in detail...
“From whatever one reins in the mind, From that no suffering comes to one.
“From where do the streams turn back?
“Further, bhikkhus, having heard a sound with the ear...
“Further, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu has heard a sound with the ear … cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, there arise in him evil unwholesome states, memories and intentions connected with the fetters.
“Further, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu has heard a sound with the ear … cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, there arise in him evil unwholesome states, memories and intentions connected with the fetters.
“Further, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu has heard a sound with the ear … cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, there do not arise in him evil unwholesome states, nor any memories and intentions connected with the fetters.
“Further, friends, in the presence of the Blessed One I heard and learnt this: ‘Bhikkhus, those bhikkhus are few who … have become of spontaneous birth.… Those bhikkhus are more numerous who, with the utter destruction of three fetters and with the diminishing of greed, hatred, and delusion, have become once-returners who, after coming back to this world only one more time, will make an end to suffering.’
“Further, friends, in the presence of the Blessed One I heard and learnt this: ‘Those bhikkhus are few who … have become once-returners.… Those bhikkhus are more numerous who, with the utter destruction of three fetters, have become stream-enterers, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as their destination.’”
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that by the destruction of the taints, in this very life I enter and dwell in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for myself with direct knowledge.”
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I recollect my manifold past abodes, that is, one birth, two births … many aeons of world-contraction and expansion….
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I understand as it really is the defilement, the cleansing, and the emergence in regard to the jhanas, deliverances, concentrations, and attainments.”
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I understand as it really is the degrees of maturity in the spiritual faculties of other beings and persons.”
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I understand as it really is the diversity in the dispositions of beings.”
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I understand as it really is the result of past, future, and present kamma by way of potential and by way of cause.”
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I understand as it really is the way leading everywhere.”
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I understand as it really is the world with its manifold and diverse elements.” 
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I understand the minds of other beings and persons, having encompassed them with my own mind.
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I understand the possible as possible and the impossible as impossible.” 
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I wield the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one I become many; having been many I become one …I exercise mastery with the body as far as the brahma world.” 
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that with the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, I hear both kinds of sound, the divine and the human, those that are far as well as near.”
“Further, friends, it is because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, I see beings passing away and being reborn … and I understand how beings fare on in accordance with their kamma.”
“Further, headman, I say this: ‘Straw may be sought by one needing straw; timber may be sought by one needing timber; a cart may be sought by one needing a cart; a workman may be sought by one needing a workman.’
“Further, householder, having heard a sound with the ear...
“Further, Kuṇḍaliya, having heard an agreeable sound with the ear...
“Further, Nandaka, a noble disciple who possesses these four things becomes endowed with a long life span, whether celestial or human; he becomes endowed with beauty, whether celestial or human; he becomes endowed with happiness, whether celestial or human; he becomes endowed with fame, whether celestial or human; he becomes endowed with sovereignty, whether celestial or human.
“Further, Upavaṇa, having heard a sound with the ear … having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, a bhikkhu experiences the mental phenomenon as well as lust for the mental phenomenon.
“Further, Upavaṇa, having heard a sound with the ear … … having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, a bhikkhu experiences the mental phenomenon without experiencing lust for the mental phenomenon.
“Further, venerable sir, these ten reasonable questions come up.
“Further, venerable sir, when we hear that the Blessed One will set out from among the Kasians on tour in the Vajjian country … that he has set out from among the Kasians on tour in the Vajjian country … that he will set out from among the Vajjians on tour in the Mallan country … that he has set out from among the Vajjians on tour in the Mallan country … that he will set out from among the Mallans on tour in Kosala … that he has set out from among the Mallans on tour in Kosala … that he will set out from among the Kosalans on tour to Savatthi, on that occasion there arises in us elation and joy at the thought: ‘The Blessed One will be near to us.’
“Further, venerable sir, when we hear that the Blessed One will set out from among the Kosalans on tour in the Mallan country … that he has set out from among the Kosalans on tour in the Mallan country … that he will set out from among the Mallans on tour in the Vajjian country … that he has set out from among the Mallans on tour in the Vajjian country … that he will set out from among the Vajjians on tour in the Kasian country … that he has set out from among the Vajjians on tour in the Kasian country … that he will set out from among the Kasians on tour in Magadha, on that occasion there arises in us distress and displeasure at the thought: ‘The Blessed One will be far away from us.’
“Further, when a bhikkhu has heard a sound with the ear … cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind … he is called ‘one who has a teacher.’
“Further, when a bhikkhu has heard a sound with the ear...
“Geese, herons, and peacocks, Elephants, and spotted deer, All are frightened of the lion
“Get up, bhikkhu, why lie down?
“Gift-worthy, knowledge-master, inwardly developed, He deserves offerings from humans and devas.
“Giving and warfare are similar, they say:
“Giving discriminately is praised by the Fortunate One—
“Giving food, one gives strength;
“Giving what does one give strength?
“Go forward, householder!
“Go forward, householder!
“Go, headman, approach the ascetic Gotama and ask him: ‘Venerable sir, doesn’t the Blessed One in many ways praise sympathy towards families, the protection of families, compassion towards families?’
“Godha, a noble woman disciple who possesses four things is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as her destination.
“Going forth, friend, is difficult to do in this Dhamma and Discipline.”
“Good is giving, dear sir!
“Good is giving, dear sir!
“Good is giving, dear sir!
“Good is giving, dear sir!
“Good is giving, dear sir!
“Good is giving, dear sir!
“Good is restraint with the body, Restraint by speech is also good;
“Good is the word you speak of them, Of those who have abandoned Mara’s snares.
“Good will, harmlessness, and seclusion:
“Good, bhikkhu!
“Good, bhikkhu!
“Good, bhikkhu!
“Good, bhikkhu!
“Good, bhikkhus!
“Good, bhikkhus!
“Good, bhikkhus!
“Good, bhikkhus!
“Good, good Sariputta!
“Good, good, Ananda!
“Good, good, Ananda!
“Good, good, Ananda!
“Good, good, Ananda!
“Good, good, Ananda!”
“Good, good, Anuradha!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhu!
“Good, good, bhikkhus!
“Good, good, bhikkhus!
“Good, good, bhikkhus!
“Good, good, bhikkhus!
“Good, good, friend Bhadda!
“Good, good, friend Bhadda!
“Good, good, friend Bhadda!
“Good, good, friend Bhadda!
“Good, good, friend Bhadda!
“Good, good, friend Yamaka!
“Good, good, Kassapa!
“Good, good, Kassapa!”
“Good, good, Maluṅkyaputta!
“Good, good, Puṇṇa!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!
“Good, good, Sariputta!…  … it is in such a way that the meaning of this, stated in brief, should be understood in detail.”
“Good, good, Tissa!
“Good, good, Tissa!
“Good, good, Tissa!
“Good, good, Tissa!
“Good, good, Udayı̄!
“Good, good, Uttiya!
“Good, lord of the devas, is the going for refuge to the Buddha.
“Good, lord of the devas, is the going for refuge to the Buddha.
“Good, lord of the devas, is the going for refuge to the Dhamma … the going for refuge to the Saṅgha.
“Good, lord of the devas, is the possession of confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is an arahant, fully enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Good, lord of the devas, is the possession of confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Good, lord of the devas, is the possession of confirmed confidence in the Dhamma thus...
“Good, lord of the devas, is the possession of confirmed confidence in the Dhamma thus: ‘The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One, directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.’
“Good, lord of the devas, is the possession of confirmed confidence in the Saṅgha thus: ‘The Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practising the good way, practising the straight way, practising the true way, practising the proper way; that is, the four pairs of persons, the eight types of individuals—this Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.’
“Good, lord of the devas, is the possession of the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken, untorn, unblemished, unmottled, freeing, praised by the wise, ungrasped, leading to concentration.
“Good, Sir Moggallana, is the going for refuge to the Buddha … to the Dhamma … to the Saṅgha.
“Good, Sir Moggallana, is the going for refuge to the Buddha … to the Dhamma … to the Saṅgha.
“Good, Sir Moggallana, is the possession of confirmed confidence in the Buddha...
“Good, Sir Moggallana, is the possession of confirmed confidence in the Buddha...
“Good, venerable sir,” Citta the householder said.
“Good, venerable sir,” Citta the householder said.
“Grain, wealth, silver, gold, Or whatever other possessions there are, Slaves, workers, messengers, And those who live as one’s dependants:
“Great king, being a layman who enjoys sensual pleasures, dwelling in a home crowded with children, enjoying the use of Kasian sandalwood, wearing garlands, scents, and unguents, receiving gold and silver, it is difficult for you to know: ‘These are arahants or these have entered upon the path to arahantship.’
“Great king, I have not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’”
“Great king, I have not declared this: ‘The Tathagata exists after death.’”
“Great king, I say that what is chief among the five cords of sensual pleasure is determined by whatever is most agreeable.
“Great king, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death.’”
“Great king, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’”
“Great king, the Blessed One has not declared this: ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.’”
“Great king, the Blessed One has not declared this: ‘The Tathagata exists after death.’”
“Great king, there are these four kinds of persons found existing in the world.
“Great king, this was said by the Blessed One who knows and sees, the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One: ‘Come, bhikkhus, dwell guarding the doors of the sense faculties.
“Great king, this was said by the Blessed One who knows and sees, the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One: ‘Come, bhikkhus, review this very body upwards from the soles of the feet, downwards from the tips of the hairs, enclosed in skin, as full of many kinds of impurities: “There are in this body head-hairs, body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, intestines, mesentery, contents of the stomach, excrement, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, grease, saliva, snot, fluid of the joints, urine.”’ This too, great king, is a cause and reason why these young bhikkhus … lead the complete and pure holy life all their lives and maintain it  continuously.”
“Great king, this was said by the Blessed One who knows and sees, the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One: ‘Come, bhikkhus, towards women old enough to be your mother set up the idea that they are your mother;  towards those of an age to be your sisters set up the idea that they are your sisters; towards those young enough to be your daughters set up the idea that they are your daughters.’
“Greed, hatred, and delusion, Arisen from within oneself, Injure the person of evil mind
“Greed, hatred, and delusion, Arisen from within oneself, Injure the person of evil mind
“Grey hairs are growing on my head, Venerable Kassapa.
“Guarded in body, guarded in speech, Controlled in my appetite for food, I use truth as my weeding-hook, And gentleness as my unyoking.
“Had you already thought out these verses, Vaṅgisa, or did they occur to you spontaneously?” 
“Happily indeed we live, We who own nothing at all.
“Happy indeed are the arahants!
“Happy indeed are those human beings
“Hard to do, Blessed One!
“Have you ever known me to teach the Dhamma thus: ‘Come, bhikkhus, compete with each other in regard to your learning, and see who can speak more, who can speak better, who can speak longer’?” 
“Have you taken leave of Sariputta, bhikkhus?”
“Having abandoned all the knots
“Having abandoned conceit, well concentrated, With lofty mind, everywhere released:
“Having abandoned discontent and delight
“Having abandoned the destruction of life, he abstains from the destruction of life.
“Having approached you, we ask a question
“Having conquered the army of Death, Not returning to renewed existence, Having drawn out craving with its root, Godhika has attained final Nibbana.”
“Having conquered the army of the pleasant and agreeable, Meditating alone, I discovered bliss, The attainment of the goal, the peace of the heart.
“Having cut off all attachments, Having removed care from the heart, The peaceful one sleeps well, Having attained peace of mind.” 
“Having cut the thong and the strap, Having cut off evil desire and greed, Having drawn out craving with its root:
“Having cut the thong and the strap, Having cut off evil desire and greed, Having drawn out craving with its root:
“Having deviated from the austere practice
“Having directed speech and mind rightly, Doing no evil deeds with the body, Dwelling at home with ample food and drink, 
“Having dug up entirely the root of sorrow, Guiltless, I meditate free from sorrow.
“Having emerged from his daytime abode
“Having enjoyed a sweet delicious taste, And having sometimes tasted what is bitter, Do not greedily enjoy the sweet taste, Do not feel aversion towards the bitter.
“Having enjoyed a taste with mindfulness muddled …
“Having entered the empty, desolate forest, Deep in the woods where many terrors lurk, 
“Having entered the thicket at the foot of a tree, Having placed Nibbana in your heart, 
“Having exerted oneself, cut the stream!
“Having felt a contact with mindfulness muddled …
“Having four wheels and nine doors, Filled up and bound with greed, Born from a bog, O great hero!
“Having four wheels and nine doors, Filled up and bound with greed, Born from a bog, O great hero!
“Having fully understood the five aggregates, Ranging in the seven good qualities, 
“Having gained what, friend?”
“Having given this explanation, Having worshipped the Bhikkhu Saṅgha, The deva-king Maghava, Suja’s husband, The chief, climbed into his chariot.”
“Having given this explanation, Having worshipped the Blessed One, The deva-king Maghava, Suja’s husband, The chief, climbed into his chariot.”
“Having given this explanation, Having worshipped the different quarters, The deva-king Maghava, Suja’s husband, The chief, climbed into his chariot.” 
“Having given up the fire made from wood, I kindle, O brahmin, the inner light alone.
“Having gone to a sal tree with flowering top, You stand at its foot all alone, bhikkhuni.
“Having heard a sound with mindfulness muddled … 
“Having heard sounds both pleasant and raucous, Do not be enthralled with pleasant sound.
“Having known an object with mindfulness muddled …
“Having known as useless any austerity
“Having left behind the dark qualities, The wise man should develop the bright ones.
“Having left their homes and gone forth, Having left their dear sons and cattle, Having left behind lust and hatred, Having expunged ignorance—
“Having overcome the deviant course of Mara’s path, You fare having demolished barrenness of mind.
“Having reverently saluted the Saṅgha, I here speak only about some:
“Having reverently saluted the Saṅgha, I here speak only about some:
“Having seen a form with mindfulness muddled, Attending to the pleasing sign, One experiences it with infatuated mind
“Having seen forms that delight the mind
“Having slain anger, one sleeps soundly;
“Having slain anger, one sleeps soundly;
“Having slain anger, one sleeps soundly;
“Having slain anger, one sleeps soundly;
“Having slain what does one sleep soundly?
“Having slain what does one sleep soundly?
“Having slain what does one sleep soundly?
“Having slain what does one sleep soundly?
“Having smelt a fragrant, delightful scent, And having smelt a putrid stench, Dispel aversion towards the stench
“Having smelt an odour with mindfulness muddled …
“Having struck down conceit, humble, One should pay homage to the arahants, Those cool of heart, their tasks done, The taintless ones, unsurpassed.”
“Having traversed all quarters with the mind, One finds none anywhere dearer than oneself.
“He abandoned reckoning, did not assume conceit;
“He becomes engaged with form, clings to it, and takes a stand upon it as ‘my self.’
“He becomes one who closely looks on with equanimity at the mind thus concentrated.
“He becomes one who closely looks on with equanimity at the mind thus concentrated.
“He closely looks on with equanimity at the mind thus concentrated.
“He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation … he develops the mind imbued with luminosity.
“He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy … concentration due to mind … concentration due to investigation … he develops the mind imbued with luminosity.
“He develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release; which is vast, exalted, measureless, without ill will.
“He develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release; which is vast, exalted, measureless, without ill will.
“He does not become engaged with form, cling to it, and take a stand upon it as ‘my self.’
“He does not conceive all, does not conceive in all, does not conceive from all, does not conceive, ‘All is mine.’
“He does not conceive the ear … He does not conceive the mind … mental phenomena … mind-consciousness … mind-contact … and as to whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … he does not conceive that, does not conceive in that, does not conceive from that, does not conceive, ‘That is mine.’
“He does not conceive the ear … … He does not conceive the mind … and as to whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … he does not conceive that, does not conceive in that, does not conceive from that, does not conceive, ‘That is mine.’
“He does not regard consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He does not regard feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self … or self as in consciousness.
“He does not regard feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He does not regard feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He does not regard feeling as self, or self as possessing feeling, or feeling as in self, or self as in feeling.
“He does not regard feeling thus … perception thus … volitional formations thus … consciousness thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
“He does not regard perception as self, or self as possessing perception, or perception as in self, or self as in perception.
“He does not regard volitional formations as self, or self as possessing volitional formations, or volitional formations as in self, or self as in volitional formations.
“He does not understand as it really is conditioned form as ‘conditioned form’ … conditioned feeling as ‘conditioned feeling’ … conditioned perception as ‘conditioned perception’ … conditioned volitional formations as ‘conditioned volitional formations’ … conditioned consciousness as ‘conditioned consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is conditioned form as ‘conditioned form’ … conditioned feeling as ‘conditioned feeling’ … conditioned perception as ‘conditioned perception’ … conditioned volitional formations as ‘conditioned volitional formations’ … conditioned consciousness as ‘conditioned consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is impermanent form as ‘impermanent form’ … impermanent feeling as ‘impermanent feeling’ … impermanent perception as ‘impermanent perception’ … impermanent volitional formations as ‘impermanent volitional formations’ … impermanent consciousness as ‘impermanent consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is impermanent form as ‘impermanent form’ … impermanent feeling as ‘impermanent feeling’ … impermanent perception as ‘impermanent perception’ … impermanent volitional formations as ‘impermanent volitional formations’ … impermanent consciousness as ‘impermanent consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is murderous form as ‘murderous form’ … murderous feeling as ‘murderous feeling’ … murderous perception as ‘murderous perception’ … murderous volitional formations as ‘murderous volitional formations’ … murderous consciousness as ‘murderous consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is painful form as ‘painful form’ … painful feeling as ‘painful feeling’ … painful perception as ‘painful perception’ … painful volitional formations as ‘painful volitional formations’ … painful consciousness as ‘painful consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is painful form as ‘painful form’ … painful feeling as ‘painful feeling’ … painful perception as ‘painful perception’ … painful volitional formations as ‘painful volitional formations’ … painful consciousness as ‘painful consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is selfless form as ‘selfless form’ … selfless feeling as ‘selfless feeling’ … selfless perception as ‘selfless perception’ … selfless volitional formations as ‘selfless volitional formations’ … selfless consciousness as ‘selfless consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is selfless form as ‘selfless form’ … selfless feeling as ‘selfless feeling’ … selfless perception as ‘selfless perception’ … selfless volitional formations as ‘selfless volitional formations’ … selfless consciousness as ‘selfless consciousness.’
“He does not understand as it really is: ‘Form will be exterminated’ … ‘Feeling will be exterminated’ … ‘Perception will be exterminated’ … ‘Volitional formations will be exterminated’ … ‘Consciousness will be exterminated.’ 
“He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings internally … contemplating feelings in feelings externally … contemplating feelings in feelings internally and externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena … having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena … having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating mind in mind internally … contemplating mind in mind externally … contemplating mind in mind internally and externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating phenomena in phenomena internally … contemplating phenomena in phenomena externally … contemplating phenomena in phenomena internally and externally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating the nature of origination in the body externally; he dwells contemplating the nature of vanishing in the body externally; he dwells contemplating the nature of origination and vanishing in the body externally—ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating the nature of origination in the body internally and externally; he dwells contemplating the nature of vanishing in the body internally and externally; he dwells contemplating the nature of origination and vanishing in the body internally and externally—ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating the nature of origination … the nature of vanishing … the nature of origination and vanishing in feelings internally … in feelings externally … in feelings internally and externally— ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating the nature of origination … the nature of vanishing … the nature of origination and vanishing in mind internally … in mind externally … in mind internally and externally—ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells contemplating the nature of origination … the nature of vanishing … the nature of origination and vanishing in phenomena internally … in phenomena externally … in phenomena internally and externally—ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“He dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion … with a mind imbued with altruistic joy … with a mind imbued with equanimity, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
“He has cut off craving, faring with his group and order;
“He has engendered much merit—
“He has engendered much merit—
“He has understood as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of sounds...
“He is the maker of light
“He is widely known to be a wise man, Sariputta, who is free of anger;
“He is widely known to be a wise man, Sariputta, who is free of anger;
“He is worshipped by those worthy of worship, Honoured by those worthy of honour, Respected by those worthy of respect:
“He listens but does not understand, He looks but does not see;
“He may not regard form as self or self as possessing form or form as in self, but he regards self as in form.
“He may not regard form as self or self as possessing form, but he regards form as in self.
“He may not regard form as self … or hold such an view, but he holds such a view as this: ‘I might not be, and it might not be for me; I will not be, it will not be for me.’
“He may not regard form as self … or hold such an view, but he is perplexed, doubtful, indecisive in regard to the true Dhamma.
“He may not regard form as self … or self as in form, but he regards feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self … self as in consciousness.
“He may not regard form as self … … or self as in consciousness, but he holds such a view as this: ‘That which is the self is the world; having passed away, that I shall be—permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change.’
“He may not regard form as self, but he regards self as possessing form.
“He possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma thus: ‘The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One, directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.’
“He possesses confirmed confidence in the Dhamma thus: ‘The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One, directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.’
“He possesses confirmed confidence in the Saṅgha thus: ‘The Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practising the good way, practising the straight way, practising the true way, practising the proper way; that is, the four pairs of persons, the eight types of individuals—this Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.’
“He possesses confirmed confidence in the Saṅgha thus: ‘The Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practising the good way, practising the straight way, practising the true way, practising the proper way; that is, the four pairs of persons, the eight types of individuals—this Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.’
“He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones—unbroken, untorn, unblemished, unmottled, freeing, praised by the wise, ungrasped, leading to concentration.
“He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones—unbroken, untorn, unblemished, unmottled, freeing, praised by the wise, ungrasped, leading to concentration.
“He possesses these four things.
“He practises for the welfare of both—
“He reflects thus: ‘In many ways the Blessed One criticizes and censures false speech, and he says: “Abstain from false speech.”
“He reflects thus: ‘In many ways the Blessed One criticizes and censures sexual misconduct, and he says: “Abstain from sexual misconduct.”
“He reflects thus: ‘In many ways the Blessed One criticizes and censures the taking of what is not given, and he says: “Abstain from taking what is not given.”
“He reflects thus: ‘This teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “There is nothing given, nothing offered … no ascetics and brahmins faring and practising rightly in the world who, having realized this world and the other world for themselves by direct knowledge, make them known to others.”’ … This, headman, is concentration of the Dhamma.
“He reflects thus: ‘This teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “There is nothing given, nothing offered...
“He reflects thus: ‘This teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “There is what is given, there is what is offered … there are ascetics and brahmins faring and practising rightly in the world who, having realized this world and the other world for themselves by direct knowledge, make them known to others.”
“He reflects thus: ‘This teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “There is what is given, there is what is offered … there are ascetics and brahmins faring and practising rightly in the world who, having realized this world and the other world for themselves by direct knowledge, make them known to others.”’ … This, headman, is concentration of the Dhamma.
“He reflects thus: ‘This teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “When one acts or makes others act … By giving, by taming oneself, by self-control, by speaking truth, there is no merit and no outcome of merit.”
“He reflects thus: ‘This teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “When one acts or makes others act … … By giving, by taming oneself, by self-control, by speaking truth, there is no merit and no outcome of merit.”’ … This, headman, is concentration of the Dhamma.
“He reflects thus: ‘This teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “When one acts or makes others act, when one mutilates or makes others mutilate … … By giving, by taming oneself, by self-control, by speaking truth, there is merit and an outcome of merit.”
“He reflects thus: ‘This teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “When one acts or makes others act...
“He regards consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He regards feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He regards feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He regards feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He regards feeling as self … perception as self … volitional formations as self … consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
“He regards feeling as self, or self as possessing feeling, or feeling as in self, or self as in feeling.
“He regards feeling thus … perception thus … volitional formations thus … consciousness thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
“He regards perception as self, or self as possessing perception, or perception as in self, or self as in perception.
“He regards volitional formations as self, or self as possessing volitional formations, or volitional formations as in self, or self as in volitional formations.
“He sees the ear as impermanent...
“He should discard all the fetters
“he should dwell contemplating nonself in form … he is freed from suffering, I say.”
“he should dwell contemplating nonself in form … … he is freed from suffering, I say.”
“he should dwell contemplating suffering in form … he is freed from suffering, I say.”
“he should dwell contemplating suffering in form … … he is freed from suffering, I say.”
“He should not conceive all, should not conceive in all, should not conceive from all, should not conceive, ‘All is mine.’
“He should not conceive forms … eye-consciousness … eye-contact … and as to whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition … he should not conceive that, should not conceive in that, should not conceive from that, should not conceive, ‘That is mine.’
“He should not conceive the ear … He should not conceive the mind … mental phenomena … mind-consciousness … mind-contact … and as to whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … he should not conceive that, should not conceive in that, should not conceive from that, should not conceive, ‘That is mine.’
“He should not conceive the ear … He should not conceive the mind … mental phenomena … mind-consciousness … mind-contact … and as to whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … he should not conceive that, should not conceive in that, should not conceive from that, should not conceive, ‘That is mine.’
“He should speak and explain the Dhamma, He should raise high the seers’ banner.
“He should train in well-spoken counsel, And in the exercise of an ascetic, In a solitary seat, alone, And in the calming of the mind.” 
“He teaches briefly, He speaks in detail.
“He then taught me the Dhamma:
“He thinks: ‘Oh, with the breakup of the body, after death, may I be reborn in the company of the devas who dwell in fragrant roots!’ He gives food….
“He trains thus: ‘Contemplating impermanence, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating impermanence, I will breathe out.’
“He trains thus: ‘Experiencing rapture, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Experiencing rapture, I will breathe out.’
“He trains thus: ‘Experiencing the mind, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Experiencing the mind, I will breathe out.’
“He understand as it really is: ‘The mind is impermanent.’… He understand as it really is: ‘Whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … that too is impermanent.’
“He understands acquisition, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading on that is in conformity with its cessation.
“He understands aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading on that is in conformity with its cessation.
“He understands aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading on that is in conformity with its cessation.
“He understands as it really is conditioned form as ‘conditioned form’ … conditioned consciousness as ‘conditioned consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is conditioned form as ‘conditioned form’ … conditioned consciousness as ‘conditioned consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is impermanent form as ‘impermanent form’ … impermanent consciousness as ‘impermanent consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is impermanent form as ‘impermanent form’ … impermanent consciousness as ‘impermanent consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is murderous form as ‘murderous form’ … murderous consciousness as ‘murderous consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is painful form as ‘painful form’ … painful consciousness as ‘painful consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is painful form as ‘painful form’ … painful consciousness as ‘painful consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is selfless form as ‘selfless form’ … selfless consciousness as ‘selfless consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is selfless form as ‘selfless form’ … selfless consciousness as ‘selfless consciousness.’
“He understands as it really is: ‘Form will be exterminated’ … ‘Feeling will be exterminated’ … ‘Perception will be exterminated’ … ‘Volitional formations will be exterminated’ … ‘Consciousness will be exterminated.’
“He understands feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; he understands the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of consciousness.
“He understands volitional formations, their origin, their cessation, and the way leading on that is in conformity with their cessation.
“He who praises one deserving blame, Or blames one deserving praise, Casts with his mouth an unlucky throw
“He who resorts to empty huts for lodging—
“Headman, by means of this principle that is seen, understood, immediately attained, fathomed, apply the method to the past and to the future thus: ‘Whatever suffering arose in the past, all that arose rooted in desire, with desire as its source; for desire is the root of suffering.
“Headman, does one who asserts, ‘I know magic,’ also assert, ‘I am a magician’?”
“Headman, just like the field that is excellent are the bhikkhus and bhikkhunı̄s to me.
“Headman, just like the waterpot that is without cracks, which does not let water seep through and escape, are the bhikkhus and bhikkhunı̄s to me.
“Here a meditator is skilled both in attainment and in maintenance regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled both in concentration and in maintenance regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled both in concentration regarding concentration and in attainment regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled both in maintenance and in emergence regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled in attainment regarding concentration but not skilled in concentration regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled in emergence regarding concentration but not skilled in maintenance regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled in maintenance regarding concentration but not skilled in attainment regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled in maintenance regarding concentration but not skilled in concentration regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled neither in attainment nor in maintenance regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled neither in concentration nor in maintenance regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled neither in concentration regarding concentration nor in attainment regarding concentration.
“Here a meditator is skilled neither in maintenance nor in emergence regarding concentration.
“Here came Kokanada, Pajjunna’s daughter, Beautiful as the gleam of lightning.
“Here now, friend Sariputta, why should you want anything additional to this?
“Here now, Maluṅkyaputta, what should I say to the young bhikkhus when a bhikkhu like you—old, aged, burdened with years, advanced in life, come to the last stage—asks me for an exhortation in brief?” 
“Here now, Susı̄ma: this answer and the nonattainment of those states, how could this be, Susı̄ma?”
“Here now, venerable ones: this answer and the nonattainment of those states, how could this be, friends?” 
“Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
“Here, Ananda, a bhikkhu, having gone to the forest … … It is, Ananda, when the seven factors of enlightenment are developed and cultivated in this way that they fulfil true knowledge and liberation.”
“Here, bhikkhu, a bhikkhu develops the faculty of faith, which leads to peace, leads to enlightenment.
“Here, bhikkhu, it occurs to someone: ‘May I have such form in the future!
“Here, bhikkhu, one possesses a trainee’s right view...
“Here, bhikkhu, someone acts ambivalently in body, speech, and mind.
“Here, bhikkhu, someone acts ambivalently in body, speech, and mind.
“Here, bhikkhu, someone acts ambivalently in body, speech, and mind.
“Here, bhikkhu, someone acts ambivalently in body, speech, and mind.
“Here, bhikkhu, someone practises good conduct of body, speech, and mind.
“Here, bhikkhu, someone practises good conduct of body, speech, and mind.
“Here, bhikkhu, someone practises good conduct of body, speech, and mind.
“Here, bhikkhu, the instructed noble disciple understands form subject to arising as it really is thus: ‘Form is subject to arising.’
“Here, bhikkhu, the instructed noble disciple understands form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
“Here, bhikkhu, the instructed noble disciple, who is a seer of the noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who is a seer of superior persons and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, does not regard form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“Here, bhikkhu, the uninstructed worldling becomes frightened over an unfrightening matter.
“Here, bhikkhu, the uninstructed worldling does not understand form subject to arising as it really is thus: ‘Form is subject to arising.’
“Here, bhikkhu, the uninstructed worldling does not understand form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
“Here, bhikkhu, the uninstructed worldling, who is not a seer of the noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who is not a seer of superior persons and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“Here, bhikkhu, the uninstructed worldling, who is not a seer of the noble ones … regards form as self … or self as in consciousness.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops and cultivates right view … right concentration, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.” 
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops and cultivates right view … right concentration, which has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.” 
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops and cultivates right view … right concentration, which slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view … right concentration, which has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion….” 
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view … right concentration, which has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal….”
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops right view … right concentration, which slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana….”
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving, thinking: ‘Thus my desire will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.’
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving, thinking: ‘Thus my desire will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.’
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness accompanied by mindfulness of breathing, based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness … the enlightenment factor of equanimity, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body … feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu who is a trainee understands as it really is: ‘This is suffering’; he understands as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; he understands as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; he understands as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu, having gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, sits down.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu, having gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, sits down.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu, having gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, sits down.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu, having gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, sits down.
“Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu, having gone to the forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty hut, sits down.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is a persistent worker but not one who does what is suitable … one who does what is suitable but not a persistent worker … neither a persistent worker nor one who does what is suitable … both a persistent worker and one who does what is suitable regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is a thorough worker but not a persistent worker… a persistent worker but not a thorough worker … neither a thorough worker nor a persistent worker … both a thorough worker and a persistent worker regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is a thorough worker but not one who does what is suitable regarding concentration….”
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is skilled in attainment regarding concentration but not skilled in maintenance regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is skilled in concentration regarding concentration but not skilled in maintenance regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is skilled in emergence but not in pliancy … … skilled in pliancy but not in emergence … skilled neither in emergence nor in pliancy … skilled both in emergence and in pliancy regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is skilled in maintenance regarding concentration but not skilled in emergence regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is skilled in pliancy but not in the object … skilled in the object but not in pliancy … skilled neither in pliancy nor in the object … skilled both in pliancy and in the object regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is skilled in resolution but not a thorough worker… a thorough worker but not skilled in resolution … neither skilled in resolution nor a thorough worker … both skilled in resolution and a thorough worker regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is skilled in the object but not in the range … skilled in the range but not in the object … skilled neither in the object nor in the range … skilled both in the object and in the range regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a meditator is skilled in the range but not in resolution … skilled in resolution but not in the range … skilled neither in the range nor in resolution … skilled both in the range and in resolution regarding concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus … He reflects thus: ‘What now is the divine track of the devas?’
“Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.…
“Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.…
“Here, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… He possesses the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.
“Here, bhikkhus, even when young, a woman goes to live with her husband’s family and is separated from her relatives.
“Here, bhikkhus, mindful I breathe in, mindful I breathe out.
“Here, bhikkhus, one does not seek delight, one does not welcome, one does not remain holding.
“Here, bhikkhus, one seeks delight, one welcomes, one remains holding.
“Here, bhikkhus, some egg-born nagas think thus: ‘In the past we acted ambivalently in body, speech, and mind.
“Here, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling … regards form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“Here, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling, who is not a seer of the noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who is not a seer of superior persons and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“Here, bhikkhus, when engaged in inward exploration, a bhikkhu explores thus: ‘The many diverse kinds of suffering that arise in the world aging-and-death: what is the source of this suffering, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?
“Here, bhikkhus, when he makes a thorough investigation, a bhikkhu thoroughly investigates thus: ‘The many diverse kinds of suffering that arise in the world aging-and-death: what is the source of this suffering, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the displeasure faculty.
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the equanimity faculty.
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the joy faculty.
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the pain faculty.
“Here, bhikkhus, while a bhikkhu is dwelling diligent, ardent, and resolute, there arises in him the pleasure faculty.
“Here, brahmin, a bhikkhu develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving.
“Here, brahmin, having seen a form with the eye, someone is intent upon a pleasing form and repelled by a displeasing form.
“Here, brahmin, having seen a form with the eye, someone is not intent upon a pleasing form and not repelled by a displeasing form.
“Here, friend, a bhikkhu does not arouse ardour by thinking: ‘If unarisen evil unwholesome states arise in me, this may lead to my harm’; nor by thinking: ‘If evil unwholesome states that have arisen in me are not abandoned, this may lead to my harm’; nor by thinking: ‘If unarisen wholesome states do not arise in me, this may lead to my harm’; nor by thinking: ‘If wholesome states that have arisen in me cease, this may lead to my harm.’
“Here, friend, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body internally, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Here, friend, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the nature of origination in the body internally; he dwells contemplating the nature of vanishing in the body internally; he dwells contemplating the nature of origination and vanishing in the body internally— ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Here, friend, as I was coming down from Mount Vulture Peak, I saw a piece of meat moving through the air.
“Here, friend, as I was coming down from Mount Vulture Peak, I saw a probationary nun…a novice monk…a novice nun moving through the air.
“Here, friend, as I was coming down from Mount Vulture Peak, I saw a skeleton moving through the air.
“Here, friend, by completely transcending the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, I entered and dwelt in the cessation of perception and feeling.
“Here, friend, by completely transcending the base of nothingness, I entered and dwelt in the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception.
“Here, friend, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ I entered and dwelt in the base of nothingness.
“Here, friend, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ I entered and dwelt in the base of the infinity of consciousness.
“Here, friend, I said to the Blessed One: ‘Venerable sir, it is said, “one with energy aroused, one with energy aroused.”
“Here, friend, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I entered and dwelt in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
“Here, friend, the instructed noble disciple understands as it really is the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.
“Here, friend, the instructed noble disciple understands as it really is the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.
“Here, friend, the instructed noble disciple understands form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
“Here, friend, the uninstructed worldling does not understand as it really is the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.
“Here, friend, the uninstructed worldling does not understand as it really is the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness.
“Here, friend, the uninstructed worldling does not understand form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
“Here, friend, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and displeasure, I entered and dwelt in the fourth jhana, which is neither painful nor pleasant and includes the purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
“Here, friend, with the complete transcendence of perceptions of forms, with the passing away of perceptions of sensory impingement, with nonattention to perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite,’ I entered and dwelt in the base of the infinity of space.
“Here, friend, with the fading away as well of rapture, I dwelt equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, I experienced happiness with the body; I entered and dwelt in the third jhana of which the noble ones declare: ‘He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.’
“Here, friend, with the subsiding of thought and examination, I entered and dwelt in the second jhana, which has internal confidence and unification of mind, is without thought and examination, and has rapture and happiness born of concentration.
“Here, friends, when I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘Is there anything in the world through the change and alteration of which sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair might arise in me?’
“Here, friends, while I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘It is said, “noble silence, noble silence.”
“Here, friends, while I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘It is said, “the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception.”
“Here, friends, while I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘It is said, “the base of nothingness, the base of nothingness.”
“Here, friends, while I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘It is said, “the base of the infinity of consciousness, the base of the infinity of consciousness.”
“Here, friends, while I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘It is said, “the base of the infinity of space, the base of the infinity of space.”
“Here, friends, while I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘It is said, “the first jhana, the first jhana.”
“Here, friends, while I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘It is said, “the fourth jhana, the fourth jhana.”
“Here, friends, while I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘It is said, “the second jhana, the second jhana.”
“Here, friends, while I was alone in seclusion, a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘It is said, “the third jhana, the third jhana.”
“Here, Godha, a noble woman disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Here, headman, some ascetic of rough life has gone forth out of faith from the household life into homelessness with the thought: ‘Perhaps I may achieve a wholesome state; perhaps I may realize a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones.’
“Here, headman, some teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: ‘Anyone at all who destroys life...
“Here, headman, someone has abandoned lust.
“Here, headman, someone has not abandoned lust.
“Here, headman, someone who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth unlawfully, by violence.
“Here, householder, the instructed noble disciple possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Here, householder, the instructed noble disciple, who has regard for the noble ones and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, who has regard for the good persons and is skilled and disciplined in their Dhamma, does not regard form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“Here, householder, the uninstructed worldling has distrust towards the Buddha, and when he considers within himself that distrust towards the Buddha, there is fright, trepidation, and fear of imminent death.
“Here, householder, the uninstructed worldling, who has no regard for the noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who has no regard for the good persons and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“Here, Mahanama, a lay follower dwells at home with a mind devoid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishment, one devoted to charity, delighting in giving and sharing.
“Here, Mahanama, a lay follower is a person of faith.
“Here, Mahanama, a lay follower is wise, he possesses wisdom directed to arising and passing away, which is noble and penetrative, leading to the complete destruction of suffering.
“Here, Mahanama, some person does not possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha.
“Here, Mahanama, some person does not possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha.
“Here, Mahanama, some person is completely dedicated to the Buddha and has full confidence in him thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Here, Mahanama, some person is completely dedicated to the Buddha and has full confidence in him….
“Here, Mahanama, some person is completely dedicated to the Buddha and has full confidence in him….
“Here, Mahanama, some person is completely dedicated to the Buddha and has full confidence in him….
“Here, Mahanama, some person is not completely dedicated to the Buddha and does not have full confidence in him thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Here, Mahanama, some person is not completely dedicated to the Buddha and does not have full confidence in him….
“Here, Mahanama, some person possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“Here, Mahanama, some person possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha.
“Here, Mahanama, some person possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha.
“Here, Mahanama, some person possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha.
“Here, Maluṅkyaputta, regarding things seen, heard, sensed, and cognized by you: in the seen there will be merely the seen; in the heard there will be merely the heard; in the sensed there will be merely the sensed; in the cognized there will be merely the cognized.
“Here, Master Gotama, my four sons, instigated by their wives, have expelled me from the house.”
“Here, Master Gotama, whatever evil deed I have done during the day I wash away by bathing at dusk.
“Here, prince, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release.
“Here, Udayı̄, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release; which is vast, exalted, measureless, without ill will.
“Here, Udayı̄, a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, which is based upon seclusion, dispassion, and cessation, maturing in release; which is vast, exalted, measureless, without ill will.
“Here, Upavaṇa, having seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu experiences the form as well as lust for the form.
“Here, Venerable Ananda, a number of bhikkhunis, dwelling with their minds well established in the four establishments of mindfulness, perceive successively loftier stages of distinction.” 
“Here, venerable sir, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed develops the faculty of faith, which leads to peace, leads to enlightenment.
“Here, venerable sir, a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed dwells reverential and deferential towards the Teacher, the Dhamma, the Saṅgha, the training, and concentration.
“Here, venerable sir, a brahmin named Saṅgarava is residing at Savatthi.
“Here, venerable sir, a financier householder in Savatthi has died.
“Here, venerable sir, I approached the Blessed One….
“Here, venerable sir, I enter the village for alms alone, I return alone, I sit alone in private, and I undertake walking meditation alone.
“Here, venerable sir, in the morning I dressed and, taking bowl and robe, entered Savatthı̄ for alms.
“Here, venerable sir, some issue concerning the Dhamma may arise.
“Here, venerable sir, some issue concerning the Dhamma may arise.
“Here, venerable sir, some issue concerning the Dhamma may arise.
“Here, venerable sir, wanderers of other sects ask us: ‘For what purpose, friends, is the holy life lived under the ascetic Gotama?’
“Here, venerable sir, when I was alone in seclusion a reflection arose in my mind thus: ‘Five cords of sensual pleasure have been spoken of by the Blessed One.
“Here, venerable sir, when King Pasenadi of Kosala wants to make an excursion to his pleasure garden, after we have prepared his riding elephants we have to place the king’s dear and beloved wives on their seats, one in front and one behind.
“Herein, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu understands aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
“Herein, headman, having abandoned the destruction of life, the noble disciple abstains from the destruction of life.
“Hold it, friend Ananda!
“Householder, for the instructed noble disciple who possesses four things there is no fright, no trepidation, no fear of imminent death.
“Householder, for the uninstructed worldling who possesses four things there is fright, there is trepidation, there is fear of imminent death.
“Householder, in the case of one who is dead and gone, the bodily formation has ceased and subsided, the verbal formation has ceased and subsided, the mental formation has ceased and subsided; his vitality is extinguished, his physical heat has been dissipated, and his faculties are fully broken up.
“Householder, in-breathing and out-breathing are bodily, these things are dependent upon the body; that is why in-breathing and out-breathing are the bodily formation.
“Householder, the measureless liberation of mind, the liberation of mind by nothingness, the liberation of mind by emptiness, and the signless liberation of mind: are these things different in meaning and also different in phrasing, or are they one in meaning and different only in phrasing?”
“Householder, there exists the ear element...
“Householder, there exists the eye element, and forms that are agreeable, and eye-consciousness: in dependence on a contact to be experienced as pleasant, a pleasant feeling arises.
“Householder, through the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishment of desire, lust, delight, craving, engagement and clinging, mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies towards the form element, the mind is said to be well liberated.
“Householder, when a bhikkhu has emerged from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, his mind slants, slopes, and inclines towards seclusion.” 
“Householder, when a bhikkhu has emerged from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, three kinds of contact touch him: emptiness-contact, signless-contact, undirected-contact.” 
“Householder, when a bhikkhu is attaining the cessation of perception and feeling, first the verbal formation ceases, after that the bodily formation, and after that the mental formation.” 
“Householder, when a bhikkhu is attaining the cessation of perception and feeling, it does not occur to him: ‘I will attain the cessation of perception and feeling,’ or ‘I am attaining the cessation of perception and feeling,’ or ‘I have attained the cessation of perception and feeling’; but rather his mind has previously been developed in such a way that it leads him to such a state.” 
“Householder, when a bhikkhu is emerging from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, first the mental formation arises, after that the bodily formation, and after that the verbal formation.” 
“Householder, when a bhikkhu is emerging from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling, it does not occur to him: ‘I will emerge from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling,’ or ‘I am emerging from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling,’ or ‘I have emerged from the attainment of the cessation of perception and feeling’; but rather his mind has previously been developed in such a way that it leads him to such a state.” 
“Householder, when five fearful animosities have subsided in a noble disciple, and he possesses the four factors of stream-entry, and he has clearly seen and thoroughly penetrated with wisdom the noble method, if he wishes he could by himself declare of himself: ‘I am one finished with hell, finished with the animal realm, finished with the domain of ghosts, finished with the plane of misery, the bad destinations, the nether world.
“Householder, your faculties are serene, your facial complexion is pure and bright.
“How are you untroubled, bhikkhu?
“How can anger arise in one who is angerless, In the tamed one of righteous living, In one liberated by perfect knowledge, In the Stable One who abides in peace?
“How could a person incline to sensual pleasures
“How could a person incline to sensual pleasures
“How could I not, venerable sir?
“How do you engage in inward exploration, bhikkhu?”
“How does a bhikkhu here often dwell
“How does one cross over the flood?
“How does one gain wisdom?
“How is it now, Master Gotama, is there a self?”
“How is it then, friend, does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?”
“How is it then, Master Gotama: are pleasure and pain created both by oneself and by another?”
“How is it then, Master Gotama: is suffering created both by oneself and by another?”
“How is it then, Master Gotama: is there no pleasure and pain?”
“How is it then, Master Gotama: is there no suffering?”
“How is it then, Master Moggallana, are the soul and the body the same?”
“How is it then, Master Moggallana, is the world finite?”
“How is it then, revered lady, does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?”
“How is it, friend Ananda, is the eye the fetter of forms or are forms the fetter of the eye?… Is the mind the fetter of mental phenomena or are mental phenomena the fetter of the mind?”
“How is it, friend Kassapa, does the Tathagata exist after death?” 
“How is it, friend Koṭṭhita, does the Tathagata exist after death?”
“How is it, friend Sariputta, does the Tathagata exist after death?”
“How is it, friend Sariputta, is the eye the fetter of forms or are forms the fetter of the eye?
“How is it, friend Sariputta: Is aging-and-death created by oneself, or is it created by another, or is it created both by oneself and by another, or has it arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another?” 
“How is it, friend Sariputta: Is birth created by oneself...
“How is it, friend Sariputta: Is consciousness created by oneself, or is it created by another, or is it created both by oneself and by another, or has it arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another?”
“How is it, good Gotama, is the world eternal?”
“How is it, Master Gotama, is the world eternal?”…...
“How is it, Master Gotama: does all exist?”
“How is it, Master Gotama: does all exist?”
“How is it, Master Gotama: is all a unity?” 
“How is it, Master Gotama: is suffering created by oneself?”
“How is it, Master Gotama: is the one who acts the same as the one who experiences?” 
“How is it, Master Kaccana, does the Tathagata exist after death?”
“How is it, Master Moggallana, does the Tathagata exist after death?”
“How is it, Master Moggallana, is the world eternal?”
“How is it, Master Moggallana, is the world eternal?”
“How is it, revered lady, does the Tathagata exist after death?” 
“How is it, then, Master Moggallana, does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?”
“How is it, venerable sir, does the Tathagata exist after death?” 
“How is this, friend?
“How is this, revered lady?
“How is this, venerable sir?
“How long has it been since you went forth, Master Kaccana?”
“How long has it been, Venerable Kassapa, since you went forth?”
“How many are asleep when are awake?
“How many days can one practise the ascetic life
“How many fissures are there in the world
“How many must one cut, how many abandon, And how many further must one develop?
“How many sources of light are in the world
“How many sources of light are in the world
“How, Ananda, are the seven factors of enlightenment developed and cultivated so that they fulfil true knowledge and liberation?
“How, Ananda, is concentration by mindfulness of breathing developed and cultivated so that it fulfils the four establishments of mindfulness?
“How, bhikkhus, is it to be obtained here: ‘May what is born, come to be, conditioned, and subject to disintegration not disintegrate!’?
“How, friends, is one corrupted?
“How, O Blessed One, can your disciple—
“However one may ponder it
“I abstained from sexual intercourse, I was celibate, free from carnal ties.
“I am afraid for Nagadatta, So impudent, bound to families.
“I am burning with sensual lust, My mind is engulfed by fire.
“I am desireless, unattached, disengaged;
“I am doing my own duty, venerable sir.”
“I am freed from all the snares
“I am freed from Mara’s snare
“I am newly ordained, friend, not long gone forth, just recently come to this Dhamma and Discipline.
“I am not afraid, Venerable Ananda.
“I am not bearing up, friend, I am not getting better.
“I am not bearing up, venerable sir, I am not getting better.
“I am not bearing up, venerable sir, I am not getting better.
“I am not bearing up, venerable sir, I am not getting better.
“I am not bearing up, venerable sir, I am not getting better.
“I am not crying, venerable sir, because of what the Blessed One said to me, but because I have been tricked, cheated, and deceived for a long time by those actors of old in the lineage of teachers who said: ‘If an actor, in the theatre or the arena, entertains and amuses people by truth and lies, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the laughing devas.’
“I am not crying, venerable sir, because of what the Blessed One said to me, but because I have been tricked, cheated, and deceived for a long time by those mercenaries of old in the lineage of teachers who said: ‘When a mercenary is one who strives and exerts himself in battle, if others slay him and finish him off while he is striving and exerting himself in battle, then with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the company of the battle-slain devas.’
“I am old, venerable sir, aged, burdened with years, advanced in life, come to the last stage, afflicted in body, often ill.
“I am one, venerable sir, by whom this has been known, seen, understood, realized, and contacted with wisdom.
“I am repelled and humiliated
“I am the independent brahma Tudu.”
“I am the master of my mind, The bases of power are well developed;
“I am the one who knows
“I ask you, Gotama, broad of wisdom—
“I can make myself disappear
“I come from Avanti, householder.”
“I did have a conversation with them, brahmin.”
“I did not reach any limit, venerable sir, to the meritorious deeds that I did for such a long time, to the wholesome deeds that I did for such a long time, such that I could say: ‘There is just so much merit,’ or ‘There is just so much result of merit,’ or ‘For just so long am I to dwell in heaven.’
“I didn’t approach the Blessed One by means of spiritual power, friend, nor did the Blessed One approach me by means of spiritual power.
“I do not have, venerable sir, any knowledge encompassing the minds of the Arahants, the Perfectly Enlightened Ones of the past, the future, and the present, but still I have understood this by inference from the Dhamma.
“I do not know what the time might be;
“I do not lie awake in dread, Nor am I afraid to sleep.
“I do not lie in a daze or drunk on poetry;
“I do not say of those bhikkhus who are arahants, whose taints are destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached their own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, and are completely liberated through final knowledge, that they still have work to do with diligence in regard to the six bases for contact.
“I do not say, Ananda, that gain, honour, and praise are an obstacle to his unshakable liberation of mind.
“I do not say, ‘One consumes.’
“I do not say, ‘One craves.’
“I do not say, ‘One feels.’
“I do not say, ‘One makes contact.’
“I do not see anyone in this world, friend, with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, who could drive me insane or split my heart or grab me by the feet and hurl me across the Ganges.
“I do not see anyone in this world, friend, with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, who could drive me insane or split my heart or grab me by the feet and hurl me across the Ganges.
“I do not see anyone, brahmin, in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, who could eat and properly digest this sacrificial cake except the Tathagata or a disciple of the Tathagata.
“I do not see anyone, brahmin, in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans, who could refute the doctrine of the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
“I do not take, I do not damage, I sniff the lotus from afar;
“I do not understand in detail, friends, the meaning of what has been stated in brief by the venerable ones.
“I do not understand in detail, venerable sir, the meaning of what was stated in brief by the Blessed One.
“I do not understand in detail, venerable sir, the meaning of what was stated in brief by the Blessed One.
“I do not wish to be reborn anywhere, friend.”
“I do, venerable sir.”
“I don’t approve of anyone’s creed, friend.”
“I don’t approve of birth, friend.”
“I don’t eat facing downwards, sister.”
“I don’t eat facing the intermediate directions, sister.”
“I don’t eat facing the quarters, sister.”
“I don’t eat facing upwards, sister.” 
“I dwell contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“I had not already thought out these verses, venerable sir; they occurred to me spontaneously.”
“I had some Dhamma talk with the Blessed One, friend.”
“I had, bull elephants with golden ornaments and golden banners, covered with nets of golden thread, the chief of which was the royal bull elephant Uposatha.
“I had, jewels, the chief of which was the jewel-gem.
“I have abandoned sensual desire for past sensual pleasures, venerable sir, I have gotten rid of sensual desire for future sensual pleasures, and I have thoroughly dispelled perceptions of aversion towards things internally and externally.
“I have confidence in the Blessed One thus: ‘The Blessed One is capable of teaching me the Dhamma in such a way that I might abandon this state of perplexity.’”
“I have gone forth out of faith
“I have heard this as a witness
“I have heard, venerable sir: ‘The ascetic Gotama knows magic.’
“I have made up this simile, bhikkhus, in order to convey a meaning.
“I have made up this simile, bhikkhus, in order to convey a meaning.
“I have made up this simile, Tissa, in order to convey a meaning.
“I have no doubt, friend.”
“I have no perplexity, friend.”
“I have nothing, venerable sir, for which to reproach myself in regard to virtue.”
“I have nothing, venerable sir, for which to reproach myself in regard to virtue.”
“I have obtained the enlightenment factor of mindfulness which, when I have developed and cultivated it, will lead me on, while I am dwelling in the appropriate way, to such a state that I shall understand: ‘Destroyed is birth … there is no more for this state of being.’… I have obtained the enlightenment factor of equanimity which, when I have developed and cultivated it, will lead me on, while I am dwelling in the appropriate way, to such a state that I shall understand: ‘Destroyed is birth … there is no more for this state of being.’
“I have seen this, venerable sir, and I have heard of it, and I will hear of it.”
“I have seen this, venerable sir, and I have heard of it, and I will hear of it.”
“I have seen this, venerable sir, and I have heard of it, and I will hear of it.”
“I have seen this, venerable sir, and I have heard of it, and I will hear of it.” 
“I have, Mahali.”
“I hope that you’re untroubled, bhikkhu.
“I hope then, bhikkhu, that you are not troubled by remorse and regret.”
“I hope then, Vakkali, that you are not troubled by remorse and regret.”
“I hope you are bearing up, Kassapa, I hope you are getting better.
“I hope, bhikkhu, that you have nothing for which to reproach yourself in regard to virtue.”
“I hope, Vakkali, that you have nothing for which to reproach yourself in regard to virtue.”
“I know now my past abodes, The divine eye is purified.
“I know Sakka, Mahali, and I know the qualities that make for Sakka, by the undertaking of which Sakka achieved the status of Sakka.
“I know, friend, emancipation, release, seclusion for beings.”
“I know, venerable sir, that they are immoral, of bad character.
“I myself will travel about
“I no longer hold that view, dear sir, The view that I formerly held.
“I recall, Ananda, having gone to the brahma world by spiritual power with a mind-made body.”
“I recall, Ananda, having gone to the brahma world by spiritual power with this body composed of the four great elements.”
“I recollect ninety-one aeons back, headman, but I do not recall any family that has ever been destroyed merely by offering cooked almsfood.
“I remember suffering, venerable sir, as the first noble truth taught by the Blessed One.
“I remember suffering, venerable sir, as the first noble truth taught by the Blessed One.
“I remember the origin of suffering as the second noble truth taught by the Blessed One….
“I saw a bhikkhu moving through the air.
“I saw a bhikkhunı̄ moving through the air.
“I saw a flayed man….”
“I saw a flayed woman moving through the air.
“I saw a headless trunk moving through the air; its eyes and mouth were on its chest.
“I saw a lump of meat….”
“I saw a man submerged in a pit of dung, eating dung with both hands….”
“I saw a man whose testicles were like pots moving through the air.
“I saw a man with body-hairs of arrows moving through the air.
“I saw a man with body-hairs of needles moving through the air.
“I saw a man with body-hairs of needles moving through the air.
“I saw a man with body-hairs of spears moving through the air.
“I saw a man with body-hairs of swords moving through the air.
“I saw a man with head submerged in a pit of dung….”
“I saw a woman, foul-smelling and ugly, moving through the air.
“I saw a woman, her body roasting, sweltering, sooty, moving through the air, while she uttered cries of pain....” 
“I say, bhikkhus, that birth too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that clinging too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that concentration too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that craving too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that dispassion too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that existence too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that faith too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that gladness too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that happiness too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that liberation too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that rapture too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that revulsion too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that suffering too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that the knowledge and vision of things as they really are too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that the knowledge of destruction in regard to destruction has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that tranquillity too has a proximate cause; it does not lack a proximate cause.
“I say, bhikkhus, that volitional formations too have a proximate cause; they do not lack a proximate cause.
“I see, dear sir, that you have so much power and might.”
“I see, dear sir, that you have so much power and might.”
“I spent the day in a gross dwelling, friend, but I did have some Dhamma talk.” 
“I suppose you desire the supreme triple heaven, The company of the world’s divine lord.
“I too, bhikkhus, before my enlightenment, while I was still a bodhisatta, not yet fully enlightened, generally dwelt in this dwelling.
“I too, brahmin, plough and sow, and when I have ploughed and sown I eat.”
“I understand in detail, venerable sir, the meaning of what was stated by the Blessed One in brief:
“I understand in detail, venerable sir, the meaning of what was stated in brief by the Blessed One thus:
“I understand, headman, the destruction of life, and the result of the destruction of life, and I understand how one who destroys life, faring along, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“I understand, headman, the taking of what is not given...
“I understand, venerable sir, that it is not for the sake of purification of virtue that the Dhamma has been taught by the Blessed One.”
“I was the one, friend, that the Blessed One brought forward in the presence of the Bhikkhu Saṅgha, saying: ‘Bhikkhus, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life I enter and dwell in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for myself with direct knowledge.
“I was the one, friend, that the Blessed One brought forward in the presence of the Bhikkhu Saṅgha, saying: ‘Bhikkhus, to whatever extent I wish, … I enter and dwell in the first jhana….
“I was your apprentice named Kappa;
“I will teach you, friends, an exposition on the corrupted and the uncorrupted.
“I will teach you, householders, a Dhamma exposition applicable to oneself.
“I won’t go out, friend.
“I worship the Buddha, the best of beings, Dwelling in the woods at Vesali.
“If a bhikkhu is an arahant, Consummate, with taints destroyed, One who bears his final body, He might still say, ‘I speak,’
“If a bhikkhu is an arahant, Consummate, with taints destroyed, One who bears his final body, Would he still say, ‘I speak’?
“If anyone, bhikkhus, should speak thus: ‘Having rejected this all, I shall make known another all’—that would be a mere empty boast on his part.
“If anyone, bhikkhus, should speak thus: ‘Having rejected this dyad, I shall make known another dyad’—that would be a mere empty boast on his part.
“If anyone, bhikkhus, speaking rightly could say of anything: ‘It is a noble dwelling, a divine dwelling, the Tathagata’s dwelling,’ it is of concentration by mindfulness of breathing that one could rightly say this.
“If anyone, bhikkhus, speaking rightly could say of anything: ‘It is a noble dwelling, a divine dwelling, the Tathagata’s dwelling,’ it is of concentration by mindfulness of breathing that one could rightly say this.” 
“If devas and humans have not seen
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he feels it attached.
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he feels it detached.
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a painful feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he feels it detached.
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a painful feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he feels it detached.
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a painful feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he feels it detached.
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a painful feeling, he feels it detached; if he feels a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he feels it detached.
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
“If he feels a pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
“If he feels a pleasant feeling......
“If he says: ‘I have abandoned my anxiety over my mother and father,’ he should be asked: ‘Are you anxious about your wife and children?’
“If he says: ‘I have abandoned my anxiety over my wife and children,’ he should be asked: ‘Are you anxious about the five cords of human sensual pleasure?’
“If he says: ‘My mind has been withdrawn from human sensual pleasures and resolved on the devas of the realm of the Four Great Kings,’ he should be told: ‘The Tavatiṁsa devas, friend, are more excellent and sublime than the devas of the realm of the Four Great Kings.
“If he says: ‘My mind has been withdrawn from the brahma world; I have directed my mind to the cessation of identity,’ then, Mahanama, I say there is no difference between a lay follower who is thus liberated in mind and a bhikkhu who has been liberated in mind for a hundred years, that is, between one liberation and the other.” 
“If he says: ‘My mind has been withdrawn from the devas of the realm of the Four Great Kings and resolved on the Tavatiṁsa devas,’ he should be told: ‘More excellent and sublime, friend, than the Tavatiṁsa devas are the Yama devas … the Tusita devas … the Nimmanarati devas … the Paranimmitavasavatti devas.… The brahma world, friend, is more excellent and sublime than the Paranimmitavasavatti devas.
“If he says: ‘My mind has been withdrawn from the Paranimmitavasavatti devas and resolved on the brahma world,’ he should be told: ‘Even the brahma world, friend, is impermanent, unstable, included in identity.
“If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the repulsive therein.
“If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the repulsive therein….
“If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the repulsive therein….
“If he wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive,’ he dwells perceiving the repulsive therein….
“If it would ever do so, venerable sir, it would be only after a very long time.”
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life or at the time of death, then with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters one becomes an attainer of Nibbana in the interval.
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life … or become an attainer of Nibbana in the interval, then with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters one becomes an attainer of Nibbana upon landing.
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life … or become an attainer of Nibbana upon landing, then with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters one becomes an attainer of Nibbana without exertion.
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life … or become an attainer of Nibbana with exertion, then with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters one becomes one bound upstream, heading towards the Akaniṭṭha realm.
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life … or become an attainer of Nibbana without exertion, then with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters one becomes an attainer of Nibbana with exertion.
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life, then one attains final knowledge at the time of death.
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life, then one attains final knowledge at the time of death.
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life...
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life...
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life...
“If one does not attain final knowledge early in this very life...
“If one does not grant pardon
“If one does not grant pardon
“If one dwells with restraint over the ear faculty, the mind is not soiled among sounds cognizable by the ear….
“If one dwells without restraint over the ear faculty, the mind is soiled among sounds cognizable by the ear….
“If one is frightened by random sounds
“If one practises the Dhamma
“If one regards oneself as dear
“If one shows oneself in one way
“If one were as one’s name implies
“If one would do what should be done, One should firmly exert oneself.
“If one wrongs an innocent man, A pure person without blemish, The evil falls back on the fool himself
“If one wrongs an innocent man, A pure person without blemish, The evil falls back on the fool himself
“If the cause and condition for the arising of eye-consciousness would cease completely and totally without remainder, could eye-consciousness be discerned?”
“If the cause and condition for the arising of mind-consciousness would cease completely and totally without remainder, could mind-consciousness be discerned?”
“If there was no transgression, If here there was no going astray, And if enmities were appeased, Then one would be faultless here.” 
“If there were a mountain made of gold, Made entirely of solid gold, Not double this would suffice for one:
“If there were no earth, where would it become established?”
“If there were no water, where would it become established?”
“If there were no western wall, where would it become established?”
“If these five kinds of seeds are broken, spoilt, damaged by wind and sun, unfertile, not securely planted, but there is earth and water, would these five kinds of seeds come to growth, increase, and expansion?”
“If these five kinds of seeds are unbroken, unspoilt, undamaged by wind and sun, fertile, securely planted, and there is earth and water, would these five kinds of seeds come to growth, increase, and expansion?”
“If they come back to the human state
“If they come back to the human state
“If they do not accept it from me, then the food still belongs to us.”
“If they were to ask me this, friend, I would answer thus: ‘Friends, form is impermanent; what is impermanent is suffering; what is suffering has ceased and passed away.
“If they were to ask me this, venerable sir, I would answer thus: ‘Birth, friends, has existence has its source, existence as its origin; it is born and produced from existence.’
“If they were to ask me this, venerable sir, I would answer thus: ‘Craving, friends, has feeling as its source, feeling as its origin; it is born and produced from feeling.’
“If they were to ask me this, venerable sir, I would answer thus: ‘Existence, friends, has clinging as its source….’”
“If they were to ask me this, venerable sir, I would answer thus: ‘Friends, there are these three feelings.
“If they were to ask me this, venerable sir, I would answer thus: ‘Friends, through an internal deliverance, through the destruction of all clinging, I dwell mindfully in such a way that the taints do not flow within me and I do not despise myself.’
“If they were to ask me this, venerable sir, I would answer thus: ‘With the destruction of the source from which birth originates, I have understood: “When is destroyed, is destroyed.”
“If we had assailed with such tactics any ascetic or brahmin who was not devoid of lust, either his heart would have burst, or he would have vomited hot blood from his mouth, or he would have gone mad or become mentally deranged; or else he would have dried up and withered away and become shrivelled, just as a green reed that has been mowed down would dry up and wither away and become shrivelled.”
“If you cannot recollect me, then you should recollect the Dhamma thus: ‘The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One, directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.’
“If you cannot recollect the Dhamma, then you should recollect the Saṅgha thus: ‘The Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practising the good way, practising the straight way, practising the true way, practising the proper way; that is, the four pairs of persons, the eight types of individuals—this Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.’
“If you have discovered the path, The secure way leading to the Deathless, Be off and walk that path alone;
“If you understand, spirit, speak up.”
“If you understand, spirit, speak up.”
“If you understand, spirit, speak up.”
“If, Ananda, they were to ask you: ‘Friend Ananda, what are the things of which an arising is discerned, a vanishing is discerned, an alteration of that which stands is discerned?’—being asked thus, how would you answer?” 
“If, Ananda, they were to ask you: ‘Friend Ananda, what are the things of which an arising was discerned, a vanishing was discerned, an alteration of that which stands was discerned?
“If, Ananda, when I was asked by the wanderer Vacchagotta, ‘Is there a self?’
“If, Ananda, when I was asked by the wanderer Vacchagotta, ‘Is there a self?’
“If, bhikkhu you understand that the Dhamma has not been taught by me for the sake of purification of virtue, then for what purpose do you understand the Dhamma to have been taught by me?”
“If, bhikkhu, while one dwells contemplating rise and fall in the eye faculty, one experiences revulsion towards the eye faculty; if, while one dwells contemplating rise and fall in the ear faculty, one experiences revulsion towards the ear faculty; … if, while one dwells contemplating rise and fall in the mind faculty, one experiences revulsion towards the mind faculty, then, experiencing revulsion, one becomes dispassionate….
“If, bhikkhu, you understand that the Dhamma has not been taught by me for the sake of purification of virtue, then for what purpose do you understand the Dhamma to have been taught by me?”
“If, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu gains concentration, gains one-pointedness of mind based upon energy, this is called concentration due to energy.
“If, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu gains concentration, gains one-pointedness of mind, based upon mind, this is called concentration due to mind.
“If, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu’s mind has become dispassionate towards the form element, it is liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the power of beauty but not the power of virtue, they expel her; they do not accommodate her in the family.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the power of beauty but not the power of wealth, then she is deficient in that respect.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the power of virtue but not the power of beauty, they accommodate her in the family; they do not expel her.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the power of virtue but not the power of relatives, they accommodate her in the family; they do not expel her.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the power of virtue but not the power of sons, they accommodate her in the family; they do not expel her.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the power of virtue but not the power of wealth, they accommodate her in the family; they do not expel her.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the powers of beauty and wealth, but not the power of relatives, then she is deficient in that respect.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the powers of beauty and wealth, but not the power of virtue, they expel her; they do not accommodate her in the family.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the powers of beauty, wealth, and relatives, but not the power of sons, then she is deficient in that respect.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the powers of beauty, wealth, and relatives, but not the power of virtue, they expel her; they do not accommodate her in the family.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the powers of beauty, wealth, relatives, and sons, but not the power of virtue, then she is deficient in that respect.
“If, bhikkhus, a woman possesses the powers of beauty, wealth, relatives, and sons, but not the power of virtue, they expel her; they do not accommodate her in the family.
“If, bhikkhus, one does not intend, and one does not plan, but one still has a tendency towards something, this becomes a basis for the maintenance of consciousness.
“If, bhikkhus, one does not intend, and one does not plan, but one still has a tendency towards something, this becomes a basis for the maintenance of consciousness.
“If, bhikkhus, one does not intend, and one does not plan, but one still has a tendency towards something, this becomes a basis for the maintenance of consciousness.
“If, bhikkhus, one were to say of anything ‘a heap of the wholesome,’ it is about the four establishments of mindfulness that one could rightly say this.
“If, bhikkhus, one were to say of anything ‘a heap of the wholesome,’ it is about these four establishments of mindfulness that one could rightly say this.
“If, bhikkhus, that log does not veer towards the near shore, does not veer towards the far shore, does not sink in mid-stream, does not get cast up on high ground, does not get caught by human beings, does not get caught by nonhuman beings, does not get caught in a whirlpool, and does not become inwardly rotten, it will slant, slope, and incline towards the ocean.
“If, bhikkhus, there is lust for the nutriment contact, or for the nutriment mental volition, or for the nutriment consciousness, if there is delight, if there is craving, consciousness becomes established there and comes to growth.
“If, bhikkhus, there is lust for the nutriment edible food, if there is delight, if there is craving, consciousness becomes established there and comes to growth.
“If, bhikkhus, there is no lust for the nutriment edible food, or for the nutriment contact, or for the nutriment mental volition, or for the nutriment consciousness, if there is no delight, if there is no craving, consciousness does not become established there and come to growth.
“If, bhikkhus, wanderers of other sects ask you: ‘But, friends, is there a path, is there a way for the full understanding of this suffering?’—being asked thus, you should answer them thus: ‘There is a path, friends, there is a way for the full understanding of this suffering.’
“If, friend Yamaka, they were to ask you: ‘Friend Yamaka, when a bhikkhu is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, what happens to him with the breakup of the body, after death?’—being asked thus, what would you answer?”
“If, friend, a bhikkhu teaches the Dhamma for the purpose of revulsion towards birth...
“If, friend, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a son of the Blessed One, born of his breast, born of his mouth, born of the Dhamma, created by the Dhamma, an heir to the Dhamma, a receiver of worn-out hempen rag-robes,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.
“If, friend, one were to remove one of those sheaves of reeds, the other would fall, and if one were to remove the other sheaf, the first would fall.
“If, friend, the ear were the fetter of sounds or if sounds were the fetter of the ear...
“If, friend, the eye were the fetter of forms or if forms were the fetter of the eye, this living of the holy life could not be discerned for the complete destruction of suffering.
“If, friends, it occurs to me, ‘ the enlightenment factor of equanimity,’ it occurs to me, ‘It’s measureless’; it occurs to me, ‘It’s fully perfected.’
“If, friends, it occurs to me, ‘ the enlightenment factor of mindfulness,’ it occurs to me, ‘It’s measureless’; it occurs to me, ‘It’s fully perfected.’
“If, friends, it occurs to me, ‘ the enlightenment factor of mindfulness’ … … I understand, ‘It has abated in me for a particular reason.’”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.”
“If, friends, one speaking rightly could say of anyone: ‘He is a disciple who attained to greatness of direct knowledge with the assistance of the Teacher,’ it is of me that one could rightly say this.” 
“If, friends, one who enters and dwells amidst unwholesome states could dwell happily in this very life, without vexation, despair, and fever, and if, with the breakup of the body, after death, he could expect a good destination, then the Blessed One would not praise the abandoning of unwholesome states.
“If, friends, one who enters and dwells amidst wholesome states would dwell in suffering in this very life, with vexation, despair, and fever, and if, with the breakup of the body, after death, he could expect a bad destination, then the Blessed One would not praise the acquisition of wholesome states.
“If, great king, one speaking rightly could say of anyone, ‘He has awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment,’ it is of me that one might rightly say this.
“If, headman, I were to teach you about the origin and the passing away of suffering with reference to the past, saying, ‘So it was in the past,’ perplexity and uncertainty about that might arise in you.
“If, headman, it can be said about you, ‘Paṭaliya the headman knows the Koliyans’ hirelings with drooping head-dresses, who are immoral, of bad character, but Paṭaliya the headman is not immoral, of bad character,’ then why can’t it be said about the Tathagata: ‘The Tathagata knows magic, but the Tathagata is not a magician’?
“If, headman, it were the case that one is led on by the manner in which one usually dwells, then according to Nigaṇṭha Nataputta’s word, no one at all would be bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.
“If, Kassapa, one speaking rightly could say: ‘Those leading the holy life have been ruined by the ruination of those who lead the holy life; those leading the holy life have been vanquished by the vanquishing of those who lead the holy life,’ it is just thus that one could rightly say this.”
“If, Mahali, this feeling were exclusively pleasurable … If this perception … these volitional formations … this consciousness were exclusively pleasurable … beings would not experience revulsion towards it.
“If, Mahali, this feeling were exclusively suffering … If this perception … these volitional formations … … this consciousness were exclusively suffering … beings would not become enamoured with it.
“If, Mahali, this form were exclusively pleasurable, immersed in pleasure, steeped in pleasure, and if it were not steeped in suffering, beings would not experience revulsion towards it.
“If, Mahali, this form were exclusively suffering, immersed in suffering, steeped in suffering, and if it were not steeped in pleasure, beings would not become enamoured with it.
“If, O Sakka, for some reason
“If, Sariputta, they were to ask you: ‘Friend Sariputta, how have you known, how have you seen, that you have declared final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being’—being asked thus, how would you answer?”
“If, venerable sir, one does not have an underlying tendency towards form, then one is not measured in accordance with it; if one is not measured in accordance with it, then one is not reckoned in terms of it.
“If, venerable sir, one does not have an underlying tendency towards form, then one is not reckoned in terms of it.
“If, venerable sir, one formerly belonging to another sect who desires the going forth and the higher ordination in this Dhamma and Discipline lives on probation for four months, and if at the end of the four months the bhikkhus, being satisfied with him, may if they wish give him the going forth and the higher ordination to the state of a bhikkhu, then I will live on probation for four years.
“If, venerable sir, one has an underlying tendency towards form, then one is measured in accordance with it; if one is measured in accordance with it, then one is reckoned in terms of it.
“If, venerable sir, one has an underlying tendency towards form, then one is reckoned in terms of it.
“If, venerable sir, such a great peril should arise, such a terrible destruction of human life, the human state being so difficult to obtain, what else should be done but to live by the Dhamma, to live righteously, and to do wholesome and meritorious deeds?” “I inform you, great king, I announce to you, great king: aging and death are rolling in on you.
“If, venerable sir, that farmer wishes to sow seed, he would sow it in the excellent field.
“If, venerable sir, that man wants to store water, he would store it in the waterpot that is without cracks, which does not let water seep through and escape.
“If, venerable sir, the Blessed One does not censure any deed of mine, bodily or verbal, does he censure any deed, bodily or verbal, of these five hundred bhikkhus?”
“If, while I am dwelling thus, You approach me, Evil One, I will act in such a way, O Death, That you won’t even see my path.” 
“Ignorance is comprised within these states.
“Ignorance, bhikkhu, is that one thing through the abandoning of which ignorance is abandoned by a bhikkhu and true knowledge arises.” 
“Immoral, venerable sir.”
“Impermanent indeed are formations;
“Impermanent, alas, are formations, Their nature is to arise and vanish.
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
“Impermanent, venerable sir.”…
“In a forest, at the foot of a tree, Or in an empty hut, O bhikkhus, You should recollect the Buddha:
“In clinging to form, venerable sir, one is bound by Mara; by not clinging to it one is freed from the Evil One.
“In conceiving form, venerable sir, one is bound by Mara; by not conceiving it one is freed from the Evil One.
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as neither-painful-nor-pleasant, a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling arises.
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as painful, a painful feeling arises.
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as painful, bhikkhus, the pain faculty arises.
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as pleasant, bhikkhus, a pleasant feeling arises.
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as pleasant, bhikkhus, the pleasure faculty arises.
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced joyously, bhikkhus, the joy faculty arises.
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced with displeasure, bhikkhus, the displeasure faculty arises.
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced with equanimity, bhikkhus, the equanimity faculty arises.
“In dependence on a middling element, Kaccayana, there arises a middling perception, a middling view, middling thought, middling volition, middling longing, a middling wish, a middling person, middling speech.
“In dependence on a superior element, Kaccayana, there arises a superior perception, a superior view, superior thought, superior volition, superior longing, a superior wish, a superior person, superior speech.
“In dependence on the ear and sounds there arises ear-consciousness … … In dependence on the mind and mental phenomena there arises mind-consciousness.
“In dependence on the ear and sounds … In dependence on the mind and mental phenomena, mind-consciousness arises.
“In dependence on the ear and sounds … In dependence on the mind and mental phenomena, mind-consciousness arises.
“In dependence on the ear and sounds … the mind and mental phenomena, mind-consciousness arises….
“In dependence on the ear and sounds … … In dependence on the mind and mental phenomena, mind-consciousness arises.
“In dependence on the ear and sounds...
“In dependence on the ear and sounds...
“In dependence on the ear and sounds...
“In dependence on the ear and sounds...
“In dependence on the eye and forms, eye-consciousness arises.
“In dependence on the eye element there arises eye-contact; in dependence on eye-contact there arises feeling born of eye-contact.
“In dependence on the eye element there arises eye-contact; the eye element does not arise in dependence on eye-contact….
“In dependence on the form element there arises perception of form...
“In dependence on the form element there arises perception of form; in dependence on perception of form there arises intention regarding form; in dependence on intention regarding form there arises contact with form; in dependence on contact with form there arises feeling born of contact with form; in dependence on feeling born of contact with form there arises desire for form; in dependence on desire for form there arises passion for form; in dependence on passion for form there arises the quest for form; in dependence on the quest for form there arises the gain of form….
“In dependence on the form element there arises perception of form; in dependence on perception of form there arises intention regarding form; in dependence on intention regarding form there arises desire for form; in dependence on desire for form there arises passion for form; in dependence on passion for form there arises the quest for form....
“In dependence on the form element there arises perception of form;...
“In dependence on the harmfulness element there arises perception of harming; in dependence on perception of harming there arises intention to harm; in dependence on intention to harm there arises desire to harm; in dependence on desire to harm there arises passion to harm; in dependence on passion to harm there arises a quest to harm.
“In dependence on the harmlessness element there arises perception of harmlessness;  in dependence on perception of harmlessness there arises intention of harmlessness; in dependence on intention of harmlessness there arises desire for harmlessness; in dependence on desire for harmlessness there arises passion for harmlessness; in dependence on passion for harmlessness there arises a quest for harmlessness.
“In dependence on the ill will element there arises perception of ill will; in dependence on perception of ill will there arises intention of ill will; in dependence on intention of ill will there arises desire ill will; in dependence on desire ill will there arises passion ill will; in dependence on passion ill will there arises a quest ill will.
“In dependence on the mental-phenomena element there arises perception of mental phenomena; in dependence on perception of mental phenomena there arises intention regarding mental phenomena … contact with mental phenomena … feeling born of contact with mental phenomena … desire for mental phenomena … passion for mental phenomena … the quest for mental phenomena; in dependence on the quest for mental phenomena there arises the gain of mental phenomena.
“In dependence on the mental-phenomena element there arises perception of mental phenomena; in dependence on perception of mental phenomena there arises intention regarding mental phenomena; in dependence on intention regarding mental phenomena there arises desire for mental phenomena; in dependence on desire for mental phenomena there arises passion for mental phenomena; in dependence on passion for mental phenomena there arises the quest for mental phenomena.
“In dependence on the mental-phenomena element there arises perception of mental phenomena; … in dependence on passion for mental phenomena there arises the quest for mental phenomena.
“In dependence on the non-ill will element there arises perception of non-ill will; in dependence on perception of non-ill will there arises intention of non-ill will; in dependence on intention of non-ill will there arises desire non-ill will; in dependence on desire non-ill will there arises passion non-ill will; in dependence on passion non-ill will there arises a quest non-ill will.
“In dependence on the renunciation element there arises perception of renunciation; in dependence on perception of renunciation there arises intention of renunciation; in dependence on intention of renunciation there arises desire for renunciation; in dependence on desire for renunciation there arises passion for renunciation; in dependence on passion for renunciation there arises a quest for renunciation.
“In dependence on the sensuality element there arises sensual perception; in dependence on sensual perception there arises sensual intention; in dependence on sensual intention there arises sensual desire; in dependence on sensual desire there arises sensual passion; in dependence on sensual passion there arises a sensual quest.
“In injuring and killing here, In beating and extortion, Kassapa did not recognize evil
“In my case too, venerable sir, it has been thirty years.”
“In recent days, Master Gotama, a number of ascetics, brahmins, and wanderers of various sects had assembled in the debating hall and were sitting together when this conversation arose among them: ‘This Pūraṇa Kassapa—the leader of an order, the leader of a group, the teacher of a group, the well known and famous spiritual guide considered holy by many people—declares the rebirth of a disciple who has passed away and died thus: “That one was reborn there, that one was reborn there.”
“In regard to this, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple reflects thus: ‘Leave off lacerating the eye faculty with a red-hot iron pin burning, blazing, and glowing.
“In seeking delight in form, venerable sir, one is bound by Mara; by not seeking delight in it one is freed from the Evil One.
“In six has the world arisen;
“In such a way this ploughing is done
“In such a way, young man, you keep on praising the ascetic Udayı̄, but when I told him, ‘Preach the Dhamma, ascetic,’ he said, ‘There will be an occasion for that, sister,’ and he rose from his seat and departed.”
“In that battle the devas won and the asuras were defeated.
“In that battle, bhikkhus, the devas won and the asuras were defeated.
“In that case, bhikkhu, purify the very beginning of wholesome states.
“In that case, bhikkhu, purify the very beginning of wholesome states.
“In that case, Nanda, return the cows to their owners.”
“In that case, Vaṅgisa, let some more verses, not already thought out, occur to you.”
“In that case, young man, invite the ascetic Udayı̄ in my name for tomorrow’s meal.”
“In that case, young man, invite the ascetic Udayı̄ in my name for tomorrow’s meal.”
“In the beginning virtue is discussed, “Bhikkhus, suppose a man with limbs wounded and festering would enter a wood of thorny reeds, and the Kusa thorns would prick his feet and the reed blades would slash his limbs.
“In the case of a person who destroys life, venerable sir, if one compares one occasion with another, whether by day or by night, the occasions when he is destroying life are infrequent while those when he is not doing so are frequent.”
“In the case of a person who speaks falsehood, venerable sir, if one compares one occasion with another, whether by day or by night, the occasions when he is speaking falsehood are infrequent while those when he is not speaking falsehood are frequent.”
“In the dark it goes before me, In the deep it gives me support.
“In the forest where no song or music sounds, A solitary sage has resorted to the woods!
“In the past I was fond of Dhamma-stanzas
“In the past I was the potter, Ghaṭikara in Vehaḷiṅga.
“In the past the bhikkhus lived happily, The disciples of Gotama.
“In the past the bhikkhus lived happily, The disciples of Gotama.
“In the past there appeared among the Magadhans
“In the past, bhikkhu, I was a head-anointed khattiya king.
“In the past, bhikkhus, when Sakka, lord of the devas, was a human being, he adopted and undertook these seven vows by the undertaking of which he achieved the status of Sakka.
“In the past, friend, when I was still a householder, it occurred to me: ‘Household life is confinement, a path of dust, going forth is like the open air.
“In the past, Mahali, when Sakka, lord of the devas, was a human being, he was a brahmin youth named Magha.
“In the presence of the Blessed One I have heard this, friend Channa, in his presence I have received the exhortation he spoke to the bhikkhu Kaccanagotta:
“In the presence of the Blessed One, friends, I heard and learnt this: ‘Bhikkhus, those bhikkhus are few who, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enter and dwell in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge.
“In the same way among human beings
“In the world no brahmin is ever purified
“In the world one’s own son is dear, In the world one’s own husband is dear;
“In these thirty years since I went forth, householder, I have not attained any superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones, no dwelling in comfort, but only nakedness, and the shaven head, and the brush for cleaning my seat.” 
“In these thirty years, householder, have you attained any superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones, any dwelling in comfort?”
“In these thirty years, venerable sir, have you attained any superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones, any dwelling in comfort?”
“In this case too, venerable sir, I do not understand in detail … let the Blessed One explain it to me in such a way that I might understand in detail the meaning of what he stated in brief.”
“In this matter, venerable sir, I do not go by faith in the Blessed One when he says: ‘There is a concentration without thought and examination, there is a cessation of thought and examination.’”
“In this way too, friend, it may be understood how that is so: There exists in the Blessed One the eye, the Blessed One sees a form with the eye, yet there is no desire and lust in the Blessed One; the Blessed One is well liberated in mind.
“In this way too, friend, this has been declared, disclosed, and revealed by the Blessed One thus: ‘For such a reason this consciousness is nonself.’
“In this way too, headman, it can be understood: ‘Whatever suffering arises, all that arises rooted in desire, with desire as its source; for desire is the root of suffering.’
“In this way too, headman, it can be understood: ‘Whatever suffering arises, all that arises rooted in desire, with desire as its source; for desire is the root of suffering.’”
“In this way, Ananda, it may be understood how this is a designation for this Noble Eightfold Path: ‘the divine vehicle’ and ‘the vehicle of Dhamma’ and ‘the unsurpassed victory in battle.’”
“In this way, bhikkhu, remember the Four Noble Truths taught by me.
“In this way, bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, won the victory by well-spoken counsel.”
“In this way, friend, it can be understood how the eye is not the fetter of forms nor forms the fetter of the eye, but rather the desire and lust that arise there in dependence on both is the fetter there; how the ear is not the fetter of sounds nor sounds the fetter of the ear…; how the mind is not the fetter of mental phenomena nor mental phenomena the fetter of the mind, but rather the desire and lust that arise there in dependence on both is the fetter there.”
“In this way, friend, this has been declared, disclosed, and revealed by the Blessed One thus: ‘For such a reason this consciousness is nonself.’
“In this world steeped in suffering, Fettered by aging and death, I wish to listen to the Dhamma
“In what dwelling does the Venerable Anuruddha usually dwell so that the arisen bodily painful feelings do not persist obsessing his mind?”
“In what four?
“In what has the world arisen?
“In what way, bhikkhu, do you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief?”
“In what way, bhikkhu, do you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief?”
“In what way, bhikkhu, do you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief?”
“In what way, bhikkhu, do you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief?”
“In what way, bhikkhu, do you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief?”
“In what way, bhikkhu, do you understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by me in brief?”
“In what way, headman, does Nigaṇṭha Nataputta teach the Dhamma to his disciples?”
“In what way, venerable sir, does the designation ‘aggregates’ apply to the aggregates?”
“In what way, venerable sir, is a lay follower accomplished in faith?”
“In what way, venerable sir, is a lay follower accomplished in generosity?”
“In what way, venerable sir, is a lay follower accomplished in virtue?”
“In what way, venerable sir, is a lay follower accomplished in wisdom?”
“In what, bhikkhus, do these three faculties end?
“In whatever direction it was slanting, sloping, and inclining, venerable sir.”
“In whatever direction it was slanting, sloping, and inclining, venerable sir.”
“In whatever way, Sariputta, a clansman declares final knowledge, what he has declared should be understood as such.”
“In-breathing and out-breathing, householder, are the bodily formation; thought and examination are the verbal formation; perception and feeling are the mental formation.”
“Indeed, for my sake the Buddha came
“Indeed, for the good of many, The sage attained enlightenment, For the bhikkhus and bhikkhunis
“Indeed, householder, you are asking last what should have been asked first; but still I will answer you.
“Indeed, venerable sir, I have quite a lot of remorse and regret.”
“Indeed, venerable sir, I have quite a lot of remorse and regret.” 
“Indeed, venerable sir, who would not approve of the Venerable Sariputta, unless he were foolish, full of hatred, deluded, or mentally deranged?
“Is feeling permanent or impermanent?… Is perception permanent or impermanent?… Are volitional formations permanent or impermanent?… Is consciousness permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“Is feeling permanent or impermanent?… Is perception permanent or impermanent?… Are volitional formations permanent or impermanent?… Is consciousness permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“Is feeling permanent or impermanent?… Is perception permanent or impermanent?… Are volitional formations permanent or impermanent?… Is consciousness permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“Is feeling permanent or impermanent?… Is perception permanent or impermanent?… Are volitional formations permanent or impermanent?… Is consciousness permanent or impermanent?” –“Impermanent, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”–“Suffering, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”–“No, venerable sir.”
“Is feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness permanent or impermanent?… But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could pleasure and pain arise internally?”
“Is it because you are sunk in sorrow
“Is it because you are sunk in sorrow
“Is it possible, venerable sir, by travelling to know or to see or to reach the end of the world, where one is not born, does not age, does not die, does not pass away, and is not reborn?”
“Is it proper to place confidence in those who hold wrong view?”
“Is it the case, venerable sir, that the dwelling of a trainee is itself the same as the Tathagata’s dwelling, or is it rather that the dwelling of a trainee is one thing and the Tathagata’s dwelling is another?”
“Is the ear permanent or impermanent?… Is the mind … Is any feeling that arises with mind-contact as condition permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.” 
“Is the ear … the mind permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“Is the ear … the mind permanent or impermanent?… But without clinging to what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change, could pleasure and pain arise internally?”
“Is the ear … the mind permanent or impermanent?… … Are mental phenomena … Is mind-consciousness … Is mind-contact...
“Is the ear … the nose … the tongue … the body … the mind permanent or impermanent?”–“Impermanent, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”–“Suffering, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”–“No, venerable sir.”
“Is the master Isidatta?”
“Is there a method of exposition, bhikkhus, by means of which a bhikkhu—apart from faith, apart from personal preference, apart from oral tradition, apart from reasoned reflection, apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it — can declare final knowledge thus: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being’?”
“Is there a person somewhere in the world
“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”
“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”
“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”
“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”
“It does not touch one who does not touch, But then will touch the one who touches.
“It has been thirty years, householder, since I went forth.”
“It is a gain for us, friend, it is well gained by us, friend, that we were in the very presence of the Venerable Anuruddha when he made such a bellowing utterance.”
“It is a gain for us, venerable sir, it is well gained by us, venerable sir, that the Blessed One understands us so well.”
“It is a gain for you, bhikkhus, it is well gained by you, that you have obtained the opportunity for living the holy life.
“It is a gain for you, bhikkhus, it is well gained by you, that you have obtained the opportunity for living the holy life.”
“It is a gain for you, Dhammadinna!
“It is a gain for you, Godha!
“It is a gain for you, householder!
“It is a gain for you, householder!
“It is a gain for you, householder!
“It is a gain for you, householder, it is well gained by you, householder, in that you have the eye of wisdom that ranges over the deep Word of the Buddha.”
“It is a gain for you, householder, it is well gained by you, householder, in that you have the eye of wisdom that ranges over the deep Word of the Buddha.”
“It is a gain for you, householder, it is well gained by you, householder, in that you have the eye of wisdom that ranges over the deep Word of the Buddha.” 
“It is always good for the mindful one, The mindful one thrives in happiness.
“It is always good for the mindful one, The mindful one thrives in happiness.
“It is because he has developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power that the bhikkhu Moggallana has become so powerful and mighty.
“It is because he has developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power that the Tathagata has become so powerful and mighty.
“It is because these four establishments of mindfulness are not developed and cultivated that the true Dhamma does not endure long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana.
“It is by clinging, Ananda, that ‘I am’ occurs, not without clinging.
“It is by dealing with someone, great king, that his honesty is to be known, and that after a long time, not after a short time; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is wise, not by a dullard.
“It is by discussion with someone, great king, that his wisdom is to be known, and that after a long time, not after a short time; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is wise, not by a dullard.” 
“It is by living together with someone, great king, that his virtue is to be known, and that after a long time, not after a short time; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is wise, not by a dullard.
“It is craving that produces a person;
“It is disintegrating, bhikkhu, therefore it is called the world.
“It is exactly the same, brahmin, with a bhikkhu who is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached his own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, and is completely liberated through final knowledge.
“It is fitting for you to be perplexed, headman, fitting for you to doubt.
“It is fitting for you to be perplexed, Vaccha, it is fitting for you to doubt.
“It is fitting, bhikkhus, for a clansman intent on his good to accept the offer.
“It is for the sake of abandoning desire, brahmin, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.”
“It is good that my son has become so wise, He whom I bore and nursed at my breast.
“It is good, dear sir, to possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha … to possess the virtues dear to the nobles ones … leading to concentration.
“It is good, friends, to possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“It is good, friends, to possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: ‘The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.’
“It is good, friends, to possess confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha … to possess the virtues dear to the noble ones … leading to concentration.
“It is good, friends, to possess confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha … to possess the virtues dear to the noble ones … leading to concentration.
“It is good, sir Moggallana, to possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha … to possess the virtues dear to the nobles ones … leading to concentration.
“It is in adversities, great king, that a person’s fortitude is to be known, and that after a long time, not after a short time; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is wise, not by a dullard.
“It is in just such a way that some foolish persons here make requests of me, but when the Dhamma has been spoken to them, they think only of following me around.” 
“It is in such a way that there is nonrestraint.
“It is in such a way that there is restraint.
“It is in such a way, Ananda, that there is development by direction.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu is skilled in seven cases.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that consciousness comes to be in dependence on a dyad.”
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that I say the nutriment consciousness should be seen.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that I say the nutriment contact should be seen.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that I say the nutriment edible food should be seen.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that I say the nutriment mental volition should be seen.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that one dwells diligently.”
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that one dwells negligently.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that one is not subject to decline.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that one is subject to decline.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that there is agitation through clinging.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that there is agitation through clinging.
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that there is nonagitation through nonclinging.”
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that there is nonagitation through nonclinging.”
“It is in such a way, bhikkhus, that this clansman has gone forth.
“It is in such a way, householder, that one is afflicted in body and afflicted in mind.
“It is in such a way, householder, that one is afflicted in body but not afflicted in mind.” 
“It is in such a way, Maluṅkyaputta, that the meaning of what was stated by me in brief should be understood in detail.”
“It is in such a way, Sariputta, that one has a liberated mind.
“It is in such a way, venerable sir, that I understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by the Blessed One in brief.”
“It is in such a way, venerable sir, that I understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by the Blessed One in brief.”
“It is in such a way, venerable sir, that I understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by the Blessed One in brief.”
“It is in such a way, venerable sir, that I understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by the Blessed One in brief.”
“It is in such a way, venerable sir, that I understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by the Blessed One in brief.”
“It is in such a way, venerable sir, that I understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by the Blessed One in brief.”
“It is in such a way, venerable sir, that I understand in detail the meaning of what was stated by the Blessed One in brief.”
“It is in this way that a bhikkhu who has students and a teacher dwells in suffering, not in comfort.
“It is in this way, Ananda, that there is development without direction.
“It is in this way, Ariṭṭha, that mindfulness of breathing is fulfilled in detail.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhu, that one is equipped with faculties.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the five powers so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the five powers so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the five spiritual faculties so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.” 
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the five spiritual faculties so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.” 
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the four bases for spiritual power so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the four right strivings so that he slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the four jhanas slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu who has no students and no teacher dwells happily, in comfort.
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu with a rightly directed view, with a rightly directed development of the path, pierces ignorance, arouses true knowledge, and realizes Nibbana.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu with a rightly directed view, with a rightly directed development of the path, pierces ignorance, arouses true knowledge, and realizes Nibbana.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, develops and cultivates the four right strivings.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, with a mind that is open and unenveloped, develops the mind imbued with luminosity.
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, with a mind that is open and unenveloped, develops the mind imbued with luminosity.
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that a bhikkhu, with a mind that is open and unenveloped, develops the mind imbued with luminosity.
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that concentration by mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit.
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that concentration by mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated so that it is peaceful and sublime, an ambrosial pleasant dwelling, and it disperses and quells on the spot evil unwholesome states whenever they arise.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that concentration by mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated so that it leads to the abandoning of the fetters, to the uprooting of the underlying tendencies, to the full understanding of the course, to the destruction of the taints.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that in dependence on the diversity of elements there arises the diversity of contacts … the diversity of elements does not arise in dependence on the diversity of contacts.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that in dependence on the diversity of elements there arises the diversity of contacts; that in dependence on the diversity of contacts there arises the diversity of feelings.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that in dependence on the diversity of elements there arises the diversity of perceptions … that in dependence on the diversity of passions there arises the diversity of quests.
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that in dependence on the diversity of elements there arises the diversity of perceptions … that in dependence on the diversity of passions there arises the diversity of quests.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that in dependence on the diversity of elements there arises the diversity of perceptions … that in dependence on the diversity of quests there arises the diversity of gains.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that in dependence on the diversity of elements there arises the diversity of perceptions … that in dependence on the diversity of quests there arises the diversity of gains; that the diversity of quests does not arise in dependence on the diversity of gains...
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated so that it is of great fruit and benefit.”
“It is in this way, bhikkhus, that when a bhikkhu is established in one thing, the five faculties are developed, well developed in him.”
“It is in this way, friend, that a bhikkhu can know for himself: ‘By careful attention the seven factors of enlightenment have been fully perfected by me in such a way that they lead to dwelling in comfort.’”
“It is in this way, friend, that one who is ardent and afraid of wrongdoing is capable of enlightenment, capable of Nibbana, capable of achieving the unsurpassed security from bondage.”
“It is in this way, friend, that one who is not ardent and who is unafraid of wrongdoing is incapable of enlightenment, incapable of Nibbana, incapable of achieving the unsurpassed security from bondage.
“It is in this way, friend, that these four establishments of mindfulness have been undertaken by a bhikkhu.”
“It is in this way, friend, that these four establishments of mindfulness have been undertaken by a bhikkhu.”
“It is in this way, friends, that a bhikkhu develops and cultivates the four establishments of mindfulness.”
“It is in this way, friends, that one is corrupted.
“It is in this way, friends, that one is uncorrupted.”
“It is in this way, householder, that in dependence on the diversity of elements there arises the diversity of contacts, and in dependence on the diversity of contacts there arises the diversity of feelings.”
“It is in this way, householder, that the diversity of elements has been spoken of by the Blessed One.” 
“It is in this way, Nandiya, that a noble disciple is one who dwells diligently.”
“It is in this way, Nandiya, that a noble disciple is one who dwells negligently.
“It is in this way, venerable sir, that I remember the Four Noble Truths taught by the Blessed One.”
“It is indeed to be expected, venerable sir, that a noble disciple who has faith and whose energy is aroused will be mindful, possessing supreme mindfulness and discretion, one who remembers and recollects what was done and said long ago.
“It is indeed to be expected, venerable sir, that a noble disciple who has faith, whose energy is aroused, and whose mindfulness is established, will gain concentration, will gain one-pointedness of mind, having made release the object.
“It is indeed to be expected, venerable sir, that a noble disciple who has faith, whose energy is aroused, whose mindfulness is established, and whose mind is concentrated, will understand thus: ‘This saṁsara is without discoverable beginning.
“It is more difficult and challenging, venerable sir, to pierce with the arrowhead the tip of a hair split into seven strands.”
“It is not in such a way that the Tathagatas are to be venerated, lord of the devas.
“It is not surprising, Ananda, that a human being should die.
“It is not surprising, Ananda, that a human being should die.
“It is not that I do not know and see pleasure and pain, Timbaruka.
“It is not that I do not know and see suffering, Kassapa.
“It is not that there is no pleasure and pain, Timbaruka; there is pleasure and pain.”
“It is not that there is no suffering, Kassapa; there is suffering.”
“It is not the case, friend Mahanama, that the dwelling of a trainee is itself the same as the Tathagata’s dwelling; rather, the dwelling of a trainee is one thing and the Tathagata’s dwelling is another.
“It is not the earth element, Kassapa, that causes the true Dhamma to disappear, nor the water element, nor the heat element, nor the air element.
“It is not thus that one becomes a mendicant, Just because one begs others for alms.
“It is on account of possessing four things, friend Ananda, that people are declared by the Blessed One to be stream-enterers, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as their destination.
“It is possible, Ananda,” the Blessed One said.
“It is possible, bhikkhu,” the Blessed One said.
“It is possible, bhikkhu,” the Blessed One said.
“It is possible, bhikkhu.
“It is possible, bhikkhus,” the Blessed One said.
“It is possible, brahmin,” the Blessed One said.
“It is possible, friend Udayı̄.
“It is through an inversion of perception
“It is through the cessation of these things, Ananda, that cessation is spoken of.”
“It is wonderful, bhikkhus, on the part of the disciples, it is amazing on the part of the disciples, that they will act in accordance with the Teacher’s instructions and comply with his admonitions, that they will be dear and agreeable to the four assemblies, that they will be revered and esteemed by them.
“It is wonderful, friend Sariputta!
“It is wonderful, Master Bharadvaja!
“It is wonderful, Master Gotama!
“It is wonderful, Master Kaccana!
“It is wonderful, Master Kaccana!
“It is wonderful, Master Moggallana!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is wonderful, venerable sir!
“It is, Ananda, because it is empty of self and of what belongs to self that it is said, ‘Empty is the world.’
“It is, Ananda, because it is empty of self and of what belongs to self that it is said, ‘Empty is the world.’”
“It is, Ananda, when concentration by mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated in this way that it fulfils the four establishments of mindfulness.
“It is, Ananda, when the four establishments of mindfulness are developed and cultivated in this way that they fulfil the seven factors of enlightenment.
“It is, Ananda, when the seven factors of enlightenment are developed and cultivated in this way that they fulfil true knowledge and liberation.”
“It is, bhikkhu, for one who knows thus, for one who sees thus, that the immediate destruction of the taints occurs.”
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated five faculties that a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declares final knowledge thus.
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated four faculties that a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declares final knowledge thus.
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated one faculty that a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declares final knowledge thus.
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated these five faculties that a bhikkhu, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.”
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated these five faculties that a bhikkhu, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.”
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that a bhikkhu, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.”
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that a bhikkhu, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.” 
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that the bhikkhu Moggallana has become so powerful and mighty.
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that the bhikkhu Moggallana has become so powerful and mighty.
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that the Tathagata has become so powerful and mighty.
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated three faculties that the bhikkhu Piṇḍola Bharadvaja has declared final knowledge thus.
“It is, bhikkhus, because he has developed and cultivated two faculties that a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declares final knowledge thus.
“It is, bhikkhus, because of not understanding and not penetrating the noble truth of suffering that you and I have roamed and wandered through this long course of saṁsara.
“It is, bhikkhus, because the bhikkhu Moggallana has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that by the destruction of the taints, in this very life he enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.”
“It is, bhikkhus, because the bhikkhu Moggallana has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that by the destruction of the taints, in this very life he enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.” 
“It is, bhikkhus, because the bhikkhu Moggallana has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that he wields the various kinds of spiritual power … he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world….
“It is, bhikkhus, because the bhikkhu Moggallana has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that he wields the various kinds of spiritual power, such that: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one … he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world….
“It is, bhikkhus, because the Tathagata has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that by the destruction of the taints, in this very life he enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.”
“It is, bhikkhus, because the Tathagata has developed and cultivated these four bases for spiritual power that he wields the various kinds of spiritual power, such that: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one … he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world….
“It is, bhikkhus, because these five faculties have been developed and cultivated that a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declares final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth … there is no more for this state of being.’”
“It is, bhikkhus, because these four faculties have been developed and cultivated that a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declares final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth … there is no more for this state of being.’”
“It is, bhikkhus, because these two faculties have been developed and cultivated that a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declares final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth … there is no more for this state of being.’”
“It is, bhikkhus, because this one faculty has been developed and cultivated that a bhikkhu who has destroyed the taints declares final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
“It is, bhikkhus, just as in a house with a peaked roof: so long as the roof peak has not been set in place, there is as yet no stability of the rafters, there is as yet no steadiness of the rafters; but when the roof peak has been set in place, then there is stability of the rafters, then there is steadiness of the rafters.
“It is, bhikkhus, when concentration by mindfulness of breathing  has been developed and cultivated that no shaking or trembling occurs in the body, and no shaking or trembling occurs in the mind.
“It is, bhikkhus, when concentration by mindfulness of breathing has been developed and cultivated in this way that no shaking or trembling occurs in the body, and no shaking or trembling occurs in the mind.”
“It is, bhikkhus, when mindfulness of breathing is developed and cultivated in this way that it is of great fruit and benefit.”
“It is, brahmin, because the four establishments of mindfulness are not developed and cultivated that the true Dhamma does not endure long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana.
“It is, friend, because I have developed and cultivated the four establishments of mindfulness that I have attained to greatness of direct knowledge.
“It is, friend, because I have developed and cultivated the four establishments of mindfulness that I have attained to greatness of direct knowledge.
“It is, friend, because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I have attained to greatness of direct knowledge.
“It is, friend, because one has completely developed the four establishments of mindfulness that one is beyond training.
“It is, friend, because one has partly developed the four establishments of mindfulness that one is a trainee.
“It is, friend, because the four establishments of mindfulness are not developed and cultivated that the true Dhamma does not endure long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana.
“It is, friend, by the abandoning of four things and because of possessing four things that people are declared thus by the Blessed One.
“It is, friend, by the abandoning of these four things and because of possessing these four things that people are declared by the Blessed One thus: ‘This one is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.’”
“It is, friend, for the full understanding of suffering that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.”
“It is, friend, on account of possessing these four things that people are declared by the Blessed One to be stream-enterers, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as their destination.”
“It is, friend, this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view … right concentration.
“It is, friend, this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
“It is, friend, this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
“It is, friend, this Noble Eightfold Path….”
“It is, friend, when these four establishments of mindfulness are not developed and cultivated that the true Dhamma declines.
“It is, friends, because I dwell with a mind well established in the four establishments of mindfulness that the arisen bodily feelings do not persist obsessing my mind.
“It is, friends, because I dwell with a mind well established in these four establishments of mindfulness that the arisen bodily painful feelings do not persist obsessing my mind.”
“It is, friends, because I have developed and cultivated the four establishments of mindfulness that I have attained to greatness of direct knowledge.
“It is, friends, because I have developed and cultivated the four establishments of mindfulness that I have attained to greatness of direct knowledge.
“It is, friends, because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I have attained to greatness of direct knowledge.
“It is, friends, because I have developed and cultivated these four establishments of mindfulness that I have attained to greatness of direct knowledge.
“It is, Udayı̄, when the seven factors of enlightenment are developed and cultivated in this way that they lead to penetration.”
“It is, Vaccha, because of not breaking through to form … feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation that those various speculative views arise in the world….” 
“It is, Vaccha, because of not directly cognizing form … feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation that those various speculative views arise in the world: ‘The world is eternal’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“It is, Vaccha, because of not knowing consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation that those various speculative views arise in the world….”
“It is, Vaccha, because of not knowing feeling, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation that those various speculative views arise in the world: ‘The world is eternal’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“It is, Vaccha, because of not knowing form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation that those various speculative views arise in the world: ‘The world is eternal’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“It is, Vaccha, because of not knowing perception, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation that those various speculative views arise in the world….”
“It is, Vaccha, because of not knowing volitional formations, their origin, their cessation, and the way leading to their cessation that those various speculative views arise in the world….”
“It is, Vaccha, because of not seeing form … feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation that those various speculative views arise in the world….” 
“It is, venerable sir, considering as benefit the unsurpassed security from bondage that a bhikkhu whose taints are destroyed conducts himself in a way that shows supreme honour towards the Tathagata and the Tathagata’s teaching.”
“It isn’t easy for us to approach that Blessed One, bhikkhu, as he is surrounded by other devatas of great influence.
“It must be because I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit have been thoroughly uprooted in the Venerable Sariputta for a long time that even if the Teacher himself were to undergo change and alteration, still sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair would not arise in him.”
“It must be because I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit have been thoroughly uprooted in the Venerable Sariputta for a long time that such thoughts did not occur to him.”
“It must be because I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit have been thoroughly uprooted in the Venerable Sariputta for a long time that such thoughts did not occur to him.”
“It must be because I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit have been thoroughly uprooted in the Venerable Sariputta for a long time that such thoughts did not occur to him.” 
“It must be because I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit have been thoroughly uprooted in the Venerable Upasena for a long time that it does not occur to him, ‘I am the eye’ or ‘The eye is mine’; ‘I am the ear’ or ‘The ear is mine’ … ‘I am the mind’ or ‘The mind is mine.’”
“It occurred to me: ‘When what does not exist does birth not come to be?… existence?… clinging?… craving?… feeling?… contact?… the six sense bases?… name-and-form?
“It occurred to me: ‘When what does not exist does consciousness not come to be?
“It occurs to him: ‘My teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “Anyone at all who engages in sexual misconduct is bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.”
“It occurs to him: ‘My teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “Anyone at all who speaks falsehood is bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.”
“It occurs to him: ‘My teacher holds such a doctrine and view as this: “Anyone at all who takes what is not given is bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.”
“It occurs to those devatas: ‘This Citta the householder is virtuous, of good character.
“It was not apart from the Blessed One!
“It was this Venerable Visakha Pañcaliputta, venerable sir.”
“It was with the ambrosia of such a Dhamma talk, venerable sir, that the Blessed One anointed me.”
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the body faculty to be lacerated by a sharp spear burning, blazing, and glowing, than for one to grasp the sign through the features in a tactile object cognizable by the body.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the ear faculty to be lacerated by a sharp iron stake burning, blazing, and glowing, than for one to grasp the sign through the features in a sound cognizable by the ear.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the nose faculty to be lacerated by a sharp nail cutter burning, blazing, and glowing, than for one to grasp the sign through the features in an odour cognizable by the nose.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the tongue faculty to be lacerated by a sharp razor burning, blazing, and glowing, than for one to grasp the sign through the features in a taste cognizable by the tongue.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, for the uninstructed worldling to take as self this body composed of the four great elements rather than the mind.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, to sleep—for sleep, I say, is barren for the living, fruitless for the living, insensibility for the living—than to think such thoughts as would induce one who has come under their control to bring about a schism in the Saṅgha.
“It would be by chance, venerable sir, that that blind turtle, coming to the surface once every hundred years, would insert its neck into that yoke with a single hole.”
“It would be for the sake of fulfilling an unfulfilled aggregate of concentration that I would honour, respect, and dwell in dependence on another ascetic or brahmin.
“It would be for the sake of fulfilling an unfulfilled aggregate of liberation that I would honour, respect, and dwell in dependence on another ascetic or brahmin.
“It would be for the sake of fulfilling an unfulfilled aggregate of the knowledge and vision of liberation that I would honour, respect, and dwell in dependence on another ascetic or brahmin.
“It would be for the sake of fulfilling an unfulfilled aggregate of wisdom that I would honour, respect, and dwell in dependence on another ascetic or brahmin.
“It would not become established anywhere, venerable sir.”
“Its qualities of faith and wisdom
“It’s a mother that you call a little hut, A wife that you call a little nest, Sons that you call lines extended, Craving that you tell me is bondage.”
“It’s good that you have no little hut, Good that you have no little nest, Good that you have no lines extended, Good that you are free from bondage.”
“It’s just as the apprentice Medakathalika said to the teacher.
“It’s only suffering that comes to be, Suffering that stands and falls away.
“I’ll ask you a question, ascetic.
“I’ll ask you a question, ascetic.
“I’m not afraid of you, friend.
“I’ve gotten past the death of sons;
“Just as a bird littered with soil
“Just as a king, a wheel-turning monarch, Accompanied by his ministers, Travels all over this mighty earth
“Just as a wild dog becomes even wilder when they sprinkle bile over its nose, so too, bhikkhus, so long as Prince Ajatasattu goes to attend upon Devadatta … only decline can be expected of Devadatta in regard to wholesome states, not growth.
“Just as an iron ball, Ananda, heated all day, becomes more buoyant, malleable, wieldy, and luminous, so too, when the Tathagata immerses the body in the mind and the mind in the body, and when he dwells having entered upon a blissful perception and a buoyant perception in regard to the body, on that occasion the body of the Tathagata becomes more buoyant, malleable, wieldy, and luminous.
“Just as excrement comes together and unites with excrement, urine with urine, spittle with spittle, pus with pus, and blood with blood, so too, bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite: those of an inferior disposition come together and unite with those of an inferior disposition.
“Just as it is difficult for burglars to assail those families that have few women and many men, so too it is difficult for nonhuman beings to assail a bhikkhu who has developed and cultivated the liberation of mind by lovingkindness.
“Just as milk comes together and unites with milk, oil with oil, ghee with ghee, honey with honey, and molasses with molasses, so too, bhikkhus, it is by way of elements that beings come together and unite: those of a good disposition come together and unite with those of a good disposition.
“Just as mountains of solid rock, Massive, reaching to the sky, Might draw together from all sides, Crushing all in the four quarters—
“Just as one standing on a mountain peak
“Just as the many rivers used by the hosts of people, Flowing downstream, finally reach the ocean, The great mass of water, the boundless sea, The fearsome receptacle of heaps of gems;
“Just as the many rivers used by the hosts of people, … …
“Just as this body, bhikkhus, sustained by nutriment, subsists in dependence on nutriment and does not subsist without nutriment, so too the five hindrances, sustained by nutriment, subsist in dependence on nutriment and do not subsist without nutriment.
“Just as this body, bhikkhus, sustained by nutriment, subsists in dependence on nutriment and does not subsist without nutriment, so too these seven factors of enlightenment, sustained by nutriment, subsist in dependence on nutriment and do not subsist without nutriment.”
“Just as, Ananda, a tuft of cotton wool or kapok, being light, sustained by the wind, rises up without difficulty from the earth into the air, so too, when the Tathagata immerses the body in the mind and the mind in the body, and when he dwells having entered upon a blissful perception and a buoyant perception in regard to the body, on that occasion the body of the Tathagata rises up without difficulty from the earth into the air.
“Just as, Assaji, an oil lamp burns in dependence on the oil and the wick, and with the exhaustion of the oil and the wick it is extinguished through lack of fuel, so too, Assaji, when a bhikkhu feels a feeling terminating with the body … terminating with life … He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here.’”
“Just as, bhikkhus, a rush-cutter would cut down a rush, grab it by the top, and shake it down and shake it out and thump it about, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed and cultivated, it eliminates all sensual lust … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, all petty princes are the vassals of a wheel-turning monarch, and the wheel-turning monarch is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, all the rafters of a house with a peaked roof lead to the roof peak, slope towards the roof peak, and converge upon the roof peak, and the roof peak is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’ 
“Just as, bhikkhus, among animals the lion is declared to be their chief, so too, among the states conducive to enlightenment the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief, that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.”
“Just as, bhikkhus, among fragrant flowers, jasmine is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, among fragrant heartwoods, red sandalwood is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, among fragrant roots, black orris is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, among the trees of Jambudipa the rose-apple tree is declared to be their chief, so too, among the states conducive to enlightenment the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief, that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.” 
“Just as, bhikkhus, an oil lamp burns in dependence on the oil and the wick, and with the exhaustion of the oil and the wick it is extinguished through lack of fuel, so too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu feels a feeling terminating with the body … terminating with life … He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here.’”
“Just as, bhikkhus, an oil lamp burns in dependence on the oil and the wick, and with the exhaustion of the oil and the wick it is extinguished through lack of fuel, so too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu feels a feeling terminating with the body … terminating with life … He understands: ‘With the breakup of the body, following the exhaustion of life, all that is felt, not being delighted in, will become cool right here.’”
“Just as, bhikkhus, from a cow comes milk … and from ghee comes cream-of-ghee, which is reckoned the best of all these, so too the meditator who is skilled both in attainment and in maintenance regarding concentration … is the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.”
“Just as, bhikkhus, from a cow comes milk … and from ghee comes cream-of-ghee, which is reckoned the best of all these, so too the meditator who is skilled both in concentration and in maintenance regarding concentration … is the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.”
“Just as, bhikkhus, from a cow comes milk, from milk comes cream, from cream comes butter, from butter comes ghee, and from ghee comes cream-of-ghee, which is reckoned the best of all these, so too the meditator who is both a persistent worker and one who does what is suitable regarding concentration is the chief, the best, the foremost, the highest, the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.”
“Just as, bhikkhus, from a cow comes milk, from milk comes cream, from cream comes butter, from butter comes ghee, and from ghee comes cream-of-ghee, which is reckoned the best of all these, so too the meditator who is skilled both in concentration regarding concentration and in attainment regarding concentration is the chief, the best, the foremost, the highest, the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.”
“Just as, bhikkhus, if anyone should speak thus, ‘Without having built the lower storey of a peaked house, I will erect the upper storey,’ this would be impossible; so too, if anyone should speak thus: ‘Without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of suffering as it really is… I will completely make an end to suffering’—this is impossible.
“Just as, bhikkhus, if anyone should speak thus: ‘Having built the lower storey of a peaked house, I will erect the upper storey,’ this would be possible; so too, if anyone should speak thus: ‘Having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of suffering as it really is… I will completely make an end to suffering’—this is possible.
“Just as, bhikkhus, if someone should speak thus: ‘Having made a basket of acacia leaves or of pine needles or of myrobalan leaves,  I will bring water or a palm fruit,’ this would be impossible; so too, if anyone should speak thus: ‘Without having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of suffering as it really is… I will completely make an end to suffering’—this is impossible.
“Just as, bhikkhus, if someone should speak thus: ‘Having made a basket of lotus leaves or of kino leaves or of maluva leaves, I will bring water or a palm fruit,’ this would be possible; so too, if anyone should speak thus: ‘Having made the breakthrough to the noble truth of suffering as it really is… I will completely make an end to suffering’—this is possible.
“Just as, bhikkhus, in the autumn a ploughman ploughing with a great ploughshare cuts through all the rootlets as he ploughs, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed and cultivated, it eliminates all sensual lust … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, in the autumn, when the sky is clear and cloudless, the sun, ascending in the sky, dispels all darkness from space as it shines and beams and radiates, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed and cultivated, it eliminates all sensual lust, it eliminates all lust for existence, it eliminates all ignorance, it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, in the last month of the hot season, when a mass of dust and dirt has swirled up, a great rain cloud out of season disperses it and quells it on the spot, so too concentration by mindfulness of breathing, when developed and cultivated, is peaceful and sublime, an ambrosial pleasant dwelling, and it disperses and quells on the spot evil unwholesome states whenever they arise.
“Just as, bhikkhus, the footprints of all living beings that walk fit into the footprint of the elephant, … so too, among the steps that lead to enlightenment, the faculty of wisdom is declared to be their chief, that is, for the attainment of enlightenment.”
“Just as, bhikkhus, the radiance of all the stars does not amount to a sixteenth part of the radiance of the moon, and the radiance of the moon is declared to be their chief, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, bhikkhus, when rain pours down in thick droplets on a mountain top, the water flows down along the slope and fills the cleft, gullies, and creeks; these being full fill up the pools; these being full fill up the lakes; these being full fill up the streams; these being full fill up the rivers; and these being full fill up the great ocean; so too, with ignorance as proximate cause, volitional formations; with volitional formations as proximate cause, consciousness … with liberation as proximate cause, the knowledge of destruction.”
“Just as, bhikkhus, when the stalk of a bunch of mangoes has been cut, all the mangoes attached to the stalk follow along with it, so too, when the perception of impermanence is developed … it uproots all conceit ‘I am.’
“Just as, Kassapa, gold does not disappear so long as counterfeit gold has not arisen in the world, but when counterfeit gold arises then true gold disappears, so the true Dhamma does not disappear so long as a counterfeit of the true Dhamma has not arisen in the world, but when a counterfeit of the true Dhamma arises in the world, then the true Dhamma disappears.
“Just as, with an assemblage of parts, The word ‘chariot’ is used, So, when the aggregates exist, There is the convention ‘a being.’
“Just now, venerable sir, I have been engaged in those affairs of kingship typical for head-anointed khattiya kings, who are intoxicated with the intoxication of sovereignty, who are obsessed by greed for sensual pleasures, who have attained stable control in their country, and who rule having conquered a great sphere of territory on earth.” 
“Just now, venerable sir, we understood you to say: ‘See this, sirs!
“Just six, O bhikkhus, are the bases for contact, Where one unrestrained meets with suffering.
“Just so it was at that time, As you say, O Bhaggava: 
“Just so the aggregates and elements, And these six bases of sensory contact, Have come to be dependent on a cause;
“Just so, Kassapa, in the past the elder bhikkhus were forest dwellers and spoke in praise of forest dwelling; they were almsfood eaters and spoke in praise of eating almsfood; they were rag-robe wearers and spoke in praise of wearing rag-robes; they were triple-robe users and spoke in praise of using the triple robe; they were of few wishes and spoke in praise of fewness of wishes; they were content and spoke in praise of contentment; they were secluded and spoke in praise of solitude; they were aloof from society and spoke in praise of aloofness from society; they were energetic and spoke in praise of arousing energy.
“Kassapa, one formerly belonging to another sect who desires the going forth and the higher ordination in this Dhamma and Discipline lives on probation for four months.
“Knowing and seeing thus, Susı̄ma, do you wield the various kinds of spiritual power, such that: having been one, you become many...
“Knowledge is the best of things that rise up;
“Knowledge, householder, is superior to faith.”
“Koṭṭhita, you should abandon desire for whatever is impermanent.
“Koṭṭhita, you should abandon desire for whatever is impermanent.” 
“Koṭṭhita, you should abandon desire for whatever is nonself.” … 
“Koṭṭhita, you should abandon desire for whatever is suffering.”...
“Kuṇḍaliya, the Tathagata lives for the benefit and fruit of true knowledge and liberation.” 
“Last night, friend, two devatas of stunning beauty approached the Blessed One.
“Learn that Dhamma exposition, bhikkhu, master it and remember it.
“Let homage be to you, the Buddha!
“Let homage be to you, the Buddha!
“Let Master Gotama eat!
“Let Master Gotama eat.
“Let Master Gotama eat.
“Let Master Kaccana approach the Lohicca family just as he approaches the families of the lay followers in Makkarakaṭa.
“Let me then honour, respect, and dwell in dependence on this very Dhamma to which I have fully awakened.”
“Let the Blessed One teach me the Dhamma in brief!
“Let the Venerable Channa not use the knife.
“Let us refrain from harming living beings, Let us not speak a deliberate lie, We should train ourselves in virtue:
“Liberation, brahmin, takes recourse in Nibbana.”
“Life is swept along, short is the life span;
“Life is swept along, short is the life span;
“Life is swept along, short is the life span;
“Life is swept along, short is the life span;
“Life undergoes destruction night and day;
“Like a counterfeit earring made of clay, Like a bronze half-pence coated with gold, Some move about in disguise:
“Lofty indeed is this bellowing utterance of yours, Sariputta, you have roared a definitive, categorical lion’s roar: ‘Venerable sir, I have such confidence in the Blessed One that I believe there has not been nor ever will be nor exists at present another ascetic or brahmin more knowledgeable than the Blessed One with respect to enlightenment.’
“Long is the life span of human beings, The good man should not disdain it.
“Lust and hatred have their source here;
“Lust is declared the deviant path;
“Lust, venerable sir, is a maker of measurement, hatred is a maker of measurement, delusion is a maker of measurement.
“Lust, venerable sir, is a maker of signs, hatred is a maker of signs, delusion is a maker of signs.
“Lust, venerable sir, is a something, hatred is a something, delusion is a something.
“Lust, venerable sir, is bondage; hatred is bondage; delusion is bondage.
“Lust, venerable sir, is trouble; hatred is trouble; delusion is trouble.
“Magnificent, Master Bharadvaja!
“Magnificent, venerable sir!
“Magnificent, venerable sir!… From today let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.” 
“Mahanama, when a lay follower has gone for refuge over a long time to the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, how could he go to the nether world?
“Mahanama, when, over a long time, a lay follower has gone for refuge to the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, how could he go to the nether world?… Mahanama, over a long time Sarakani the Sakyan had gone for refuge to the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, so how could he go to the nether world?
“Many are the disciples of the Buddha
“Many feelings flourish within, Originating from the visible form, Covetousness and annoyance as well
“Master Bharadvaja, what is the cause and reason why these young bhikkhus, lads with black hair, endowed with the blessing of youth, in the prime of life, who have not dallied with sensual pleasures, lead the complete and pure holy life all their lives and maintain it continuously?” 
“Master Gotama, even those ascetics and brahmins who are the heads of orders and companies, the teachers of companies, well known and famous founders of sects considered by the multitude to be holy men—that is, Pūraṇa Kassapa, Makkhali Gosala, Nigaṇṭha Nataputta, Sañjaya Belaṭṭhiputta, Pakudha Kaccayana, Ajita Kesakambali—even these, when I asked them whether they had awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment, did not claim to have done so.
“Master Gotama, I am one who stays around monastic parks and frequents assemblies.
“Master Gotama, there are some ascetics and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this: ‘Whatever a person experiences, whether it be pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant, all that is caused by what was done in the past.’
“Master Gotama, these five faculties have different domains, different resorts; they do not experience each others’ resort and domain.
“Master Gotama, we have such wishes, desires, and hopes as these: ‘May we dwell in a home crowded with children!
“Master Gotama, what is the cause and reason why sometimes even those hymns that have been recited over a long period do not recur to the mind, let alone those that have not been recited?
“Master Gotama, what is the cause and reason why the true Dhamma does not endure long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana?
“Master Gotama, what is the cause and reason why these various speculative views arise in the world: ‘The world is eternal’ or ‘The world is not eternal’; or ‘The world is finite’ or ‘The world is infinite’; or ‘The soul and the body are the same’ or ‘The soul is one thing, the body is another’; or ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’?”
“Master Gotama, when a flame is flung by the wind and goes some distance, what does Master Gotama declare to be its fuel on that occasion?”
“Master Kaccana said ‘with sense doors unguarded.’
“Mastery is sovereignty in the world;
“Metre is the scaffolding of verses;
“Migajala, even though a bhikkhu who dwells thus lives in the vicinity of a village, associating with bhikkhus and bhikkhunis, with male and female lay followers, with kings and royal ministers, with sectarian teachers and their disciples, he is still called a lone dweller.
“Migajala, even though a bhikkhu who dwells thus resorts to forests and groves, to remote lodgings where there are few sounds and little noise, desolate, hidden from people, appropriate for seclusion, he is still called one dwelling with a partner.
“Mighty, Kaccayana, is this element, the element of ignorance.
“Mind-consciousness is impermanent, changing, becoming otherwise.
“Mindfulness, brahmin, takes recourse in liberation.” 
“Miserable are celestial maidens
“Misery is born of desire; suffering is born of desire.
“Moggallana, great in spiritual power, Encompassed their minds with his own, And searching their minds:
“Mother dear, I am not talking;
“Move in your own resort, bhikkhus, in your own ancestral domain.
“Move in your own resort, bhikkhus, in your own ancestral domain.
“My head would have split in seven parts, While living I would have found no ease, If, when chanted over by the Buddha’s verse, I had not let go of Candima.” 
“My head would have split in seven parts, While living I would have found no ease, If, when chanted over by the Buddha’s verses, I had not let go of Suriya.”
“My statement is made with reference
“My statement is made with reference
“Name has weighed down everything;
“Name-and-form, friend Koṭṭhita, is not created by oneself, nor is it created by another, nor is it created both by oneself and by another, nor has it arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another; but rather, with consciousness as condition, name-and-form.”
“Nanda, this is not proper for you, a clansman who has gone forth out of faith from the household life into homelessness, that you wear well-pressed and well-ironed robes, paint your eyes, and carry a glazed bowl.
“Nandaka, a noble disciple who possesses four things is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.
“Nandiya, I say that one in whom the four factors of stream-entry are completely and totally absent is ‘an outsider, one who stands in the faction of worldlings.’
“Nevertheless, bhikkhus, what that man saw was actually real, not unreal.
“No knots exist for one with conceit abandoned;
“No, friend.
“No, friend.
“No, friend.
“No, friend.”
“No, friend.”
“No, friend.”
“No, friend.”
“No, friend.”
“No, friend.”
“No, friend.”
“No, friend.”
“No, friend.”
“No, he did not, venerable sir.
“No, householder.
“No, revered lady.
“No, revered lady.”
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.”
“No, venerable sir.” 
“No, venerable sir.” 
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One replied.
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One replied.
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One replied.
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One replied.
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One replied.
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One replied.
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One replied.
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One replied.
“Not by means of slack endeavour, Not by means of feeble effort, Is this Nibbana to be achieved, Release from all suffering.
“Not by mere speech nor solely by listening
“Not directing his mind outwardly, a bhikkhu understands: ‘My mind is not directed outwardly.’
“Not directing his mind outwardly, a bhikkhu understands: ‘My mind is not directed outwardly.’
“Not directing his mind outwardly, a bhikkhu understands: ‘My mind is not directed outwardly.’
“Not knowing suffering, not knowing the origin of suffering, not knowing the cessation of suffering, not knowing the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
“Not long, friend.
“Not long, friend.”
“Not long, friend.”
“Not long, friend.” 
“Not so, Ananda!
“Not so, Ananda!
“Not so, Kassapa,” the Blessed One said.
“Not so, Kassapa,” the Blessed One said.
“Not so, Kassapa,” the Blessed One said.
“Not so, Kassapa,” the Blessed One said.
“Not so, Timbaruka,” the Blessed One said.
“Not so, Timbaruka,” the Blessed One said.
“Not so, Timbaruka,” the Blessed One said.
“Not so, Timbaruka,” the Blessed One said.
“Now I will never again dwell
“Now it is possible, Ananda, that wanderers of other sects might speak thus: ‘The ascetic Gotama speaks of the cessation of perception and feeling, and he maintains that it is included in happiness.
“Now that you have received this brief exhortation from me, Puṇṇa, in which country will you dwell?”
“Now these truths have been seen;
“Now this practice of the brahmins, bhikkhus, is a foolish course, a stupid course; it does not lead to revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
“Now this, bhikkhus, is the noble truth of suffering: birth is suffering, aging is suffering, illness is suffering, death is suffering;  union with what is displeasing is suffering; separation from what is pleasing is suffering; not to get what one wants is suffering; in brief, the five aggregates subject to clinging are suffering.
“Now this, bhikkhus, is the noble truth of the cessation of suffering: it is the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving, the giving up and relinquishing of it, freedom from it, nonreliance on it.
“Now this, bhikkhus, is the noble truth of the origin of suffering: it is this craving which leads to renewed existence, accompanied by delight and lust, seeking delight here and there; that is, craving for sensual pleasures, craving for existence, craving for extermination.
“Now this, bhikkhus, is the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering: it is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view … right concentration.
“Now we understand the Venerable Sariputta’s statement thus: ‘Name-and-form, friend Koṭṭhita, is not created by oneself … but rather, with consciousness as condition, name-and-form.’
“Now when these six animals become worn out and fatigued, they would be dominated by the one among them that was strongest; they would submit to it and come under its control.
“Now when these six animals become worn out and fatigued, they would stand close to that post or pillar, they would sit down there, they would lie down there.
“Now, friend, I usually dwell with a mind well established in the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Now, householder, are you asking thus: ‘Venerable elder, it is said, “diversity of elements, diversity of elements.”
“Now, householder, are you asking thus: ‘Venerable elder, there are various views that arise in the world: “The world is eternal” …—these as well as the sixty-two speculative views mentioned in the Brahmajala.
“Nurture in yourself that faith
“O Blessed One, your name is ‘Naga,’
“O Blessed One,:
“O great hero who has vanquished death, Your disciple is longing for death.
“O great hero, great in wisdom, Blazing forth with power and glory!
“Of great might, a triple-knowledge man, Skilled in the course of others’ minds—
“Of these Four Noble Truths, bhikkhus, there is a noble truth that is to be fully understood; there is a noble truth that is to be abandoned; there is a noble truth that is to be realized; there is a noble truth that is to be developed.
“Of those, cities, bhikkhu, there was only one city in which I resided at that time: the capital Kusavati.
“Of those, elephants, there was only one elephant that I rode at that time, the royal bull elephant Uposatha.
“Of those, women, there was only one woman who waited on me at that time, either a khattiya maiden or a velamika maiden.
“On an occasion, bhikkhus, when the mind becomes excited, it is timely to develop the enlightenment factor of tranquillity, the enlightenment factor of concentration, and the enlightenment factor of equanimity.
“On an occasion, bhikkhus, when the mind becomes excited, it is untimely to develop the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states, the enlightenment factor of energy, and the enlightenment factor of rapture.
“On an occasion, bhikkhus, when the mind becomes sluggish, it is timely to develop the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states, the enlightenment factor of energy, and the enlightenment factor of rapture.
“On an occasion, bhikkhus, when the mind becomes sluggish, it is untimely to develop the enlightenment factor of tranquillity, the enlightenment factor of concentration, and the enlightenment factor of equanimity.
“On an occasion, prince, when one dwells with a mind obsessed by sensual lust, overwhelmed by sensual lust, and one neither knows nor sees as it really is the escape from arisen sensual lust: this is a cause and condition for lack of knowledge and vision; it is in this way that lack of knowledge and vision is with cause and condition.
“On one occasion, Ananda, I was dwelling right here in Rajagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrel Sanctuary.
“On one occasion, great king, I was living among the Sakyans, where there is a town of the Sakyans named Nagaraka.
“On the earth, venerable sir.”
“On the water, venerable sir.”
“On the western wall, venerable sir.”
“On the western wall, venerable sir.” 
“On this one occasion, friend Mahanama, the Blessed One was dwelling at Icchanaṅgala in the Icchanaṅgala Wood.
“Once in the past, bhikkhus, a certain devata of the Tavatiṁsa host was revelling in Nandana Grove, &lt; &gt; supplied and endowed with the five cords of celestial sensual pleasure, accompanied by a retinue of celestial nymphs.
“Once in the past, bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, instructing the Tavatiṁsa devas in the Sudhamma assembly hall, on that occasion recited this verse: 
“Once in the past, bhikkhus, the devas and the asuras were arrayed for battle.
“Once in the past, bhikkhus, the devas and the asuras were arrayed for battle.
“Once in the past, venerable sir, I lived the holy life under the Perfectly Enlightened One Kassapa.
“Once in the past, venerable sir, I was a king named Seri, a donor, a philanthropist, one who spoke in praise of giving.
“Once in the past, venerable sir, I was a seer named Rohitassa, son of Bhoja, possessed of spiritual power, able to travel through the sky.
“One always perfect in virtue, Endowed with wisdom, well concentrated, One energetic and resolute
“One attains final knowledge early in this very life.
“One attains final knowledge early in this very life.
“One attains final knowledge early in this very life.
“One attains final knowledge early in this very life.
“One does not have, friend, that distrust regarding the Buddha which the uninstructed worldling possesses, because of which the latter, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“One does not have, friend, that distrust regarding the Dhamma which the uninstructed worldling possesses, because of which the latter, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“One does not have, friend, that distrust regarding the Saṅgha which the uninstructed worldling possesses, because of which the latter, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“One does not have, friend, that immorality which the uninstructed worldling possesses, because of which the latter, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“One does not seek delight in feeling … … in perception … in volitional formations … in consciousness, does not welcome it, does not remain holding to it.
“One endowed with the triple knowledge, Of proper birth, of ample learning, Accomplished in knowledge and conduct, Might partake of this milk-rice meal.” 
“One fares mindfully in such a way
“One for whom these teachings are accepted thus after being pondered to a sufficient degree with wisdom is called a Dhamma-follower, one who has entered the fixed course of rightness, entered the plane of superior persons, transcended the plane of the worldlings.
“One for whom these teachings are accepted thus after being pondered to a sufficient degree with wisdom is called a Dhamma-follower, one who has entered the fixed course of rightness…; he is incapable of passing away without having realized the fruit of stream-entry.
“One is stuck, Radha, tightly stuck, in desire, lust, delight, and craving for form; therefore one is called a being.
“One must cut off five, abandon five, And must develop a further five.
“One need not rein in the mind from everything
“One seeks delight in feeling … in perception … in volitional formations … in consciousness, welcomes it, and remains holding to it.
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should associate only with the good;
“One should build delightful hermitages
“One should discard anger, cast off conceit, Transcend all the fetters.
“One should discard anger, cast off conceit, Transcend all the fetters.
“One should do no evil in all the world, Not by speech, mind, or body.
“One should do no evil in all the world, Not by speech, mind, or body.
“One should not despise as ‘young’
“One should not despise as ‘young’
“One should not despise as ‘young’
“One should promptly do the deed
“One should resort to remote lodgings, Practise for release from the fetters.
“One should speak as one would act;
“One should utter only pleasant speech, Speech that is gladly welcomed.
“One should utter only such speech
“One teacher held such a doctrine and view as this: ‘There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing presented in charity; no fruit or result of good and bad actions; no this world, no other world; no mother, no father; no beings who are reborn spontaneously; no ascetics and brahmins faring and practising rightly in the world who, having realized this world and the other world for themselves by direct knowledge, make them known to others.’
“One teacher held such a doctrine and view as this: ‘There is what is given, what is offered, what is presented in charity; there is fruit and result of good and bad actions; there is this world and the other world; there is mother and father; there are beings who are reborn spontaneously; there are ascetics and brahmins faring and practising rightly in the world who, having realized this world and the other world for themselves by direct knowledge, make them known to others.’
“One teacher held such a doctrine and view as this: ‘When one acts or makes others act, when one mutilates or makes others mutilate … … evil is done by the doer.
“One teacher held such a doctrine and view as this: ‘When one acts or makes others act, when one mutilates or makes others mutilate, when one tortures or makes others inflict torture, when one inflicts sorrow or makes others inflict sorrow, when one oppresses or makes others inflict oppression, when one intimidates or makes others inflict intimidation, when one destroys life, takes what is not given, breaks into houses, plunders wealth, commits burglary, ambushes highways, seduces another’s wife, utters falsehood—no evil is done by the doer.
“One to whom it might occur, ‘I’m a woman’ or ‘I’m a manʹ
“One virtuous, wise, of developed mind, Concentrated, mindful, enjoying jhana, For whom all sorrows are gone, abandoned, A taint-destroyer bearing his final body:
“One who conceives ‘I am equal, better, or worse,’
“One who desires merit, established in the wholesome, Develops the path to attain the Deathless;
“One who desists from sensual perception, Who has overcome the fetter of form, Who has destroyed delight in existence—
“One who digs up the lotus stalks, One who damages the flowers, One of such rough behaviour:
“One who does not seek delight in form … in consciousness does not seek delight in suffering.
“One who does not seek delight in the earth element...
“One who does not seek delight in the eye … in the mind does not seek delight in suffering.
“One who fares harming no living beings
“One who has completed and fulfilled these five faculties is an arahant.
“One who has completed and fulfilled these five faculties is an arahant.
“One who has completed and fulfilled these five faculties is an arahant.
“One who has completed and fulfilled these five faculties is an arahant.
“One who has completed and fulfilled these five faculties is an arahant.
“One who has completed and fulfilled these five faculties is an arahant.
“One who has completed and fulfilled these five faculties is an arahant.
“One who has crossed this ocean so hard to cross, With its dangers of sharks, demons, waves, The knowledge-master who has lived the holy life, Reached the world’s end, is called one gone beyond.”
“One who has expunged lust and hate
“One who has known his past abodes, Who sees heaven and the plane of woe, Who has reached the destruction of birth, A sage consummate in direct knowledge:
“One who has known his past abodes, Who sees heaven and the plane of woe, Who has reached the destruction of birth, A sage consummate in direct knowledge: 
“One who has sons delights in sons, One with cattle delights in cattle.
“One who has sons delights in sons, One with cattle delights in cattle.
“One who has sons sorrows over sons, One with cattle sorrows over cattle.
“One who has sons sorrows over sons, One with cattle sorrows over cattle.
“One who has such a vehicle—
“One who knows and sees these teachings thus is called a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.”
“One who knows and sees these teachings thus is called a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.”
“One who knows and sees these teachings thus is called a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.” 
“One who possesses this Noble Eightfold Path, venerable sir, is called a stream-enterer: this venerable one of such a name and clan.”
“One who repays an angry man with anger
“One who repays an angry man with anger
“One who takes what is not given … … who engages in sexual misconduct … who speaks falsely...
“One whose mind all day and night
“One, bhikkhus, who has completed and fulfilled these five faculties is an arahant.
“One, friend, who has gotten so much in such a time has indeed gotten much, not to speak of one who has surpassed this!” 
“Open to them are the doors to the Deathless:
“Outside here the followers of creeds
“Over a thousand bhikkhus here
“Pakudhaka Katiyana and the Nigaṇṭha, Along with Makkhali and Pūraṇa:
“Parents and brothers worship an ascetic
“People are tied to their acquisitions, To what is seen, heard, sensed, and felt;
“People smeared by denigration, Slain by conceit, fall into hell.
“Placing faith in the Dhamma of the arahants
“Practice in accordance with the Dhamma, friend, is difficult to do by one who has found delight.”
“Practising wrongly, venerable sir.”
“Proficient, long trained in concentration, Honest, discreet, without longing, The sage has attained the peaceful state, Depending on which he bides his time
“Punabbasu, be happy!
“Puṇṇa, the people of Sunaparanta are wild and rough.
“Puṇṇa, there are forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“Puṇṇa, there are forms cognizable by the eye … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“Radha, the desire, lust, delight, craving, engagement and clinging, mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding form: this is called the conduit to existence.
“Radha, you should abandon desire for whatever is impermanent.
“Radha, you should abandon desire for whatever is nonself.” …
“Radha, you should abandon desire for whatever is suffering.” …
“Radha, you should abandon desire, you should abandon lust, you should abandon desire and lust, for whatever is Mara.
“Radha, you should abandon desire, you should abandon lust, you should abandon desire and lust, for whatever is subject to Mara … … for whatever is impermanent … for whatever is of an impermanent nature … for whatever is suffering … for whatever is of a painful nature … for whatever is nonself … for whatever is of a selfless nature … for whatever is subject to destruction … for whatever is subject to vanishing … for whatever is subject to arising … for whatever is subject to cessation.
“Rain nurtures both the slack and active
“Rather, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple has knowledge about this that is independent of others: ‘When this does not exist, that does not come to be; with the cessation of this, that ceases.
“Rather, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple has knowledge about this that is independent of others: ‘When this exists, that comes to be; with the arising of this, that arises.
“Recite the factors of enlightenment, Cunda.”
“Recluse, I plough and sow, and when I have ploughed and sown I eat.
“Rejoice, Tissa!
“Release is twofold, release as giving up and release as entering into.
“Resolving thus, venerable sir, a bhikkhu can cut off the lower fetters.
“Resounding with a host of nymphs, Haunted by a host of demons!
“Restraint of the sense faculties, Kuṇḍaliya, when developed and cultivated, fulfils the three kinds of good conduct.
“Return the cows to their owners, Nanda.”
“Right view, Ananda, when developed and cultivated, has as its final goal the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
“Rise up, O hero, victor in battle!
“Rise up, O hero, victor in battle!
“Rise up, O hero, victor in battle!
“Run forward, good luck be with you!
“Sariputta and Moggallana, friends, are healthy and robust.”
“Sariputta is wise, Ananda, Sariputta has great wisdom, in so far as he can analyse the four factors of stream-entry in ten modes.”
“Sariputta truly is endowed with wisdom, With virtue and with inner peace.
“Sariputta truly is endowed with wisdom, With virtue and with inner peace.
“Sariputta, didn’t the bhikkhu Channa declare his blameless-ness right in your presence?” 
“Sariputta, do you have faith that the faculty of faith, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal?… That the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.” 
“Sariputta, do you see: ‘This has come to be’?
“Sariputta, does the noble disciple who is completely dedicated to the Tathagata and has full confidence in him entertain any perplexity or doubt about the Tathagata or the Tathagata’s teaching?”
“Sariputta, this is said: ‘A factor for stream-entry, a factor for stream-entry.’
“Sariputta, this is said: ‘A stream-enterer, a stream-enterer.’
“Sariputta, this is said: ‘The stream, the stream.’
“Sariputta, when you do not have any knowledge encompassing the minds of the Arahants, the Perfectly Enlightened Ones of the past, the future, and the present, why do you utter this lofty, bellowing utterance and roar this definitive, categorical lion’s roar: ‘Venerable sir, I have such confidence in the Blessed One that I believe there has not been nor ever will be nor exists at present another ascetic or brahmin more knowledgeable than the Blessed One with respect to enlightenment’?”
“See formations as alien, As suffering, not as self.
“See now, madam, you should know that the ascetic Udayı̄ teaches a Dhamma that is good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, with the right meaning and phrasing; he reveals a holy life that is perfectly complete and pure.”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’” 
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’” 
“Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’” 
“Seeing thus, bhikkhu, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye … revulsion towards the mind.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards contact, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards forms, revulsion towards sounds, revulsion towards odours, revulsion towards tastes, revulsion towards tactile objects, revulsion towards mental phenomena.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye … towards the mind.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye, forms, eye-consciousness, eye-contact, and whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant … towards the mind, mental phenomena, mind-consciousness, mind-contact, and whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition….
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye, revulsion towards the ear, revulsion towards the nose, revulsion towards the tongue, revulsion towards the body, revulsion towards the mind.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye, towards forms, towards eye-consciousness, towards eye-contact … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye, towards forms, towards eye-consciousness, towards eye-contact, towards whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant.
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye, towards forms, towards eye-consciousness, towards eye-contact, towards whatever feeling arises with eye-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant; experiences revulsion towards the ear … towards the mind … towards whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition….
“Seeing thus, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye...
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards craving for forms...
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards eye-consciousness … revulsion towards mind-consciousness.
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards eye-contact … revulsion towards mind-contact.
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards feeling born of eye-contact … revulsion towards feeling born of mind-contact.
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form...
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards forms...
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards perception of forms...
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the earth element...
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye, revulsion towards forms, revulsion towards eye-consciousness, revulsion towards eye-contact; revulsion towards anything included in feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness arisen with eye-contact as condition.
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards the eye, revulsion towards the ear, revulsion towards the nose, revulsion towards the tongue, revulsion towards the body, revulsion towards the mind.
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards volition regarding forms...
“Seeing thus, Soṇa, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
“Seeing thus, Susı̄ma, the instructed noble disciple experiences revulsion towards form, revulsion towards feeling, revulsion towards perception, revulsion towards volitional formations, revulsion towards consciousness.
“Seeing thus...
“Sensual pleasures are impermanent, unstable, Though the dullard is enthralled with them.
“Sensual pleasures are like swords and stakes;
“Serve with other food and drink
“Seven bhikkhus reborn in Aviha
“She abstains from the destruction of life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from sexual misconduct, abstains from false speech, abstains from wine, liquor, and intoxicants that cause negligence.
“She destroys life, takes what is not given, engages in sexual misconduct, speaks falsehood, and indulges in wine, liquor, and intoxicants that cause negligence.
“She has faith, she has a sense of shame, she is afraid of wrongdoing, she is without anger, she is wise.
“She has faith, she has a sense of shame, she is afraid of wrongdoing, she is without malice,  wise.
“She is without faith, shameless, unafraid of wrongdoing, angry, unwise.
“She is without faith, shameless, unafraid of wrongdoing, malicious,  unwise.
“She may wish: ‘Having been born into a suitable family and having married into a suitable family, may I dwell at home without a rival!’ This is the third situation….
“She may wish: ‘Having been born into a suitable family … dwelling at home without a rival, may I bear sons!’ This is the fourth situation….
“She may wish: ‘Having been born into a suitable family … having borne sons, may I abide with my husband under my control!’ This is the fifth situation….
“She may wish: ‘Having been born into a suitable family … having borne sons, may I abide with my husband under my control!’ This is the fifth situation….
“She may wish: ‘Having been born into a suitable family, may I marry into a suitable family!’ This is the second situation….
“She may wish: ‘May I be born into a suitable family!’ This is the first situation that is difficult to obtain for a woman who has not done merit.
“She may wish: ‘May I be born into a suitable family!’ This is the first situation….
“Short is the life span of human beings, The good man should disdain it.
“Shrines in parks and woodland shrines, Well-constructed lotus ponds:
“Silent, the worthy one stands, Shaven-headed, clad in a stitched robe.
“Since he does not conceive anything thus, he does not cling to anything in the world.
“Since he does not conceive anything thus, he does not cling to anything in the world.
“Since he does not conceive anything thus, he does not cling to anything in the world.
“Since he does not conceive anything thus, he does not cling to anything in the world.
“Since I know and see thus, venerable sir, in what other ascetic or brahmin need I place faith regarding the claim that there is a concentration without thought and examination, a cessation of thought and examination?”
“Since they give while settled in unrighteousness, Having slain and killed, causing sorrow, Their offering—tearful, fraught with violence—
“Sire, there is no ascetic or brahmin in Toraṇavatthu whom your majesty could visit.
“Sister, I do not earn my living by such wrong means of livelihood as the debased art of geomancy, or the debased art of astrology, or by undertaking to go on errands and run messages, or by the debased art of palmistry.
“Sister, the arahants maintain that when the eye exists there is pleasure and pain, and when the eye does not exist there is no pleasure and pain.
“Sister, those ascetics and brahmins who earn their living by the debased art of geomancy —a wrong means of livelihood—these are called ascetics and brahmins who eat facing downwards.
“So I did not get through to you when I said, ‘Enough, headman, let it be!
“So I did not get through to you when I said, ‘Enough, headman, let it be!
“So it is, Ananda!
“So it is, Ananda, so it is!
“So it is, Ananda, so it is!
“So it is, Blessed One!
“So it is, friend Ananda, for those venerable ones who have such compassionate and benevolent brothers in the holy life to admonish and instruct them.
“So it is, friend Sariputta, for those venerable ones who have such compassionate and benevolent brothers in the holy life to admonish and instruct them.
“So it is, friend, when one does not guard the doors of the sense faculties, is immoderate in eating, and is not devoted to wakefulness.
“So it is, great king!
“So it is, great king!
“So it is, great king!
“So it is, great king!
“So it is, great king!
“So it is, great king!
“So it is, great king!
“So it is, great king!
“So it is, great king!
“So it is, householder, so it is!
“So it is, sisters, so it is!
“So long as I did not directly know as they really are the five aggregates subject to clinging in four phases, I did not claim to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans.
“So long, bhikkhus, as beings have not directly known as they really are the gratification as gratification, the danger as danger, and the escape as escape in the case of these five aggregates subject to clinging, they have not escaped from this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, from this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans; they have not become detached from it, released from it, nor do they dwell with a mind rid of barriers.
“So long, bhikkhus, as beings have not directly known as they really are the gratification as gratification, the danger as danger, and the escape as escape in the case of these four elements, they have not escaped from this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, from this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans; they have not become detached from it, released from it, nor do they dwell with a mind rid of barriers.
“So long, bhikkhus, as beings have not directly known as they really are the gratification as gratification, the danger as danger, and the escape as escape in the case of these six internal sense bases, they have not escaped from this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, from this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans; they have not become detached from it, released from it, nor do they dwell with a mind rid of barriers.
“So long, bhikkhus, as I did not directly know as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five aggregates subject to clinging, I did not claim to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans.
“So long, bhikkhus, as I did not directly know as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five aggregates subject to clinging, I did not claim to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans.
“So long, bhikkhus, as I did not directly know as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these four elements, I did not claim to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans.
“So long, bhikkhus, as I did not directly know as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these four elements...
“So long, bhikkhus, as I did not directly know as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these six internal sense bases, I did not claim to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans.
“So long, bhikkhus, as I did not directly know as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five faculties, I did not claim to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans.
“So long, bhikkhus, as I did not directly know as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these six faculties, I did not claim to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with … its devas and humans.
“So long, bhikkhus, as my knowledge and vision of these Four Noble Truths as they really are in their three phases and twelve aspects was not thoroughly purified in this way,  I did not claim to have awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment in this world with its devas, Mara, and Brahma, in this generation with its ascetics and brahmins, its devas and humans.
“So subtle, bhikkhus, was the bondage of Vepacitti, but even subtler than that is the bondage of Mara.
“So that formation, bhikkhus, is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; that craving is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; that feeling is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; that contact is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; that ignorance is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
“So the fool, having left the Dhamma
“So the streams of merit reach the wise man—
“So too, a bhikkhu does not recognize either a self or anything belonging to a self in these six bases for contact.
“So too, Ananda, when one dwells contemplating danger in things that can be clung to, craving ceases.
“So too, bhikkhus,  when the Tathagata arises in the world, an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One, he teaches the Dhamma thus: ‘Such is form, such its origin, such its passing away; such is feeling … such is perception … such are volitional formations … such is consciousness, such its origin, such its passing away.’ 
“So too, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … of such great benefit is it to obtain the vision of the Dhamma.”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … of such great benefit is it to obtain the vision of the Dhamma.”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … of such great benefit is it to obtain the vision of the Dhamma.”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … of such great benefit is it to obtain the vision of the Dhamma.”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … of such great benefit is it to obtain the vision of the Dhamma.”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … of such great benefit is it to obtain the vision of the Dhamma.”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … of such great benefit is it to obtain the vision of the Dhamma.”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … Therefore an exertion should be made.…”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … Therefore an exertion should be made.…”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … Therefore an exertion should be made.…”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … Therefore an exertion should be made.…”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … Therefore an exertion should be made.…”
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … Therefore an exertion should be made.…” 
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … Therefore an exertion should be made.…” 
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple … Therefore an exertion should be made.…” 
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple, a person accomplished in view who has made the breakthrough, the suffering that has been destroyed and eliminated is more, while that which remains is trifling.
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple, a person accomplished in view who has made the breakthrough, the suffering that has been destroyed and eliminated is more, while that which remains is trifling.
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple, a person accomplished in view who has made the breakthrough, the suffering that has been destroyed and eliminated is more, while that which remains is trifling.
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple, a person accomplished in view who has made the breakthrough, the suffering that has been destroyed and eliminated is more, while that which remains is trifling.
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple, a person accomplished in view who has made the breakthrough, the suffering that has been destroyed and eliminated is more, while that which remains is trifling….
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple, a person accomplished in view who has made the breakthrough, the suffering that has been utterly destroyed and eliminated is more, while that which remains is trifling.
“So too, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple, a person accomplished in view who has made the breakthrough, the suffering that has been utterly destroyed and eliminated is more, while that which remains is trifling.
“So too, bhikkhus, form is not yours … consciousness is not yours: abandon it.
“So too, bhikkhus, here some bhikkhu dresses in the morning and, taking bowl and robe, enters a village or town for alms with body, speech, and mind unguarded, without setting up mindfulness, unrestrained in his sense faculties.
“So too, bhikkhus, here some foolish, incompetent, unskilful bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“So too, bhikkhus, here some wise, competent, skilful bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“So too, bhikkhus, here the elder bhikkhus dress in the morning and, taking bowl and robe, enter a village or town for alms.
“So too, bhikkhus, I saw the ancient path, the ancient road travelled by the Perfectly Enlightened Ones of the past.
“So too, bhikkhus, if any bhikkhu understands as it really is ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering,’ and then an ascetic or a brahmin comes along … it is impossible that he could make that bhikkhu shake, quake, or tremble.
“So too, bhikkhus, if there is no lust for the nutriment edible food...
“So too, bhikkhus, if you do not veer towards the near shore, do not veer towards the far shore, do not sink in mid-stream, do not get cast up on high ground, do not get caught by human beings, do not get caught by nonhuman beings, do not get caught in a whirlpool, and do not become inwardly rotten, you will slant, slope, and incline towards Nibbana.
“So too, bhikkhus, in regard to forms cognizable by the eye...
“So too, bhikkhus, in regard to forms cognizable by the eye...
“So too, bhikkhus, it is by chance that one obtains the human state; by chance that a Tathagata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One arises in the world; by chance that the Dhamma and Discipline proclaimed by the Tathagata shines in the world.
“So too, bhikkhus, Mara the Evil One is constantly and continually waiting close by you, thinking, ‘Perhaps I will gain access to him through the eye or through the ear … or through the mind.’
“So too, bhikkhus, on an occasion when the mind becomes excited, it is timely to develop the enlightenment factor of tranquillity, the enlightenment factor of concentration, and the enlightenment factor of equanimity.
“So too, bhikkhus, on an occasion when the mind becomes excited, it is untimely to develop the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states, the enlightenment factor of energy, and the enlightenment factor of rapture.
“So too, bhikkhus, on an occasion when the mind becomes sluggish, it is timely to develop the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states, the enlightenment factor of energy, and the enlightenment factor of rapture.
“So too, bhikkhus, on an occasion when the mind becomes sluggish, it is untimely to develop the enlightenment factor of tranquillity, the enlightenment factor of concentration, and the enlightenment factor of equanimity.
“So too, bhikkhus, so long as a Tathagata has not arisen in the world, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One, for just so long there is no manifestation of great light and radiance, but then blinding darkness prevails, a dense mass of darkness; for just so long there is no explaining, teaching, proclaiming, establishing, disclosing, analysing, or elucidating of the Four Noble Truths.
“So too, bhikkhus, that which is the faculty of faith is the power of faith … that which is the power of wisdom is the faculty of wisdom.
“So too, bhikkhus, the achievements of ascetics, brahmins, and wanderers of other sects do not amount to a hundredth part, or a thousandth part, or a hundred thousandth part of the achievement of a noble disciple, a person accomplished in view who has made the breakthrough.
“So too, bhikkhus, the brahmin Uṇṇabha has gained faith in the Tathagata that is settled, deeply rooted, established, firm.
“So too, bhikkhus, the eye is not yours … The ear … The mind is not yours … When you have abandoned it, that will lead to your welfare and happiness.”
“So too, bhikkhus, the eye is not yours … Whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … that too is not yours: abandon it.
“So too, bhikkhus, the same thing will happen with the bhikkhus in the future.
“So too, bhikkhus, the things I have directly known but have not taught you are numerous, while the things I have taught you are few.
“So too, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling is struck in the eye by agreeable and disagreeable forms; struck in the ear by agreeable and disagreeable sounds; struck in the nose by agreeable and disagreeable odours; struck in the tongue by agreeable and disagreeable tastes; struck in the body by agreeable and disagreeable tactile objects; struck in the mind by agreeable and disagreeable mental phenomena.
“So too, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling regards form thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
“So too, bhikkhus, the uninstructed worldling … regards form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“So too, bhikkhus, there are these five corruptions of the mind, corrupted by which the mind is neither malleable nor wieldy nor radiant but brittle and not rightly concentrated for the destruction of the taints.
“So too, bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand as it really is ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they look up at the face of another ascetic or brahmin, thinking: ‘This worthy is surely one who really knows, who really sees.’
“So too, bhikkhus, those ascetics or brahmins who understand as it really is ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they do not look up at the face of another ascetic or brahmin, thinking: ‘This worthy is surely one who really knows, who really sees.’
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from accepting elephants, cattle, horses, and mares.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from accepting fields and land.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from accepting fowl and swine.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from accepting goats and sheep.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from accepting gold and silver.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from accepting male and female slaves.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from accepting raw grain.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from accepting raw meat.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from accepting women and girls.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from buying and selling.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from damaging seed and plant life.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from dancing, singing, instrumental music, and unsuitable shows.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from divisive speech.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from eating at improper times.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from false speech.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from false weights, false metals, and false measures.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from harsh speech.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from high and luxurious beds and seats.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from idle chatter.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from mutilating, murder, binding, robbery, plunder, and violence.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from running messages and errands.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from sexual misconduct.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from taking what is not given.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from the crooked ways of bribery, deception, and fraud.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from the destruction of life.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from wearing garlands, embellishing themselves with scents, and beautifying themselves with unguents.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who abstain from wine, liquors, and intoxicants that are a basis for negligence.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who are born on high ground.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who are reborn among human beings.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who are reborn in the middle countries.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who honour ascetics.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who honour brahmins.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who honour their father.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who honour their mother.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who possess the noble eye of wisdom.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who respect their elders in the family.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away as devas, are reborn among human beings.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away as devas, are reborn among the devas.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn among human beings.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn among human beings.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn among human beings.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away as human beings, are reborn among the devas.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away from hell, are reborn among human beings.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away from hell, are reborn among the devas.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away from the animal realm, are reborn among human beings.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away from the animal realm, are reborn among the devas.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away from the domain of ghosts, are reborn among human beings.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away from the domain of ghosts, are reborn among the devas.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away from the domain of ghosts, are reborn among the devas.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings are few who, when they pass away from the domain of ghosts, are reborn among the devas.
“So too, bhikkhus, those beings who are reborn among human beings are few.
“So too, bhikkhus, whatever ascetics and brahmins in the past … in the future...
“So too, bhikkhus, whatever ascetics and brahmins in the past … in the future...
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu does not dwell devoted to development, even though such a wish as this might arise in him: ‘Oh, that my mind might be liberated from the taints by nonclinging!’ yet his mind is not liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu dwells devoted to development, even though no such knowledge occurs to him: ‘So much of my taints has been worn away today, so much yesterday, so much earlier,’ yet when they are worn away, the knowledge occurs to him that they have been worn away.
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu dwells devoted to development, even though no such wish as this might arise in him: ‘Oh, that my mind might be liberated from the taints by nonclinging!’ yet his mind is liberated from the taints by nonclinging.
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu has developed and cultivated the liberation of mind by lovingkindness, made it a vehicle, made it a basis, stabilized it, exercised himself in it, and fully perfected it, if a nonhuman being thinks he can overthrow his mind, that nonhuman being would only experience fatigue and vexation.
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is conducting himself thus and dwelling thus, kings or royal ministers, friends or colleagues, relatives or kinsmen, might invite him to accept wealth … it is impossible that he will give up the training and return to the lower life.
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu is developing and cultivating the Noble Eightfold Path, kings or royal ministers, friends or colleagues, relatives or kinsmen, might invite him to accept wealth, saying: ‘Come, good man, why let these saffron robes weigh you down?
“So too, bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu’s mind has been subdued, well subdued, regarding the six bases for contact, it then becomes inwardly steady, settled, unified, and concentrated.
“So too, bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating danger in things that can be clung to, craving ceases….
“So too, bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating danger in things that can fetter, craving ceases….
“So too, bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating danger in things that can fetter, there is no descent of consciousness….
“So too, bhikkhus, when one dwells contemplating danger in things that can fetter, there is no descent of name-and-form….
“So too, bhikkhus, when there is no eye, no pleasure and pain arise internally with eye-contact as condition.
“So too, bhikkhus, when there is no eye...
“So too, bhikkhus, when there is the eye, pleasure and pain arise internally with eye-contact as condition.
“So too, bhikkhus, when there is the eye, pleasure and pain arise internally with eye-contact as condition….
“So too, brahmin, we—who do not abuse anyone, who do not scold anyone, who do not rail against anyone—refuse to accept from you the abuse and scolding and tirade you let loose at us.
“So too, friend Yamaka, the uninstructed worldling, who is not a seer of the noble ones and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, who is not a seer of superior persons and is unskilled and undisciplined in their Dhamma, regards form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“So too, friend, the eye is not the fetter of forms nor are forms the fetter of the eye, but rather the desire and lust that arise there in dependence on both: that is the fetter there.
“So too, friend, the eye is not the fetter of forms … nor are mental phenomena the fetter of the mind, but rather the desire and lust that arise there in dependence on both: that is the fetter there.
“So too, friend, the eye is not the fetter of forms...
“So too, friends, even though a noble disciple has abandoned the five lower fetters, still, in relation to the five aggregates subject to clinging, there lingers in him a residual conceit ‘I am,’ a desire ‘I am,’ an underlying tendency ‘I am’ that has not yet been uprooted….
“So too, friends, I do not speak of form as ‘I am,’ nor do I speak of ‘I am’ apart from form.
“So too, friends, when a bhikkhu is developing and cultivating the four establishments of mindfulness, kings or royal ministers, friends or colleagues, relatives or kinsmen, might invite him to accept wealth, saying: ‘Come, good man, why let these saffron robes weigh you down?
“So too, great king, that form by which one describing the Tathagata might describe him has been abandoned by the Tathagata, cut off at the root, made like a palm stump, obliterated so that it is no more subject to future arising.
“So too, great king, when a person has gone forth from the household life into homelessness, no matter from what clan, if he has abandoned five factors and possesses five factors, then what is given to him is of great fruit.
“So too, Mahanama, a noble disciple who possesses these four things slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
“So too, Mahanama, here a Dhamma is badly expounded, badly proclaimed, unemancipating, not conducive to peace, proclaimed by one who is not perfectly enlightened.
“So too, Mahanama, here a Dhamma is well expounded, well proclaimed, emancipating, conducive to peace, proclaimed by one who is perfectly enlightened.
“So too, Radha, scatter form, demolish it, shatter it, put it out of play; practise for the destruction of craving.
“So too, venerable sir, I have understood this by inference from the Dhamma: Whatever Arahants, Perfectly Enlightened Ones arose in the past, all those Blessed Ones had first abandoned the five hindrances, corruptions of the mind and weakeners of wisdom; and then, with their minds well established in the four establishments of mindfulness, they had developed correctly the seven factors of enlightenment; and thereby they had awakened to the unsurpassed perfect enlightenment.
“So vast, bhikkhus, is the plane of misery.
“So when the world is ablaze
“So, bhikkhus, if Sakka, lord of the devas, subsisting on the fruit of his own merit, exercising supreme sovereignty and rulership over the Tavatiṁsa devas, will be one who speaks in praise of initiative and energy, then how much more would it be fitting here for you, who have gone forth in such a well-expounded Dhamma and Discipline, to toil, struggle, and strive for the attainment of the as-yet-unattained, for the achievement of the as-yet-unachieved, for the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.”
“So, bhikkhus, if Sakka, lord of the devas, subsisting on the fruit of his own merit, exercising supreme sovereignty and rulership over the Tavatiṁsa devas, will be one who speaks in praise of patience and gentleness, then how much more would it be fitting here for you, who have gone forth in such a well-expounded Dhamma and Discipline, to be patient and gentle.”
“So, headman, if it were the case that one is led on by the manner in which one usually dwells, then according to Nigaṇṭha Nataputta’s word no one at all would be bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.
“So, headman, if it were the case that one is led on by the manner in which one usually dwells, then according to Nigaṇṭha Nataputta’s word no one at all would be bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.
“So, too, headman, if a person is one who abstains from the destruction of life … who holds right view, even though a great crowd of people would come together and assemble around him … still, with the breakup of the body, after death, that person will be reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.”
“So, too, headman, if a person is one who destroys life … and holds wrong view, even though a great crowd of people would come together and assemble around him … still, with the breakup of the body, after death, that person will be reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“So, venerable sir, that financier householder has been reborn in the Great Roruva Hell?” 
“Some feelings, Sı̄vaka, arise here originating from bile disorders: that some feelings arise here originating from bile disorders one can know for oneself, and that is considered to be true in the world.
“Some feelings, Sı̄vaka, arise here originating from phlegm disorders...
“Some provide from the little they have, Others who are affluent don’t like to give.
“Some provide from what little they have, Others who are affluent don’t like to give.
“Someone here, headman, is seen garlanded and adorned, freshly bathed and groomed, with hair and beard trimmed, enjoying sensual pleasures with women as if he were a king.
“Someone is deluded, and on account of delusion he intends for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, for the affliction of both.
“Someone is full of hatred, and on account of hatred he intends for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, for the affliction of both.
“Someone is lustful, and on account of lust he intends for his own affliction, for the affliction of others, for the affliction of both.
“Sometimes I do, Master Gotama.”
“Sometimes they come to visit, Master Gotama.”
“Sons are the support of human beings, A wife the best companion;
“Sooner, I say, would that blind turtle, coming to the surface once every hundred years, insert its neck into that yoke with a single hole than the fool who has gone once to the nether world the human state.
“Sounds … Odours … Tastes … Tactile objects … Mental phenomena are impermanent.
“Sounds … Odours … Tastes … Tactile objects … Mental phenomena are nonself.
“Sounds … Odours … Tastes … Tactile objects … Mental phenomena are suffering.
“Soṇa, those ascetics or brahmins who do not understand form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who do not understand feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Soṇa, when any ascetics and brahmins do not, on the basis of form—which is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change—regard themselves thus: ‘I am superior,’ or ‘I am equal,’ or ‘I am inferior,’ what is that due to apart from seeing things as they really are?
“Soṇa, when any ascetics and brahmins, on the basis of form—which is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change—regard themselves thus: ‘I am superior,’ or ‘I am equal,’ or ‘I am inferior,’ what is that due to apart from not seeing things as they really are?
“Sprung from affection, arisen from oneself, Like the trunk-born shoots of the banyan tree;
“Such being the case, Master Ananda, the situation is interminable, not terminable.
“Such indeed is how the steadfast act:
“Such is this continuum, This illusion, beguiler of fools.
“Such, bhikkhus, is nonrestraint.
“Such, bhikkhus, is restraint.”
“Suffering, venerable sir.”
“Suffering, venerable sir.”
“Suffering, venerable sir.”
“Suffering, venerable sir.”
“Suppose, Ananda, at a crossroads there is a great mound of soil.
“Suppose, Ananda, there was a great tree, and all its roots going downwards and across would send the sap upwards.
“Suppose, Ananda, there was a great tree.
“Suppose, bhikkhu, there was a city with iron walls a yojana long, a yojana wide, and a yojana high, filled with mustard seeds as dense as a topknot.
“Suppose, bhikkhu, there was a great stone mountain a yojana long, a yojana wide, and a yojana high, without holes or crevices, one solid mass of rock.
“Suppose, bhikkhus there was a hen with eight, ten, or twelve eggs that she had not covered, incubated, and nurtured properly.
“Suppose, bhikkhus,  there was a stone column sixteen yards long: an eight yards’ portion of it would be sunk in the ground, an eight yards’ portion above ground.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a chariot harnessed to thoroughbreds was standing ready on even ground at a crossroads, with a goad on hand.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a dog tied up on a leash was bound to a strong post or pillar.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a dog tied up on a leash was bound to a strong post or pillar: it would just keep on running and revolving around that same post or pillar.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a great bonfire was burning, consuming ten, twenty, thirty, or forty loads of wood, and a man would cast dry grass, dry cowdung, and dry wood into it from time to time.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a great bonfire was burning, consuming ten, twenty, thirty, or forty loads of wood, and a man would not cast dry grass, dry cowdung, or dry wood into it from time to time.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man wandering through a forest would see an ancient path, an ancient road travelled upon by people in the past.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man wants to extinguish a great bonfire.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man wants to extinguish a great bonfire.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man wants to make a small fire flare up.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man wants to make a small fire flare up.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man would catch six animals—with different domains and different feeding grounds—and tie them by a strong rope.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man would catch six animals—with different domains and different feeding grounds—and tie them by a strong rope.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man would drop a blazing grass torch into a thicket of dry grass.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man would drop a blazing grass torch into a thicket of dry grass.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man would remove a hot clay pot from a potter’s kiln and set it on smooth ground: its heat would be dissipated right there and potsherds would be left.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a tuft of cotton wool or kapok, light, wafted by the wind, had settled on an even piece of ground.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a wise, competent, skilful cook were to present a king or a royal minister with various kinds of curries: sour, bitter, pungent, sweet, sharp, mild, salty, bland.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, an artist or a painter, using dye or lac or turmeric or indigo or crimson, would create the figure of a man or a woman complete in all its features on a well-polished plank or wall or canvas.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, an artist or a painter, using dye or lac or turmeric or indigo or crimson, would create the figure of a man or a woman complete in all its features on a well-polished plank or wall or canvas.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, an oil lamp was burning in dependence on oil and a wick, and a man would pour oil into it and adjust the wick from time to time.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, an oil lamp was burning in dependence on oil and a wick, and the man would not pour oil into it or adjust the wick from time to time.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, people were to carry off the grass, sticks, branches, and foliage in this Jeta’s Grove, or to burn them, or to do with them as they wish.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, people were to carry off the grass, sticks, branches, and foliage in this Jeta’s Grove, or to burn them, or to do with them as they wish.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, people were to carry off the grass, sticks, branches, and foliage in this Jeta’s Grove, or to burn them, or to do with them as they wish.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, that a magician or a magician’s apprentice would display a magical illusion at a crossroads.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, that a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, would take a sharp axe and enter a forest.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, that in the autumn, when it is raining and big rain drops are falling, a water bubble arises and bursts on the surface of the water.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, that in the last month of the hot season, at high noon, a shimmering mirage appears.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, that the barley has ripened and the watchman is negligent.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, that the barley has ripened and the watchman is vigilant.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, that when the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, a great crowd of people would come along bringing a shovel and a basket, thinking: ‘We will make this river Ganges slant, slope, and incline towards the west.’
“Suppose, bhikkhus, that when the river Ganges slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, a great crowd of people would come along bringing a shovel and basket, thinking: ‘We will make this river Ganges slant, slope, and incline towards the west.’
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there is a river which slants, slopes, and inclines towards the east, with an island in the middle.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a bronze cup of a beverage having a fine colour, aroma, and taste, but it was mixed with poison.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a bronze cup of a beverage having a fine colour, aroma, and taste, but it was mixed with poison.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a great tree, and all its roots going downwards and across would send the sap upwards.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a great tree, and all its roots going downwards and across would send the sap upwards.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a great tree, and all its roots going downwards and across would send the sap upwards.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a great tree.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a great tree.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a great tree.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a hen with eight, ten, or twelve eggs that she had covered, incubated, and nurtured properly.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a house or a hall with a peaked roof, with windows on the northern, southern, and eastern sides.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a king or a royal minister who had never before heard the sound of a lute.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a milk-sap tree —an assattha or a banyan or a pilakkha or an udumbara-fresh, young, tender.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a milk-sap tree—an assattha or a banyan or a pilakkha or an udumbara—dried up, desiccated, past its prime.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a sapling, and from time to time a man would clear the area around the roots, from time to time provide it with good soil, from time to time water it.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a sapling.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was a seafaring ship bound with rigging that had been worn away in the water for six months.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there was an iron pillar or an Indra’s pillar  with a deep base, securely planted, immobile, unshaking.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there were four disciples here each with a life span of a hundred years, living a hundred years, and each day they were each to recollect a hundred thousand aeons.
“Suppose, brahmin, the grains of sand between the point where the river Ganges originates and the point where it enters the great ocean: it is not easy to count these and say there are so many grains of sand, or so many hundreds of grains, or so many thousands of grains, or so many hundreds of thousands of grains.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water being heated over a fire, bubbling and boiling.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water covered over with water plants and algae.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water mixed with lac, turmeric, blue dye, or crimson dye.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water not covered over with water plants and algae.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water not heated over a fire, not bubbling, not boiling.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water not mixed with lac, turmeric, blue dye, or crimson dye.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water not stirred by the wind, without ripples, without swirls, not churned into wavelets.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water stirred by the wind, rippling, swirling, churned into wavelets.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water that is clear, serene, limpid, set out in the light.
“Suppose, brahmin, there is a bowl of water that is turbid, unsettled, muddy, placed in the dark.
“Suppose, friend Ananda, a young woman—or a man—youthful and fond of ornaments, would examine her own facial image in a mirror or in a bowl filled with pure, clear, clean water: she would look at it with clinging, not without clinging.
“Suppose, friend, a black ox and a white ox were yoked together by a single harness or yoke.
“Suppose, friend, a black ox and a white ox were yoked together by a single harness or yoke.
“Suppose, friend, a man needing heartwood, seeking heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood, would take a sharp axe and enter a forest.
“Suppose, friends, a cloth has become soiled and stained, and its owners give it to a laundryman.
“Suppose, friends, a king or a royal minister had a wardrobe full of differently coloured clothes.
“Suppose, friends, there is a peaked house or a hall built of thickly packed clay and freshly plastered.
“Suppose, friends, there is a shed made of reeds or of grass, dried up, desiccated, past its prime.
“Suppose, friends, there is the scent of a blue, red, or white lotus.
“Suppose, great king, a man would climb from the ground on to a palanquin, or from a palanquin on to horseback, or from horseback to an elephant mount, or from an elephant mount to a mansion: this person, I say, is exactly similar.
“Suppose, great king, a man would cross over from palanquin to palanquin, or from horseback to horseback, or from elephant mount to elephant mount, or from mansion to mansion: this person, I say, is exactly similar.
“Suppose, great king, a man would descend from a mansion to an elephant mount, or from an elephant mount to horseback, or from horseback to a palanquin, or from a palanquin to the ground, or from the ground to underground darkness: this person, I say, is exactly similar.
“Suppose, great king, a man would go from darkness to darkness, or from gloom to gloom, or from stain to stain: this person, I say, is exactly similar.
“Suppose, great king, in a place uninhabited by human beings, there was a lotus pond with clear, cool, sweet, clean water, with good fords, delightful; but no people would take that water, or drink it, or bathe in it, or use it for any purpose.
“Suppose, great king, not far from a village or a town, there was a lotus pond with clear, cool, sweet, clean water, with good fords, delightful; and people would take that water, and drink it, and bathe in it, and use it for their purposes.
“Suppose, headman, a man had three waterpots: one without cracks, which does not let water seep through and escape; one without cracks, but which lets water seep through and escape; and one with cracks, which lets water seep through and escape.
“Suppose, headman, a man submerges a pot of ghee or a pot of oil in a deep pool of water and breaks it.
“Suppose, headman, a person would hurl a huge boulder into a deep pool of water.
“Suppose, Mahanama, a man submerges a pot of ghee or a pot of oil in a deep pool of water and breaks it.
“Suppose, Mahanama, a tree was slanting, sloping, and inclining towards the east.
“Suppose, Mahanama, there is a bad field, a bad piece of ground, with stumps not cleared, and the seeds sown there would be broken, spoilt, damaged by wind and sun, unfertile, not planted securely, and the sky would not send down a proper rainfall.
“Suppose, Mahanama, there is a good field, a good piece of ground, well cleared of stumps, and the seeds sown there would be unbroken, unspoilt, undamaged by wind and sun, fertile, planted securely, and the sky would send down a proper rainfall.
“Suppose, Radha, some little boys or girls are playing with sand castles.
“Suppose, Tissa, there were two men: one unskilled in the path, the other skilled in the path.
“Suppose, venerable sir, not far from a village or a town there was a lotus pond in which a crab was living.
“Suppose, venerable sirs, a black ox and a white ox were yoked together by a single harness or yoke.
“Surely giving is praised in many ways, But the path of Dhamma surpasses giving.
“Surely I have no little hut, Surely I have no little nest, Surely I have no lines extended, Surely I’m free from bondage.” 
“Surely I would, venerable sir.”
“Surely I would, venerable sir.”
“Surely my sacrifice is well performed
“Surely not, venerable sir.”
“Surely not, venerable sir.”
“Surely they are factors of enlightenment, Blessed One!
“Surely they are hindrances, Blessed One!
“Surely this ascetic does not have
“Surely this ascetic does not have
“Surely this ascetic does not have
“Surely this ascetic does not have
“Surely this ascetic does not have
“Surely this ascetic does not have
“Surely this ascetic does not have
“Surely you know this life span of mine;
“Surely, bhikkhus, when you answer thus you state what has been said by me and do not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact; you explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of your assertion gives ground for criticism.
“Surely, bhikkhus, you have committed a transgression—so foolish, so confused, so inept were you—in that, having gone forth in such a well-expounded Dhamma and Discipline, you competed with each other in regard to your learning….
“Surely, Blessed One, they are factors of enlightenment!
“Surely, brahmin, I do not have
“Surely, brahmin, I do not have
“Surely, brahmin, I do not have
“Surely, brahmin, I do not have
“Surely, brahmin, I do not have
“Surely, brahmin, I do not have
“Surely, brahmin, I do not have
“Surely, Cunda, they are factors of enlightenment!
“Surely, friend Ananda, knowing, the Blessed One knows; seeing, he sees; he has become vision...
“Surely, headman, I am not getting through to you when I say, ‘Enough, headman, let it be!
“Surely, headman, I am not getting through to you when I say, ‘Enough, headman, let it be!
“Surely, Master Ananda, such being the case, the situation is terminable, not interminable.
“Surely, spirit, you understand me, And you have compassion for me.
“Surely, Susı̄ma, you have committed a transgression in that you were so foolish, so confused, so inept that you went forth as a thief of the Dhamma in such a well-expounded Dhamma and Discipline as this.
“Surely, venerable sir, that must have been one who looked like Sakka, lord of the devas; for Sakka, lord of the devas, is difficult to see.”
“Suriya has gone for refuge
“Take a sitting cloth, Ananda.
“That being was a corrupt magistrate in this same Rajagaha....”  
“That being was a deer hunter in this same Rajagaha….”
“That being was a hog butcher in this same Rajagaha….”
“That being was a horse trainer in this same Rajagaha….”
“That being was a poultry butcher in this same Rajagaha….”
“That being was a sheep butcher in this same Rajagaha….” 
“That being was a slanderer in this same Rajagaha....” 
“That being was a torturer in this same Rajagaha....” 
“That being was an adulterer in this same Rajagaha....” 
“That being was an executioner named Harika in this same Rajagaha….”
“That being, bhikkhus, used to be a cattle butcher in this same Rajagaha.
“That being, bhikkhus, was a cattle butcher in this same Rajagaha....” 
“That being, bhikkhus, was a hostile brahmin in this same Rajagaha.
“That bhikkhu had been an evil bhikkhu in the Buddha Kassapa’s Dispensation....” 
“That bhikkhu is of great spiritual power and might.
“That bhikkhu is of great spiritual power and might.
“That bhikkhunı̄ had been an evil bhikkhunı̄ in the Buddha Kassapa’s Dispensation….”
“That Blessed One, dear sir, is still more powerful and mighty than both you and You should go, dear sir, to attend upon that Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.”
“That bond, the wise say, is not strong
“That deed is not well performed
“That feeling by which one describing the Tathagata might describe him … That perception by which one describing the Tathagata might describe him...
“That foolish, incompetent, unskilful bhikkhu does not gain pleasant dwellings in this very life, nor does he gain mindfulness and clear comprehension.
“That foolish, incompetent, unskilful cook does not gain clothing, wages, and bonuses.
“That foolish, incompetent, unskilful cook does not pick up the sign of his own master’s preference: ‘Today this curry pleased my master, or he reached for this one, or he took a lot of this one, or he spoke in praise of this one; or the sour curry pleased my master today, or he reached for the sour one, or he took a lot of the sour one, or he spoke in praise of the sour one; or the bitter curry … or the pungent curry … or the sweet curry … or the sharp curry … or the mild curry … or the salty curry … or the bland curry pleased my master … or he spoke in praise of the bland one.’
“That is a way of dwelling alone, Elder, I do not deny this.
“That is easy, Master Bharadvaja, for those bhikkhus who are developed in body, developed in virtue, developed in mind, developed in wisdom.
“That is hard to concentrate, Blessed One, namely, the mind.”
“That is hard to gain, Blessed One, namely, contentment.”
“That is kindly said, householder.”
“That is kindly said, householder.”
“That is mindfulness of breathing, Ariṭṭha, I do not say that it is not.
“That is no council where the good are absent;
“That is not an ascetic; that is a sham ascetic.
“That is so, householder.”
“That noble truth of suffering, bhikkhus, has been understood and penetrated.
“That novice nun had been an evil novice nun in the Buddha Kassapa’s Dispensation.
“That of which they say ‘It’s mine,’
“That of which they say ‘It’s mine,’
“That old jackal is afflicted with a disease called mange.
“That old jackal is afflicted with a disease called mange.
“That state so hard to achieve
“That steadfast man was resolute, A meditator always rejoicing in meditation, Applying himself day and night
“That the Blessed One is able to go to the brahma world by spiritual power with a mind-made body, and that he recalls having gone to the brahma world by spiritual power with this body composed of the four great elements: that is wonderful and amazing, venerable sir, on the part of the Blessed One.”
“That was because park devatas, grove devatas, tree devatas, and devatas dwelling in medicinal herbs and forest giants assembled and said to me: ‘Make a wish, householder, thus: “May I become a wheel-turning monarch in the future!”’ And I said to them: ‘That too is impermanent; that too is unstable; one must abandon that too and pass on.’”
“That was not a brahmin, bhikkhus.
“That was not the earth splitting open, Samiddhi.
“That which does not quake or blaze, That to which worldlings do not resort, Where there is no place for Mara:
“That which is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, and ranged over by the mind: is that permanent or impermanent?”
“That which is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, and ranged over by the mind: is that permanent or impermanent?”
“That which the miser fears when he does not give
“That which they speak of is not mine, I’m not one of those who speak.
“That which they speak of is not mine, I’m not one of those who speak.
“That wise, competent, skilful bhikkhu gains pleasant dwellings in this very life, and he gains mindfulness and clear comprehension.
“That wise, competent, skilful cook gains clothing, wages, and bonuses.
“That wise, competent, skilful cook picks up the sign of his own master’s preference: ‘Today this curry pleased my master … or he spoke in praise of the bland one.’
“That woman was a fortune-teller in this same Rajagaha....” 
“That woman was an adulteress in this same Rajagaha....” 
“That woman was the chief queen of the king of Kaliṅga.
“That would be good, friend.”
“That, bhikkhus, is Mara the Evil One searching for the consciousness of the clansman Vakkali, wondering: ‘Where now has the consciousness of the clansman Vakkali been established?’
“That, bhikkhus, is what the wise in the world agree upon as existing, of which I too say that it exists.
“That, bhikkhus, is what the wise in the world agree upon as not existing, of which I too say that it does not exist.
“That, madam, was because you put on your sandals, sat down on a high seat, covered your head, and told him: ‘Preach the Dhamma, ascetic.’
“That, Tissa, is because you admonish others but cannot bear being admonished yourself.
“That’s enough, friend Mahaka.
“That’s enough, Venerable Mahaka.
“That’s the method there,” the Blessed One said.
“The adepts’ knowledge has arisen in them:
“The Arahant, the Fortunate One in the world, Is not easily drawn by means of lust.
“The Arahant, the Fortunate One in the world, The Sage, is afflicted with winds.
“The Arahants, the Perfectly Enlightened Ones, who arose in the past also had just such a supreme pair of disciples as I had in Sariputta and Moggallana.
“The ascetic life is hard to practise
“The bad do not emulate the good, Who give what is hard to give
“The beautiful chariots of kings wear out, This body too undergoes decay.
“The bhikkhu strikes me as a dolt
“The bhikkhu, friend, who is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached his own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, one completely liberated through final knowledge, usually dwells with a mind well established in these four establishments of mindfulness.”
“The bhikkhus of the Saṅgha, friends, are healthy and robust.”
“The bhikkhus there are concentrated;
“The Blessed One has revealed the bhikkhu but not the instruction to the bhikkhu.” 
“The Blessed One laid down this rule for three reasons, Venerable Kassapa: for restraining ill-behaved persons and for the comfort of well-behaved bhikkhus, ‘May those of evil wishes, by forming a faction, not create a schism in the Saṅgha!’; and out of sympathy towards families.
“The Blessed One, friend, has declared: ‘This is suffering,’ and ‘This is the origin of suffering,’ and ‘This is the cessation of suffering,’ and ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“The Blessed One, friend, has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death.’” 
“The Blessed One, friend, has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’”
“The Blessed One, friend, has not declared this: ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.’”
“The Blessed One, friend, has not declared this: ‘The Tathagata exists after death.’”
“The Blessed One, friends, is healthy and robust.” 
“The Buddha has taught the Dhamma, The transcendence of birth;
“The Buddha is the best of bipeds, A steed, the best of quadrupeds;
“The Buddhas of the past, The future Buddhas, And he who is the Buddha now, Removing the sorrow of many—
“The cessation of identity
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of craving for forms … of craving for mental phenomena is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of eye-consciousness … of mind-consciousness is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.” 
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of eye-contact … of mind-contact is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of feeling born of eye-contact … of feeling born of mind-contact is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of form … of consciousness is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of form … of consciousness is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of forms … of mental phenomena is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of perception of forms … of perception of mental phenomena is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of the earth element … of the consciousness element is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of the earth element … the air element is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of the eye … the mind is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of the eye … the mind is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The cessation, subsiding, and passing away of volition regarding forms … of volition regarding mental phenomena is the cessation of suffering, the subsiding of disease, the passing away of aging-and-death.”
“The chariot’s ornament is virtue, Its axle jhana, energy its wheels;
“The conversation I had with those youths was like this:
“The cows will go back of their own accord, venerable sir, out of attachment to the calves.”
“The days and nights do not fly by, Life does not come to a stop.
“The days and nights go flying by, Life comes to a stop.
“The desire, lust, delight, craving, engagement and clinging, mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies regarding feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness: this is called the conduit to existence.
“The destruction of lust, the destruction of hatred, the destruction of delusion: this is called the Deathless.
“The destruction of lust, the destruction of hatred, the destruction of delusion: this, friend, is called arahantship.”
“The destruction of lust, the destruction of hatred, the destruction of delusion: this, friend, is called Nibbana.” 
“The Dhamma is a lake with fords of virtue—
“The Dhamma, brahmin, is a lake with fords of virtue—
“The ear becomes manifest to him as it really is … The mind becomes manifest to him as it really is … Whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … becomes manifest to him as it really is—as impermanent.
“The ear is burning … … The mind is burning … and whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant—that too is burning.
“The ear is impermanent … The mind is impermanent … Whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … that too is impermanent; you should abandon desire for it.
“The ear is impermanent … The nose is impermanent … The tongue is impermanent … The body is impermanent … The mind is impermanent, both of the past and the future, not to speak of the present.
“The ear is impermanent….
“The ear is impermanent….
“The ear is nonself….
“The ear is nonself….
“The ear is not yours … … The mind is not yours … Whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … that too is not yours: abandon it.
“The ear is suffering….
“The ear is suffering….
“The ear is to be abandoned through direct knowledge and full understanding … The mind is to be abandoned through direct knowledge and full understanding, mental phenomena are to be so abandoned, mind-consciousness is to be so abandoned, mind-contact is to be so abandoned, and whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant—that too is to be abandoned through direct knowledge and full understanding.
“The ear is to be abandoned … The mind is to be abandoned, mental phenomena are to be abandoned, mind-consciousness is to be abandoned, mind-contact is to be abandoned, and whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant—that too is to be abandoned.
“The ear is weighed down … The mind is weighed down … Weighed down by what?
“The ear … The mind is impermanent … Whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … that too is impermanent; you should abandon desire for it.
“The ear … The tongue … The body … The mind … Whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … that too is subject to birth.
“The ear, bhikkhus, is the ocean for a person….
“The eye and forms and eye-consciousness and things to be cognized by eye-consciousness.
“The eye is mine, ascetic, forms are mine, eye-contact and its base of consciousness are mine.
“The eye is yours, Evil One, forms are yours, eye-contact and its base of consciousness are yours; but, Evil One, where there is no eye, no forms, no eye-contact and its base of consciousness—there is no place for you there, Evil One.
“The eye, bhikkhus, as a base for contact—if untamed, unguarded, unprotected, unrestrained—is a bringer of suffering.
“The eye, bhikkhus, as a base for contact—if well tamed, well guarded, well protected, well restrained—is a bringer of happiness.
“The eye, bhikkhus, is the ocean for a person; its current consists of forms.
“The faithful seeker of the household life
“The five aggregates are truly burdens, The burden-carrier is the person.
“The five faculties remain right there, bhikkhus, but in regard to them the instructed noble disciple abandons ignorance and arouses true knowledge.
“The fool thinks fortune is on his side
“The fool thinks victory is won
“The form element, householder, is the home of consciousness; one whose consciousness is shackled by lust for the form element is called one who roams about in a home.
“The fostering of conceit is never good
“The four establishments of mindfulness, Kuṇḍaliya, when developed and cultivated, fulfil the seven factors of enlightenment.”
“The four great elements, bhikkhu, are the cause and condition for the manifestation of the form aggregate.
“The four practising the way
“The great heroes roar their lion’s roar
“The great seers of right conduct
“The heap of bones one person leaves behind
“The horse sacrifice, human sacrifice, Sammapasa, vajapeyya, niraggaḷa:
“The householder Anathapiṇḍika, venerable sir, has been exhorted by the Venerable Sariputta with such and such an exhortation.”
“The instructed noble disciple, bhikkhu, who is a seer of the noble ones … does not regard form as self … or self as in consciousness.
“The jackal had also seen the tortoise in the distance searching for food, so he approached and waited close by, thinking, ‘When this tortoise extends one or another of its limbs or its neck, I will grab it right on the spot, pull it out, and eat it.’
“The khattiya is the best among people
“The khattiya is the best among people
“The khattiya is the best of bipeds, The ox, the best of quadrupeds;
“The killer begets a killer, One who conquers, a conqueror.
“The king and his retinue understand the ascetic Gotama to be an arahant, yet Master Gotama still gets angry.” 
“The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’”
“The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’”
“The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’”
“The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’”
“The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’”
“The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’”
“The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’”
“The knowledge and vision arose in me: ‘Unshakable is my liberation of mind; this is my last birth; now there is no more renewed existence.’” 
“The knowledge: ‘Birth has existence as its condition.’… The knowledge: ‘Volitional formations have ignorance as their condition.’
“The life span here is short, not long, Though you, Baka, imagine it is long.
“The life span in the Paduma hell is long, bhikkhu.
“The light element, the beauty element, the base of the infinity of space element, the base of the infinity of consciousness element, and the base of nothingness element: these elements are to be attained as attainments with perception.
“The light-maker, having pierced right through, Saw the transcendence of all stations;
“The meeting, the encounter, the concurrence of these three things is called eye-contact.
“The meeting, the encounter, the concurrence of these three things is called mind-contact.
“The mind is wanton, Master Bharadvaja.
“The mind, brahmin, takes recourse in mindfulness.”
“The more than fifty male lay followers who have died in Ñatika had, with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters, become of spontaneous birth, due to attain Nibbana there without returning from that world.
“The newly ordained bhikkhus, emulating the elder bhikkhus, dress in the morning and, taking bowl and robe, enter a village or town for alms.
“The Noble Eightfold Path, bhikkhus, is to be developed for the full understanding of these three feelings.
“The Noble Eightfold Path, Uttiya, is to be developed for the abandoning of these five cords of sensual pleasure.
“The noble ones have seen as happiness
“The ocean is the best body of water, The moon, the best of nocturnal lights, But in this world together with its devas
“The old merit of that financier householder has been utterly exhausted, and he had not accumulated any fresh merit.
“The one of broad wisdom has indeed found
“The one who gives a residence
“The path is impassable and uneven, Blessed One.” 
“The person, O king, who is poor, Endowed with faith, generous, One who gives, with best intentions, A person with unscattered mind
“The person, O king, who is poor, Lacking in faith, stingy, Niggardly, with bad intentions, Wrong in views, disrespectful, Who abuses and reviles ascetics, Brahmins, and other mendicants;
“The person, O king, who is rich, Endowed with faith, generous, One who gives, with best intentions, A person with unscattered mind
“The person, O king, who is rich, Lacking in faith, stingy, Niggardly, with bad intentions, Wrong in views, disrespectful, Who abuses and reviles ascetics, Brahmins, and other mendicants;
“The physical form of mortals decays, Their name and clan does not decay.
“The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on consciousness: this is the gratification in consciousness.
“The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on feeling: this is the gratification in feeling.
“The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on feeling: this is the gratification in feeling.
“The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on form: this is the gratification in form.
“The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on perception: this is the gratification in perception.
“The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on volitional formations: this is the gratification in volitional formations.
“The pleasure and joy, bhikkhu, that arise in dependence on form: this is the gratification in form.
“The purpose of dispassion is liberation.”
“The purpose of liberation is Nibbana.” 
“The purpose of revulsion is dispassion.”
“The purpose of seeing rightly, Radha, is revulsion.”
“The sacrificer should invoke this one:
“The secure speech which the Buddha utters
“The seer has crossed over the abyss
“The seer of the destruction of birth, Compassionate, knows the one-way path
“The sense of shame is its leaning board, Mindfulness its upholstery;
“The seven factors of enlightenment, Kuṇḍaliya, when developed and cultivated, fulfil true knowledge and liberation.”
“The son to whom she gives birth
“The sun shines by day, The moon glows at night, The khattiya shines clad in armour, The meditative brahmin shines.
“The Tathagata, bhikkhus, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, is the originator of the path unarisen before, the producer of the path unproduced before, the declarer of the path undeclared before.
“The Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, liberated by nonclinging through revulsion towards feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, through its fading away and cessation, is called a Perfectly Enlightened One.
“The Tathagata, the Enlightened One, Full of compassion for all beings:
“The Tathagatas, Ananda, are wonderful and possess wonderful qualities; the Tathagatas are amazing and possess amazing qualities.
“The three kinds of good conduct, Kuṇḍaliya, when developed and cultivated, fulfil the four establishments of mindfulness.”
“The tie-surmounter, death-forsaker, without acquisitions, Has abandoned suffering for no renewed existence.
“The true Dhamma does not disappear all at once in the way a ship sinks.
“The unlearned come together and unite with the unlearned, the muddle-minded with the muddle-minded, the unwise with the unwise.
“The wise one, all-conqueror, all-knower, Among all things unsullied, with all cast off, Liberated in the destruction of craving:
“The wise person should offer this, A sacrifice bringing great fruit.
“The wise person who is diligent
“The wise person who is diligent
“The world is afflicted with death, Enveloped by old age;
“The world is ensnared by craving;
“The world is held in bondage by delight;
“The world is led around by craving;
“The world is led around by mind;
“The world is shut in by death;
“The world is tightly fettered by delight;
“The world’s end can never be reached
“Their job, venerable sir, is to arrest thieves for the Koliyans and to carry the Koliyans’ messages.”
“Their young offspring, emulating those great bull elephants, would plunge into the lake and pull up lotus stalks with their trunks, but without washing them thoroughly, without chewing them, they would swallow them along with the mud.
“Then a brahmin youth would arrive...
“Then a brahmin youth would arrive...
“Then a disciple has full confidence in that teacher.
“Then ask what you want, Kassapa.”
“Then exhort us too, householder.”
“Then express your inspiration, Candanaṅgalika,” the Blessed One said.
“Then express your inspiration, friend Vaṅgisa.”
“Then express your inspiration, Vaṅgisa.”
“Then express your inspiration, Vaṅgisa.”
“Then express your inspiration, Vaṅgisa.”
“Then express your inspiration, Vaṅgisa.”
“Then he would approach that householder or householder’s son and say to him: ‘I would serve you, sir.’
“Then if you have never known me to teach the Dhamma thus, what do you senseless men know and see that, having gone forth in such a well-expounded Dhamma and Discipline, you compete with each other in regard to your learning, as to who can speak more, who can speak better, who can speak longer?”
“Then if you have nothing for which to reproach yourself in regard to virtue, Assaji, why are you troubled by remorse and regret?”
“Then in the end one leaves the body
“Then is it possible to give a simile, venerable sir?”
“Then is it possible to give a simile, venerable sir?”
“Then is it possible to give a simile, venerable sir?” 
“Then is it that Master Gotama does not know and see pleasure and pain?”
“Then is it that Master Gotama does not know and see suffering?”
“Then knowing and seeing thus, do you venerable ones dwell in those peaceful deliverances that transcend forms, the formless attainments, having touched them with the body?” 
“Then knowing and seeing thus, do you venerable ones recollect your manifold past abodes, that is, one birth, two births, three births, four births, five births, ten births, twenty births, thirty births, forty births, fifty births, a hundred births, a thousand births, a hundred thousand births, many aeons of world-contraction, many aeons of world-expansion, many aeons of world-contraction and expansion thus: ‘There I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life span; passing away from there, I was reborn elsewhere, and there too I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life span; passing away from there, I was reborn here’?
“Then knowing and seeing thus, do you venerable ones understand the minds of other beings and persons, having encompassed them with your own minds?
“Then knowing and seeing thus, do you venerable ones wield the various kinds of spiritual power, such that: having been one, you become many; having been many, you become one; you appear and vanish; you go unhindered through a wall, through a rampart, through a mountain as though through space; you dive in and out of the earth as though it were water; you walk on water without sinking as though it were earth; seated cross-legged, you travel in space like a bird; with your hand you touch and stroke the moon and sun so powerful and mighty; you exercise mastery with the body as far as the brahma world?”
“Then knowing and seeing thus, do you venerable ones, with the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, hear both kinds of sounds, the divine and human, those that are far as well as near?”
“Then knowing and seeing thus, do you venerable ones, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, see beings passing away and being reborn, inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and understand how beings fare on in accordance with their kamma thus: ‘These beings who engaged in misconduct of body, speech, and mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong view, and undertook actions based on wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell; but these beings who engaged in good conduct of body, speech, and mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right view, and undertook action based on right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world’?
“Then knowing and seeing thus, Susı̄ma, do you dwell in those peaceful deliverances that transcend forms, the formless attainments, having touched them with the body?”
“Then knowing and seeing thus, Susı̄ma, do you recollect your manifold past abodes with their modes and details?”
“Then knowing and seeing thus, Susı̄ma, do you understand the minds of other beings and persons, having encompassed them with your own mind?”
“Then knowing and seeing thus, Susı̄ma, do you, with the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, hear both kinds of sounds, the divine and human, those that are far as well as near?” 
“Then knowing and seeing thus, Susı̄ma, do you, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, see beings passing away and being reborn and understand how beings fare on in accordance with their kamma?”
“Then let Master Isidatta delight in the delightful Wild Mango Grove at Macchikasaṇḍa.
“Then let the Venerable Narada get to answer that series of questions.
“Then listen and attend closely, Ananda, I will speak.”
“Then listen and attend closely, Ananda.
“Then listen and attend closely, bhikkhus, I will speak.”
“Then listen and attend closely, bhikkhus, I will speak.”
“Then listen and attend closely, bhikkhus, I will speak.”
“Then listen and attend closely, bhikkhus, I will speak.”
“Then listen and attend closely, bhikkhus, I will speak.”
“Then listen and attend closely, bhikkhus, I will speak.”
“Then listen and attend closely, friends, I will speak.”
“Then listen and attend closely, householder, I will speak.”
“Then listen, bhikkhus….
“Then listen, friends, and attend closely to what I shall say.”
“Then surely that venerable did not find solace in this Dhamma and Discipline.”
“Then take leave of Sariputta, bhikkhus.
“Then that man, dissatisfied with the other’s answer, might approach another man who had seen a kịsuka tree and ask him: ‘Sir, what is a kịsuka tree like?’
“Then that man, dissatisfied with the other’s answer, might approach still another man who had seen a kịka tree and ask him:’Sir, what is a kịsuka tree like?’
“Then that man, dissatisfied with the other’s answer, might approach still another man who had seen a kịsuka tree and ask him: ‘Sir, what is a kịsuka tree like?’
“Then the hawk, confident of her own strength, not boasting of her own strength, folded up both her wings and suddenly swooped down on the quail.
“Then the hawk, confident of her own strength, not boasting of her own strength, released the quail, saying: ‘Go now, quail, but even there you won’t escape me.’
“Then the man would collect grass, twigs, branches, and foliage, and bind them together into a raft, so that by means of that raft, making an effort with his hands and feet, he would get safely across to the far shore.
“Then the man would think: ‘There is this great expanse of water whose near shore is dangerous and fearful, and whose further shore is safe and free from danger, but there is no ferryboat or bridge for crossing over.
“Then the Venerable Musı̄la is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed.”
“Then the Venerable Narada is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed.” 
“Then there was terror, Then there was trepidation, When the one perfect in all excellent qualities, The Buddha, attained final Nibbana.”
“Then those caught in the sixty, Led by their own thoughts—
“Then those devas with long life spans, Beautiful, ablaze with glory, Are struck with fear, filled with terror, Like beasts who hear the lion’s roar.
“Then Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, said to Sakka, lord of the devas: ‘Speak a verse, lord of the devas.’
“Then wait a moment, venerable sir, while I consider its meaning.”
“Then was it, headman, because of seeing her or hearing about her that this desire, attachment, and affection arose in you?”
“Then why is it, venerable sir, that the Blessed One teaches the Dhamma thoroughly to some, yet not so thoroughly to others?” 
“Then why, friend Ananda, are you wandering about with these young bhikkhus who are unguarded in their sense faculties, immoderate in eating, and not devoted to wakefulness?
“Then why, venerable sir, is the Blessed One wandering on tour with a large Saṅgha of bhikkhus at a time of famine, a time of scarcity, when crops are blighted and have turned to straw?
“Then, Ananda, I have also taught the successive cessation of formations …....
“Then, ascetic, do you eat facing the intermediate directions?”
“Then, ascetic, do you eat facing the quarters?” 
“Then, ascetic, do you eat facing upwards?”
“Then, ascetic, do you neither delight nor sorrow?”
“Then, ascetic, do you sorrow?”
“Then, bhikkhu, I have also taught the successive cessation of formations.
“Then, bhikkhu, I have also taught the successive subsiding of formations.
“Then, bhikkhu, if you have nothing for which to reproach yourself in regard to virtue, why are you troubled by remorse and regret?”
“Then, bhikkhus, afraid of the four vipers of fierce heat and deadly venom, and of the five murderous enemies, and of the sixth murderer, the intimate companion with drawn sword, that man would flee in one direction or another.
“Then, bhikkhus, afraid of the four vipers of fierce heat and deadly venom, and of the five murderous enemies, and of the sixth murderer—the intimate companion with drawn sword—and of the village-attacking dacoits, that man would flee in one direction or another.
“Then, bhikkhus, afraid of the four vipers of fierce heat and deadly venom, and of the five murderous enemies, that man would flee in one direction or another.
“Then, bhikkhus, afraid of the four vipers of fierce heat and deadly venom, that man would flee in one direction or another.
“Then, bhikkhus, Brahma Sahampati, having known with his own mind the reflection in my mind, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, disappeared from the brahma world and reappeared before me.
“Then, bhikkhus, having put a curse on Sambara, lord of the asuras, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, those seers who were virtuous and of good character disappeared from the presence of Sambara and reappeared in their leaf huts on the shore of the ocean.
“Then, bhikkhus, having sat down on his own seat, instructing the Tavatiṁsa devas, Sakka, lord of the devas, on that occasion recited these verses:
“Then, bhikkhus, having stirred up a sense of urgency in Brahma and in Brahma’s retinue and in Brahma’s assembly, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, the Blessed One Sikhi, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, and the bhikkhu Abhibhū disappeared from that brahma world and reappeared in the capital Aruṇavati.
“Then, bhikkhus, if the wanderers of other sects ask you: ‘But, friends, is there a path, is there a way for attaining final Nibbana without clinging?’—being asked thus, you should answer them thus: ‘There is a path, friends, there is a way for attaining final Nibbana without clinging.’
“Then, bhikkhus, if the wanderers of other sects ask you: ‘But, friends, is there a path, is there a way for the fading away of lust?’—being asked thus, you should answer them thus: ‘There is a path, friends, there is a way for the fading away of lust.’
“Then, bhikkhus, instructing the Tavatiṁsa devas, Sakka, lord of the devas, on that occasion recited these verses:
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘I have discovered this path to enlightenment, that is, with the cessation of name-and-form comes cessation of consciousness; with the cessation of consciousness comes cessation of name-and-form; with the cessation of name-and-form, cessation of the six sense bases; with the cessation of the six sense bases, cessation of contact….
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on form: this is the gratification in form.
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on the earth element: this is the gratification in the earth element.
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on the eye: this is the gratification in the eye.
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘There are these three feelings …...
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what does not exist does aging-and-death not come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what does not exist does aging-and-death not come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what does not exist does birth not come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists do the six sense bases come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists do volitional formations come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does aging-and-death come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does birth come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does birth come to be?… existence?… clinging?… craving?… feeling?… contact?… the six sense bases?… name-and-form?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does clinging come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does consciousness come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does contact come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does craving come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does existence come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does feeling come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to me: ‘When what exists does name-and-form come to be?
“Then, bhikkhus, it occurred to the asuras: ‘Now Sakka’s chariot with its team of a thousand thoroughbreds has turned back.
“Then, bhikkhus, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, so the Blessed One Sikhi, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, and the bhikkhu Abhibhū disappeared from the capital Aruṇavati and reappeared in that brahma world.
“Then, bhikkhus, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his drawn-in arm or draw in his extended arm, those seers who were virtuous and of good character disappeared from their leaf huts along the shore of the ocean and reappeared in the presence of Sambara, lord of the asuras.
“Then, bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, addressed the Tavatiṁsa devas thus: ‘Dear sirs, do not find fault with this young deva.
“Then, bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, approached that anger-eating yakkha.
“Then, bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, descending from the Vejayanta Palace, raised his joined hands in reverential salutation and worshipped the Blessed One.
“Then, bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, descending from the Vejayanta Palace, raised his joined hands in reverential salutation and worshipped the Saṅgha of bhikkhus.
“Then, bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, descending from the Vejayanta Palace, raised his joined hands in reverential salutation, and worshipped the different quarters.
“Then, bhikkhus, the bhikkhu Abhibhū said to the Blessed One Sikhi, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One: ‘I recall, venerable sir, having made such a statement as this in the midst of the Bhikkhu Saṅgha: “Friends, while standing in the brahma world I can make my voice heard throughout the thousandfold world system.’” - ‘Now is the time for that, brahmin!
“Then, bhikkhus, the Blessed One Sikhi addressed the bhikkhu Abhibhū thus: ‘Brahmin, Brahma and Brahma’s retinue and Brahma’s assembly deplore this, saying, “It is wonderful indeed, sir!
“Then, bhikkhus, the devas and the asuras appointed a panel of judges, saying: ‘These will ascertain what has been well spoken and badly spoken by us.’
“Then, bhikkhus, the husband and wife would kill their only son, dear and beloved, prepare dried and spiced meat, and by eating their son’s flesh they would cross the rest of the desert.
“Then, bhikkhus, the quail went to a freshly ploughed field covered with clods of soil.
“Then, bhikkhus, the Tavatiṁsa devas approached Sakka and said to him: ‘Here, dear sir, an ugly deformed yakkha has sat down on your seat….
“Then, bhikkhus, those seers addressed Sakka in verse:
“Then, bhikkhus, Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, addressed Sakka, lord of the devas, in verse:
“Then, bhikkhus, Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, asked the asuras: ‘May I teach the Sambari magic to Sakka, lord of the devas?’ - ‘Do not teach him the Sambari magic, dear sir.’ 
“Then, bhikkhus, Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, having known with his own mind the reflection in Sakka’s mind, approached Sakka, lord of the devas.
“Then, bhikkhus, when those devas who are long-lived, beautiful, abounding in happiness, dwelling for a long time in lofty palaces, hear the Tathagata’s teaching of the Dhamma, they are for the most part filled with fear, a sense of urgency, and terror,: ‘It seems, sir, that we are impermanent, though we thought ourselves permanent; it seems, sir, that we are unstable, though we thought ourselves stable; it seems, sir, that we are noneternal, though we thought ourselves eternal.
“Then, engaging further in inward exploration, he explores thus: ‘What is the source of this acquisition, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?
“Then, engaging further in inward exploration, he explores thus: ‘When this craving arises, where does it arise?
“Then, friend, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?”
“Then, friend, does the Tathagata not exist after death?”
“Then, friend, the Blessed One descended from the road and went to the foot of a tree.
“Then, friends, by completely transcending the base of nothingness, I entered and dwelt in the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception.
“Then, friends, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing,’ I entered and dwelt in the base of nothingness.
“Then, friends, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite,’ I entered and dwelt in the base of the infinity of consciousness.
“Then, friends, by nonattention to all signs, I entered and dwelt in the signless concentration of mind.
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, by completely transcending the base of nothingness, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception.
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of consciousness, aware that “there is nothing,” a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of nothingness.
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of space, aware that “consciousness is infinite,” a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of consciousness.
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, by nonattention to all signs, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the signless concentration of mind.
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and displeasure, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the fourth jhana, which is neither painful nor pleasant and includes the purification of mindfulness by equanimity.
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, with the complete transcendence of perceptions of forms, with the passing away of perceptions of sensory impingement, with nonattention to perceptions of diversity, aware that “space is infinite,” a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the base of the infinity of space.
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, with the fading away as well of rapture, a bhikkhu dwells equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, he experiences happiness with the body; he enters and dwells in the third jhana of which the noble ones declare: “He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily.”
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, with the subsiding of thought and examination, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the second jhana, which has internal confidence and unification of mind, is without thought and examination, and has rapture and happiness born of concentration.
“Then, friends, it occurred to me: ‘Here, with the subsiding of thought and examination, a bhikkhu enters and dwells in the second jhana, which has internal confidence and unification of mind, is without thought and examination, and has rapture and happiness born of concentration.
“Then, friends, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I entered and dwelt in the first jhana….
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent regarding noble silence, brahmin.
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent, brahmin, regarding the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception.
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent, brahmin, regarding the base of nothingness.
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent, brahmin, regarding the base of the infinity of consciousness.
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent, brahmin, regarding the base of the infinity of space.
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent, brahmin, regarding the first jhana.
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent, brahmin, regarding the fourth jhana.
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent, brahmin, regarding the second jhana.
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent, brahmin, regarding the signless concentration of mind.
“Then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by means of spiritual power and said this: ‘Moggallana, Moggallana, do not be negligent, brahmin, regarding the third jhana.
“Then, friends, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain...
“Then, friends, with the complete transcendence of perceptions of forms...
“Then, friends, with the fading away as well of rapture...
“Then, friends, with the subsiding of thought and examination, I entered and dwelt in the second jhana, which … has rapture and happiness born of concentration.
“Then, friends, with the subsiding of thought and examination, I entered and dwelt in the second jhana….
“Then, great king, do you have an accountant or calculator or mathematician who can count the water in the great ocean thus: ‘There are so many gallons of water,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of gallons of water,’ or ‘There are so many thousands of gallons of water,’ or ‘There are so many hundreds of thousands of gallons of water’?”
“Then, great king, you may go at your own convenience.”
“Then, having given me this exhortation, the Blessed One rose from his seat and departed.
“Then, headman, just like that field that is inferior— rough, salty, with bad ground—are the ascetics, brahmins, and wanderers of other sects to me.
“Then, headman, just like the field of middling quality are the male and female lay followers to me.
“Then, headman, just like the waterpot that has cracks, which lets water seep through and escape, are the ascetics, brahmins, and wanderers of other sects to me.
“Then, headman, just like the waterpot that is without cracks, but which lets water seep through and escape, are the male and female lay followers to me.
“Then, headman, some ascetic of rough life has gone forth out of faith….
“Then, headman, some ascetic of rough life has gone forth out of faith….
“Then, headman, someone here is seen garlanded and adorned, freshly bathed and groomed, with hair and beard trimmed, enjoying sensual pleasures with women as if he were a king.
“Then, headman, someone here is seen garlanded and adorned, freshly bathed and groomed, with hair and beard trimmed, enjoying sensual pleasures with women as if he were a king.
“Then, headman, someone here is seen garlanded and adorned, freshly bathed and groomed, with hair and beard trimmed, enjoying sensual pleasures with women as if he were a king.
“Then, headman, someone here is seen with his arms tightly bound behind him with a strong rope, his head shaven, being led around from street to street, from square to square, to the ominous beating of a drum, and then taken out through the south gate and beheaded to the south of the city.
“Then, headman, someone here is seen with his arms tightly bound behind him with a strong rope, his head shaven, being led around from street to street, from square to square, to the ominous beating of a drum, and then taken out through the south gate and beheaded to the south of the city.
“Then, headman, someone here is seen with his arms tightly bound behind him with a strong rope, his head shaven, being led around from street to street, from square to square, to the ominous beating of a drum, and then taken out through the south gate and beheaded to the south of the city.
“Then, headman, someone here is with his arms tightly bound behind him with a strong rope, his head shaven, being led around from street to street, from square to square, to the ominous beating of a drum, and then taken out through the south gate and beheaded to the south of the city.
“Then, headman, someone here who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth both lawfully and unlawfully, both by violence and without violence.
“Then, headman, someone here who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth both lawfully and unlawfully, both by violence and without violence.
“Then, headman, someone here who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth both lawfully and unlawfully, both by violence and without violence.
“Then, headman, someone here who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth lawfully, without violence.
“Then, headman, someone here who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth lawfully, without violence.
“Then, headman, someone here who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth lawfully, without violence.
“Then, headman, someone here who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth lawfully, without violence.
“Then, headman, someone here who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth unlawfully, by violence.
“Then, headman, someone here who enjoys sensual pleasures seeks wealth unlawfully, by violence.
“Then, headman, that noble disciple—who is thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unconfused, clearly comprehending, ever mindful—dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion … with a mind imbued with altruistic joy … with a mind imbued with equanimity … … without ill will.
“Then, headman, that noble disciple—who is thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unconfused, clearly comprehending, ever mindful—dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion … … with a mind imbued with altruistic joy … with a mind imbued with equanimity, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
“Then, headman, that noble disciple—who is thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unconfused, clearly comprehending, ever mindful—dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with lovingkindness … without ill will.
“Then, headman, that noble disciple—who is thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unconfused, clearly comprehending, ever mindful—dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with lovingkindness … without ill will.
“Then, headman, that noble disciple—who is thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unconfused, clearly comprehending, ever mindful—dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with lovingkindness … … without ill will.
“Then, headman, that noble disciple—who is thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unconfused, clearly comprehending, ever mindful—dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with lovingkindness, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
“Then, headman, that noble disciple—who is thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unconfused, clearly comprehending, ever mindful—dwells pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with lovingkindness, likewise the second quarter, the third quarter, and the fourth quarter.
“Then, householder, spread your cloak upon the verandah and scatter a bundle of grass upon it.”
“Then, investigating further, he thoroughly investigates thus: ‘What is the source of this birth, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?… What is the source of this existence?… this clinging?… this craving?… this feeling?… this contact?… these six sense bases?… this name-and-form?… this consciousness?
“Then, Master Gotama, are pleasure and pain created by another?”
“Then, Master Gotama, does all not exist?”
“Then, Master Gotama, does all not exist?”
“Then, Master Gotama, has suffering arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another?” 
“Then, Master Gotama, have pleasure and pain arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another?”
“Then, Master Gotama, is all a plurality?” 
“Then, Master Gotama, is suffering created by another?”
“Then, Master Gotama, is the one who acts one, and the one who experiences another?”
“Then, Master Gotama, is there no self?”
“Then, Master Gotama, should I give this sacrificial cake to someone else?”
“Then, Master Moggallana, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?”
“Then, Master Moggallana, does the Tathagata not exist after death?”
“Then, Master Moggallana, is the soul one thing, the body another?”
“Then, Master Moggallana, is the world infinite?”
“Then, Master Moggallana, is the world not eternal?”
“Then, revered lady, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?”
“Then, revered lady, does the Tathagata not exist after death?”
“Then, Sariputta, have you encompassed with your mind my own mind—I being at present the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One—and known thus: ‘The Blessed One is of such virtue, or of such qualities, or of such wisdom, or of such dwellings, or of such liberation’?”
“Then, Sariputta, have you encompassed with your mind the minds of all the Arahants, the Perfectly Enlightened Ones, who will arise in the future and known thus: ‘Those Blessed Ones will be of such virtue, or of such qualities, or of such wisdom, or of such dwellings, or of such liberation’?” 
“Then, sir, we did not believe the plain truth asserted by those ascetics and brahmins who said, ‘The ascetic Gotama knows magic.’
“Then, Vakkali, if you have nothing for which to reproach yourself in regard to virtue, why are you troubled by remorse and regret?”
“Then, venerable sir, let the Blessed One enter Pañcasala a second time for alms.
“Then, venerable sir, my khattiya vassals came to me and said: ‘Your majesty gives gifts, the harem women give gifts, but we do not give gifts.
“Then, venerable sir, my men came to me and said: ‘Now your majesty is not giving gifts anywhere.’
“Then, venerable sir, my troops came to me … … So, venerable sir, I gave the third gate to the troops.
“Then, venerable sir, the brahmins and householders came to me … So, venerable sir, I gave the fourth gate to the brahmins and householders.
“Then, venerable sir, while I was staying in an empty hut following along with the surge and decline of the five aggregates subject to clinging, I directly knew as it really is: ‘This is suffering’; I directly knew as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; I directly knew as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; I directly knew as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
“Then, when a bhikkhu was a forest dweller and spoke in praise of forest dwelling … … when he was energetic and spoke in praise of arousing energy, the elder bhikkhus would invite him to a seat, saying: ‘Come, bhikkhu.
“There are among humans
“There are five hundred more trainees, And ten times a tenfold ten:
“There are five things, Kassapa, that lead to the longevity of the true Dhamma, to its nondecay and nondisappearance.
“There are four sources of light in the world;
“There are four sources of light in the world;
“There are four things, great king, that should not be despised and disparaged as ‘young.’
“There are many disagreeable sounds
“There are six fissures in the world
“There are sounds cognizable by the ear...
“There are such people, venerable sir.”
“There are such people, venerable sir.”
“There are Tavatiṁsa and Yama devas, And devatas of the Tusita realm, Devas who take delight in creating, And devas who exercise control.
“There are Tavatiṁsa and Yama devas, And devatas of the Tusita realm, Devas who take delight in creating, And devas who exercise control.
“There are, bhikkhu, these six kinds of tranquillization.
“There are, bhikkhu, these three feelings: pleasant feeling, painful feeling, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“There are, bhikkhu, what are called cool-cloud devas.
“There are, bhikkhu, what are called rain-cloud devas.
“There are, bhikkhu, what are called storm-cloud devas.
“There are, bhikkhu, what are called warm-cloud devas.
“There are, bhikkhu, what are called wind-cloud devas.
“There are, bhikkhus, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable … tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable … tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, bhikkhus, sounds cognizable by the ear...
“There are, bhikkhus, these seven factors of enlightenment, which are nonobstructions, nonhindrances, noncorruptions of the mind; when developed and cultivated they lead to the realization of the fruit of true knowledge and liberation.
“There are, bhikkhus, these three kinds of unwholesome thoughts: sensual thought, thought of ill will, thought of harming.
“There are, bhikkhus, these two views: the view of existence and the view of extermination.
“There are, bhikkhus, two kinds of wise people: one who sees a transgression as a transgression; and one who, when another is confessing a transgression, pardons him in accordance with the Dhamma.
“There are, friend, these four floods: the flood of sensuality, the flood of existence, the flood of views, the flood of ignorance.
“There are, friend, these four kinds of clinging: clinging to sensual pleasures, clinging to views, clinging to rules and vows, clinging to a doctrine of self.
“There are, friend, these three feelings: pleasant feeling, painful feeling, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“There are, friend, these three kinds of craving: craving for sensual pleasures, craving for existence, craving for extermination.
“There are, friend, these three kinds of existence: sense-sphere existence, form-sphere existence, formless-sphere existence.
“There are, friend, these three kinds of suffering: the suffering due to pain, the suffering due to formations, the suffering due to change.
“There are, friend, these three taints: the taint of sensuality, the taint of existence, the taint of ignorance.
“There are, friends, wise khattiyas, wise brahmins, wise householders, and wise ascetics who question a bhikkhu when he has gone abroad—for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘What does your teacher say, what does he teach?’
“There are, great king, three things in the world which, when they arise, arise for one’s harm, suffering, and discomfort.
“There are, great king, three things which, when they arise within a person, arise for his harm, suffering, and discomfort.
“There are, headman, eight causes and conditions for the destruction of families.
“There are, headman, some ascetics and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this: ‘Anyone at all who destroys life experiences pain and grief in this very life.
“There are, headman, these three kinds of ascetics of rough life existing in the world.
“There are, headman, these three kinds of wearing away that are directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.
“There are, headman, these three persons who enjoy sensual pleasures existing in the world.
“There are, headman, these two extremes which should not be cultivated by one who has gone forth into homelessness: the pursuit of sensual happiness in sensual pleasures, which is low, vulgar, the way of worldlings, ignoble, unbeneficial; and the pursuit of self-mortification, which is painful, ignoble, unbeneficial.
“There are, householder, three kinds of formations: the bodily formation, the verbal formation, and the mental formation.” “Good, venerable sir,” Citta the householder said.
“There are, lord of the devas, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, lord of the devas, forms cognizable by the eye...
“There are, lord of the devas, sounds cognizable by the ear...
“There are, Migajala, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, Migajala, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, Migajala, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, Migajala, forms cognizable by the eye that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, Migajala, sounds cognizable by the ear … odours cognizable by the nose … tastes cognizable by the tongue … tactile objects cognizable by the body … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, Migajala, sounds cognizable by the ear … odours cognizable by the nose … tastes cognizable by the tongue … tactile objects cognizable by the body … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, Migajala, sounds cognizable by the ear … odours cognizable by the nose … tastes cognizable by the tongue … tactile objects cognizable by the body … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, Migajala, sounds cognizable by the ear … odours cognizable by the nose … tastes cognizable by the tongue … tactile objects cognizable by the body … mental phenomena cognizable by the mind that are desirable, lovely, agreeable, pleasing, sensually enticing, tantalizing.
“There are, venerable sir, elephant battles head-anointed khattiya kings, who are intoxicated with the intoxication of sovereignty, who are obsessed by greed for sensual pleasures, who have attained stable control in their country, and who rule having conquered a great sphere of territory on earth; but there is no place for those elephant battles, no scope for them, when aging and death are rolling in.
“There can be, bhikkhu,” the Blessed One said.
“There comes a time, bhikkhus, when Sineru, the king of mountains, burns up and perishes and no longer exists, but still, I say, there is no making an end of suffering for those beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
“There comes a time, bhikkhus, when the great earth burns up and perishes and no longer exists, but still, I say, there is no making an end of suffering for those beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
“There comes a time, bhikkhus, when the great ocean dries up and evaporates and no longer exists, but still, I say, there is no making an end of suffering for those beings roaming and wandering on hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving.
“There could be, friend.
“There could be, friend.
“There could be, friend.
“There in seclusion he should seek delight, Having left behind sensual pleasures.
“There is a method of exposition by means of which a bhikkhu—apart from faith...
“There is a method of exposition, bhikkhus, by means of which the five faculties become the five powers and the five powers become the five faculties.
“There is a method, bhikkhus, by means of which a bhikkhu who is a trainee … might understand: ‘I am a trainee,’ while a bhikkhu who is one beyond training … might understand: ‘I am one beyond training.’
“There is a method, venerable sir, by which these things are different in meaning and also different in phrasing, and there is a method by which they are one in meaning and different only in phrasing.
“There is a path, brahmin, there is a way for the abandoning of this desire.”
“There is a path, friend, there is a way for the abandonment of this lust, hatred, and delusion.”
“There is a path, friend, there is a way for the full understanding of this identity.”
“There is a path, friend, there is a way for the realization of this arahantship.”
“There is a path, friend, there is a way for the realization of this Nibbana.” 
“There is a path, friend, there is a way … this Noble Eightfold Path….”
“There is a path, friend, there is a way … this Noble Eightfold Path….”
“There is a path, friend, there is a way … this Noble Eightfold Path….” 
“There is a path, friend, there is a way...
“There is a path, friend, there is a way...
“There is a path, friend, there is a way...
“There is a path, friend, there is a way...
“There is a path, friend, there is a way...
“There is a path, friend, there is a way...
“There is a path, friend, there is a way...
“There is a path, friend, there is a way...
“There is a snare moving in the sky, Something mental which moves about 
“There is an escape in the world
“There is no affection like that for a son, No wealth equal to cattle, There is no light like the sun, Among the waters the ocean is supreme.” 
“There is no affection like that for oneself, No wealth equal to grain, There is no light like wisdom, Among the waters the rain is supreme.”
“There is no deed of yours, Sariputta, either bodily or verbal, that I censure.
“There is no deed, Sariputta, bodily or verbal, of these five hundred bhikkhus that I censure.
“There is no escape in the world, So what will you do with seclusion?
“There is no eye, Phagguna, by means of which one describing the Buddhas of the past could describe them—those who have attained final Nibbana, cut through proliferation, cut through the rut, exhausted the round, and transcended all suffering.
“There is no one, great king, more dear to me than myself.
“There is no taming here for one fond of conceit, Nor is there sagehood for the unconcentrated:
“There is not even this much feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself.
“There is nothing in the woods I need to do;
“There is one thing, bhikkhu, through the abandoning of which ignorance is abandoned by a bhikkhu and true knowledge arises.”
“There is one thing, great king, which secures both kinds of good, the good pertaining to the present life and that pertaining to the future life.”
“There is, Ananda, one thing which, when developed and cultivated, fulfils four things; and four things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil seven things; and seven things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil two things.
“There is, Ananda, one thing which, when developed and cultivated, fulfils four things; and four things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil seven things; and seven things which, when developed and cultivated, fulfil two things.”
“There is, bhikkhu.”
“There is, bhikkhu.”
“There is, bhikkhu.”
“There is, bhikkhus, a world-phenomenon in the world to which the Tathagata has awakened and broken through.
“There is, headman, concentration of the Dhamma.
“There is, Mahali, a cause and condition for the defilement of beings; beings are defiled with cause and condition.
“There is, prince, a cause and condition for lack of knowledge and vision; lack of knowledge and vision is with cause and condition.
“There is, venerable sir, a clansman from Avanti named Isidatta, an unseen friend of ours, who has gone forth.
“There is, venerable sir, a country named Sunaparanta.
“There may be some gratitude and thankfulness in that old jackal, but there is no gratitude and thankfulness in a certain person here claiming to be a follower of the Sakyan son.
“There was a crow that walked around
“There was no more in-and-out breathing
“There was perplexity in me, Master Gotama, there was doubt: ‘How is the Dhamma of the ascetic Gotama to be understood?’”
“Therefore a person of wisdom here, Out of regard for his own good, Steadfast, should settle faith
“Therefore a person who is wise, Out of regard for his own good, 
“Therefore a person who is wise, Out of regard for his own good, Should always treat these properly:
“Therefore a person who is wise, Out of regard for his own good, Should carefully examine the Dhamma:
“Therefore be pliant here and strenuous;
“Therefore one desiring his own good, Aspiring for spiritual greatness, Should deeply revere the true Dhamma, Recollecting the Buddhas’ Teaching.” 
“Therefore one should do what is good
“Therefore one should do what is good
“Therefore one should do what is good
“Therefore the person of intelligence, Remembering the Buddha’s Teaching, Should be devoted to faith and virtue, To confidence and vision of the Dhamma.”
“Therefore the person of intelligence, Remembering the Buddha’s Teaching, Should be devoted to faith and virtue, To confidence and vision of the Dhamma.”
“Therefore their destination after death
“Therefore … Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’” 
“Therefore, Ananda, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, Ananda, any kind of form whatsoever, whether past, future, or present….
“Therefore, Ananda, dwell with yourselves as your own island, with yourselves as your own refuge, with no other refuge; dwell with the Dhamma as your island, with the Dhamma as your refuge, with no other refuge … … Those bhikkhus, Ananda, either now or after I am gone, who dwell with themselves as their own island, with themselves as their own refuge, with no other refuge; who dwell with the Dhamma as their island, with the Dhamma as their refuge, with no other refuge—it is these bhikkhus, Ananda, who will be for me topmost of those keen on the training.”
“Therefore, bhikkhu, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhu, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhu, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhu, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhu, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, an exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is suffering.’… An exertion should be made to understand: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’” 
“Therefore, bhikkhus, any kind of form whatsoever … Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all consciousness should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, any kind of form whatsoever … Any kind of feeling whatsoever … Any kind of perception whatsoever … Any kind of volitional formations whatsoever … Any kind of consciousness whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near—all consciousness should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, any kind of form whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all form should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, do not reflect about the world, thinking: ‘The world is eternal’ or ‘The world is not eternal’; or ‘The world is finite’ or ‘The world is infinite’; or ‘The soul and the body are the same’ or ‘The soul is one thing, the body is another’; or ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, do not stray outside your own resort into the domain of others.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, do not stray outside your own resort into the domain of others.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, dwell with yourselves as your own island, with yourselves as your own refuge, with no other refuge; dwell with the Dhamma as your island, with the Dhamma as your refuge, with no other refuge … … Those bhikkhus, either now or after I am gone, who dwell with themselves as their own island, with themselves as their own refuge, with no other refuge; with the Dhamma as their island, with the Dhamma as their refuge, with no other refuge—it is these bhikkhus who will be for me topmost of those keen on the training.”
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I dwell perceiving the repulsive in the unrepulsive,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I, by completely transcending the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception, enter and dwell in the cessation of perception and feeling,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I, by completely transcending the base of nothingness, enter and dwell in the base of neither-perception-nor-nonperception,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of consciousness, aware that “there is nothing,” enter and dwell in the base of nothingness,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I, by completely transcending the base of the infinity of space, aware that “consciousness is infinite,” enter and dwell in the base of the infinity of consciousness,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, enter and dwell in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I, with the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous passing away of joy and displeasure, enter and dwell in the fourth jhana, which is neither painful nor pleasant and includes the purification of mindfulness by equanimity,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I, with the complete transcendence of perceptions of forms, with the passing away of perceptions of sensory impingement, with nonattention to perceptions of diversity, aware that “space is infinite,” enter and dwell in the base of the infinity of space,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I, with the fading away as well of rapture, dwell equanimous and, mindful and clearly comprehending, may I experience happiness with the body; may I enter and dwell in the third jhana of which the noble ones declare: “He is equanimous, mindful, one who dwells happily,”’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May I, with the subsiding of thought and examination, enter and dwell in the second jhana, which has internal confidence and unification of mind, is without thought and examination, and has rapture and happiness born of concentration,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May neither my body nor my eyes become fatigued and may my mind, by not clinging, be liberated from the taints,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, if a bhikkhu wishes: ‘May the memories and intentions connected with the household life be abandoned by me,’ this same concentration by mindfulness of breathing should be closely attended to.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, in your case too your minds may often stray towards those five cords of sensual pleasure that have already left their impression on the heart but which have passed, ceased, and changed, or towards those that are present, or slightly towards those in the future.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, one should often reflect upon one’s own mind thus: ‘For a long time this mind has been defiled by lust, hatred, and delusion.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, one should often reflect upon one’s own mind thus: ‘For a long time this mind has been defiled by lust, hatred, and delusion.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, one should often reflect upon one’s own mind thus: ‘For a long time this mind has been defiled by lust, hatred, and delusion.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, that base should be understood, where the eye ceases and perception of forms fades away.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘Using blocks of wood as cushions, we will dwell diligent and ardent in striving.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will be content with any kind of robe, and we will speak in praise of contentment with any kind of robe, and we will not engage in a wrong search, in what is improper, for the sake of a robe.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will be grateful and thankful, and we will not overlook even the least favour done to us.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will develop and cultivate the liberation of mind by lovingkindness, make it our vehicle, make it our basis, stabilize it, exercise ourselves in it, and fully perfect it.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will develop and cultivate the liberation of mind by lovingkindness, make it our vehicle, make it our basis, stabilize it, exercise ourselves in it, and fully perfect it.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will develop and cultivate the liberation of mind by lovingkindness, make it our vehicle, make it our basis, stabilize it, exercise ourselves in it, and fully perfect it.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will dwell diligently.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will enter a village or town for alms with body, speech, and mind guarded, with mindfulness set up, restrained in our sense faculties.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will use our gains without being tied to them, uninfatuated with them, not blindly absorbed in them, seeing the danger in them and understanding the escape.’
“Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: ‘When those discourses spoken by the Tathagata that are deep, deep in meaning, supramundane, dealing with emptiness, are being recited, we will be eager to listen to them, will lend an ear to them, will apply our minds to understand them; and we will think those teachings should be studied and mastered.’
“Therefore, chamberlains, the household life is confinement, a path of dust.
“Therefore, chamberlains, the household life is confinement, a path of dust.
“Therefore, Dhammadinna, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will possess confirmed confidence in the Buddha … in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha.… We will possess the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken … leading to concentration.’
“Therefore, Dighavu, established upon these four factors of stream-entry, you should develop further six things that partake of true knowledge.
“Therefore, Dighavu, you should train yourself thus: ‘I will be one who possesses confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: “The Blessed One is … teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.”
“Therefore, friend, you should train yourself thus: ‘We will guard the doors of the sense faculties; we will be moderate in eating; we will be devoted to wakefulness.’
“Therefore, great king, you should train yourself thus: ‘I will be one who has good friends, good companions, good comrades.’
“Therefore, having removed stinginess, The conqueror of the stain should give a gift.
“Therefore, having removed stinginess, The conqueror of the stain should give a gift.
“Therefore, having removed stinginess, The conqueror of the stain should give a gift.
“Therefore, Soṇa, any kind of form whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all form should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Therefore, Susı̄ma, any kind of form whatsoever, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, all form should be seen as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.’
“Therefore, truly, the world-knower, the wise one, Gone to the world’s end, fulfiller of the holy life, Having known the world’s end, at peace, Longs not for this world or another.”
“Therefore, you should train yourselves thus: ‘We will be possessed of confirmed confidence in the Buddha thus: “The Blessed One is an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One.”
“Therein, Ananda, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself...
“Therein, Ananda, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself...
“Therein, Ananda, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering is created by oneself...
“Therein, Ananda, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering is created by oneself...
“Therein, bhikkhus, egg-born supaṇṇas carry off only nagas that are egg-born, not those that are womb-born, moisture-born, or spontaneously born.
“Therein, bhikkhus, nagas born from the womb, from moisture, and born spontaneously are superior to nagas born from eggs.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple attends closely and carefully to dependent origination itself thus: ‘When this exists, that comes to be; with the arising of this, that arises.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple attends closely and carefully to dependent origination itself thus: ‘When this exists, that comes to be; with the arising of this, that arises.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple reflects thus: ‘I am now being devoured by form.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is both a persistent worker and one who does what is suitable regarding concentration is the chief, the best, the foremost, the highest, the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is both a thorough worker and a persistent worker regarding concentration is the chief … the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.”
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is both skilled in resolution and a thorough worker regarding concentration is the chief … the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.”
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is skilled both in attainment and in maintenance regarding concentration is the chief, the best, the foremost, the highest, the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is skilled both in concentration and in maintenance regarding concentration is the chief, the best, the foremost, the supreme, the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is skilled both in concentration regarding concentration and in attainment regarding concentration is the chief, the best, the foremost, the highest, the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is skilled both in emergence and in pliancy regarding concentration is the chief … the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.”
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is skilled both in maintenance and in emergence regarding concentration is the chief … the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.” 
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is skilled both in pliancy and in the object regarding concentration is the chief … the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.”
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is skilled both in the object and in the range regarding concentration is the chief … the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.” 
“Therein, bhikkhus, the meditator who is skilled both in the range and in resolution regarding concentration is the chief … the most excellent of these four kinds of meditators.”
“Therein, bhikkhus, the pleasure faculty and the joy faculty should be seen to be pleasant feeling.
“Therein, bhikkhus, the pleasure faculty and the joy faculty should be seen to be pleasant feeling.
“Therein, bhikkhus, what is the distinction, what is the disparity, what is the difference between the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, and a bhikkhu liberated by wisdom?”
“Therein, friend, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by another, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain are created both by oneself and by another, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another—in each case that is conditioned by contact.
“Therein, friends, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by oneself, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain are created by another, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain are created both by oneself and by another, and those who maintain that pleasure and pain have arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another—in each case it is impossible that they will experience without contact.”
“Therein, friends, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering is created by oneself, it is impossible that they will experience without contact.
“Therein, friends, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins, proponents of kamma, who maintain that suffering is created by oneself, that is conditioned by contact.
“Therein, headman, the ascetic of rough life who afflicts and torments himself, achieves a wholesome state, and realizes a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones, may be criticized on one ground and praised on two grounds.
“Therein, headman, the ascetic of rough life who afflicts and torments himself, and achieves a wholesome state, yet does not realize a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones, may be criticized on two grounds and praised on one ground.
“Therein, headman, the ascetic of rough life who afflicts and torments himself, yet does not achieve a wholesome state or realize a superhuman distinction in knowledge and vision worthy of the noble ones, may be criticized on three grounds.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth both lawfully and unlawfully, both by violence and without violence, and who does not make himself happy and pleased nor share it and do meritorious deeds, may be praised on one ground and criticized on three grounds.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth both lawfully and unlawfully, both by violence and without violence, and who makes himself happy and pleased and shares it and does meritorious deeds, may be praised on three grounds and criticized on one ground.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth both lawfully and unlawfully, both by violence and without violence, and who makes himself happy and pleased but does not share it and do meritorious deeds, may be praised on two grounds and criticized on two grounds.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth lawfully, without violence, and makes himself happy and pleased, and shares it and does meritorious deeds, and who uses that wealth without being tied to it, uninfatuated with it, not blindly absorbed in it, seeing the danger in it, understanding the escape—he may be praised on four grounds.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth lawfully, without violence, and makes himself happy and pleased, and shares it and does meritorious deeds, but who uses that wealth while being tied to it, infatuated with it, blindly absorbed in it, not seeing the danger in it, not understanding the escape—he may be praised on three grounds and criticized on one ground.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth lawfully, without violence, and who does not make himself happy and pleased nor share it and do meritorious deeds, may be praised on one ground and criticized on two grounds.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth lawfully, without violence, and who makes himself happy and pleased but does not share it and do meritorious deeds, may be praised on two grounds and criticized on one ground.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth unlawfully, by violence, and makes himself happy and pleased, and shares it and does meritorious deeds, may be criticized on one ground and praised on two grounds.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth unlawfully, by violence, and who does not make himself happy and pleased nor share it and do meritorious deeds, may be criticized on three grounds.
“Therein, headman, the one enjoying sensual pleasures who seeks wealth unlawfully, by violence, and who makes himself happy and pleased but does not share it and do meritorious deeds, may be criticized on two grounds and praised on one ground.
“Therein, headman, when those ascetics and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this say: ‘Anyone at all who destroys life experiences pain and grief here and now,’ do they speak truthfully or falsely?”
“Therein, headman, when those ascetics and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this say: ‘Anyone at all who engages in sexual misconduct experiences pain and grief here and now,’ do they speak truthfully or falsely?… Is it proper to place confidence in those who hold wrong view?”
“Therein, headman, when those ascetics and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this say: ‘Anyone at all who speaks falsely experiences pain and grief here and now,’ do they speak truthfully or falsely?… Is it proper to place confidence in those who hold wrong view?”
“Therein, headman, when those ascetics and brahmins who hold such a doctrine and view as this say: ‘Anyone at all who takes what is not given experiences pain and grief here and now,’ do they speak truthfully or falsely?… Is it proper to place confidence in those who hold wrong view?”
“Therein, Upavaṇa, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins who maintain that suffering is created by oneself, and those who maintain that suffering is created by another, and those who maintain that suffering is created both by oneself and by another, and those who maintain that suffering has arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another—in each case it is impossible that they will experience without contact.”
“Therein, Upavaṇa, in the case of those ascetics and brahmins who maintain that suffering is created by oneself, and those who maintain that suffering is created by another, and those who maintain that suffering is created both by oneself and by another, and those who maintain that suffering has arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another—in each case that is conditioned by contact.
“Thereupon the Tavatiṁsa devas found fault with this, grumbled, and complained about it, saying: ‘It is wonderful indeed, sir!
“There’s no ground there for elephant troops, For chariot troops and infantry.
“These are called the factors of enlightenment, prince.”
“These are called the hindrances, prince.”
“These are considered happiness
“These are the five fearful animosities that have subsided.
“These are the five powers of a woman.”
“These are the five powers of a woman.”
“These are the five powers of a woman.” 
“These are the five situations that are difficult to obtain for a woman who has not done merit.
“These are the five situations that are easy to obtain for a woman who has done merit.”
“These are the four divine tracks of the devas for the purification of beings who have not been purified, for the cleansing of beings who have not been cleansed.”
“These are the four divine tracks of the devas, for the purification of beings who have not been purified, for the cleansing of beings who have not been cleansed.”
“These are the four factors of stream-entry that he possesses.
“These are the four streams of merit, streams of the wholesome, nutriments of happiness.”
“These are the four streams of merit, streams of the wholesome, nutriments of happiness.”
“These are the four streams of merit, streams of the wholesome, nutriments of happiness.”
“These are the four streams of merit.…
“These are the four streams of merit.…
“These companion bhikkhus
“These eight things, Nandiya, when developed and cultivated, lead to Nibbana, have Nibbana as their destination, Nibbana as their final goal.
“These evil fellows are indeed mean, Although they call me, ‘Dad, dear Dad.’
“These five aggregates subject to clinging have been spoken of by the Blessed One; that is, the form aggregate subject to clinging … the consciousness aggregate subject to clinging.
“These five aggregates subject to clinging have been spoken of by the Blessed One; that is, the form aggregate subject to clinging … the consciousness aggregate subject to clinging.
“These five aggregates subject to clinging, bhikkhu, are rooted in desire.” 
“These five aggregates subject to clinging, friend, have been called identity by the Blessed One; that is, the form aggregate subject to clinging, the feeling aggregate subject to clinging, the perception aggregate subject to clinging, the volitional formations aggregate subject to clinging, the consciousness aggregate subject to clinging.
“These five faculties, when developed and cultivated, lead to the abandoning of the fetters, to the uprooting of the underlying tendencies, to the full understanding of the course, to the destruction of the taints.
“These five powers are to be developed for direct knowledge of these five higher fetters, for the full understanding of them, for their utter destruction, for their abandoning.”
“These five powers are to be developed for direct knowledge of these five higher fetters, for the full understanding of them, for their utter destruction, for their abandoning.”
“These five spiritual faculties are to be developed for direct knowledge of these five higher fetters, for the full understanding of them, for their utter destruction, for their abandoning.”
“These five spiritual faculties are to be developed for direct knowledge of these five higher fetters, for the full understanding of them, for their utter destruction, for their abandoning.”
“These five, bhikkhus, are obstructions, hindrances, encirclers of the mind, weakeners of wisdom.
“These four bases for spiritual power are to be developed for direct knowledge of these five higher fetters, for the full understanding of them, for their utter destruction, for their abandoning.” 
“These four establishments of mindfulness, bhikkhus, are to be developed for the full understanding of these three feelings.”
“These four establishments of mindfulness, bhikkhus, are to be developed for the full understanding of these three taints.”
“These four establishments of mindfulness, bhikkhus, when developed and cultivated, are noble and emancipating; they lead the one who acts upon them out to the complete destruction of suffering.”
“These four establishments of mindfulness, bhikkhus, when developed and cultivated, lead to utter revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.”
“These four jhanas are to be developed for direct knowledge of these five higher fetters, for the full understanding of them, for their utter destruction, for their abandoning.”
“These four right strivings are to be developed for the direct knowledge of these five higher fetters, for the full understanding of them, for their utter destruction, for their abandoning.”
“These four right strivings are to be developed for the direct knowledge of these three searches, for the full understanding of them, for their utter destruction, for their abandoning.”
“These four things, bhikkhus, are actual, unerring, not otherwise.
“These I consider to be ascetics among ascetics and brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism and the goal of brahminhood.”
“These I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“These seven factors of enlightenment, bhikkhus, are makers of vision, makers of knowledge, promoting the growth of wisdom, free from vexation, leading towards Nibbana.
“These seven factors of enlightenment, bhikkhus, are nonobstructions, nonhindrances, nonencirclers of the mind; when developed and cultivated they lead to the realization of the fruit of true knowledge and liberation.
“These seven factors of enlightenment, brahmin, are nonobstructions, nonhindrances, noncorruptions of the mind; when developed and cultivated they lead to the realization of the fruit of true knowledge and liberation.
“These seven factors of enlightenment, Kassapa, have been rightly expounded by me; when developed and cultivated, they lead to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
“These seven factors of enlightenment, venerable sir, have been rightly expounded by the Blessed One; when developed and cultivated, they lead to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
“These, bhikkhus, are called the devas of the cloud-dwelling order.”
“These, bhikkhus, are called the devas of the gandhabba order.”
“These, bhikkhus, are called the seventy-seven cases of knowledge.”
“These, bhikkhus, are the five faculties.”
“These, bhikkhus, are the five faculties.”
“These, bhikkhus, are the five faculties.”
“These, bhikkhus, are the five faculties.”
“These, bhikkhus, are the five faculties.”
“These, bhikkhus, are the five faculties.” 
“These, bhikkhus, are the five kinds of suffering peculiar to women, which women experience but not men.” 
“These, bhikkhus, are the four modes of generation of nagas.”
“These, bhikkhus, are the four modes of generation of supaṇṇas.”
“These, bhikkhus, are the Four Noble Truths.
“These, bhikkhus, are the four portions.”
“These, bhikkhus, are the three pathways of language, pathways of designation, pathways of description, that are unmixed, that were never mixed, that are not being mixed, that will not be mixed, that are not rejected by wise ascetics and brahmins.
“These, great king, are the four kinds of persons found existing in the world.
“These, headman, are the three kinds of wearing away that are directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.”
“These, venerable sir, are my spies, undercover agents, coming back after spying out the country.
“They always take delight in food, Both devas and human beings.
“They always take delight in food, Both devas and human beings.
“They are not sense pleasures, the world’s pretty things:
“They arrest a thief when he takes away, But an ascetic who takes away is dear.
“They concentrate even what is hard to concentrate, “Who delight in calming the faculties.
“They did, brahmin.”
“They do even what is hard to do, “The trainees endowed with virtue, steadfast.
“They do not die among the dead
“They do not know bliss
“They do not sorrow over the past, Nor do they hanker for the future.
“They do not understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
“They gain even what is hard to gain, “Who delight in calming the mind, Whose minds, day and night, Take delight in development.”
“They have been disciplined well by Kappina
“They lead to enlightenment, bhikkhu, therefore they are called factors of enlightenment.
“They lead to enlightenment, bhikkhu, therefore they are called factors of enlightenment.
“They listen to the stainless Dhamma
“They rejoice like the devas who control
“They understand aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
“They weep, mother, for the dead
“They weep, O son, for the dead
“They will surely reach the far shore
“They will surely reach to safety
“They would bring him the lute and tell him: ‘Sire, this is that lute, the sound of which was so tantalizing, so lovely, so intoxicating, so entrancing, so enthralling.’
“They’ve gone to Magadha, gone to Kosala, And some are in the Vajjian land.
“This bhikkhu shines with sublime beauty, Having a mind utterly straight.
“This Brahmadeva, madam, Without acquisitions, has surpassed the devas.
“This Dhamma isn’t easily understood
“This diversity of elements, householder, has been spoken of by the Blessed One thus: the eye element, form element, eye-consciousness element...
“This divine vehicle unsurpassed
“This eightfold wrong path, friend, is the unholy life; that is, wrong view...
“This indeed is that Jeta’s Grove, The resort of the Order of seers, Dwelt in by the Dhamma King, A place that gives me joy.
“This indeed is that Jeta’s Grove, The resort of the Order of seers, Dwelt in by the Dhamma King, A place that gives me joy.
“This is a designation for this Noble Eightfold Path: ‘the divine vehicle’ and ‘the vehicle of Dhamma’ and ‘the unsurpassed victory in battle.’
“This is a simile for the brahmin, O Damali, For the taintless one, the discreet meditator.
“This is called ignorance, bhikkhu, and in this way one is immersed in ignorance.”
“This is called true knowledge, bhikkhu, and in this way one has arrived at true knowledge.”
“This is called, bhikkhus, a noble disciple who dismantles and does not build up; who abandons and does not cling; who scatters and does not amass; who extinguishes and does not kindle.
“This is called, bhikkhus, a noble disciple who neither builds up nor dismantles, but who abides having dismantled; who neither abandons nor clings, but who abides having abandoned; who neither scatters nor amasses, but who abides having scattered; who neither extinguishes nor kindles, but who abides having extinguished.
“This is called, friends, a bhikkhu who is corrupted amidst forms cognizable by the eye, corrupted amidst sounds cognizable by the ear, corrupted amidst odours cognizable by the nose, corrupted amidst tastes cognizable by the tongue, corrupted amidst tactile objects cognizable by the body, corrupted amidst mental phenomena cognizable by the mind.
“This is called, friends, a bhikkhu who is uncorrupted amidst forms cognizable by the eye, uncorrupted amidst sounds cognizable by the ear, uncorrupted amidst odours cognizable by the nose, uncorrupted amidst tastes cognizable by the tongue, uncorrupted amidst tactile objects cognizable by the body, uncorrupted amidst mental phenomena cognizable by the mind.
“This is not suitable for you, That you instruct others.
“This is not the right time for a question, Kassapa.
“This is not the right time for a question, Kassapa.
“This is not the time for that question, friend Lakkhaṇa.
“This is one question, great king, ‘Where should a gift be given?’ and this another, ‘Where does what is given become of great fruit?’
“This is the cause and reason, lord of the devas, why some beings here attain Nibbana in this very life.” 
“This is the cause and reason, lord of the devas, why some beings here do not attain Nibbana in this very life.
“This is the noble method that he has clearly seen and thoroughly penetrated with wisdom.
“This is what that young deva said.
“This is what the young deva Tayana said.
“This Noble Eightfold Path, bhikkhu, is the holy life; that is, right view...
“This Noble Eightfold Path, friend, is the holy life; that is, right view...
“This Noble Eightfold Path, friend, is the holy life; that is, right view...
“This Noble Eightfold Path, venerable sir, is the stream; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.”
“This puppet is not made by itself, Nor is this misery made by another.
“This should be done by the brahmin:
“This was called Pacı̄navaṁsa by the Tivaras, And Vaṅkaka by the Rohitassas, Supassa by the Suppiya people, Vepulla by the Magadhan folk.
“This world, Kaccana, for the most part relies upon a duality …  … Such is the cessation of this whole mass of suffering.”
“This world, Kaccana, is for the most part shackled by engagement, clinging, and adherence.
“This young bhikkhu 
“This, Ananda, is that Dhamma exposition, the mirror of the Dhamma, equipped with which a noble disciple, if he wishes, could by himself declare of himself: ‘I am one finished with hell.… I am a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as my destination.’”
“This, Ananda, is that Dhamma exposition, the mirror of the Dhamma, equipped with which a noble disciple, if he wishes, could by himself declare of himself: ‘I am one finished with hell.… I am a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as my destination.’” 
“This, bhikkhu, is a designation for the element of Nibbana: the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.
“This, bhikkhu, is the cause and reason why some egg-born nagas here observe the Uposatha and relinquish their bodies.” 
“This, bhikkhu, is the cause and reason why someone here, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the company of egg-born nagas.”
“This, bhikkhu, is the cause and reason why someone here, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the company of egg-born nagas.”
“This, bhikkhu, is the cause and reason why someone here, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the company of egg-born supaṇṇas.”
“This, bhikkhu, is the cause and reason why someone here, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the company of egg-born supaṇṇas.”
“This, bhikkhu, is the cause and reason why someone here, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the company of the devas of the gandhabba order.”
“This, bhikkhu, is the cause and reason why someone here, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the company of the devas who dwell in fragrant roots.”
“This, bhikkhu, is the cause and reason why someone here, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the company of the devas who dwell in fragrant roots.” 
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhu who has understood the cessation of the displeasure faculty.
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhu who has understood the cessation of the equanimity faculty.
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhu who has understood the cessation of the joy faculty.
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhu who has understood the cessation of the pain faculty.
“This, bhikkhus, is called a bhikkhu who has understood the cessation of the pleasure faculty.
“This, bhikkhus, is that way going upwards, which leads to utter revulsion, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the all by directly knowing and fully understanding which … one is capable of destroying suffering.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the all by directly knowing and fully understanding which, by developing dispassion towards which and abandoning which, one is capable of destroying suffering.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the all without directly knowing and fully understanding which … one is incapable of destroying suffering.
“This, bhikkhus, is the all without directly knowing and fully understanding which, without developing dispassion towards which and abandoning which, one is incapable of destroying suffering.
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma exposition on the theme of burning.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma exposition on the theme of the hundred and eight.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma exposition on the theme of the one who declares the exertion to become secure from bondage.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma for abandoning all through direct knowledge and full understanding.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma for abandoning all.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma for the exhaustion of all clinging.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma for the exhaustion of all clinging.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma for the full understanding of all clinging.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the instructed noble disciple and the uninstructed worldling.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, and a bhikkhu liberated by wisdom.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the distinction, the disparity, the difference between the wise man and the fool, that is, the living of the holy life.” 
“This, bhikkhus, is the method of exposition by means of which a bhikkhu can declare final knowledge thus: ‘Destroyed is birth...
“This, bhikkhus, is the method of exposition by means of which a bhikkhu—apart from faith, apart from personal preference, apart from oral tradition, apart from reasoned reflection, apart from acceptance of a view after pondering it—can declare final knowledge thus: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
“This, bhikkhus, is the method of exposition by means of which the seven factors of enlightenment become fourteen.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the one-way path for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow and lamentation, for the passing away of pain and displeasure, for the achievement of the method, for the realization of Nibbana, that is, the four establishments of mindfulness.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the origin of form; this is the origin of feeling; this is the origin of perception; this is the origin of volitional formations; this is the origin of consciousness.
“This, bhikkhus, is the passing away of form; this is the passing away of feeling; this is the passing away of perception; this is the passing away of volitional formations; this is the passing away of consciousness.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the way that is appropriate for uprooting all conceivings.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the way that is suitable for attaining Nibbana.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the way that is suitable for attaining Nibbana.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the way that is suitable for uprooting all conceivings.”
“This, bhikkhus, is the way that is suitable for uprooting all conceivings.” 
“This, bhikkhus, is what Brahma Sahampati said.
“This, brahmin, is the cause and reason why even those hymns that have been recited over a long period do not recur to the mind, let alone those that have not been recited.
“This, brahmin, is the cause and reason why even those hymns that have not been recited over a long period recur to the mind, let alone those that have been recited.
“This, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One.”
“This, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One.”
“This, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One.”
“This, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One.”
“This, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One.”
“This, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One.”
“This, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One.”
“This, headman, is concentration based upon the Dhamma.
“This, headman, is concentration of the Dhamma.
“This, headman, is concentration of the Dhamma.
“This, headman, is concentration of the Dhamma.
“This, headman, is concentration of the Dhamma.
“This, headman, is the cause and reason why someone here is reckoned as gentle.” 
“This, headman, is the cause and reason why someone here is reckoned as wrathful.
“This, venerable sir, is the method by which these things are different in meaning and also different in phrasing.
“This, venerable sir, is the method by which these things are one in meaning and different only in phrasing.” 
“This, venerable sir, is the path that I have obtained, which … will lead me on … to such a state that I shall understand: ‘Destroyed is birth … there is no more for this state of being.’”
“Those are the five aggregates subject to clinging, bhikkhu: that is, the form aggregate subject to clinging, the feeling aggregate subject to clinging, the perception aggregate subject to clinging, the volitional formations aggregate subject to clinging, the consciousness aggregate subject to clinging.”
“Those ascetics and brahmins, Assaji, who regard concentration as the essence and identify concentration with asceticism, failing to obtain concentration, might think, ‘Let us not fall away!’
“Those ascetics and brahmins, bhikkhu, who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering’; who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they delight in volitional formations that lead to birth, in volitional formations that lead to aging, in volitional formations that lead to death, in volitional formations that lead to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
“Those ascetics and brahmins, bhikkhu, who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering’; who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they delight in volitional formations that lead to birth, in volitional formations that lead to aging, in volitional formations that lead to death, in volitional formations that lead to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhu, who do not understand as it really is: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering’—they delight in volitional formations that lead to birth, in volitional formations that lead to aging, in volitional formations that lead to death, in volitional formations that lead to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five faculties … do not in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five faculties: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these four elements: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these six faculties: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these three feelings: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these four elements: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics….
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand as they really are the origination and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these three feelings: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand feeling, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics … nor do they enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand the eye faculty, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who do not understand the ear faculty … the mind faculty, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand the faculty of faith, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who do not understand the faculty of energy … the faculty of mindfulness … the faculty of concentration … the faculty of wisdom, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation: these I do not consider to be ascetics among ascetics or brahmins among brahmins, and these venerable ones do not, by realizing it for themselves with direct knowledge, in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those ascetics or brahmins, bhikkhus, who do not understand the pleasure faculty, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; who do not understand the joy faculty … the pain faculty … the displeasure faculty … the equanimity faculty, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation … do not in this very life enter and dwell in the goal of asceticism or the goal of brahminhood.
“Those at whose birth I took delight
“Those at whose birth I took delight …
“Those bhikkhus are of great spiritual power and might.
“Those bhikkhus too become worthy of praise, “Who venerate him, the one thus liberated.
“Those bhikkhus, Ananda, either now or after I am gone, who dwell with themselves as their own island, with themselves as their own refuge, with no other refuge; with the Dhamma as their island, with the Dhamma as their refuge, with no other refuge—it is these bhikkhus, Ananda, who will be for me topmost of those keen on the training.” 
“Those engaged in austerity and scrupulousness, Those protecting their solitude, And those who have settled on form, Delighting in the world of devas:
“Those fired by lust, obscured by darkness, Will never see this abstruse Dhamma, Deep, hard to see, subtle, Going against the stream.” 
“Those for whom lust and hatred
“Those for whom lust and hatred
“Those for whom you have compassion … these you should exhort, settle, and establish for making the breakthrough to these Four Noble Truths as they really are.
“Those for whom you have compassion … these you should exhort, settle, and establish in these four factors of stream-entry.”
“Those for whom you have compassion … these you should exhort, settle, and establish in these four factors of stream-entry.”
“Those having faith come together and unite with those having faith, those having a sense of shame with those having a sense of shame, those afraid of wrongdoing with those afraid of wrongdoing, the concentrated with the concentrated, the wise with the wise.”
“Those here who, on gaining the human state, Are amiable and generous, Confident in the Buddha and the Dhamma
“Those ignorant people who go about
“Those men of old who excelled in virtue, Those brahmins who recalled the ancient rules, Their sense doors guarded, well protected, Dwelt having vanquished wrath within.
“Those monkeys who are not foolish and frivolous, when they see the pitch, avoid it from afar.
“Those of right view come together and unite with those of right view; those of right intention...
“Those of right view...
“Those people going to the far shore
“Those people in Uruvelakappa, venerable sir, in relation to whom sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair would arise in me if they were to be executed, imprisoned, fined, or censured—these are the ones for whom I have desire and attachment.
“Those same sounds … Those same odours … Those same tastes … … Those same tactile objects that are agreeable to one person, great king, are disagreeable to another.
“Those virtues spoken of by the Blessed One were spoken of by him for the sake of developing these four establishments of mindfulness.”
“Those who abstain from the destruction of life come together and unite with those who abstain from the destruction of life; those who abstain from taking what is not given … from sexual misconduct...
“Those who abstain from the destruction of life … from taking what is not given … from sexual misconduct...
“Those who abstain from the destruction of life...
“Those who are stingy here in the world, Niggardly folk, revilers, People who create obstacles
“Those who are stingy here in the world, Niggardly folk, revilers, People who create obstacles
“Those who are utterly muddled about things, Who may be led into others’ doctrines, Fast asleep, they have not yet awakened:
“Those who are well restrained
“Those who aren’t muddled about things, Who cannot be led into others’ doctrines, Those awakened ones, having rightly known, Fare evenly amidst the uneven.”
“Those who do not understand suffering, Who do not know suffering’s origin, Nor where suffering completely stops, Where it ceases without remainder;
“Those who dwell deep in the forest, Peaceful, leading the holy life, Eating but a single meal a day:
“Those who have gone to the Buddha for refuge
“Those who have not penetrated things, Who may be led into others’ doctrines, Fast asleep, they have not yet awakened:
“Those who have penetrated things well, Who cannot be led into others’ doctrines, Those awakened ones, having rightly known, Fare evenly amidst the uneven.” 
“Those who possess faith and virtue, Confidence and vision of the Dhamma, In time arrive at the happiness
“Those who set up a park or a grove, The people who construct a bridge, A place to drink and a well, Those who give a residence: 
“Those who speak thus, headman, do not state what has been said by me but misrepresent me with untruth and falsehood.
“Those who understand their source, They dispel it—listen, O yakkha!—
“Those wholesome virtues spoken of by the Blessed One were spoken of by him for the purpose of developing the four establishments of mindfulness.
“Those whose minds are well developed
“Those, friend, who teach the Dhamma for the abandonment of lust, for the abandonment of hatred, for the abandonment of delusion: they are the proponents of Dhamma in the world.
“Those, headman, who say, ‘The ascetic Gotama knows magic,’ state what has been said by me and do not misrepresent me with what is contrary to fact; they explain in accordance with the Dhamma, and no reasonable consequence of their assertion gives ground for criticism.” 
“Though a hundred thousand rogues
“Though many creatures crawl about, Many terrors, flies, serpents, 
“Though some may say, ‘This is the supreme pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede this to them.
“Though some may say, ‘This is the supreme pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede this to them.
“Though some may say, ‘This is the supreme pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede this to them.
“Though some may say, ‘This is the supreme pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede this to them.
“Though some may say, ‘This is the supreme pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede this to them.
“Though some may say, ‘This is the supreme pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede this to them.
“Though some may say, ‘This is the supreme pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede this to them.
“Though some may say, ‘This is the supreme pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede this to them.
“Though some may say, ‘This is the supreme pleasure and joy that beings experience,’ I would not concede this to them.
“Though the Dhamma is of such a nature
“Though the path is impassable and uneven, The noble ones walk it, Kamada.
“Though the sky might split, the earth quake, And all creatures be stricken with terror, Though men brandish a dart at their breast, The enlightened take no shelter in acquisitions.” 
“Though they seek him everywhere, Mara and his army do not find him:
“Three kinds of feelings, carpenter, have been spoken of by the Blessed One: pleasant feeling, painful feeling, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
“Three supaṇṇas, four geese, And five hundred falcons:
“Through hankering for the future, Through sorrowing over the past, Fools dry up and wither away
“Through stinginess and negligence
“Through stinginess and negligence
“Through the destruction, fading away, cessation, giving up, and relinquishment of desire, lust, delight, craving, engagement and clinging, mental standpoints, adherences, and underlying tendencies towards the feeling element … the perception element … the volitional formations element … the consciousness element, the mind is said to be well liberated.
“Thus a bhikkhu has comprehended a mode of conduct and manner of dwelling in such a way that as he conducts himself and as he dwells thus, evil unwholesome states of covetousness and displeasure do not flow in upon him.
“Thus one should avoid such a person—
“Thus this way of regarding things and ‘I am’ have not vanished in him.
“Thus those perfect in many qualities
“Thus with ignorance as condition, volitional formations; with volitional formations as condition, consciousness….
“Thus with the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations; with the cessation of volitional formations, cessation of consciousness….
“Thus, Ananda, I have taught development by direction, I have taught development without direction.
“Thus, being intoxicated and negligent himself, having made others intoxicated and negligent, with the breakup of the body, after death, he is reborn in the ‘Hell of Laughter.’
“Thus, bhikkhu, all those formations have passed, ceased, changed.
“Thus, bhikkhus, according to the method of exposition, these five faculties, having been five, become three; and having been three, become five.”
“Thus, bhikkhus, due to a difference in the faculties there is a difference in the fruits; due to a difference in the fruits there is a difference among persons.” 
“Thus, bhikkhus, due to a difference in the faculties there is a difference in the fruits; due to a difference in the fruits there is a difference among persons.” 
“Thus, bhikkhus, I have taught old kamma, I have taught new kamma, I have taught the cessation of kamma, I have taught the way leading to the cessation of kamma.
“Thus, bhikkhus, I have taught you the destination and the path leading to the destination.
“Thus, bhikkhus, I have taught you the unconditioned and the path leading to the unconditioned.
“Thus, bhikkhus, I have taught you the unconditioned and the path leading to the unconditioned.
“Thus, bhikkhus, I have taught you the unconditioned and the path leading to the unconditioned….
“Thus, bhikkhus, I have taught you the unconditioned and the path leading to the unconditioned….
“Thus, bhikkhus, one who activates them fully succeeds fully; one who activates them partly succeeds partly.
“Thus, bhikkhus, one who activates them fully succeeds fully; one who activates them partly succeeds partly.
“Thus, bhikkhus, that formation is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; that craving is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; that feeling is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; that contact is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; that ignorance is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen.
“Thus, bhikkhus, that monkey, trapped at five points, lies there screeching.
“Thus, bhikkhus, the actuality in this, the inerrancy, the nototherwiseness, specific conditionality: this is called dependent origination.
“Thus, bhikkhus, whatever is impermanent is suffering.
“Thus, bhikkhus, when there is suffering, it is by clinging to suffering, by adhering to suffering, that such a view as this arises: ‘The winds do not blow … but stand as steady as a pillar.’”
“Thus, bhikkhus, with ignorance as condition, volitional formations; with volitional formations as condition, consciousness….
“Thus, bhikkhus, with ignorance as condition, volitional formations; with volitional formations as condition, consciousness….
“Thus, bhikkhus, with ignorance as proximate cause, volitional formations; with volitional formations as proximate cause, consciousness; with consciousness as proximate cause, name-and-form; with name-and-form as proximate cause, the six sense bases; with the six sense bases as proximate cause, contact; with contact as proximate cause, feeling; with feeling as proximate cause, craving; with craving as proximate cause, clinging; with clinging as proximate cause, existence; with existence as proximate cause, birth; with birth as proximate cause, suffering; with suffering as proximate cause, faith; with faith as proximate cause, gladness; with gladness as proximate cause, rapture; with rapture as proximate cause, tranquillity; with tranquillity as proximate cause, happiness; with happiness as proximate cause, concentration; with concentration as proximate cause, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are; with the knowledge and vision of things as they really are as proximate cause, revulsion; with revulsion as proximate cause, dispassion; with dispassion as proximate cause, liberation; with liberation as proximate cause, the knowledge of destruction.
“Thus, householder, when it was said by the Blessed One in ‘The Questions of Magandiya’ of the Aṭṭhakavagga:
“Thus, householder, when it was said by the Blessed One in ‘The Questions of Sakka’: ‘Those ascetics and brahmins who are liberated in the extinction of craving are those who have reached the ultimate end, the ultimate security from bondage, the ultimate holy life, the ultimate goal, and are best among devas and humans’—it is in such a way that the meaning of this, stated in brief by the Blessed One, should be understood in detail.”
“Thus, Udayı̄, with the destruction of craving comes the destruction of kamma; with the destruction of kamma comes the destruction of suffering.”
“Thus, venerable sir, when it is said in ‘The Questions of Ajita’ of the Parayana:
“Thus, venerable sir, when it was said by the the Blessed One:
“Timbaruka, ‘The feeling and the one who feels it are the same,’ with reference to one existing from the beginning: ‘Pleasure and pain are created by oneself.’
“Time flies by, the nights swiftly pass;
“Time flies by, the nights swiftly pass;
“Time flies by, the nights swiftly pass;
“Time flies by, the nights swiftly pass;
“Tissa, why are you sitting there, miserable, sorrowful, with tears streaming down?”
“To find delight, friend, is difficult to do by one who has gone forth.”
“To what extent, friend Anuruddha, have these four establishments of mindfulness been undertaken by a bhikkhu?”
“To what extent, friend Anuruddha, have these four establishments of mindfulness been undertaken by a bhikkhu?”
“To whatever extent, bhikkhus, there are abodes of beings, even up to the pinnacle of existence, these are the foremost in the world, these are the best, that is, the arahants.”
“Today discontent appears to me
“Today, friend, do you still hold that view, The view that you formerly held?
“Towards whom should one avoid conceit?
“Tranquil in body, in mind well liberated, Not generating, mindful, homeless, Knowing Dhamma, meditating thought-free, He does not erupt, or drift, or stiffen.
“Trifling is the unlucky throw
“Truly the Tathagatas, the great heroes, Lead by means of the true Dhamma.
“Truly, I’m untroubled, spirit, Yet no delight is found in me.
“Truly, the wise do not pretend, For they have understood the way of the world.
“Truth, Dhamma, restraint, the holy life, Attainment of Brahma based on the middle: 
“Truth, indeed, is deathless speech:
“Under whom have you shaved your head?
“Understood, Blessed One!
“Understood, Blessed One!
“Understood, Blessed One!
“Understood, Blessed One!
“Understood, Blessed One!
“Understood, Blessed One!
“Upaka and Palagaṇḍa, With Pukkusati—these are three.
“Upavaṇa, I have said that suffering is dependently arisen.
“Vaccha, as to the cause and condition for describing him as ‘consisting of form’ or as ‘formless’ or as ‘percipient’ or as ‘nonpercipient’ or as ‘neither percipient nor nonpercipient’: if that cause and condition were to cease completely and totally without remainder, in what way could one describe him as ‘consisting of form’ or as ‘formless’ or as ‘percipient’ or as ‘nonpercipient’ or as ‘neither percipient nor nonpercipient’?”
“Vaccha, I have not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’” 
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The soul is one thing, the body is another.’”
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.’”
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death.’”
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’”
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’”
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The world is infinite.’” 
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this either: ‘The world is not eternal.’”
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this: ‘The soul and the body are the same.’”
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this: ‘The Tathagata exists after death.’”
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this: ‘The world is eternal.’”
“Vaccha, the Blessed One has not declared this: ‘The world is finite.’”
“Vaccha, wanderers of other sects regard form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“Vaccha, wanderers of other sects regard form as self...
“Vaccha, wanderers of other sects regard the eye thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
“Vaccha, wanderers of other sects regard the eye...
“Venerable Elder, it is said, ‘diversity of elements, diversity of elements.’
“Venerable Elder, there are various views that arise in the world: ‘The world is eternal’ or ‘The world is not eternal’; or ‘The world is finite’ or ‘The world is infinite’; or ‘The soul and the body are the same’ or ‘The soul is one thing, the body is another’; or ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’—these as well as the sixty-two views mentioned in the Brahmajala.
“Venerable sir!” the bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” the bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” the bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir!” those bhikkhus replied.
“Venerable sir, a new council hall has just been built for the Sakyans of Kapilavatthu and it has not yet been inhabited by any ascetic or brahmin or by any human being at all.
“Venerable sir, as to these four establishments of mindfulness taught by the Blessed One—these things exist in me, and I live in conformity with those things.
“Venerable sir, as to these four factors of stream-entry taught by the Blessed One, these things exist in me, and I live in conformity with those things.
“Venerable sir, as to these four factors of stream-entry taught by the Blessed One, these things exist in us, and we live in conformity with those things.
“Venerable sir, as to these four factors of stream-entry that have been taught by the Blessed One, these things exist in me, and I live in conformity with those things.
“Venerable sir, as to these six things that partake of true knowledge that have been taught by the Blessed One, these things exist in me, and I live in conformity with those things.
“Venerable sir, didn’t I too speak thus: ‘Venerable sir, I did not state the matter in those terms and phrases’?”
“Venerable sir, even if he could catch the arrow shot by one archer before it reached the ground and could bring it back, that would be enough to say: ‘That man is a speedster endowed with supreme speed.’
“Venerable sir, even if he were struck with one spear he would experience pain and displeasure on that account, not to speak of three hundred spears.”
“Venerable sir, for one who has faith in regard to wholesome states, a sense of shame, fear of wrongdoing, energy, and wisdom, whether day or night comes only growth is to be expected in regard to wholesome states, not decline.
“Venerable sir, has the Blessed One seen Sakka, lord of the devas?”
“Venerable sir, how does identity view come to be?”
“Venerable sir, how long is an aeon?” 
“Venerable sir, how many things are there which, when they arise within a person, arise for his harm, suffering, and discomfort?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see so that, in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit no longer occur within?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see so that, in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit no longer occur within?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see so that, in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit no longer occur within?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see so that, in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit no longer occur within?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see so that, in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit no longer occur within?” 
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see so that, in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, the mind is rid of I-making, mine-making, and conceit, has transcended discrimination, and is peaceful and well liberated?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see so that, in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, the mind is rid of I-making, mine-making, and conceit, has transcended discrimination, and is peaceful and well liberated?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see so that, in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, the mind is rid of I-making, mine-making, and conceit, has transcended discrimination, and is peaceful and well liberated?” 
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see, for identity view to be abandoned?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see, for ignorance to be abandoned and true knowledge to arise?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see, for the fetters to be abandoned?” 
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see, for the fetters to be uprooted?”
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see, for the taints to be abandoned?… for the taints to be uprooted?… for the underlying tendencies to be abandoned?… for the underlying tendencies to be uprooted?” 
“Venerable sir, how should one know, how should one see, for the view of self to be abandoned?”
“Venerable sir, I am not bearing up, I am not getting better.
“Venerable sir, I am not bearing up, I am not getting better.
“Venerable sir, I am not bearing up, I am not getting better.
“Venerable sir, I am not bearing up, I am not getting better.
“Venerable sir, I did not state the matter in those terms and phrases.”
“Venerable sir, I do not go by faith in the Blessed One about this: that the faculty of faith … the faculty of wisdom, when developed and cultivated, has the Deathless as its ground, the Deathless as its destination, the Deathless as its final goal.
“Venerable sir, I have such confidence in the Blessed One that I believe there has not been nor ever will be nor exists at present another ascetic or brahmin more knowledgeable than the Blessed One with respect to enlightenment.”
“Venerable sir, I understand the Dhamma to have been taught by the Blessed One for the sake of final Nibbana without clinging.”
“Venerable sir, I understand the Dhamma to have been taught by the Blessed One for the sake of the fading away of lust.” 
“Venerable sir, if Ciravası̄ were to be executed, imprisoned, fined, or censured, even my life would be upset, so how could sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair not arise in me?”
“Venerable sir, if Ciravası̄’s mother were to be executed, imprisoned, fined, or censured, even my life would be upset, so how could sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair not arise in me?”
“Venerable sir, if one’s clothes or head were ablaze, to extinguish one’s blazing clothes or head one should arouse extraordinary desire, make an extraordinary effort, stir up zeal and enthusiasm, be unremitting, and exercise mindfulness and clear comprehension.” 
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta abuse and revile me, then I will think: ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not give me a blow with the fist.’
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta give me a blow with a clod, then I will think: ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not give me a blow with a rod.’
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta give me a blow with a rod, then I will think: ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not stab me with a knife.’
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta give me a blow with the fist, then I will think: ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not give me a blow with a clod.’
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta stab me with a knife, then I will think: ‘These people of Sunaparanta are excellent, truly excellent, in that they do not take my life with a sharp knife.’
“Venerable sir, if the people of Sunaparanta take my life with a sharp knife, then I will think: ‘There have been disciples of the Blessed One who, being repelled, humiliated, and disgusted by the body and by life, sought for an assailant.
“Venerable sir, if they were to ask me this, I would answer thus: ‘Friends, with form an arising is discerned, a vanishing is discerned, an alteration of that which stands is discerned.
“Venerable sir, if they were to ask me this, I would answer thus: ‘Friends, with form that has passed, ceased, changed, an arising was discerned, a vanishing was discerned, an alteration of that which stands was discerned.
“Venerable sir, if they were to ask me: ‘Friend Ananda, what is the source of aging-and-death, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?’—being asked thus, I would answer thus: ‘Friends, aging-and-death has birth as its source, birth as its origin; it is born and produced from birth.’
“Venerable sir, if they were to ask me: ‘Friend Ananda, what is the source of birth, what is its origin, from what is it born and produced?’—being asked thus, I would answer thus: ‘Friends, birth has existence as its source, existence as its origin; it is born and produced from existence….
“Venerable sir, in what way is one a lay follower?”
“Venerable sir, is that clinging the same as these five aggregates subject to clinging, or is the clinging something apart from the five aggregates subject to clinging?”
“Venerable sir, is there any form that is permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change, and that will remain the same just like eternity itself?
“Venerable sir, is there one thing which, when developed and cultivated, fulfils four things?
“Venerable sir, it is not easy for us—dwelling in a home crowded with children, enjoying Kasian sandalwood, wearing garlands, scents, and unguents, receiving gold and silver—from time to time to enter and dwell upon those discourses spoken by the Tathagata that are deep, deep in meaning, supramundane, dealing with emptiness.
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘a being, a being.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘a great man, a great man.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘a lone dweller, a lone dweller.’  In what way, venerable sir, is one a lone dweller, and in what way is one dwelling with a partner?” 
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘a trainee, a trainee.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘an unwise dolt, an unwise dolt.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘cessation, cessation.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘ignorance, ignorance.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘one equipped with faculties, one equipped with faculties.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘poor, poor.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘prosperous, prosperous.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘suffering, suffering.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘the holy life, the holy life.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘the removal of lust, the removal of hatred, the removal of delusion.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘the world, the world.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘true knowledge, true knowledge.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘true knowledge, true knowledge.’
“Venerable sir, it is said, ‘wise and alert, wise and alert.’
“Venerable sir, it was said by the Blessed One: ‘It is in dependence on the diversity of elements that there arises the diversity of contacts; in dependence on the diversity of contacts that there arises the diversity of feelings.’
“Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief, so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
“Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief, so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
“Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief, so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
“Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief, so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, withdrawn, diligent, ardent, and resolute.”
“Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief….”
“Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief….”
“Venerable sir, it would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief….”
“Venerable sir, my grandmother has died.
“Venerable sir, Nigaṇṭha Nataputta teaches the Dhamma to his disciples thus: ‘Anyone at all who destroys life is bound for a state of misery, bound for hell.
“Venerable sir, one sees as it really is with correct wisdom: ‘This has come to be.’
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One, guided by the Blessed One, take recourse in the Blessed One.
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….”
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….” 
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….” 
“Venerable sir, our teachings are rooted in the Blessed One….” 
“Venerable sir, Pūraṇa Kassapa says: ‘There is no cause or condition for lack of knowledge and vision; lack of knowledge and vision is without cause or condition.
“Venerable sir, Pūraṇa Kassapa speaks thus: ‘There is no cause or condition for the defilement of beings; beings are defiled without cause or condition.
“Venerable sir, Sineru, the king of mountains, is more.
“Venerable sir, Sineru, the king of mountains, is more.
“Venerable sir, some ascetics and brahmins maintain that suffering is created by oneself; some ascetics and brahmins maintain that suffering is created by another; some ascetics and brahmins maintain that suffering is created both by oneself and by another; some ascetics and brahmins maintain that suffering has arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another.
“Venerable sir, that is because had spoken in praise of the development of foulness meditation, and those bhikkhus,] thinking: ‘The Blessed One was giving a talk on foulness in many ways, was speaking in praise of foulness, was speaking in praise of the development of foulness meditation,’ dwelt devoted to the development of foulness meditation in its many aspects and factors.
“Venerable sir, the bhikkhu named Asoka has died.
“Venerable sir, the bhikkhu named Saḷha has died.
“Venerable sir, the bhikkhus are difficult to admonish now, and they have qualities which make them difficult to admonish.
“Venerable sir, the bhikkhus are difficult to admonish now, and they have qualities which make them difficult to admonish.
“Venerable sir, the bhikkhus are difficult to admonish now, and they have qualities which make them difficult to admonish.
“Venerable sir, the Blessed One has developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power, made them a vehicle, made them a basis, stabilized them, exercised himself in them, and fully perfected them.
“Venerable sir, the great earth is more.
“Venerable sir, the great earth is more.
“Venerable sir, the great earth is more.
“Venerable sir, the great earth is more.
“Venerable sir, the great earth is more.
“Venerable sir, the great earth is more.
“Venerable sir, the great earth is more.
“Venerable sir, the great earth that has been destroyed and eliminated is more.
“Venerable sir, the great earth that has been destroyed and eliminated is more.
“Venerable sir, the Himalayas, the king of mountains, is more.
“Venerable sir, the Himalayas, the king of mountains, is more.
“Venerable sir, the male lay follower named Kakkaṭa has died in Ñatika.
“Venerable sir, the noble disciple who is completely dedicated to the Tathagata and has full confidence in him does not entertain any perplexity or doubt about the Tathagata or the Tathagata’s teaching.
“Venerable sir, the portion of Sineru, the king of mountains, that has been destroyed and eliminated is more.
“Venerable sir, the portion of the Himalayas, the king of mountains, that has been destroyed and eliminated is more.
“Venerable sir, the portion of the Himalayas, the king of mountains, that has been destroyed and eliminated is more.
“Venerable sir, the siṁsapa leaves that the Blessed One has taken up in his hand are few, but those in the siṁsapa grove overhead are numerous.”
“Venerable sir, the Venerable Piṇḍola Bharadvaja has declared final knowledge thus: ‘I understand: Destroyed is birth….’
“Venerable sir, the water at the confluence is more.
“Venerable sir, the water at the confluence is more.
“Venerable sir, the water at the confluence that has been destroyed and eliminated is more.
“Venerable sir, the water at the confluence that has been destroyed and eliminated is more; the two or three drops of water that remain are trifling.
“Venerable sir, the water in the great ocean is more.
“Venerable sir, the water in the great ocean is more.
“Venerable sir, the water in the great ocean that has been destroyed and eliminated is more.
“Venerable sir, the water in the great ocean that has been destroyed and eliminated is more.
“Venerable sir, the water in the pond is more.
“Venerable sir, the water in the pond is more.
“Venerable sir, this is half of the holy life, that is, good friendship, good companionship, good comradeship.” 
“Venerable sir, this is the entire holy life, that is, good friendship, good companionship, good comradeship.” 
“Venerable sir, this Kapilavatthu is rich and prosperous, populous, crowded, with congested thoroughfares.
“Venerable sir, this was said by the Blessed One in ‘The Questions of Magandiya’ of the Aṭṭhakavagga:
“Venerable sir, this was said by the Blessed One in ‘The Questions of Sakka’: ‘Those ascetics and brahmins who are liberated in the extinction of craving are those who have reached the ultimate end, the ultimate security from bondage, the ultimate holy life, the ultimate goal, and are best among devas and humans.’
“Venerable sir, we are subject to another confinement even more confining and considered more confining than the former one.” 
“Venerable sir, we wish to go to the western province in order to take up residence there.” 
“Venerable sir, what is the cause and reason why it sometimes becomes stormy?”
“Venerable sir, what is the cause and reason why it sometimes becomes warm?”
“Venerable sir, what is the cause and reason why it sometimes becomes windy?”
“Venerable sir, what is the cause and reason why it sometimes rains?”
“Venerable sir, what is the cause and reason why some beings here do not attain Nibbana in this very life?
“Venerable sir, what is the reason, what is the cause, why formerly there were fewer training rules but more bhikkhus were established in final knowledge, while now there are more training rules but fewer bhikkhus are established in final knowledge?” 
“Venerable sir, what now are volitional formations, and for whom are there these volitional formations?”
“Venerable sir, what now is birth, and for whom is there this birth?”
“Venerable sir, what now is existence, and for whom is there this existence?”
“Venerable sir, when the four factors of stream-entry are completely and totally nonexistent in a noble disciple, would that noble disciple be one who dwells negligently?”
“Venerable sir, when we hear that the Blessed One will set out from Savatthi on tour among the Kosalans, on that occasion there arises in us distress and displeasure at the thought: ‘The Blessed One will be far away from us.’
“Venerable sir, whenever we see that venerable one, whether he is sitting in the midst of the Saṅgha or sitting alone in private, we never see any shaking or trembling in that venerable one’s body.”
“Venerable sir, where does Master Isidatta come from?”
“Venerable sir, where should a gift be given?” 
“Venerable sir, who craves?”
“Venerable sir, who feels?”
“Venerable sir, who makes contact?”
“Venerable sirs, ‘the fetter’ and ‘the things that fetter’ are different in meaning and also different in phrasing.
“Venerable, sir, it is said, ‘a speaker on the Dhamma, a speaker on the Dhamma.’
“Venerable, sir, it is said, ‘a speaker on the Dhamma, a speaker on the Dhamma.’
“Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, put on his boots, bound his sword on tightly, and, with a parasol borne aloft, entered the hermitage through the main gate; then, having turned his left side towards them, he walked past those seers who were virtuous and of good character.
“Very well, friend,” the Venerable Samiddhi replied.
“Victory breeds enmity, The defeated one sleeps badly.
“Vipula is called the best of mountains
“Virtue is good by not decaying;
“Virtue is good until old age;
“Wait, Mahanama!
“Walking for alms from family to family, Faculties guarded, discreet, mindful, One should resort to remote lodgings, Freed from fear, liberated in the fearless.
“Was it you, Evil One, who saw to it that I didn’t get alms?”
“Was this stated by the Blessed One, venerable sir?”
“We don’t live with your support, Nor are we your hired servant.
“We dwell in the forest all alone
“We have come, dear sir, from the presence of the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One.
“We have not abandoned what is directly visible, brahmin, in order to pursue what takes time.
“We hope, venerable sir, that Sariputta and Moggallana are healthy and robust.”
“We hope, venerable sir, that the bhikkhus of the Saṅgha are healthy and robust.”
“We hope, venerable sir, that the Blessed One is healthy and robust.”
“We seventy-two, Gotama, were merit-makers;
“We too, friends, teach the Dhamma to our disciples thus: ‘Come, friends, abandon the five hindrances … … dwell pervading the entire world with a mind imbued with lovingkindness … compassion...
“We understand thus what you have said;
“We would ask the Venerable Channa about a certain point, if he would grant us the favour of answering our question.” 
“We would come from far away, friend, to learn the meaning of this statement from the Venerable Sariputta.
“We would come from far away, venerable sir, to learn the meaning of this statement from the Venerable Sariputta.
“Welcome indeed has it been for me, My coming into the Buddha’s presence.
“Well then, Ananda, assemble in the attendance hall all the bhikkhus who are living in dependence on Vesali.”
“Well then, Ananda, clear up that same matter yourself.”
“Well then, Ananda, listen and attend closely, I will speak.”
“Well then, Bahiya, purify the very starting point of wholesome states.
“Well then, bhikkhu, purify the very starting point of wholesome states.
“Well then, bhikkhu, sit down in your own seat and ask whatever you wish.”
“Well then, brahmin, I will question you about this matter.
“Well then, brahmin, learn these verses and recite them when the multitude has assembled in the meeting hall with your sons sitting together there:
“Well then, friend, I will make up a simile for you, for some intelligent people here understand the meaning of a statement by means of a simile.
“Well then, friends, pay homage to the Blessed One in my name with your head at his feet and say: ‘Venerable sir, the bhikkhu Vakkali is sick, afflicted, gravely ill; he pays homage to the Blessed One with his head at his feet.’
“Well then, great king, I will question you about this same matter.
“Well then, great king, I will question you about this same matter.
“Well then, has the Venerable Sariputta attained solace in this Dhamma and Discipline?”
“Well then, headman, I will question you about this same matter.
“Well then, headman, I will question you about this.
“Well then, headman, I will question you about this.
“Well then, householder, you should train thus: ‘I will dwell contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Well then, Kassapa, clear up this point yourself.” 
“Well, venerable sir, to whatever extent I wish, secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unwholesome states, I enter and dwell in the first jhana, which is accompanied by thought and examination, with rapture and happiness born of seclusion.
“Well-spoken counsel is hard to understand
“What advantage do those devatas see, master, that they speak to you thus?”
“What are oxen to you, Evil One?”
“What are the five fearful animosities that have subsided?
“What are the four factors of stream-entry that he possesses?
“What are the four?
“What decays, what does not decay?
“What did I say that makes you speak to me thus.”
“What do you think I call a little hut?
“What do you think, Ananda, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Ananda, is the eye permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Ananda, which is more difficult and challenging: to shoot arrows from a distance through a very small keyhole, head through butt, without missing, or to pierce with the arrowhead the tip of a hair split into seven strands?” 
“What do you think, Anuradha, do you regard form as the Tathagata?” - “No, venerable sir.” - “Do you regard feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness as the Tathagata?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Anuradha, do you regard form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness as the Tathagata?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Anuradha, do you regard the Tathagata as in form?” - “No, venerable sir.” - “Do you regard the Tathagata as apart from form?” - “No, venerable sir.” - “Do you regard the Tathagata as in feeling?
“What do you think, Anuradha, do you regard the Tathagata as one who is without form, without feeling, without perception, without volitional formations, without consciousness?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Anuradha, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”… - “Therefore … Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’
“What do you think, Assaji, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”… - “Therefore … Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’ 
“What do you think, Bahiya, is the eye permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” …  … “He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more for this state of being.’”
“What do you think, bhikkhu, do you regard the eye thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”
“What do you think, bhikkhu, do you regard the eye thus: ‘This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self’?”
“What do you think, bhikkhu, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”… - “Is feeling permanent or impermanent?… Is perception permanent or impermanent?
“What do you think, bhikkhu, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”… … - “Therefore … Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“What do you think, bhikkhu, is the eye permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, bhikkhu, is the eye permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”… “Is the ear … the mind permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, bhikkhu, is the eye permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”… “Is the ear … the nose … the tongue … the body … the mind … mind-consciousness … mind-contact … whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition—whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant—permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, how is a bhikkhu’s teaching of the Dhamma impure, and how is his teaching of the Dhamma pure?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form permanent or impermanent?
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form permanent or impermanent?
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form permanent or impermanent?
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form permanent or impermanent?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”… - “Therefore … Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”… - “Therefore … Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form … consciousness permanent or impermanent?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form … consciousness permanent or impermanent?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form … consciousness permanent or impermanent?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form … consciousness permanent or impermanent?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form … consciousness permanent or impermanent?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form … consciousness permanent or impermanent?” 
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form … feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”- “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my selfʹ?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is form … … consciousness permanent or impermanent?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is the eye permanent or impermanent?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is the eye permanent or impermanent?” …...
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is the eye...
“What do you think, bhikkhus, which is more: the little bit of soil in my fingernail or the great earth?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus, which is more: the little bit of soil in my fingernail or the great earth?” 
“What do you think, bhikkhus, would that man stop attending to that bowl of oil and out of negligence turn his attention outwards?”
“What do you think, bhikkhus?
“What do you think, bhikkhus?
“What do you think, brahmin, such being the case, is the situation terminable or interminable?”
“What do you think, friend Ananda, is form permanent or impermanent?”… … “Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, do you regard form as the Tathagata?” - “No, friend.” - “Do you regard feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness as the Tathagata?” - “No, friend.”
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, do you regard form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness as the Tathagata?” - “No, friend.” 
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, do you regard the Tathagata as in form?” - “No, friend.” - “Do you regard the Tathagata as apart from form?” - “No, friend.” - “Do you regard the Tathagata as in feeling?
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, do you regard the Tathagata as one who is without form, without feeling, without perception, without volitional formations, without consciousness?” - “No, friend.” 
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, friend.”… - “Therefore … Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’ 
“What do you think, friend Yamaka, when that man had approached that householder or householder’s son and said to him: ‘I would serve you, sir,’ wasn’t he a murderer even then, though the other did not recognize him as ‘my murderer’?
“What do you think, great king?
“What do you think, headman, have you ever seen or heard of such a case?”
“What do you think, headman, have you ever seen or heard of such a case?”
“What do you think, headman, have you ever seen or heard of such a case?”
“What do you think, headman, have you ever seen or heard of such a case?”
“What do you think, headman?
“What do you think, Maluṅkyaputta, do you have any desire, lust, or affection for those forms cognizable by the eye that you have not seen and never saw before, that you do not see and would not think might be seen?” 
“What do you think, Rahula, are forms...
“What do you think, Rahula, is craving for forms...
“What do you think, Rahula, is eye-consciousness … ear-consciousness...
“What do you think, Rahula, is eye-contact … ear-contact … nose-contact...
“What do you think, Rahula, is feeling born of eye-contact...
“What do you think, Rahula, is form...
“What do you think, Rahula, is perception of forms...
“What do you think, Rahula, is the earth element...
“What do you think, Rahula, is the eye permanent or impermanent?” –“Impermanent, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”–“Suffering, venerable sir.”– “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” –“No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Rahula, is the eye permanent or impermanent?” –“Impermanent, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”–“Suffering, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”–“No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Rahula, is volition regarding forms...
“What do you think, Soṇa, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Susı̄ma, is form permanent or impermanent?” –“Impermanent, venerable sir.” –“Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?”–“Suffering, venerable sir.”–“Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?”–“No, venerable sir.”
“What do you think, Tissa, if one is not devoid of lust for form, not devoid of desire, affection, thirst, passion, and craving for it, then with the change and alteration of that form, do sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair arise within?”
“What do you think, Vakkali, is form permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.”… - “Therefore … Seeing thus … He understands: ‘… there is no more for this state of being.’”
“What do you think, venerable sir, which is superior: knowledge or faith?”
“What does womanhood matter at all
“What five?
“What five?
“What five?
“What five?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?
“What four?… … Those who have neglected … Those who have undertaken these four establishments of mindfulness have undertaken the noble path leading to the complete destruction of suffering.”
“What has been lost, friend?”
“What has happened to these people in Rajagaha?
“What has weighed down everything?
“What here is a man’s best treasure?
“What here is a man’s best treasure?
“What is a person’s partner?
“What is declared the deviant path?
“What is given yields pleasant fruit, But not so what is not given.
“What is good by not decaying?
“What is good until old age?
“What is it that produces a person?
“What is it that produces a person?
“What is it that produces a person?
“What is sovereignty in the world?
“What is the best of things that rise up?
“What is the cause and condition, venerable sir, for the manifestation of the form aggregate?
“What is the friend of one on a journey?
“What is the scaffolding of verses?
“What is the source of light in the world?
“What is the source of lust and hatred?
“What is the support of human beings?
“What is the token of a chariot?
“What is this Dhamma exposition called, venerable sir?”
“What is this Dhamma exposition called, venerable sir?”
“What is well spoken, the good say, is foremost;
“What kind of conversation did you have with them, Master Kaccana?”
“What kind of Dhamma talk did the Venerable Mahamoggallana have with the Blessed One?”
“What Noble Eightfold Path?
“What Noble Eightfold Path?
“What Noble Eightfold Path?
“What Noble Eightfold Path?
“What Noble Eightfold Path?
“What Noble Eightfold Path?
“What Noble Eightfold Path?
“What Noble Eightfold Path?
“What Noble Eightfold Path?
“What now, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One?”
“What now, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One?”
“What now, friend, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One?”
“What nurtures both the slack and active
“What others speak of as happiness, That the noble ones say is suffering;
“What secures provisions for a journey?
“What seven?
“What seven?
“What seven?
“What should he not give who loves the good?
“What then, Master Kaccana, is the cause and reason why this has not been declared by the Blessed One?”
“What wise man here would seek to define
“What wise man here would seek to define
“What, bhikkhus, is the development of the four establishments of mindfulness?
“What, friend, is difficult to do by one who has found delight?”
“What, friend, is difficult to do by one who has gone forth?”
“What, headman, is the cause and reason why in relation to some people in Uruvelakappa sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair would arise in you if they were to be executed, imprisoned, fined, or censured, while in regard to others no such sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair would arise in you?”
“What, householders, is the Dhamma exposition applicable to oneself?
“What, Master Gotama, is the cause and reason why, when wanderers of other sects are asked such questions, they give such answers as: ‘The world is eternal’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“What, Master Gotama, is the cause and reason why, when wanderers of other sects are asked such questions, they give such answers as: ‘The world is eternal’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’?
“What, Master Moggallana, is the cause and reason why, when wanderers of other sects are asked such questions, they give such answers as: ‘The world is eternal’ or ‘The world is not eternal’; or ‘The world is finite’ or ‘The world is infinite’; or ‘The soul and the body are the same’ or ‘The soul is one thing, the body is another’; or ‘The Tathagata exists after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death,’ or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’?
“What, Master Moggallana, is the cause and reason why, when wanderers of other sects are asked such questions, they give such answers as: ‘The world is eternal’ … or ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death’?
“What, venerable sir, is the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form?
“What, venerable sir, is the purpose of seeing rightly?”
“What, you sleep?
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins at present regard that in the world with a pleasant and agreeable nature as impermanent, as suffering, as nonself, as a disease, as fearful: they are abandoning craving.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins at present regard that in the world with a pleasant and agreeable nature as permanent, as happiness, as self, as healthy, as secure: they are nurturing craving.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins in the future will regard that in the world with a pleasant and agreeable nature as impermanent, as suffering, as nonself, as a disease, as fearful: they will abandon craving.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins in the future will regard that in the world with a pleasant and agreeable nature as permanent, as happiness, as self, as healthy, as secure: they will nurture craving.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins … As to those consummate ones, there is no round for describing them.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins … As to those consummate ones, there is no round for describing them.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins … As to those consummate ones, there is no round for describing them.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins … … As to those consummate ones, there is no round for describing them.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins, having thus directly known consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation, are practising for the purpose of revulsion towards consciousness, for its fading away and cessation, they are practising well.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins, having thus directly known consciousness, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation, having thus directly known the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of consciousness, are practising for the purpose of revulsion towards consciousness, for its fading away and cessation, they are practising well.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins, having thus directly known feeling, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation, are practising for the purpose of revulsion towards feeling, for its fading away and cessation, they are practising well.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins, having thus directly known feeling, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation, having thus directly known the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of feeling, are practising for the purpose of revulsion towards feeling, for its fading away and cessation, they are practising well.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins, having thus directly known form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation, are practising for the purpose of revulsion towards form, for its fading away and cessation, they are practising well.
“Whatever ascetics and brahmins, having thus directly known form, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation, having thus directly known the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of form, are practising for the purpose of revulsion towards form, for its fading away and cessation, they are practising well.
“Whatever ascetics or brahmins at present wield the various kinds of spiritual power, such that: having been one, they become many … they exercise mastery with the body as far as the brahma world—all do so because they have developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power.
“Whatever ascetics or brahmins in the future will wield the various kinds of spiritual power, such that: having been one, they will become many … … they will exercise mastery with the body as far as the brahma world—all will do so because they will have developed and cultivated the four bases for spiritual power.
“Whatever be the many desires and delights
“Whatever bodily energy there is, is the enlightenment factor of energy; whatever mental energy there is, is also the enlightenment factor of energy.
“Whatever concentration there is accompanied by thought and examination is the enlightenment factor of concentration; whatever concentration there is without thought and examination is also the enlightenment factor of concentration.
“Whatever doubt there is about the internal is a hindrance; whatever doubt there is about the external is also a hindrance.
“Whatever equanimity there is regarding things internal is the enlightenment factor of equanimity; whatever equanimity there is regarding things external is also the enlightenment factor of equanimity.
“Whatever exists here on earth and in space, Comprised by form, included in the world—
“Whatever feeling … Whatever perception … Whatever volitional formations … Whatever consciousness has been born, has become manifest: the term, label, and description ‘is’ applies to it, not the term ‘was’ or the term ‘will be.’
“Whatever feeling … Whatever perception … Whatever volitional formations … Whatever consciousness has not been born, has not become manifest: the term, label, and description ‘will be’ applies to it, not the term ‘is’ or the term ‘was.’
“Whatever feeling … Whatever perception … Whatever volitional formations … Whatever consciousness has passed, ceased, changed: the term, label, and description ‘was’ applies to it, not the term ‘is’ or the term ‘will be.’
“Whatever form, bhikkhus, has been born, has become manifest: the term, label, and description ‘is’ applies to it, not the term ‘was’ or the term ‘will be.’
“Whatever form, bhikkhus, has not been born, has not become manifest: the term, label, and description ‘will be’ applies to it, not the term ‘is’ or the term ‘was.’
“Whatever form, bhikkhus, has passed, ceased, changed: the term, label, and description ‘was’ applies to it, not the term ‘is’ or the term ‘will be.’
“Whatever forms exist here or beyond, And those of luminous beauty in the sky, All these, indeed, you praise, Namuci, Like bait thrown out for catching fish.” 
“Whatever ill will there is towards the internal is a hindrance; whatever ill will there is towards the external is also a hindrance.
“Whatever is subject to disintegration, Ananda, is called the world in the Noble One’s Discipline.
“Whatever kind of form there is, bhikkhu, whether past, future, or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near: this is called the form aggregate.
“Whatever may be attained by a disciple
“Whatever mindfulness there is of things internal is the enlightenment factor of mindfulness; whatever mindfulness there is of things external is also the enlightenment factor of mindfulness.
“Whatever rapture there is accompanied by thought and examination is the enlightenment factor of rapture; whatever rapture there is without thought and examination is also the enlightenment factor of rapture.
“Whatever restlessness there is, is a hindrance; whatever remorse there is, is also a hindrance.
“Whatever sensual desire there is for the internal is a hindrance; whatever sensual desire there is for the external is also a hindrance.
“Whatever sloth there is, is a hindrance; whatever torpor there is, is also a hindrance.
“Whatever the fools may expect from others, Even that they do not obtain.
“Whatever tranquillity of body there is, is the enlightenment factor of tranquillity; whatever tranquillity of mind there is, is also the enlightenment factor of tranquillity.
“Whatever, bhikkhus, is the extent of the aggregates, the elements, and the sense bases, he does not conceive that, does not conceive in that, does not conceive from that, does not conceive, ‘That is mine.’
“Whatever, bhikkhus, is the extent of the aggregates, the elements, and the sense bases, he does not conceive that, does not conceive in that, does not conceive from that, does not conceive, ‘That is mine.’
“When a bhikkhu dwells thus, forms overwhelm him; he does not overwhelm forms.
“When a bhikkhu dwells thus, he overwhelms forms; forms do not overwhelm him.
“When a bhikkhu here often dwells thus, With five floods crossed, he here has crossed the sixth.
“When a bhikkhu is an arahant, Consummate, with taints destroyed, One who bears his final body, Is it because he has come upon conceit
“When a bhikkhu is conducting himself thus and dwelling thus, kings or royal ministers, friends or colleagues, relatives or kinsmen, might invite him to accept wealth, saying: ‘Come, good man, why let these saffron robes weigh you down?
“When a fire burns down a forest—
“When a man is always mindful, Knowing moderation in the food he eats, His ailments then diminish:
“When a man is always mindful...
“When a mortal righteously supports his parents, Because of this service to them
“When a person has taken birth
“When a person has taken birth
“When a person is rough and fierce, Badly soiled like a nursing cloth, I have nothing to say to him;
“When a person supports his parents, And respects the family elders;
“When a ship was seized on the river Ganges
“When an individual possesses four things, Godha, I recognize him as a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination.
“When an individual possesses three things, Mahanama, I recognize him as a stream-enterer, one no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.
“When any ascetics and brahmins do not, on the basis of feeling … on the basis of perception … on the basis of volitional formations … on the basis of consciousness—which is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change—regard themselves thus: ‘I am superior,’ or ‘I am equal,’ or ‘I am inferior,’ what is that due to apart from seeing things as they really are?
“When any ascetics and brahmins, on the basis of feeling … on the basis of perception … on the basis of volitional formations … on the basis of consciousness—which is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change—regard themselves thus: ‘I am superior,’ or ‘I am equal,’ or ‘I am inferior,’ what is that due to apart from not seeing things as they really are?
“When common people of proliferated perception
“When he achieves the cure of both—
“When he feels a feeling terminating with the body, he understands: ‘I feel a feeling terminating with the body.’
“When he feels a feeling terminating with the body, he understands: ‘I feel a feeling terminating with the body.’
“When he feels a feeling terminating with the body, he understands: ‘I feel a feeling terminating with the body.’
“When he feels a feeling terminating with the body, he understands: ‘I feel a feeling terminating with the body.’
“When he gives a gift of a righteous gain
“When he is energetic and resolute, Always firm in his exertion, Aspiring to attain Nibbana, Why trouble one gone forth?” 
“When he speaks in such a way, friend Ananda, I would not say anything about the Venerable Narada except what is good and favourable.” 
“When he speaks in such a way, venerable sir, I would not say anything about Mahanama the Sakyan except what is good and favourable.” 
“When he speaks like that, Godha, what would you say about Mahanama the Sakyan?”
“When his energy is aroused, there arises in him spiritual rapture.
“When his energy is aroused, there arises in him spiritual rapture.
“When I had said this, the Blessed One said to me: ‘Kassapa, if one who does not know and see should say to a disciple so single-minded as yourself: “I know, I see,” his head would split.
“When I had thus gone forth, I was travelling along a road when I saw the Blessed One sitting by the Bahuputta Shrine between Rajagaha and Nalanda.
“When it occurred to Vepacitti: ‘The devas are righteous, the asuras are unrighteous; now right here I have gone to the city of the devas,’ he then saw himself freed from the bonds around his limbs and neck and he enjoyed himself furnished and endowed with the five cords of divine sensual pleasure.
“When kindling wood, brahmin, do not imagine
“When one attends carefully, bhikkhus, unarisen sensual desire does not arise and arisen sensual desire is abandoned.
“When one conducts oneself by Dhamma
“When one has confidence in the Saṅgha
“When one has confidence in the Saṅgha
“When one has faith in the Tathagata, Unshakable and well established, And good conduct built on virtue, Dear to the noble ones and praised;
“When one has faith in the Tathagata, Unshakable and well established, And good conduct built on virtue, Dear to the noble ones and praised;
“When one has understood the impermanence of feeling … of perception … of volitional formations … of consciousness, its change, fading away, and cessation, and when one sees as it really is with correct wisdom thus: ‘In the past and also now all consciousness is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change,’ then sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair are abandoned.
“When one is seized by the End-maker
“When one knows and sees thus, bhikkhu, then in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit no longer occur within.”
“When one knows and sees thus, Radha, then in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit no longer occur within.”
“When one knows and sees thus, Rahula, then in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit no longer occur within.”
“When one knows and sees thus, Rahula, then in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, I-making, mine-making, and the underlying tendency to conceit no longer occur within.” 
“When one knows and sees thus, Rahula, then in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, the mind is rid of I-making, mine-making, and conceit, has transcended discrimination, and is peaceful and well liberated.”
“When one knows and sees thus, Rahula, then in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, the mind is rid of I-making, mine-making, and conceit, has transcended discrimination, and is peaceful and well liberated.”
“When one knows and sees thus, Suradha, then in regard to this body with consciousness and in regard to all external signs, the mind is rid of I-making, mine-making, and conceit, has transcended discrimination, and is peaceful and well liberated.”
“When one sees this thus as it really is with correct wisdom, one holds no more views concerning the past.
“When one’s house is ablaze
“When people were abducted at Antelope Bank, You released the captives being led away.
“When recollecting thus, bhikkhus: ‘I had such form in the past,’ it is just form that one recollects.
“When Sanu has awakened tell him
“When shall I see Nanda as a forest dweller, Wearing robes stitched from rags, Subsisting on the scraps of strangers, 
“When she grows here in faith and virtue, In wisdom, generosity, and learning, The virtuous woman lay disciple
“When that consciousness is unestablished, not coming to growth, nongenerative, it is liberated.
“When that consciousness is unestablished, not coming to growth, nongenerative, it is liberated.
“When that consciousness is unestablished, not coming to growth, nongenerative, it is liberated.
“When the Blessed One speaks of Nibbana, Release from all the knots, There has arisen within me
“When the Buddha, through direct knowledge, Sets in motion the Wheel of Dhamma, The peerless Teacher in this world
“When the course of teaching is proclaimed by me, “Those meditators who train therein, Being diligent at the proper time, Will not come under Death’s control.”
“When the Dhamma has been so well taught, What negligence is there for those who understand it?
“When the Dhamma has been taught by me in such a way through methods of exposition, it may be expected of those who will not concede, allow, and approve of what is well stated and well spoken by others that they will become contentious and quarrelsome and engage in disputes, and that they will dwell stabbing each other with verbal daggers.
“When the Dhamma is rightly expounded
“When the lion, the king of beasts, roars, whatever animals hear the sound are for the most part filled with fear, a sense of urgency, and terror.
“When the mind is thus well developed in six, If touched, one’s mind never flutters anywhere.
“When the uninstructed worldling is contacted by a painful bodily feeling, he sorrows, grieves, and laments; he weeps and beats his breast and becomes distraught.
“When the wise man is in the midst of fools
“When there are utterly no volitional formations, with the cessation of volitional formations, would consciousness be discerned?” “No, venerable sir.”
“When there is feeling … When there is perception … When there are volitional formations … When there is consciousness, Radha, there might be Mara, or the killer, or the one who is killed.
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, identity view arises.
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, one regards things thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘I might not be, and it might not be for me; I will not be, it will not be for me.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘I might not be, and it might not be for me; I will not be, it will not be for me.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘That which is the self is the world; having passed away, that I shall be—permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘That which is the self is the world; having passed away, that I shall be—permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change’ When there is feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, by clinging to consciousness, by adhering to consciousness, such a view as this arises: ‘That which is the self is the world … not subject to change.’ …
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘The winds do not blow … but stand as steady as a pillar.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘The winds do not blow … but stand as steady as a pillar.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘The winds do not blow … but stand as steady as a pillar.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘The winds do not blow … but stand as steady as a pillar.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, such a view as this arises: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self.’
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, the fetters, adherences, and shackles arise.
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, view of self arises.
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, by adhering to form, wrong view arises.
“When there is form, bhikkhus, by clinging to form, pleasure and pain arise internally.
“When there is form, bhikkhus, when there is feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, by clinging to consciousness, by adhering to consciousness, such a view as this arises: ‘The world is eternal.’… …
“When there is form, bhikkhus, when there is feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, by clinging to consciousness, by adhering to consciousness, such a view as this arises: ‘There are these seven bodies that are unmade … the foolish and the wise, by unwinding, flee from pleasure and pain.’… …
“When there is form, bhikkhus, when there is feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, by clinging to consciousness, by adhering to consciousness, such a view as this arises: ‘There is no cause or condition for the defilement of beings … they experience pleasure and pain in the six classes.’…
“When there is form, bhikkhus, when there is feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, by clinging to consciousness, by adhering to consciousness, such a view as this arises: ‘There is nothing given … … after death they do not exist.’…
“When there is form, bhikkhus, when there is feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness, by clinging to consciousness, by adhering to consciousness, such a view as this arises: ‘When one acts or makes others act … there is no merit and no outcome of merit.’…
“When there is form, Radha, there might be Mara, or the killer, or the one who is killed.
“When there is the eye, bhikkhus, by clinging to the eye, by adhering to the eye, the thought occurs: ‘I am superior’ or ‘I am equal’ or ‘I am inferior.’
“When there is the eye, bhikkhus, by clinging to the eye, pleasure and pain arise internally.
“When there is utterly no consciousness, with the cessation of consciousness, would name-and-form be discerned?”
“When there is utterly no name-and-form … no six sense bases......
“When they give out of faith
“When they give out of faith
“When this was said, bhikkhus, a certain devata replied to that devata in verse:
“When this was said, great king, I told the bhikkhu Ananda: ‘Not so, Ananda!
“When touched by pleasant contact do not be enthralled, Do not tremble when touched by pain.
“When vitality, heat, and consciousness
“When you are asked, ‘Ascetic, do you eat facing downwards?’… ‘Do you eat facing the intermediate directions?’ you reply, ‘I don’t eat thus, sister.’
“When you have answered thus, friends, there may be wise khattiyas … wise ascetics who will question you further—for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘Having seen what benefit does your teacher teach the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness?’
“When you have answered thus, friends, there may be wise khattiyas … wise ascetics who will question you further—for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘Having seen what danger does your teacher teach the removal of desire and lust for form, the removal of desire and lust for feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness?’
“When you have answered thus, friends, there may be wise khattiyas … wise ascetics who will question you further—for wise people, friends, are inquisitive: ‘In regard to what does your teacher teach the removal of desire and lust?’
“When you reflect, bhikkhus, you should reflect: ‘This is suffering’; you should reflect: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; you should reflect: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; you should reflect: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
“When you reflect, bhikkhus, you should reflect: ‘This is suffering’; you should reflect: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; you should reflect: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; you should reflect: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
“When you sniff this lotus flower, An item that has not been given, This is one factor of theft:
“When you talk, bhikkhus, you should talk about: ‘This is suffering’; you should talk about: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; you should talk about: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; you should talk about: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
“When you talk, bhikkhus, you should talk about: ‘This is suffering’; you should talk about: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; you should talk about: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; you should talk about: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
“When you think, bhikkhus, you should think: ‘This is suffering’; you should think: ‘This is the origin of suffering’; you should think: ‘This is the cessation of suffering’; you should think: ‘This is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.’
“When, Ananda, one dwells contemplating danger in things that can be clung to, craving ceases.
“When, Ananda, the Tathagata immerses the body in the mind and the mind in the body, and when he dwells having entered upon a blissful perception and a buoyant perception in regard to the body, on that occasion the body of the Tathagata becomes more buoyant, malleable, wieldy, and luminous.
“When, Ananda, the Tathagata immerses the body in the mind and the mind in the body, and when he dwells having entered upon a blissful perception and a buoyant perception in regard to the body, on that occasion the body of the Tathagata rises up without difficulty from the earth into the air.
“When, Anuruddha, a woman possesses five qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, she is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
“When, Anuruddha, a woman possesses five qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, she is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
“When, Anuruddha, a woman possesses five qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, she is reborn in a good destination, in a heavenly world.
“When, Anuruddha, a woman possesses five qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, she is reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“When, Anuruddha, a woman possesses five qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, she is reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“When, Anuruddha, a woman possesses five qualities, with the breakup of the body, after death, she is reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“When, Bahiya, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, you develop these four establishments of mindfulness in such a way, then whether night or day comes, you may expect only growth in wholesome states, not decline.” 
“When, bhikkhu, a bhikkhu knows and sees thus, ignorance is abandoned by him and true knowledge arises.”
“When, bhikkhu, a bhikkhu knows and sees thus, ignorance is abandoned by him and true knowledge arises.”
“When, bhikkhu, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, you develop these four establishments of mindfulness in such a way, then, whether night or day comes, you may expect only growth in wholesome states, not decline.”
“When, bhikkhu, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, you develop these four establishments of mindfulness in such a way, then, whether night or day comes, you may expect only growth in wholesome states, not decline.”
“When, bhikkhu, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, you develop these four establishments of mindfulness thus in a threefold way, then, whether night or day comes, you may expect only growth in wholesome states, not decline.”
“When, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu has abandoned the underlying tendency to lust in regard to pleasant feeling, the underlying tendency to aversion in regard to painful feeling, and the underlying tendency to ignorance in regard to neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, then he is called a bhikkhu without underlying tendencies,  one who sees rightly.
“When, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu has seen pleasant feeling as painful, painful feeling as a dart, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling as impermanent, he is called a bhikkhu who sees rightly.
“When, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is thus liberated in mind, the devas together with Indra, Brahma, and Pajapati pay homage to him from afar: 
“When, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu thus understands aging-and-death, its origin, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation; when he thus understands birth...
“When, bhikkhus, a carpenter or a carpenter’s apprentice looks at the handle of his adze, he sees the impressions of his fingers and his thumb, but he does not know: ‘So much of the adze handle has been worn away today, so much yesterday, so much earlier.’
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases … he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases … he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases … he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases … he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases … he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases … he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases … he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination.” 
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases … … he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases, and when, further, he has abandoned perplexity about suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the way leading to the cessation of suffering, he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has abandoned perplexity in these six cases, and when, further, he has abandoned perplexity about suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the way leading to the cessation of suffering, he is then called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.” 
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has clearly seen with correct wisdom as it really is this dependent origination and these dependently arisen phenomena, it is impossible that he will run back into the past, thinking: ‘Did I exist in the past?
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has purified and cleansed these two kinds of knowledge—knowledge of the principle and knowledge of entailment—he is then called a noble disciple who is accomplished in view, accomplished in vision, who has arrived at this true Dhamma, who sees this true Dhamma, who possesses a trainee’s knowledge, a trainee’s true knowledge, who has entered the stream of the Dhamma, a noble one with penetrative wisdom, one who stands squarely before the door to the Deathless.
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple has purified and cleansed these two kinds of knowledge—knowledge of the principle and knowledge of entailment—he is then called a noble disciple who is accomplished in view...
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple listens to the Dhamma with eager ears, attending to it as a matter of vital concern, directing his whole mind to it, on that occasion the five hindrances are not present in him; on that occasion the seven factors of enlightenment go to fulfilment by development.
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple listens to the Dhamma with eager ears, attending to it as a matter of vital concern, directing his whole mind to it, on that occasion these five hindrances are not present in him; on that occasion these seven factors of enlightenment go to fulfilment by development.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses these four streams of merit, streams of the wholesome, it is not easy to take the measure of his merit thus: ‘Just so much is his stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, nutriment of happiness’; rather, it is reckoned as an incalculable, immeasurable, great mass of merit.
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses these four streams of merit, streams of the wholesome, it is not easy to take the measure of his merit thus: ‘Just so much is his stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, nutriment of happiness’; rather, it is reckoned as an incalculable, immeasurable, great mass of merit.
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses these four streams of merit, streams of the wholesome, it is not easy to take the measure of his merit thus: ‘Just so much is his stream of merit, stream of the wholesome, nutriment of happiness’; rather, it is reckoned as an incalculable, immeasurable, great mass of merit.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple possesses these four things, the devas are elated and speak of his similarity.” 
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple thus understands volitional formations, their origin, their cessation, and the way leading to their cessation, this is his knowledge of the principle.
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple understands as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five faculties, then he is called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.” 
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple understands as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five faculties, then he is called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.” 
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple understands as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these six faculties, then he is called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple understands as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five aggregates subject to clinging, then he is called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple understands as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five faculties, then he is called a noble disciple who is a stream-enterer, no longer bound to the nether world, fixed in destiny, with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple … with enlightenment as his destination.”
“When, bhikkhus, a noble disciple … with enlightenment as his destination.” 
“When, bhikkhus, having understood as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five faculties, a bhikkhu is liberated by nonclinging, then he is called a bhikkhu who is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached his own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, one completely liberated through final knowledge.”
“When, bhikkhus, having understood as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five faculties, a bhikkhu is liberated by nonclinging, then he is called a bhikkhu who is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached his own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, one completely liberated through final knowledge.” 
“When, bhikkhus, having understood as they really are the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these six faculties, a bhikkhu is liberated by nonclinging, then he is called a bhikkhu who is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached his own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, one completely liberated through final knowledge.”
“When, bhikkhus, having understood as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five aggregates subject to clinging, a bhikkhu is liberated by nonclinging, then he is called a bhikkhu who is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, who has lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached his own goal, utterly destroyed the fetters of existence, one completely liberated through final knowledge.”
“When, bhikkhus, having understood as they really are the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of these five faculties, a bhikkhu is liberated by nonclinging, then he is called a bhikkhu who is an arahant … one completely liberated through final knowledge.”
“When, bhikkhus, mindfulness of breathing has been developed and cultivated in this way, one of two fruits may be expected: either final knowledge in this very life or, if there is a residue of clinging, the state of nonreturning.”
“When, bhikkhus, mindfulness of breathing has been developed and cultivated in this way, seven fruits and benefits may be expected.
“When, bhikkhus, mindfulness of breathing has been developed and cultivated in this way, these seven fruits and benefits may be expected.”
“When, bhikkhus, one dwells contemplating danger in things that can be clung to, craving ceases.
“When, bhikkhus, one dwells contemplating danger in things that can fetter, craving ceases.
“When, bhikkhus, one dwells contemplating danger in things that can fetter, there is no descent of consciousness.
“When, bhikkhus, one dwells contemplating danger in things that can fetter, there is no descent of name-and-form.
“When, bhikkhus, Sakka, lord of the devas, spoke this verse, the devas applauded but the asuras were silent.
“When, bhikkhus, the concentration by mindfulness of breathing has been developed and cultivated in this way, if he feels a pleasant feeling, he understands: ‘It is impermanent’; he understands: ‘It is not held to’; he understands: ‘It is not delighted in.’
“When, bhikkhus, the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu wields the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, he becomes many … he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world….
“When, bhikkhus, the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu wields the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one … he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world….
“When, bhikkhus, the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.”
“When, bhikkhus, the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.”
“When, bhikkhus, the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, they are of great fruit and benefit.
“When, bhikkhus, the seven factors of enlightenment have been developed and cultivated in this way, these seven fruits and benefits may be expected.”
“When, bhikkhus, there are no hands, picking up and putting down are not discerned.
“When, bhikkhus, there are no hands, there is no picking up and putting down….
“When, bhikkhus, these five faculties have been developed and cultivated, one of two fruits may be expected: either final knowledge in this very life or, if there is a residue of clinging, the state of nonreturning.” 
“When, bhikkhus, these five faculties have been developed and cultivated, seven fruits and benefits may be expected.
“When, bhikkhus, these five faculties have been developed and cultivated, these seven fruits and benefits may be expected.”
“When, bhikkhus, these four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated, one of two fruits may be expected: either final knowledge in this very life or, if there is a residue of clinging, the state of nonreturning.”
“When, bhikkhus, these four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated, seven fruits and benefits may be expected.
“When, bhikkhus, these four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated, these seven fruits and benefits may be expected.”
“When, bhikkhus, these four establishments of mindfulness have been developed and cultivated, one of two fruits may be expected: either final knowledge in this very life or, if there is a residue of clinging, the state of nonreturning.”
“When, bhikkhus, these verses were spoken by Sakka, lord of the devas, the devas applauded but the asuras were silent.
“When, bhikkhus, Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, spoke this verse, the asuras applauded but the devas were silent.
“When, bhikkhus, Vepacitti, lord of the asuras, spoke this verse, the asuras applauded but the devas were silent.
“When, bhikkhus, you dwell guarding the doors of the sense faculties, Mara the Evil One, failing to gain access to you, will lose interest in you and depart, just as the jackal departed from the tortoise.” 
“When, by breaking ignorance with knowledge
“When, by the removal of desire and lust
“When, firmly mindful, one enjoys a taste, One is not inflamed by lust for tastes;...
“When, firmly mindful, one feels a contact, One is not inflamed by lust for contacts;...
“When, firmly mindful, one hears a sound, One is not inflamed by lust for sounds; … 
“When, firmly mindful, one knows an object, One is not inflamed by lust for objects;...
“When, firmly mindful, one sees a form, One is not inflamed by lust for forms;
“When, firmly mindful, one smells an odour, One is not inflamed by lust for odours;...
“When, friend, a bhikkhu understands as it really is the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of the six bases for contact, in this way he has attained consolation.”
“When, friend, a bhikkhu understands as it really is: ‘Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation,’ in this way his vision is well purified.”
“When, friend, a bhikkhu understands as they really are the origin and the passing away of the five aggregates subject to clinging, in this way his vision is well purified.”
“When, friend, a bhikkhu understands as they really are the origin and the passing away of the four great elements, in this way his vision is well purified.”
“When, friend, a bhikkhu understands as they really are the origin and the passing away of the six bases for contact, in this way his vision is well purified.” 
“When, friend, having understood as it really is the origin and the passing away, the gratification, the danger, and the escape in the case of the six bases for contact, a bhikkhu is liberated by nonclinging, in this way he has attained supreme consolation.”
“When, great king, you are dwelling diligently, with diligence for support, you yourself will be guarded and protected, your retinue of harem women will be guarded and protected, your treasury and storehouse will be guarded and protected.
“When, great king, you are dwelling diligently, with diligence for support, your retinue of harem women will think thus: ‘The king dwells diligently, with diligence for support.
“When, great king, you are dwelling diligently, with diligence for support, your retinue of khattiya vassals will think thus … your troops will think thus...
“When, great king, you have good friends, good companions, good comrades, you should dwell with one thing for support: diligence in wholesome states.
“When, householder, these five fearful animosities have subsided in a noble disciple, and he possesses these four factors of stream-entry, and he has clearly seen and thoroughly penetrated with wisdom this noble method, if he wishes he could by himself declare of himself: ‘I am one finished with hell, finished with the animal realm, finished with the domain of ghosts, finished with the plane of misery, the bad destinations, the nether world.
“When, householders, the noble disciple possesses these seven good qualities and these four desirable states, if he wishes he could by himself declare of himself: ‘I am one finished with hell, finished with the animal realm, finished with the domain of ghosts, finished with the plane of misery, the bad destinations, the nether world.
“When, Kuṇḍaliya, after he has seen a form with the eye, a bhikkhu’s body is steady and his mind is steady, inwardly well composed and well liberated in regard to both agreeable and disagreeable forms; when, after he has heard a sound with the ear … smelt an odour with the nose...
“When, Mahanama, a lay follower abstains from the destruction of life, from taking what is not given, from sexual misconduct, from false speech, and from wines, liquor, and intoxicants that are a basis for negligence, the lay follower is accomplished in virtue.”
“When, Mahanama, one has gone for refuge to the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, one is then a lay follower.”
“When, Uttiya, based upon virtue, established upon virtue, you develop these four establishments of mindfulness in such a way, you will go beyond the realm of Death.”
“When, Vaccha, a being has laid down this body but has not yet been reborn in another body, I declare that it is fuelled by craving.
“When, Vaccha, a flame is flung by the wind and goes some distance, I declare that it is fuelled by the wind.
“Whenever one discriminates things internally with wisdom, examines them, makes an investigation of them, that is the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states; whenever one discriminates things externally with wisdom, examines them, makes an investigation of them, that is also the enlightenment factor of discrimination of states.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating feelings in feelings … mind in mind … phenomena in phenomena, on that occasion unmuddled mindfulness is established in that bhikkhu.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, on that occasion unmuddled mindfulness is established in that bhikkhu.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu trains thus: ‘Contemplating impermanence, I will breathe in’ … when he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out’—on that occasion the bhikkhu dwells contemplating phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu trains thus: ‘Contemplating impermanence, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Contemplating impermanence, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Contemplating fading away, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Contemplating fading away, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Contemplating cessation, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Contemplating cessation, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out’—on that occasion the bhikkhu dwells contemplating phenomena in phenomena, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu trains thus: ‘Experiencing rapture, I will breathe in’ … when he trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the mental formation, I will breathe out’—on that occasion the bhikkhu dwells contemplating feelings in feelings, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu trains thus: ‘Experiencing rapture, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Experiencing rapture, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Experiencing happiness, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Experiencing happiness, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Experiencing the mental formation, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Experiencing the mental formation, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the mental formation, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the mental formation, I will breathe out’—on that occasion the bhikkhu dwells contemplating feelings in feelings, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu trains thus: ‘Experiencing the mind, I will breathe in’ … when he trains thus: ‘Liberating the mind, I will breathe out’—on that occasion the bhikkhu dwells contemplating mind in mind, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu trains thus: ‘Experiencing the mind, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Experiencing the mind, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Gladdening the mind, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Gladdening the mind, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Concentrating the mind, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Concentrating the mind, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Liberating the mind, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Liberating the mind, I will breathe out’—on that occasion the bhikkhu dwells contemplating mind in mind, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu, when breathing in long, knows: ‘I breathe in long’ … … when he trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the bodily formation, I will breathe out’—on that occasion the bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Whenever, Ananda, a bhikkhu, when breathing in long, knows: ‘I breathe in long’; or, when breathing out long, knows: ‘I breathe out long’; when breathing in short, knows: ‘I breathe in short’; or, when breathing out short, knows: ‘I breathe out short’; when he trains thus: ‘Experiencing the whole body, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Experiencing the whole body, I will breathe out’; when he trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the bodily formation, I will breathe in’; when he trains thus: ‘Tranquillizing the bodily formation, I will breathe out’—on that occasion the bhikkhu dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, mindful, having removed covetousness and displeasure in regard to the world.
“Whenever, Ananda, by nonattention to all signs and by the cessation of certain feelings, the Tathagata enters and dwells in the signless concentration of mind, on that occasion, Ananda, the body of the Tathagata is more comfortable.
“Where is that venerable one now dwelling, venerable sir?”
“Where name-and-form ceases, Stops without remainder, And also impingement and perception of form:
“Where name-and-form ceases, Stops without remainder, And also impingement and perception of form:
“Where name-and-form ceases, Stops without remainder:
“Where should one give a proper gift?
“Where terrible serpents glide, Where lightning flashes and the sky thunders, In the thick darkness of the night
“Where there is no ear … no mind, no mental phenomena, no mind-consciousness, no things to be cognized by mind-consciousness, there Mara does not exist nor any description of Mara.”
“Where there is no ear … no mind, no mental phenomena, no mind-consciousness, no things to be cognized by mind-consciousness, there the world does not exist nor any description of the world.”
“Where there is no eye, Samiddhi, no forms, no eye-consciousness, no things to be cognized by eye-consciousness, there Mara does not exist nor any description of Mara.
“Where there is no eye, Samiddhi, no forms, no eye-consciousness, no things to be cognized by eye-consciousness, there the world does not exist nor any description of the world.
“Where there is the ear … the mind, where there are mental phenomena, mind-consciousness, things to be cognized by mind-consciousness, there Mara exists or the description of Mara.
“Where there is the ear … the mind, where there are mental phenomena, mind-consciousness, things to be cognized by mind-consciousness, there the world exists or the description of the world.
“Where there is the eye, Samiddhi, where there are forms, eye-consciousness, things to be cognized by eye-consciousness, there Mara exists or the description of Mara.
“Where there is the eye, Samiddhi, where there are forms, eye-consciousness, things to be cognized by eye-consciousness, there the world exists or the description of the world.
“Where water, earth, fire, and air, Do not gain a footing:
“Wherever one’s mind has confidence, great king.” 
“Whether he is showered with honour, Shown dishonour, or offered both, His concentration does not vacillate
“Whether in a village or forest, In a valley or on the plain—
“Whether khattiya, brahmin, vessa, sudda, Caṇḍala or scavenger, If one is energetic and resolute, Always firm in exertion, One attains the supreme purity:
“Whether or not you understand, friend Susı̄ma, we are liberated by wisdom.”
“Whether you are asked: ‘How is it, Master Gotama: are pleasure and pain created by oneself?’ or ‘Are they created by another?’ or ‘Are they created by both?’ or ‘Are they created by neither?’ in each case you say: ‘Not so, Timbaruka.’
“Whichever of these seven factors of enlightenment I want to dwell in during the morning, I dwell in that factor of enlightenment during the morning.
“While he discriminates that Dhamma with wisdom, examines it, makes an investigation of it, his energy is aroused without slackening.
“While he discriminates that Dhamma with wisdom, examines it, makes an investigation of it, his energy is aroused without slackening.
“While moving across the sky, O Rahu, Do not swallow the radiant one, The maker of light in darkness, The disk of fiery might in the gloom.
“While the sage is seated on the mountain slope, Gone to the far shore of suffering, His disciples sit in attendance on him, Triple-knowledge men who have left Death behind.
“Who are you, friend?”
“Who else apart from the noble ones
“Who here crosses over the flood, Unwearying by day and night?
“Who here in the world are placid?
“Whom do parents and brothers worship
“Whom do they arrest when he takes away?
“Why are so many people here afraid
“Why are you angry?
“Why are you despondent, father?
“Why does their sacrifice, vast and grand, Not share the value of the righteous one’s gift?
“Why don’t you approve of birth?
“Why hasn’t the Blessed One declared this, friend?”
“Why not, venerable sir?
“Why now do you assume ‘a being’?
“Why now do you roar like a lion, Confident in the assembly?
“Why now should I ask this question
“Why now, when your son is dead, Do you sit alone with tearful face?
“Why, Ananda, when Sariputta attained final Nibbana, did he take away your aggregate of virtue, or your aggregate of concentration, or your aggregate of wisdom, or your aggregate of liberation, or your aggregate of the knowledge and vision of liberation?” 
“Why, Rahu, did you come in a hurry?
“Why, Rahu, did you come in a hurry?
“Wisdom is the source of light in the world;
“With a confident heart one should give
“With a liberated mind, I say, Sariputta, one is a great man.
“With confidence in him, free from wavering, 
“With reference to this body
“With the extermination of form, feeling, perception, volitional formations, and consciousness, that bhikkhu, resolving thus: ‘It might not be, and it might not be for me; it will not be, it will not be for me,’ can cut off the lower fetters.” 
“With the manifestation of a Tathagata, bhikkhus, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One, comes the manifestation of the seven gems of the factors of enlightenment.
“With the origination of attention there is the origination of phenomena.
“With the origination of contact there is the origination of feeling.
“With the origination of name-and-form there is the origination of mind.
“With the remainderless fading away and cessation of ignorance, whatever kinds of contortions, manoeuvres, and vacillations there may be—‘What now is birth, and for whom is there this birth?’......
“With those who lead the holy life, Who observe the Uposatha days
“With unshrinking mind
“With what kind of ambrosia of a Dhamma talk did the Blessed One anoint you, householder?”
“With what kind of work are you engaged
“With whom did the Venerable Mahamoggallana have some Dhamma talk?”
“Within him craving no longer lurks, Entangling and binding, to lead him anywhere;
“Without directly knowing and fully understanding the ear … the mind … and whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition … without developing dispassion towards it and abandoning it, one is incapable of destroying suffering.
“Without directly knowing and fully understanding the eye, without developing dispassion towards it and abandoning it, one is incapable of destroying suffering.
“Without having enjoyed you seek alms, bhikkhu, You don’t seek alms after you’ve enjoyed.
“Would one be speaking rightly, headman, if one were to say: ‘Paṭaliya the headman knows the Koliyans’ hirelings with drooping head-dresses, who are immoral, of bad character.
“Wouldn’t they eat that food only for the sake of crossing the desert?”
“Wrong view, venerable sir.”
“Yes, dear sir,” that member of Brahma’s assembly replied.
“Yes, dear sir,” the independent brahma Suddhavasa replied.
“Yes, dear,” the householder Jotika replied, and he approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and delivered his message.
“Yes, friend,” that bhikkhu replied, and he approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
“Yes, friend,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, friend,” the Venerable Elder replied, and he approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
“Yes, friend,” the Venerable Mahacunda replied.
“Yes, friend,” the Venerable Sariputta replied, and he approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
“Yes, friend,” the Venerable Tissa replied, and he approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
“Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied and, having lifted up the Venerable Vakkali on the bed, they carried him to the Black Rock on the Isigili Slope.
“Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied, and then they departed.
“Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied, and they approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
“Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied, and they approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and delivered their message.
“Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied, and they lowered the Venerable Vakkali from the bed.
“Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, friend,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friend.”
“Yes, friends,” the Venerable Dasaka replied, and he approached the Venerable Khemaka and delivered his message.
“Yes, friends,” the Venerable Dasaka replied, and he approached the Venerable Khemaka and delivered his message.
“Yes, friends,” the Venerable Dasaka replied, and he approached the Venerable Khemaka and delivered his message.
“Yes, friends,” the Venerable Dasaka replied, and he approached the Venerable Khemaka and delivered his message.
“Yes, friends,” those bhikkhus replied, and having risen from their seats, they went to the Blessed One.
“Yes, friends,” those bhikkhus replied, and having risen from their seats, they went to the Blessed One.
“Yes, great king, that financier householder has been reborn in the Great Roruva Hell.
“Yes, headman, the Tathagata dwells compassionate towards all living beings.”
“Yes, headman, the Tathagata in many ways praises sympathy for families, the protection of families, compassion for families.”
“Yes, householder.”
“Yes, householder.”
“Yes, householder.”
“Yes, madam,” he replied.
“Yes, madam,” the youth replied.
“Yes, Master Gotama.”
“Yes, master,” that man replied, and he approached the Venerable Ananda, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and delivered his message.
“Yes, master,” that man replied, and he approached the Venerable Sariputta, paid homage to him, sat down to one side, and delivered his message.
“Yes, sir,” those brahmin householders of Bamboo Gate replied.
“Yes, sir.”
“Yes, sir.”
“Yes, sir.”
“Yes, sir.”
“Yes, sire,” the brahmin youth Sudassana replied.
“Yes, sire,” the man replied, but though he traversed the whole of Toraṇavatthu he did not see any ascetic or brahmin there whom King Pasenadi could visit.
“Yes, venerable sir,” Asibandhakaputta the headman replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” Bhadraka the headman replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” Citta the householder replied, and he spread his cloak upon the verandah and scattered a bundle of grass upon it.
“Yes, venerable sir,” Nandiya the Sakyan replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” that bhikkhu replied, and he went to that bhikkhu and told him: “The Teacher calls you, friend.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” that bhikkhu replied, and he went to the Venerable Elder and told him: “The Teacher calls you, friend Elder.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” that bhikkhu replied, and he went to the Venerable Sariputta and told him: “The Teacher calls you, friend Sariputta.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” that bhikkhu replied, and he went to the Venerable Tissa and told him: “The Teacher calls you, friend Tissa.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” that bhikkhu replied, and he went to those bhikkhus and told them: “The Teacher calls the venerable ones.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” that bhikkhu replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the householder Nakulapita replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the novice Cunda replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Ananda replied and, having taken a sitting cloth, he followed closely behind the Blessed One.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Ananda replied, and he assembled in the attendance hall all the bhikkhus who were living in dependence on Vesali, as many as there were.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Ananda replied, and he rose from his seat, paid homage to the Blessed One, and, keeping his right side towards him, sat down nearby at the foot of a tree.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Ananda replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Ananda replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Ariṭṭha replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Mahamoggallana replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Mahamoggallana replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Rahula replied and, having taken a sitting cloth, he followed close behind the Blessed One.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Samiddhi replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Upavaṇa replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” the Venerable Vaṅgisa replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” they replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied, and no one approached the Blessed One except the one who brought him almsfood.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied, and no one approached the Blessed One except the one who brought him almsfood.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied, and no one approached the Blessed One except the one who brought him almsfood.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied, and no one approached the Blessed One except the one who brought him almsfood.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied, and they approached the Venerable Vakkali and said to him: “Friend Vakkali, listen to the word of the Blessed One and two devatas.”
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied, and they entered upon the rains wherever they had friends, acquaintances, and intimates in the vicinity of Vesali, while the Blessed One entered upon the rains right there in Beluvagamaka.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”
“Yes, venerable sir.”… …
“You abstained from sexual intercourse, You were celibate, free from carnal ties.
“You are bound by all the snares
“You are bound by Mara’s snare
“You are so young and beautiful, And I too am a youth in my prime.
“You claim to be a man who works the plough, But I do not see your ploughing.
“You gave drink to many people
“You go, friend Ananda, you’re the busy one with many duties.”
“You go, friend Ananda, you’re the busy one with many duties.” 
“You have all spoken well in a way.
“You have all spoken well in a way.
“You have all spoken well in a way.
“You have gone beyond the range of questioning, brahmin.
“You have gone beyond the range of questioning, Radha.
“You have obtained that human state, bhikkhus; a Tathagata, an Arahant, a Perfectly Enlightened One has arisen in the world; the Dhamma and Discipline proclaimed by the Tathagata shines in the world.
“You have produced demerit, Mara, Having assailed the Tathagata.
“You must abandon discontent, be mindful—
“You said to us: ‘That too is impermanent; that too is unstable; one must abandon that too and pass on.’”
“You should exhort, settle, and establish them in confirmed confidence in the Dhamma … in the Saṅgha … in the virtues dear to the noble ones … leading to concentration.
“You, householder, do not have that distrust towards the Buddha which the uninstructed worldling possesses because of which the latter, with the breakup of the body, after death, is reborn in the plane of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell.
“You, householder, do not have that distrust towards the Dhamma which the uninstructed worldling possesses because of which the latter … is reborn in the plane of misery … in hell.
“You, householder, do not have that distrust towards the Saṅgha which the uninstructed worldling possesses because of which the latter … is reborn in the plane of misery … in hell.
“You, householder, do not have that immorality which the uninstructed worldling possesses because of which the latter … is reborn in the plane of misery … in hell.
“You, householder, do not have that wrong intention … … wrong speech … wrong action … wrong livelihood … wrong effort … wrong mindfulness … wrong concentration … wrong knowledge … wrong liberation which the uninstructed worldling possesses because of which the latter … is reborn in the plane of misery … in hell.
“You, householder, do not have that wrong view which the uninstructed worldling possesses because of which the latter … is reborn in the plane of misery … in hell.
“You’ve wandered on through the long course
“You’ve wandered through the long course
“‘A magician—O Maghava, Sakka, King of devas, Suja’s husband—
“‘A strong post or pillar’: this, bhikkhus, is a designation for mindfulness directed to the body.
“‘All does not exist’: this, brahmin, is the second cosmology.”
“‘All does not exist’: this, brahmin, is the second extreme.
“‘All exists’: Kaccana, this is one extreme.
“‘All exists’: this, brahmin, is one extreme.”
“‘All exists’: this, brahmin, is the oldest cosmology.” 
“‘All is a plurality’: this, brahmin, is the fourth cosmology.
“‘All is a unity’: this, brahmin, is the third cosmology.”
“‘Arouse your energy, strive on!
“‘As long as I live may I be free from anger, and if anger should arise in me may I dispel it quickly.’
“‘As long as I live may I dwell at home with a mind devoid of the stain of stinginess, freely generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishment, devoted to charity, delighting in giving and sharing.’
“‘As long as I live may I not speak divisively.’
“‘As long as I live may I respect the family elders.’
“‘As long as I live may I speak gently.’
“‘As long as I live may I speak the truth.’
“‘As long as I live may I support my parents.’
“‘As Sariputta is supreme
“‘Avoid, O Matali, with your chariot pole
“‘Both devas and human beings
“‘Bring anger under your control;
“‘By the following method too, Ananda, it may be understood how the entire holy life is good friendship, good companionship, good comradeship: by relying upon me as a good friend, Ananda, beings subject to birth are freed from birth; beings subject to aging are freed from aging; beings subject to illness are freed from illness; beings subject to death are freed from death; beings subject to sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair are freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, displeasure, and despair.
“‘Cessation, cessation’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘Cessation, cessation’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.”
“‘Cessation, cessation’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before there arose in the Bodhisatta Vipassı̄ vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.”
“‘Come, friends, dwell contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly comprehending, unified, with limpid mind, concentrated, with one-pointed mind, in order to know the body as it really is.
“‘Crossed over, gone beyond, the brahmin stands on high ground’: this is a designation for the arahant.”
“‘Dart,’ bhikkhus: this is a designation for gain, honour, and praise.
“‘Do not let anger overpower you;
“‘Don’t you know, you fool, That maxim of the arahants?
“‘Faultless’: this, venerable sir, is a designation for the virtues.
“‘Fisherman,’ bhikkhus: this is a designation for Mara the Evil One.
“‘Fools would vent their anger even more
“‘Fools would vent their anger even more
“‘Friends, with form that has been born, that has become manifest, an arising is discerned, a vanishing is discerned, an alteration of that which stands is discerned.
“‘Friends, with form that has not been born, not become manifest, an arising will be discerned, a vanishing will be discerned, an alteration of that which stands will be discerned.
“‘Getting caught in a whirlpool’: this, bhikkhu, is a designation for the five cords of sensual pleasure.
“‘He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy and volitional formations of striving, thinking: “Thus my energy will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.”
“‘He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving, thinking: “Thus my investigation will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.”
“‘He develops the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to mind and volitional formations of striving, thinking: “Thus my mind will be neither too slack nor too tense; and it will be neither constricted internally nor distracted externally.”
“‘He practises for the welfare of both, His own and the other’s, When, knowing that his foe is angry, He mindfully maintains his peace.
“‘Here, sirs, I left Rajagaha and approached the Sumagadha Lotus Pond … … I saw a four-division army entering a lotus stalk on the bank of the pond.
“‘Homage to you, O thoroughbred man!
“‘Hunter,’ bhikkhus: this is a designation for Mara the Evil One.
“‘I am not one afflicted in mind, Nor easily drawn by anger’s whirl.
“‘I myself think this alone
“‘I myself think this alone
“‘I see this fault, O Vasava, In practising patient endurance:
“‘I see this fault, O Vasava, In practising patient endurance:
“‘I will protect myself,’ bhikkhus: thus should the establishments of mindfulness be practised.
“‘I worship as well, O Matali, Those householders making merit, The lay followers possessed of virtue
“‘If anyone, bhikkhus, speaking rightly could say of anything: “It is a noble dwelling, a divine dwelling, the Tathagata’s dwelling,” it is of concentration by mindfulness of breathing that one could rightly say this.’
“‘If there exists any place anywhere
“‘If you cannot look up at the crest of my standard, then you should look up at the crest of the deva-king Pajapati’s standard.
“‘If you cannot look up at the crest of the deva-king Pajapati’s standard, then you should look up at the crest of the deva-king Varuṇa’s standard….
“‘It is neither through fear nor weakness
“‘It is these that should worship you—
“‘I’ll grant no safety to the seers, For they are hated devotees of Sakka;
“‘Leave off lacerating the body faculty with a sharp spear burning, blazing, and glowing.
“‘Leave off lacerating the ear faculty with a sharp iron stake burning, blazing, and glowing.
“‘Leave off lacerating the nose faculty with a sharp nail cutter burning, blazing, and glowing.
“‘Leave off lacerating the tongue faculty with a sharp razor burning, blazing, and glowing.
“‘Leave off sleeping.
“‘Let it be whether or not he thinks, “He endures me out of fear,”
“‘Let it be whether or not he thinks, … … 
“‘Let the odour of the seers long bound by their vows, Emitted from their bodies, go with the wind;
“‘Making effort with hands and feet’: this is a designation for the arousing of energy.
“‘Many are the disciples of the Buddha …
“‘One who dwells diligently
“‘One who repays an angry man with anger
“‘Origination, origination’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘Origination, origination’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘Surely you’re mad, good man!
“‘That a lazy man who does not toil
“‘That basis for spiritual power possessing concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving has been developed’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘That basis for spiritual power possessing concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving is to be developed’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘That basis for spiritual power possessing concentration due to energy and volitional formations of striving is to be developed … has been developed’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘That basis for spiritual power possessing concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving is to be developed … has been developed’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.”
“‘That basis for spiritual power possessing concentration due to mind and volitional formations of striving is to be developed … has been developed’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘That contemplation of phenomena in phenomena is to be developed’ … ‘That contemplation of phenomena in phenomena has been developed’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.”
“‘That contemplation of the body in the body is to be developed’ … ‘That contemplation of the body in the body has been developed’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘The Arahant, the Fortunate One in the world …
“‘The bliss, supreme deva, we might find
“‘The empty village’: this is a designation for the six internal sense bases.
“‘The eye, friends, is suffering: it is for the full understanding of this that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.
“‘The five murderous enemies’: this is a designation for the five aggregates subject to clinging; that is, the material form aggregate subject to clinging, the feeling aggregate subject to clinging, the perception aggregate subject to clinging, the volitional formations aggregate subject to clinging, the consciousness aggregate subject to clinging.
“‘The further shore, which is safe and free from danger’: this is a designation for Nibbana.
“‘The great expanse of water’: this is a designation for the four floods: the flood of sensuality, the flood of existence, the flood of views, and the flood of ignorance.
“‘The near shore, which is dangerous and fearful’: this is a designation for identity.
“‘The near shore,’ bhikkhu: this is a designation for the six internal sense bases.
“‘The odour of the seers long bound by their vows, Emitted from their bodies, goes with the wind.
“‘The one who acts is one, and the one who experiences is another’: this, brahmin, is the second extreme.
“‘The one who acts is the same as the one who experiences’: this, brahmin, is one extreme.” 
“‘The Perfectly Enlightened One here
“‘The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on feeling … in dependence on perception … in dependence on volitional formations … in dependence on consciousness: this is the gratification in consciousness.
“‘The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on the ear … the nose … the tongue … the body … the mind: this is the gratification in the mind.
“‘The pleasure and joy that arise in dependence on the water element...
“‘The raft’: this is a designation for the Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view...
“‘The seer of the destruction of birth, Compassionate, knows the one-way path
“‘The seers who have come to Sambara
“‘The sixth murderer, the intimate companion with drawn sword’: this is a designation for delight and lust.
“‘The straight way’ that path is called, And ‘fearless’ is its destination.
“‘The stream’: this, venerable sir, is a designation for craving.
“‘The Tathagata exists after death’: this, friend, is an involvement with feeling … an involvement with perception … an involvement with volitional formations … an involvement with consciousness.
“‘The Tathagata exists after death’: this, friend, is an involvement with form.
“‘The trainees who delight in dismantling, Who diligently pursue the training
“‘Therefore the person of intelligence, Remembering the Buddha’s Teaching, Should be devoted to faith and virtue, To confidence and vision of the Dhamma.’”
“‘Therefore, having removed stinginess, The conqueror of the stain should give a gift.
“‘Therefore, Kassapa, you should train yourself thus: “I will never relinquish mindfulness directed to the body associated with joy.”
“‘Therefore, Kassapa, you should train yourself thus: “Whenever I listen to any Dhamma connected with the wholesome, I will listen to it with eager ears, attending to it as a matter of vital concern, applying my whole mind to it.”
“‘These all humbly worship me—
“‘These all humbly worship you—
“‘These are feelings’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘They call that strength no strength at all—
“‘They do not keep their goods in storage, Neither in a pot nor in a box.
“‘They do not know bliss
“‘This is suffering’: this, bhikkhus, is actual, unerring, not otherwise.
“‘This is the basis for spiritual power possessing concentration due to investigation and volitional formations of striving’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to desire and volitional formations of striving’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to energy and volitional formations of striving’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the basis for spiritual power that possesses concentration due to mind and volitional formations of striving’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the cessation of feeling’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision...
“‘This is the contemplation of feelings in feelings’ …
“‘This is the contemplation of mind in mind’ …
“‘This is the contemplation of phenomena in phenomena’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the contemplation of the body in the body’—thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the gratification in feeling’ … ‘This is the danger in feeling’ … ‘This is the escape from feeling’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.”
“‘This is the noble truth of suffering’: such has been made known by me.
“‘This is the noble truth of suffering’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the noble truth of suffering’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in the Tathagatas vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the noble truth of the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This noble truth of the cessation of suffering is to be realized’ … ‘This noble truth of the cessation of suffering has been realized’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in the Tathagatas vision … and light.
“‘This is the noble truth of the cessation of suffering’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the noble truth of the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the noble truth of the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering’: such has been made known by me.
“‘This is the noble truth of the origin of suffering’ … ‘This noble truth of the origin of suffering is to be abandoned’ … ‘This noble truth of the origin of suffering has been abandoned’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in the Tathagatas vision … and light.
“‘This is the noble truth of the origin of suffering’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering is to be developed’ … ‘This noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering has been developed’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in the Tathagatas vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.”
“‘This is the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This is the origin of feeling’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision … and light.
“‘This is the way leading to the cessation of feeling’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision...
“‘This is the way leading to the origination of feeling’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision … and light.
“‘This is why I envy them, 
“‘This noble truth of suffering has been fully understood’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This noble truth of suffering has been fully understood’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in the Tathagatas vision … and light.
“‘This noble truth of suffering is to be fully understood’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This noble truth of suffering is to be fully understood’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in the Tathagatas vision … and light.
“‘This noble truth of the cessation of suffering has been realized’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This noble truth of the cessation of suffering is to be realized’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This noble truth of the origin of suffering has been abandoned’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This noble truth of the origin of suffering is to be abandoned’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering has been developed’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering is to be developed’: thus, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose in me vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“‘This, surely a knowledge-master—
“‘This, surely a knowledge-master—
“‘This, surely a knowledge-master—
“‘Those for whom lust and hatred
“‘Those men of old who excelled in virtue, Those brahmins who recalled the ancient rules, …
“‘Those whom you worship, my lord Sakka, Are indeed the best in the world.
“‘Those whom you worship, my lord Sakka, Are indeed the best in the world.
“‘Those whom you worship, my lord Sakka, Are indeed the best in the world.
“‘Though we have asked for safety, You give us only danger.
“‘Thunderbolt,’ bhikkhus: this is a designation for gain, honour, and praise.
“‘Village-attacking dacoits’: this is a designation for the six external sense bases.
“‘We will be content with any kind of almsfood … with any kind of lodging … with any kind of medicinal requisites … and if we get them we will use them without being tied to them, uninfatuated with them, not blindly absorbed in them, seeing the danger in them, understanding the escape.’
“‘We will be possessed of confirmed confidence in the Dhamma thus: “The Dhamma is well expounded by the Blessed One, directly visible, immediate, inviting one to come and see, applicable, to be personally experienced by the wise.”
“‘We will be possessed of confirmed confidence in the Saṅgha thus: “The Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is practising the good way, practising the straight way, practising the true way, practising the proper way; that is, the four pairs of persons, the eight types of individuals—this Saṅgha of the Blessed One’s disciples is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.”
“‘We’ve not transcended identity;
“‘Whatever sort of seed is sown, That is the sort of fruit one reaps:
“‘Whatever there may be in our family that can be given away, all that we will share unreservedly with the virtuous ones who are of good character.’
“‘When a person endowed with strength
“‘When desire has not subsided, and thought has not subsided, and perception has not subsided, there is feeling with that as condition.
“‘When desire has not subsided, and thought has not subsided, and perception has not subsided, there is feeling with that as condition..
“‘When face to face with Vepacitti
“‘When he achieves the cure of both—
“‘When I’m angry I don’t speak harshly
“‘When one has confidence in the Saṅgha
“‘When one has faith in the Tathagata, Unshakable and well established, And good conduct built on virtue, Dear to the noble ones and praised; 
“‘When the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu recollects his manifold past abodes, that is, one birth, two births, three births, four births, five births, ten births, twenty births, thirty births, forty births, fifty births, a hundred births, a thousand births, a hundred thousand births, many aeons of world-contraction, many aeons of world-expansion, many aeons of world-contraction and expansion thus: “There I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life span; passing away from there, I was reborn elsewhere, and there too I was so named, of such a clan, with such an appearance, such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such my life span; passing away from there, I was reborn here.”
“‘When the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu understands the minds of other beings and persons, having encompassed them with his own mind.
“‘When the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu wields the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one … he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world….
“‘When the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu wields the various kinds of spiritual power: having been one, he becomes many; having been many, he becomes one; he appears and vanishes; he goes unhindered through a wall, through a rampart, through a mountain as though through space; he dives in and out of the earth as though it were water; he walks on water without sinking as though it were earth; seated cross-legged, he travels in space like a bird; with his hand he touches and strokes the moon and sun so powerful and mighty; he exercises mastery with the body as far as the brahma world.
“‘When the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.’” 
“‘When the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu, with the divine ear element, which is purified and surpasses the human, hears both kinds of sounds, the divine and human, those that are far as well as near.
“‘When the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu, with the divine eye, which is purified and surpasses the human, sees beings passing away and being reborn, inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate, and he understands how beings fare on in accordance with their kamma thus: “These beings who engaged in misconduct of body, speech, and mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong view, and undertook actions based on wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in a state of misery, in a bad destination, in the nether world, in hell; but these beings who engaged in good conduct of body, speech, and mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right view, and undertook action based on right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, have been reborn in a good destination, in the heavenly world.”
“‘When they give out of faith
“‘When, bhikkhus, the four bases for spiritual power have been developed and cultivated in this way, a bhikkhu, by the destruction of the taints, in this very life enters and dwells in the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, realizing it for himself with direct knowledge.’”
“‘Where a lazy man who does not toil
“‘Where one need not toil and strive
“‘While devas fight with asuras
“‘With existence as condition, birth’ … ‘With clinging as condition, existence’ … ‘With craving as condition, clinging’ … ‘With feeling as condition, craving’...
“‘With faultless wheel and a white awning, The one-spoked chariot rolls.
“‘With faultless wheel and a white awning, The one-spoked chariot rolls.
“‘Yes, your lordship,’ Matali the charioteer replied, and he turned back the chariot with its team of a thousand thoroughbreds.
“… leads to the destruction of the taints.
“… leads to the full understanding of the course.”
“… leads to the uprooting of the underlying tendencies.”
…  … This Noble Eightfold Path is the way leading to the cessation of volitional formations; that is, right view...
… a disagreeable one thus...
… accomplishment in desire...
… and those who maintain that suffering has arisen fortuitously, being created neither by oneself nor by another, that too is conditioned by contact.
… Are volitional formations permanent or impermanent?… Is consciousness permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
… by one who is wise, not by a dullard.’
… consciousness?… volitional formations?
… devas and humans.
… for the sake of final Nibbana without clinging that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One.’
… Having cognized a mental phenomenon with the mind, if there is lust, hatred, or delusion internally, a bhikkhu understands: ‘There is lust, hatred, or delusion internally’; or, if there is no lust, hatred, or delusion internally, he understands: ‘There is no lust, hatred, or delusion internally.’
… He sees the mind as impermanent, he sees mental phenomena as impermanent, he sees mind-consciousness as impermanent, he sees mind-contact as impermanent, he sees as impermanent whatever feeling arises with mind-contact as condition, whether pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant.
… He trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe in’; he trains thus: ‘Contemplating relinquishment, I will breathe out.’
… idle chatter … covetousness … ill will and hatred...
… in the case of volitional formations?… in the case of consciousness?”
… Is feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
… Is feeling … perception … volitional formations … consciousness permanent or impermanent?” - “Impermanent, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent suffering or happiness?” - “Suffering, venerable sir.” - “Is what is impermanent, suffering, and subject to change fit to be regarded thus: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’?” - “No, venerable sir.”
… or become an attainer of Nibbana upon landing, then with the utter destruction of the five lower fetters one becomes an attainer of Nibbana without exertion.
… Perception is nonself….
… revulsion towards the water element...
… sounds...
… the Evil One can do with him as he wishes.
… the mind of the past was impermanent.
… the possession of the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken...
… the possession of the virtues dear to the noble ones, unbroken...
… the power of virtue.
… the river Aciravati … the river Sarabhū … the river Mahı̄ … whatever great rivers there are—that is, the Ganges, the Yamuna, the Aciravati, the Sarabhū, the Mahı̄—all slant, slope, and incline towards the east, so too a bhikkhu who develops and cultivates the Noble Eightfold Path slants, slopes, and inclines towards Nibbana.”
… The Venerable Ananda saw the Venerable Sariputta coming in the distance and said to him: “Friend Sariputta, your faculties are serene, your complexion is pure and bright.
… Then, referring to the bhikkhu Katamorakatissaka, the independent brahma Suddhavasa recited this verse in the presence of the Blessed One: 
… This is what is not a bhikkhu’s own resort but the domain of others.
… thus this aging and this death are together called aging-and-death.
… unless he were mentally deranged?”
… What is the source of these volitional formations, what is their origin, from what are they born and produced?
… who are covetous … who bear ill will … of wrong view come together and unite with those of wrong view.
… who are uncovetous … without ill will … of right view come together and unite with those of right view.”
… With its deliverance he understands: ‘Clinging has been exhausted by me.’
… With its deliverance he understands: ‘Clinging has been exhausted by me.’
… your son...
… ‘With ignorance as condition, volitional formations’?”
… ‘With volitional formations as condition, consciousness’?
… … Is consciousness permanent or impermanent?”
… … It is because these four establishments of mindfulness are not developed and cultivated … are developed and cultivated that the true Dhamma endures long after a Tathagata has attained final Nibbana.”
… … These four establishments of mindfulness, when developed and cultivated, lead to going beyond from the near shore to the far shore.”
… … ‘With the cessation of ignorance comes cessation of volitional formations’?”
Everything in the three realms is nothing but mind.’’ The expressions‘mind’, ‘mental faculty’, ‘awareness’, and ‘appearance’ are synonyms. 
Here, the term ‘mind’ is meant to include associated mental factors . The expression ‘nothing but’ is meant to rule out the existence of external objects. Verse 1. This is all appearance only; for even non-existent objects are presented to us, as, for instance, a person with faulty vision sees unreal hair, etc. 
What is being said? 
If color-appearances are produced, not by the colors themselves, but in their absence, then why are such appearances produced at some places, and not everywhere? Even then, they are produced only sometimes, and not always. 
perceived by people with faulty vision fail to be causally efficacious in the way hair, flies, etc. should be? But others [i.e., the hair, flies, etc. seen by people with normal vision] are causally efficacious in that way. 
The production of appearances at particular times and places is established, just as in the case of dreams. 
…In dreams, even without the presence of any external object, certain objects like flies, gardens, women, men, etc. are seen, only at certain places and not everywhere. 
Even when a particular place is fixed, they are only seen only at certain times [in the course of those dreams], and not always. 
Hence, even without the presence of any external object, appearances may arise only at particular places and times. 
The production of appearances across different minds is established, just as in the case of hungry ghosts. 
…When placed in the same predicament with respect to the ripened fruit of their previous acts, all hungry ghosts—and not just one of them—see a river full of pus. 
They also see a river full of urine and excrement, governed by men armed with swords and clubs, etc. 
…The analogy is that even though there is no sexual intercourse in a dream, the dreamer still discharges semen. 
5 In the same manner, the four constraints on appearances, namely the production of appearances at particular places and their production at particular times, etc., are established by other examples too. 
All four constraints on appearances are established as in the case of hell. 
How is the analogy with hell established? Verse 4 . 
Through the perception of the wardens of hell, etc., and through torture at their hands. 
The inhabitants of hell undergo visions of hell-wardens. 
And even though hell-wardens don’t exist, the suffering that the hell-wardens cause to the inhabitants of hell is still established ; for the ripened fruit of their past morally equivalent acts holds sway . 
The Argument for Idealism Then, why is it to be understood that the Buddha spoke about the existence of the external bases of sensory cognition like color, intending to convey that there is no external object which is presented by each appearance, e.g., by the appearance of color? Because Verse 11. This object cannot be simple, nor can it be a plurality of atoms. 
What is being said? 
The external basis of sensory cognition, such as colour, etc., which appears as an object of our awareness can be simple, e.g., the part-possessing form accepted by the Vaiśeṣikas. 
Neither can a plurality of atoms be the object of awareness, because we are never aware of an individual atom. 
Nor can a unified collection of atoms be the object of awareness, because the status of an atom as a simple substance7 isn’t established. 
Why not? 
If an atom could be simultaneously conjoined to six other atoms on its six sides, then it would have six parts. 
If an atom could simultaneously be conjoined to six other atoms on its six sides [so as to produce a composite object], then each atom would have six parts; for the region which is in contact with one atom cannot be occupied by another. 
Moreover, if the six atoms were to occupy the same location, the composite object consisting of the atoms would also be an atom. 
The Kashmiri Vaibhāṣikas 8 say, “Atoms are not conjoined to each other, because they don’t have parts. So, this unacceptable consequence doesn’t follow . Rather, unified collections of atoms are in contact with each other.’’ They are to be asked this: “A unified collection of atoms isn’t something distinct from the atoms themselves. 
If atoms cannot be conjoined, whose conjoining do we see in unified collections of atoms?” … 7 An independently existing thing or entity; see substance. 
So, unified collections of atoms cannot be established by appeal to the conjoining of atoms, because atoms have no parts. 
Well, even unified collections of atoms are not conjoined to each other! 
Therefore, it cannot be said that the reason why the conjoining of atoms cannot be established is that they don’t have parts; for even the conjoining of unified collections of atoms—which are objects with parts— cannot be accepted. 
If no individual atom were spatially extended, how could shadows be cast at dawn at one place and sunlight at another? 
For the atom would have no region which was untouched by sunlight. 
How could one atom be concealed by another atom if atoms were not spatially extended? 
For, in that case, there wouldn’t be any front region of an atom such that when another atom arrives at that region, it blocks the original one. 
If one atom didn’t block another, all unified collections of atoms would be reduced to a single atom. 
III.2 Against Composite Wholes Why don’t you accept that only composite wholes are subject to shadows and concealment? 
If you don’t accept the view that the composite whole is distinct from its constituent atoms, then the shadows and the concealment are not properties of the composite object. 
As long as the defining characteristics such as color, etc. 
8 “Being an object detected by the eye, etc.,” and “being blue”, etc. 
Is the thing which is blue, yellow, etc., and which is also taken to be the object of visual perception, etc., a simple substance, or a plurality? 
If one imagines that the object of visual perception is just one unbroken substance—not many—, then gradual traversal across the earth would be impossible, where “traversal” means motion; for, in a single step, the whole earth would be traversed. 
Nor could elephants, horses, etc., which are separate and distinct, be located at different places; for, wherever one was, there would be the other. 
Or, , how could the places that they occupy and do not occupy be one, given that empty space is apprehended between them? 
Thus, we have to accept that different substances can differ with respect to their atomic compositions. 
Hence, these are nothing but appearances. 
If there is no external object, then how does the thought, “ perceived ” arise? 
When the perceptual thought arises in the form, “This object is perceived by me”, then the external object isn’t seen; for it is by mental awareness that the object is then discerned, since visual awareness by then has ceased. 
This principle, namely that only directly apprehended objects can be recalled, cannot be established, because Verse 17. 
If appearances that arise when one is awake were about unreal objects just like appearances produced in dreams, then one would oneself recognize the non-existence of such objects. 
This doesn’t happen. 
The absence of objects in dreams isn’t recognized unless one is awake. 
The ordinary person—enwrapped in the sleep of traces left by her habits of false imaginative construction—sees as in dreams unreal objects. Thus, she fails to recognize the absence of such objects in that unawakened state. 
Then, faced with the purified worldly awareness that arises as a result of that transcendent awareness, she recognizes the absence of external objects. 
IV.2 Causation and Moral Responsibility If appearances are produced in sentient beings not by external objects, but rather by events within their own minds, then how can we establish that particular appearances arise in particular sentient beings from the company of good or bad friends, or from hearing good or bad teaching? 
If the appearances produced in a wakeful state have no object just like appearances produced in a dream, then why do good and bad acts performed in wakeful states and dreams not have the same desirable and undesirable consequences in the future? 
In dreams, the mind languishes in a state of torpor; that is why the fruits of acts are different . 
If all this is just appearance, then no one has a body or speech. Then, how do butchers kill approaching sheep? 
If they do not kill the sheep, why are the butchers subject to the sin of killing? 11 Verse 19. 
Death is a change brought about by a mental event that arises in another being, just as certain mental powers of demons bring about the loss of memory, etc., in others. 
The mental powers of demons can induce loss of memory, dreams, and possession by spirits in others. 
for example, Sāraṇa saw a dream due to the influence of Ārya Mahakātyāyana, while the mental sins of the forest-dwelling sages led to the conquest of Vemacitra. 
10 Analogously, it is to be understood that due to the influence of one being’s mental events, a change opposed to the life of another being arises. 
This interruption of the homogeneous continuum [that constitutes the mind of the latter being] is called death. 
How else could the Danḍaka Forest have been emptied owing to the anger of the sages, if one doesn’t accept that mental events of one being can bring about the death of another? 
The householder Upāli was asked by the Buddha, who wanted to establish the sinfulness of mental torture, “O householder, have you heard that the Danḍaka Forest, the Forest of Mātaṅga, and the Forest of Kaliṅga, were emptied and turned into grounds fit for sacrificial rites?’’ And he said, “I have heard, o Gautama! 
If one imagines that the beings living in those forests were destroyed by demonic creatures who were pleased with the sages, and not killed by the mental sins of the sages, then how can that action establish that mental torture is the greatest sin? 
It can only be established if the death of those beings came about solely due to the mental sins of the sages. 
IV.3 Our Knowledge of Other Minds If all this is just appearance, do knowers of other minds become aware of other minds, or not? 
If they are not aware of other minds, how are they knowers of other minds? 
Well, then, they are aware of other minds. 
Awareness of other minds is illusory. 
Just like one’s awareness of one’s own mind. 
Because one’s own mind is unknown to one in the manner in which it is known to the Buddhas.11 Since one isn’t acquainted with the ineffable manner in which the mind [both another’s and one’s own] is known to the Buddhas, one’s awareness of both another’s and one’s own minds turns out to be illusory; for the misleading appearance of a distinction between the graspable object and the grasping awareness isn’t dispelled.12 Even though the doctrine of appearance-only is comprised of innumerable theories and distinctions, and is unfathomably profound, Verse 22. 
I have established the doctrine of appearance-only according to my capacities; but it is in fact not thinkable in its entirety. 
This doctrine, under all its aspects, is grasped by the supreme Buddhas; for nothing stands in the way of their grasping graspable things of all forms. 

From the delusion of self and dharmas, Comes the conveyence of various manifestations; These are supported and transformed by consciousness, And there are only three of these which may transform. 
The first of these is the Ä€laya Consciousness, Which is retribution as well as all the seeds. 
It is undefiled and morally indeterminate; Mental contact and the others are also like this. Its conveyence is like that of a flowing stream, And it is abandoned in the stage of the arhat. 
Next is the second which is able to transform, And this consciousness is called Manas. It is supported by the previous conveyence, And its character and nature are that of thought. 
It is always associated with the four vexations, Which are delusion of a self, perception of a self, Identity with a self, and love of a self, As well as mental contact and the others. 
In the Nirodha SamÄpatti of the arhats, And in the Supramundane Path, it does not exist. 
Next is the third which is able to transform, Which is distinguished into six different divisions; Its appearance and nature are perceiving external objects, And these may be good, bad, or indeterminate. 
It is associated with omnipresent mental activities, With the external objects, the good, the vexations, The secondary vexations, and the undetermined, And it is associated with all three feelings. 
Omnipresent mental activities are mental contact, etc.; Next are those with objects, which are desires, Determination, mindfulness, samÄdhi, wisdom, etc., And the object of each of these is not the same. 
The vexations are desire, hatred, Delusion, pride, doubt, and wrong views. 
The secondary vexations are anger, Hostility, obscuration, anger, jealousy, greed, Deceit, harmful flattery, arrogance, Lack of shame, lack of conscience, Acting upon agitations, torpor, A lack of faith, laziness, Negligence as well as forgetfulness, Distraction, and incorrect knowing. 
The undetermined are remorse, sleep, And both types of initial and sustained thought. 
With their basis in the root consciousness, The five consciousnesses manifest according to conditions; These manifestations may occur together or separately, Just as waves are formed upon the water. 
These various consciousnesses are transformed As discrimination and that which is discriminated, And with this basis they are all emptyâ€” Thus they are all Consciousness Only. 
Through the consciousness of all seeds, There are such-and-such transformations, And from the power of this conveyence, This-and-that are produced by discrimination. 
Due to the habit energy of various actions, Along with the habit energy of dualistic grasping, Even when earlier retributions are exhausted, Still the renewed arising of retribution occurs. 
From this and that imagination, One imagines all kinds of objects; These pervasive imagined objects Are without actual self-nature. 
From the self-nature of interdependence Comes discrimination arising from conditions; The perfection of the fruit comes from Always being apart from the former nature. 
Therefore in relation to the interdependent, It is neither different nor is it not different, Just like the nature of impermanence, etc., And when one is not perceived, the other is. 
On the basis of the three kinds of self-nature Is established the threefold absence of self-nature; Thus the Buddha spoke with the hidden intent That all dharmas are without nature. 
The first is the naturelessness of characteristics, The next is the naturelessness of self-existence; The last is the detachment from the first, When the natures of self and dharmas are grasped. 
Because its nature is eternally so, It is the true nature of Consciousness Only. 
So long as one has not given rise to the consciousness Which seeks to abide in the nature of Consciousness Only, Then regarding the two types of grasping dispositions, He is still not yet able to subdue and extinguish them. 
Setting up and establishing even something small And saying this is the nature of Consciousness Only, Because there is still something which is grasped, It is not truly abiding in Consciousness Only. 
When one regards that which is conditioned With the wisdom of total non-appropriation, Then at that time one abides in Consciousness Only, Apart from the duality of grasping at appearances. 
Without grasping and not conceptualizingâ€” This is the wisdom of the supramundane realm Which abandons the coarseness of duality And naturally attains transformation of the basis. 
This itself is the realm of no outflows, Inconceivable, good, and eternal, The peaceful and blissful body of liberation, And what the great Muni called the Dharma. 

Who created the variety of the world of living beings and the receptacleworld which we have described in the preceding chapter? 
It was not a god who intelligently created it. 
The variety of the world arises from action. 
But, in this hypothesis, how does it happen that actions produce at one and the same time, pleasing things,;saffron, sandalwood, etcon the one band, and bodies of quite opposite qualities on the other? 
The actions of beings whose conduct is a mixture of good and bad actions produce bodies resembling abscesses whose impurities flow out through the nine gates,and, in order to serve as a remedy to these bodies, they also produce objects of pleasing eṉjoyment, colors and shapes, odors, tastes and tangibles. 
But the gods haveaccomplished only good actions: their bodies and their objects of enjoyment are equally pleasing. 
kkḵ What is action? 
It is volition and that which is produced through volition. 
The sūtra says that there are two types of action, volition and the action after having been willed. 
Action after having been willed is what the kārikādesignates by the woṟds that which is produced through volition. 
These two actions form three actions: 
bodily action, vocal action, and mental action. 
To what does this question tend? 
If one were to regard its support, there is nothingbut an action, for allactions are supported on a physical support, a body. 
If one were to regard its nature, there is only vocal actioṉ, for, of these three,;body, speech and anas,only the voice is ultimately actionby its nature. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say that the three types of action are established by reason of all of these three causes, support, nature and original cause, in this order. 
Volition is mental action: 
it gives rise to two actions, bodily and vocal action. 
Volition is called mental action; that which arises from volition, namely action which has been willed, is made up of the two other actions, bodily and vocal action. 
These two actions are informative and noninformative. 
Bodily action and vocal action are informative and non informative ; we then have bodily informative action, vocal informative action, bodily noninformative actioṉ, and vocal noninformative action. 
What action is bodily informative action? 
2b Bodily vrjñapti is shape. 
Bodily viñapti is such and such a shape of the body by reason of a volition According to others, bodily vijñapti is dis placement, for it takes place when there is movement, and not when there is no movement. 
This is not so, because all conditioned things re Tṉnoeṇtary. 
What is understood by momentary ? 
Kṣaṇa means to perish immediately after having acquired its being; ksaṇika īs a āharma that has kṣaṇa, as a daṇḍika is one who has a staff. 
A conditioned thing does not exist beyond the acquisition of its being; it perishes on the spot where it arises; it cannot go from this spot to another. 
Consequently bodily vñapti is not movement. 
If conditioned things are momentary, we would admit that they are not susceptible of displacement. 
It is proven that they are momentary, since they necessarily perish; for the destruction of conditioned things is spontaneous; it does not come from anything; it does not depend on a cause. 
That which ḍepends on a cause is an effect, something done, created. 
Therefore destruction does not depend on a cause. Destruction does not depeṅd on a cause: 
hence a conditioned thing perishes as soon as it arises; if it did not perish immediately, it would not perish later, since it would then remain the same. 
Since you admit that it perishes, you must admit that it immediately perishes. Would you say that a conditioned thing changes and that, consequently, it is later subject to destruction? 
There are many remarks to make with respect to this. 
In fact, people do not directly perceive the destruction of kindling by reason of fire. 
If you think that kindling perishes through its relationship to fire because we no longer see the kindling when this relationship has taken place, then your thesis rests on an inference,and nṉot on direct perception, and your reasoning is not conclusive. 
The fact that we no longer see kindling after its relationship with fire is open to two interpretations: 
You admit that the destruction of the flame is spontaneous. 
When, after a relationship with wind, the flame is no longer visible, you admit that this relationship is not the cause of the destruction of the flame; but you admit that the flame, by virtue of this relationship, stops renewing itself. 
Therefore it is inference that should determine this question. 
We have already said that destruction,being a negative state, cannot bpe caused. 
We would further say that if desttuctin is the eftect of a cause, nothing would not perish without a cause. 
If, like arising, destruction proceeds from a cause, it would never take place without a cause. 
Now we hold that intellgence, a flame, or a ṣound, which are momentary, perish without their destruction de pending on a cause. 
Hence the destruction of the kindling, etc., is spontaneous. 
The Vaibhāṣikas maintain that an earlier thought perishes by reason of a later thought, that earlier sound perishes by reason of later sound. 
But the two thoughts in question are not simultaneous. 
Some contradictory thoughts:doubt and certainty, pleasure and suffering, love and hate,do not displace one another; and the same holds for noncontradictory thoughts. 
And if you suppose that they do contradict one another, then how can weak dharmas destroy strong dharmas of the same typeas when weak thoughts or sounds immediately follow strong thoughts or sounds? 
Some think that a flame perishes through the absence of a cause of duration. 
Āccording to the Vaiśeṣikas, flame perishes by reason of dharma anṇd adharma, merit and demerit. 
This explanation is inadmissible. 
Dharma and adharmma would both be causes of arising and of destruction: 
Furthermore since this manner of explaining destruction would hold for all conditioned things, it is useless to puṟsue the discussion. 
If one holds that the destruction of the kindling, etc., has for its cause the relationship of this kindling with fire, one would then be forced to acknowledge that a cause that engenders is at the same time a cause that destroys. 
Cooking , or a relationship with fire, produces different products , of deeper and deeper color. 
The same cause that produces the firstcolor destroys this firstcolor, or, at leastif you object that it refers to a new relationship with fire, since the fire is momentarythe cause that destroys the first color is similar to the cause that produces it. 
Now it is impossible that a certain cause would produce a certain effect and that later this same cause,ora parallel cause, would destroy this same effect. 
Would you say that, if the successive flames are differentlong, short, large andsmall,.our conclusion does notbecome indispensable? 
By the prolonged action of ashes, snovw, caustics, sun, water, or earth, there arises and disappears in turn different products of cooking. 
Some ask why water diminishes when it is beated if a relationship with fire is not destruction of the water? 
By reason of its relationship with fire, through the foce of the fire, the heat elementwhich is present in water increases and, increasing, causes the mass of water to be reborn inquantities more and more reduced, until being totally reduced, the water ceases renewing itself. 
This is what a relationship with fire does to water. itself. 
The destruction of things is spontaneous. 
Things perish in and of themselves, because it is their nature to perish. 
As they perish in and of themselves, they perish upon arising. 
As they perish upon arising, they are momentary. 
Thus there is no movemenṇt, no displacement; there is only arising in another place of the second moment of the series: 
this is the case, even in the opinion of our opponent, for the fire which consumes firewood. 
The idea of movement is a false conception. 
kksk The Sautrāntikas say that shape is nota distinct thing,a thing in and of itself. 
For theSautrāntikas, shape does not exist as a substance, but only as a designation. 
When there arises, in one direction,a large mass of color, this mass is called long. When, by comparison, a mass of color is small, it is called short. 
When a color arises in a great quantity in the four directions, it is called square. 
When it arises equally in all directions, it is called circuler. 
Shape is thus not a thing in and of itself, a npa. First argument. 
If shape were a thing in and of itself, It would be perceived by two organs. 
Now, according to the scriptural definition, rūpāyaana, the visible physical matter, is perceived by only the eye. 
but exactly the same holds for the visible. 
one calls a visible or a tangible arraṇged in a certain manner long. 
When we have the idea of length after having touched something, we are not perceiving shape through touch; we remember the shape, because it is associated with a tangible. 
It is the same when we see the color of fire,for we then remember heat ; and when we smell the odor of flower,we then remember its color. 
But a tangible is not iavariably associated witha certain shape: 
how then does the perception of a tangible provoke the rememberance of a certain shape? 
If a similar remembrance is produced without there having been an invariable association betweena tangible and its shape, one would in this same manner remember color after having touched something. 
But such is not the case. 
Hence, one must not say that the perception of a tangible provokes the remembrance of its shape. Second argument. 
One sees many shapes in a multicolored piece of cloth. 
Thus, there would be, according to you, many rpas, in the category of shape inone and the same piece: 
this is impossible, as itwas for color. 
ow Shape does not exist in an atom. 
There is no atom of length. 
In fact, when a long mass diminishes, we arrive at the moment when we no longer have the idea of long with regard to it, but rather the idea of short: 
Therefore what we designate as long is number of real things,.atoms of color,aṟranged in a certain manner. 
If you maintain that the expressions, long, etc. 
refer to some atoms of shape arranged in a certainmanner, and thatsome atoms that would not be shape by nature could not be designated as long, etcthis is merely repeating your affirmation without the support of any argument. 
In fact, if the existence of special atoms of shape were proved, you wouldbe able to maintain that united, arranged in a certain fashion, they constitute length: but since the existence of these atoms has not been proved, as the existence of the atoms of color has been proved, how could they be united and arranged? If a shape is not distiact in color, if a shape is nothing other than a certain color, then shapes would not differ when their color is the same: 
now somne jugs of the same color have different shapes. 
Somne ants, all similar, arrange themselves in a straight line or in a ciccle, and so present different shapes. 
But, in darkness or at a distance, one sees the shape of an object,a columṉ, a person, etc., without seeing its color. 
Hence shape exists separate from color. 
This army is arranged in a circle Oṟ rather it happens that one does not clearly distinguish either color or shape; one only knowsthrough the mental consciousnessa mass. 
You Sautrāntikas negate both movement and shape. 
Then what is designated by the term bodily vṝjñapñ? 
Bodily action is theaction which has for its object thebody: 
itproceeds by being supported on this gate which is the body, and is thus called bodily action. 
If bodily action and vocal action are volition, what difference is there between the two types of action defined in this scripture? 
There are two types of volition. 
First, the initial or preparatory stage,wherein one produces a volition which is pure volition, I must do such and such an action; this is what the Scripture calls cetanākarman, action which is volition. 
Then, afteṛ 
this stage of pure volition, one produces a volition of action, the volition of doing an action in conformity with what has been previously willed, to move the body or to emit a voice: 
If this is the case, then informative action does not exist: 
And if viñapti does not exist, then vjñapti,noninformation of the sphere of Kāmadhātu,does not exist. 
These difficulties can be refuted. 
Avñapri is explained very well in our system. 
This s generis volition is subordinate to the mind , like the eviñapti which in our system arises from dhyāna, for the avijñapti of Kāmadhātu develops during sleep, etc. 
No, for this s. 
generis volition is projected by.a certain volition.of decision , its distant cause, and by a certain volition of action and voice, its near cause. 
Now however you woūld have it that the vijñapti,ift it exists,would depend, like the projectionof the evjñapti, on the force of the thought: 
for it is itself nonintelligent. 
kksk The Vaibhāṣikas say that shape exists in and of itself, and thatbbodily vijñapti is shape. 
Vocal vijñapti is vocal sound. Sound whidch is discourse by naturethat is, articulated sound is vocaḻ viñapti. 
ḵkṣk Avijñapti has already been defined. 
because it solely consists of not doing an action after having undertaken not to do it; 2 because one designates a thing which would exist by reasonof past primatry elements as evijñapti; now past dharmas no longer exist ; and because avjñapti does not have the nature of pa: 
the nature of rūpa is rūpyate and since the aviñapti is not susceptible of destruction , it cannot be rūpa. 
Scrīpture says that rāpa is of three types and that there is a pure vpa; there is increase of merit; and there is a course of action for him who is not concerned with himself, etc. 
A scripture says that there are three types of rpa: 
Rpa is embraced within a threefold rpa: 
there is visible rūpa susceptible of destruction ; there is an invisible rpa susceptible of destruction ; and there is an invisible r7p, free from destruction, and this latter can only be the gvjñapti. 
The BlessedOnesaid in a scripture that there is pure rpa: 
What are the pure dharmas? 
All rūpa of the past, the future and the present. all consciousness of the past, future, present, concerning which there arises neither affection nor antipathy: these are the pure dharmas.. 
Now, apart from avjñapti, there exists no rpa which can be invisible and free from destruction, and no rāpa which is pure. 
A scripture says that there is an increase of merit, . 
, There are seven mateṟial meritorious works,. 
when a believer, son oṟ daughter of good family, who is endowed, walks, stands still, sleeps or is awake, his merit increases with intensity, without ceasing;merit continues adding to itself. 
By reason of what dharma, other than the. 
avjñapti, could merit increase even when the mind is not good, or when one is without thought? 
4.1f avijñapti does not exist, he who does not himself act, who gives orders to others, will not be endowed with a course of action. 
Would one say that when the action is accomplished the action that consists of giving the order becomes a course of action? 
But it is evident that the nature of this action is not modified by the execution of the order. 
The Blessed One said, Monks, the dharmas, the external sources of consciousness not included within the eleven āyatanas, are invisible, and are free from destruction. 
He did not say that the dharmāyatana īs nonrūpa. 
If avijñapś does not exist, the Way no longer has eight parts, for the parts, samyagvākc, samyakkarmānta, and samyagājīva , are incompatible with absorption. 
would disappear. 
For a person who has assumed the vows of religion is still a Bhikṣu or Bhikṣuṇī, when his mind is bad or neutral. 
A scripture teaches that the renouncing of sin is a dike which arrests immorality. 
An absence cannot be a dike: 
These arguments. 
are numerous and diverse, but are not conclusive. 
Let us examine them one by one. 
The Sūtra teaches that rāpa is of three types. 
The Yogācārins say that in the Dhyānas,through the force of absorption,a rpa arises which is the object of the absorption, that is, which is perceived by the person in the absorption,. 
This rpa is notseen by the eye; it is thus invisible. 
it is thus free from destruction. 
If you ask how this object of absorption can be rpa you forget that the existence of gviñapti would give rise to the same question. 
The scripture says that there is a pure rpa.The Yogācārins maiṇtain that thepa that arises through the force of the absorption is pure, since the absorption is pure. 
But other masters, maintain that the rpa of the Arhats and external rpa, , are pure because they are not a support of the vices. 
AlI that which is organ of sight, all that which is visible. 
To this one could object that the same dharmas would be impure, because they are not opposed to the vices, and at the same time pure, because they are not a support of the vices, with the unpleasant consequence that the characteristic of pure and impure would be confused. 
No, answer the Dārṣṭāṇtikas, for these dharmas are not pure from the same point of view in which they are impure. 
Further, if the visible and the other āyatanas are exclusively impure, why would the scripture specify, The impure and pādānaprovoking rūpas,. 
the impure and upādānaprovoking dharmas are the cause of the hardening of the mind and of hypocrisy. 
The scripture says that merit increases. 
The ancient masters say: 
It is in this sense that the text says, Merit increases in an intense and uṉ interrupted manṇner, rmerit adds to itself. 
But how does one explain the increase of merit in the case of noṇmaterial meritorious work? 
by reason of the repetition of volitions having for their object. 
Even during dreamms these volitions are linked together. 
On the contrary, we do not see how the partisans of aṉ avirñapti,can explain the growth of merit in the case of nonmaterial meritorious work. 
But according to other masters, in the case also of material meritorious works, merit proceeds from the repetition of a volition having for its object But this opinion is inadmissible in light of the scripture which says, When an energetic Bhtkṣu, endowed with morality, possessor of good dharmas ,eats the alms of a donor, he then enters into and dwells in the absoṟption called Śinfinites , and by reason of this fact there is certainly produced for the donor an outflowing of merit, and outflowing of good and prosperity. 
Now does the donor whose merit thus continues to increase, have a special volition whose object is the person who receives? 
This holds likewise when one acts for oneself; when the course of action is achieved, at this moment the series undergoes a transformation. 
This transformation is called course of action, and consequently the person whose series is transformed is endowed with the course of actionfor the effect receives the name which belongs more properly to the cause ,and this transformation is called bodily or vocal accordingly as it results from an action of the body or the voice. 
It is by virtue of these same principles that the partisans of evijñapti consider the avjñapti as a bodily or vocal course of action. 
A person is touched by the sin of murder by reason of a tritemporal volition with regard to the skandhasr which constitute a living being , that is, when he thinks, I shall kill; I kill; he is killed. 
But this triple volition does not necessarily bring about the achievement of the course of action, for, according to the theory of the Bhadanta, there would be a mortal sin for the child who says, my mother has been murdered, if she has not in fact been killed by the emissary charged with the murder. 
Nevertheless all this exercise of volition, I shall kili, I kill, he is killed applies only to the person who kills: 
the intention of the Bhadanta is to refer to this type of murder. 
But, why do you, in your antipathy, deny the existence of the gvñapti and yet admit a transformation of the mental series ? 
I thus have no antipathy But, tosay that there arisesat the moment of the achieving of the course of action by a bodily operationdependent on amind, a certain dharma, called aviñapti, either from the mind of him who has ordered, or separate from the body of him who has accomplished the murder, is a hypothesis that cannot satisfy us; but to say that there is produced at the moment of the achievement of the course of action by an operation ordered by a ceṛtain person, a transformation of the mental series of this person, is a hypthesis that satisfies us. 
And it also satisfies us that the result arises from a transformation of the series and not from an avjñapti. 
if the viñapt does not exist, 5. 
The dharmāyatanais not defined as nonmaterial. 
The response to this objection is as has been given above: there is an invisible rpa free from destruction, forming part of the dharmāyatana: this is not the avijñapti; this is a ppa which is the object of the absorption and which arises from the force of the absorption. 
The Way, say the Vaibhāṣikas, would not have eight parts. 
How does the saint,when he has attained the Way, possess correct speech,action, and livelihood? 
Does he pronounce correct speech,act ina correctmannet; and corṟectly ask for the robes of a monk? 
In the Pat, the saint takes possession of certain pure avijñaptii, so that,vhen he ḹeaves the contemplation, it is by the force of these pure gviñaptis that he produces correct speech, actions, and livelihood, and does not produce incoLrect speech, actions, and livelihood. 
A cause takes the name of its result; thus speech, action and livelihood are designated as avijñapti. 
If this is so,why not accept my theory? 
One gives to the cause the name of their result; and we can thus affirm that the Path possesses eight parts. 
Āccording to another opinion, the parts of the Path solely consist of poṉncommission. 
The person who is in absorption acquires, through the force of the Path, definite absolute abstention. 
This abstention, which is ac quired having the pure Path as its support, is pure. 
but these are not the only real and distinct things which constitute the dharmuas; there are for example, the eight worldly dharmas: 
possession and nonpossession; glory and nonglory; praise and blame; pleasure and suffering. 
Nonpossession of clothes, of food, etc., is not a thing. 
One refutes this objection according to the same principles, by making a state out of the force of the intention. 
Discipline is volition which, after it has been translated into the positive action of abstaining from transgression, into the pledge of no longer cornmitting transgression, arrests bad actions anddisciplines the body and the voice: 
the Prātimokṣa discipline should be understood in this manner. 
The Vaibhāṣikas object that, if the Prātimokṣa discipline is volition, the monk who thinks a thought other than this thought of volition would cease being disciplined, for he does not then possess the volition which disciplines. 
This objection is worthless.In fact,the mental series is perfumed in such a way that, when a thought of traṉsgression starts to appeatr, the memory of the vow undertaken also appears: 
And this volition has the characteristic of a dike. 
When one is obliged not to comrmit transgression, one remembers this obligation, shame is present, and one constrains oneself in such a manner that one does not violate morality. 
In your system, on the contrary, ifimmorality is dammed up by an aviñapti independent of memory, then even a persoa who has a faulty memory would not be able to commit a transgression, since the avijñapti is always there. 
Let us stop this discussion here. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say that there exists a certain substantial thing , sui generis, which is avrñaptirūpa. 
the question is then posed whether it derives from the same primary elements which are the support of the v4iapti, that is, the primary elements of the body through which the action termed vjñapti is accomplished; or if it deṟives from other primary elements. 
The general rule is that all derived rpa is simultaneous to its primary elements. 
But certain derived pa,of the present and the future,derive from past primary elements: 
From the firstmoment, the vjñapti of Kāmadhātu arises derived from past primary elements. 
From this first moment on, avijñapti of the sphere of Kāmadhātuin opposition to the avjñapti arisen from the dhyāna, and pure avijñapti arises, that is, it continues to be reborn, being derived from the same primary elements of the first moment, which are now past: 
In the same way, the hand that has hurled the wheeland the ground that the supports the wheel, are the causes,respectively, of the prevṛzti and the anuvṛtti of the movement of the wheel. 
When impure, bodily and vocal action derive from the primary elements of the sphere to which they belong. 
Bodily and vocal actions of Kāmadhātu derive from the primary. 
elements of Kāmadhātu, aṇd so on to the bodily and vocal actions of the Fourth Dhyāna which derives from primary elements of the Fourth Dhyāṇṉa. 
When they are pure, they are from the primary elements of the sphere to which the person who has produced them belongs. 
When they are pure, bodily and vocal action derives from the primary elements of the sphere where the person who produces arises: 
for the pure dharmas are transcendent to the sphere of existence kk What are the characteristicss of these two actions, vñapt and avijñapti? 
The aviñaptiis not integral to the organism, it is also an outflowing; itbelongs solely to livingbeings. 
Not of absorption, it derives from the primary elements which are an outflowing, which are integral to the organism, which are differentiated, 1. 
The avijñapti is a derived rūpa exempt from mass , nonextended ; thus it cannot be a support of the mind and of mental states; thus it is axepātta, not integral to the sense oṟganisrm. 
The avrñapti is never moṟally neutral : 
the fitst pure aviñapti is not an outflowing. 
Not absorbed or, in other words belonging to Kāmadhātu, it derives from primary elements which are an outflowing, and which are integral to the organism. 
These primary ekements are differentiated, because each of the seven avñaptis, the renouncing of killing, etc., which form the Prātimokṣa discipline, derive from a distinct group of the four primary elements. 
Arisen from absorption, it derives from nondifferentiated primary elements, not integral to the organism, and increase. 
Avjñapti which arises from samādhi, is divided into two types, that is, absorption, and pure discipline. 
These two botharise from saādhi, are of increase,and not integral to the sense organism. 
They are both arisen from undifferentiated primary elements. 
In the same way that the mind which engenders these renouncings is a unity, the primary elements upon which the renouncings are based constitute a unity. 
The vijñapti is an outflowing; being bodily, it is integral to the organism. 
Does bodily vjñapti, by arising, destroy or not destroy the preexistent bodily figure which is retribution ? 
The two hypotheses create difficulties. 
That it destroys it, is impossible; for it is contrary to the principles of the Vaibhāṣikas that a rpa, retribution by nature, continues again, after having been interrupted. 
If on the contrary, bodily vsjñapt does bot destroy the previous figure, two figares,:the first of retribution, the second of out flowing,;would be found to coexist in one and the same spot. 
We must admit that bodily viñapti arises deriving from new primary elements, outflowing in its nature, and that it does not destroy.the previous figure. 
If this is the case, the part by means of which a bodily vrñapti is produced would be greater than has existed previously, being pene trated by new primary elements from whence this viñapti derives. 
We could answer that the bodyretribution in naturepresents some voids: 
, to which sphere do they belong? 
The avijñapti is never neutral. It is either good or bad. 
In fact, neutral volition is weak; it is not capable of engendering a powerful action as is the vrñapti, which continues reproducing itself after its initial cause has disappeared. 
Other action are of three types. 
Other actions, namely volition and the vñapti, can be good, bad, or ṉeutral. 
Bad action exists in Kāmadhātu. 
Not in the other spheres, for, in the other spheres the three roots of evil , and noṉshame and imprudence , are missing. 
The restriction of the stanza refers only to bad actions; hence good actions and neutral actions are in all of the Three Dhātus. 
Avṣjñapti also exists in Rūpadhātu. 
in Kāmadhātu as well as in Rāpadhātu; not in Ārūpyadhātu, for the primary elements are missing there. 
Only where body and voice exist, do we find is the discipline of the body and voice. 
There are no pure primary elements and yet there is a pure aviñapti.Pure avijñapti derives from the primary elements of the sphere wherein the person arises who produces the pure vijñaptin the same way, when a person arisen in Kāmadhātu and Rūpadhātu enters into an ārūpya absoṟption, he produces an avijñapti of Ārūpyadhātu deriving from the primary elements of Kāmadhātu or Rūpadhātu. 
The case is not the same, for the pure avñapti ttranscends the spheres; it has nothing in common with the defilements of the sphere where the personwho has produced it is found; it is neither of the same type, nor of adifferent type through rapport with the primary elements of the sphere. 
On the contrary, an avājñapti of Ārūpyadhātu cannot derive from the primary elements, of a different type,of Kāmadhātuor Rūpadhātu. 
Further, turning away from all āēpasince any idea of rūpa is absent in itan ārūpya absoṟption is not capable of producing an avijñapti, which is rūpa. 
Morality exists in opposition to immorality. 
But the ārāpyas are removed from Kāmadhātu by the four estrangements of āśraya, prakara, āālambana, pratipakṣa. 
Vijñapti exists in the two spheres where there is vcāra, There is vñapti, bodily and a vocal action, only in the spheres of Kāmadhātu and the FirstDhyāna, where there is vicāra. 
The vjñapti termed njvrta is also missing in Kāmadhātu. 
, defiled but neutral. 
Also, in the spheres where there is no vicāra, and also in Kāmadhātu. 
of the anivṛtāvyākrta class exists only in the world of Brahmā. 
It is reported that Mahābrahmā produced a false vocal action: 
in his assembly Mahābrahmā boasted falsely, in order to avoid the inquires of the venerable Aśvajit.2 ksek. 
But if vocal avjñapti is absent above the First Dhyāna, how can sound exist in the Second Dhyāna and above? 
It exists there, but it has for its cause the external primary elements: sound caused by the wind, etc. 
masters say: 
In fact the beings who are born in these Dhyānas do not call fortha good or defiled mmind of a lower sphere, by which mind they would be able to produce a good or defiled vijñapti.For the good mind of a lower sphere is of an inferior oṛder; and the defiled mind has been abandoned. 
But defend the first opinion. 
Why is the vjñapti, whatever it may be, absent above the world of Brahmā? 
Why is the vzjñapz of the defiledneutral class absent in Kāmadhātu? 
Because the cause which produces it is absent. 
i.It is the mindassociated with vtarka aṇd vicāra which gives rise to the vṝjñapti: 
such a mind is absent in the Second Dhyāna and above. 
The nvṛtāvyākṛṣta mind gives rise to a vtjñapi of the same characteristics, since this mind belongs to the class to be abandoned through Mediation. 
Thus, it does not give rise to vijñapti. 
kkk Is it solely by reason of the nature of the mind which gives rise to themgood or bad naturethat the ḍharmuas are good or bad? 
The dharmas are good or bad in four ways: 
absolutely , in and of themselves , through association , and through their original cause. 
Deliverance is absolute good. 
Nirvāṇa, being the cessation of all suffering, is perfectly tranqnil andhappy; hence it is absolute good. Comparison: like the absence of sickness. 
The roots, respect and fear, are good in and of them selves. 
The three roots of good, respectand fear , independent of their associations and of their causes, are good in and of themselves. 
like a salutary medicine. 
That which is associated is good through association. 
The dharmas, volitions, and mental states, which are associated with the roots of good, with respect, and with fear, are good by association. 
Associated with these principles, they are good; not associated with these principles, they are not good. 
Comparison: like a drink wherein one has mixed a salutary medicine. 
Actions, etc. 
are good by reason of their original cause. 
Comparison: like the milk of a cow which has drunk a drink mixed with a salutary medicine. 
How can prāptis be good when they have their origin in a mind which is not good? 
Evil is the contrary. 
The contrary of good is as shall now be taught: 
Sasāraoṟ existencehas for its nature the process of all suffering: it is thus perfectly unhappy, and so absoḻute evil. 
The roots of evil,the absence of shameand imprudence are bad in themselves. 
The dharmas associated with these principles are bad in themselves. 
Having their origin in the roots, etc., and in the dharmas associated with these roots, etc., bodily action, vocal action, their characteristics and the prāptis of the baddharmuas, are bad by reason of their original cause. 
sickness, unhealthy drugs, etc. 
hence can nothing which is impure be good or neutral? 
From the absolute point of view, this is true. 
But putting oneself in the point of view of retribution, the impure dharma which is not defined as to how it should be retributed is called undefined, or neutral , and the impure dharma which produces an agreeable retribu tion, is called good. 
What is absolutely neutral? 
Two entities are neutral in the absolute sense. 
The two unconditioned things , namely space and apraṭisakhyānirodha, are, without ambiguity, neutral. 
The Vaibhāṣikas teach that action, bodily or vocal, is good or bad by reason of its original cause, JThe same rule should apply to the primary elements which conṇstitute bodily or vocal action. 
No, answer the Vaibhāṣikas, for the intention of the agent coṟresponds to the action, not to the primary elements: 
The agent, entered into absorption, does not have any intention with regard to the avrñapti and so does not think, Let us create an gvjñapi We cannot admit that the avñapti produced by the absoṟption has its origin in a nonabsorbed mind which proceeds from the absorption, for this mind is of another class. 
Thus the avjjñapti produced by the absorption is not good; or rather, if the Vaibhāṣikas maintain that it is good, they should consider as good the divine eye and the divine ear which they regard as neutral. 
Īt has been said above that the mind susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing does not give rise to vsjñapr.Yet the Blessed One said, From bad views there proceeds bad resoḻution, bad speech, bad action, bad livelihood. 
This Sūtra does not contradict this theory. 
In fact That which gīves rise is of two types, which are known as hetusamutthāna aṅd tatkṣaṇasamutthāna. 
Samutṭhāna is that through which the action arises. 
What is both cause and samutthāna īs hetusamuṭthāna.What is samutthānaat the very moment of the action is ratkṣaṇasamuithāna. 
It is thus promoter. 
The atkṣaṇasamutthāna is second mover because it is contemporary to the action. 
But what is the efficacy done by the tatkṣaṇasamutthāna which makes it the second mover? 
If the ratkṣaṇasamutthāṇna is absent, the action will not take place, even if it was projected dies. 
how is there vjñapti for a person free from a mind which undertakes the discipline? 
The vññapti is clearer in him who is endowed with the mind, which is at the moment of the vūñapti, the second mover mind. 
The consciousness to be abandoned through Seeing is solely agent. 
The mind which is abandoned through Seeing is alone the agent of the viñapti, because it is the cause of the mental process which gives rise to the vñapti. 
this latter is put into motion by a thought turned inward, 2. 
because, to suppose that it is a seoond movet, it would then follow that the rūpa created by it would also be abandoned by this Seeing; And this hypothesis is in contradiction to the Abhidharma ī40cd. 
is not contradicted either by vidyā , or by avidyā : 
For he who maintains the thesis of the abaṇndoning of pa through Seeing would not admit that rūpa is not contradicted by vidyā. 
which has its origin ina thought to be abandoned through Seeing is, itself.also, to be abandoned through Seeing, then the primary elements which serve as a substrate to this rpa, to this viñapti, will be, themselves also, abandoned through Seeing, for they take their origin from the same thought. 
We deny this consequence.n fact, the primary elements in qestion are not good or bad by reason of the thought which gives rise to them, whereas this is the case for the vñapti. 
Or rather, we admit this consequence; the primary elements in question are abandoned through Seeing. 
this is impossible. 
The primary elements cannot be abandoned through Seeing; they are no longer nottobeabandoned. 
For the undefiled dharma is not contradicted either by vidyā or by avidyā. 
Hence the Sūtra quoted above does not invalidate our thesis: 
The manas susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation is twofold. The mental consciousness of the hāvanāheya category isatoneand the same time both agent and mover. 
The five are solely mover. 
The five viiñānakāyas, aṟe solely mover, There are thus four cases: 
The mind susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing is exclusively agent. 
The five sense consciousnesses are exclusively mover. 
iii The mental consciousness susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation is both promoter and mover. 
The pure mind is neither promoter nor mover. 
ēkkīṭ Is the mover of the same as the agent? 
There is no rule on this subject: 
From a good agent, etc., a mover of three types. 
A good, bad, or neutral mover can come from a good agent. 
The same for a bad or neutral agent. 
With regard to the Muni, mover of the same type. With regard to the Buddha the Blessed One, the mover is of the same species as the agent: 
from a good mover, a good mover; from a neutreḷ agent, a neutraḹl mover. Or good. 
Or rather, it happens that a good mover comes out of a neutral agent, whereas a neutral mover never comes out of a good agent: 
the teaching of the Buddhas is not subject to diminution. 
Accoṟding to other Schools, the mind of the Buddhas is never neutral: they are always in absorption; their mental series is exclusively a series of good thoughts. 
This is why the Sūtra says, The Nāga is absorbed when he walks, when he stands still, when he dreams, and when he is seated. 
The Vaibhāṣikas say: 
That which arises from retribution is neither of the two. 
according to the character isties of the agent, or 2. 
according to the characteristic of its mover? 
To what does this question lead? 
First hypothesis. 
and the anāgrāhadrṣi are not agents, the other wrong views are agents. 
Second hypothesis. 
The vjñapt through which a person under takes thePṛātimokṣa discipline will not be good, if this person, while he is receiving the ordination, has a bad or neutral mind. 
The vñapti is of the same nature as its agent when this latter is of a mind susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation.It is not of the same nature as its agent when this latter is of a mind susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing, for example, the thought the soul exists, for, in this case, another agent arises between the promoter and the action , a thought susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation, turned inward, accompanied by vicāra and by vitarka, through which, for example, one preaches the existence of a soul. 
But if the action is not good, bad, or neutral by reason of the mover, the explanation that you have given of the Sūtra does not hold. 
You have said in effect that the Sūtra considers a wrong view as agent and that,as a consequence, by affirming that a wrong view is the generator of vjñapti, the Sūtra contradicts neither the principle that the mind susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing does not engender vrñapti nor its corollary that, in Kāmadhātu, there is no vjñapti of the defiledneutral class. 
Oṇe must say that the Sūtra considers a wrong view as an agent to which there follows, separating it from the action , another agent which is susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation. 
This is enough on this point which has been defined above. 
Avijñapii is threefold, discipline , undiscipline ,anddifferent from either discipline or undiscipline. 
It is of three types, 1. 
savara, discipline, so called because it constrains the flix of immorality, because it destroys or arrests the flux of immorality; 2. 
naivasavaranāsavara, Prātimokḵṣa discipline, pure discipline, discipline arising from dhyāna. 
There are three types of discipline: 
this is the morality of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, the morality of beings of this world; 2. 
the discipline produced through dhyāna is morality of the sphere of Rūpadhātu; and 3. 
pure discipline, which arises from the Path, pure morality. 
The Prātimokṣa is of eight types. 
It includes the discipline of the Bhikṣu, the Bhikṣuṇī, the Śik ṣamāṇā, the Śrāmaṇera , the Śrāmaṇerikā, the Upāsaka , the Upāsikā, and the Upavāsastha. 
These eightdisciplines are the Prātimokṣa disciplines: 
thus, from the point of view of the names given to them, the discipline of the Pṛātimokṣa is of eight types. 
In substance however, the Pṛātimokṣa is of four types. 
the discipline of the Bhikṣu, the Śrāmaṇera, the Upāsaka and the Upavāsastha. 
In facī, the disciplipe of the Bhikṣuṇī does not differ, does not exist separately from the discipline of the Bhikṣu; the discipline of the Śikṣamāṇā and the Śrāmaṇetikā do not differ from the discipline of the Śrāmaṇera; and the discipline of the Upāsikā does not differ from that of the Upāsaka. 
The name changes with the gender. 
Liṅga is yyañjana, that which dīstinguishes men and women. 
It isby reason of gender that the names, Bhikṣu, Bhikṣuṇī, etc., differ. 
When their gender is modified, the Bhīkṣu becomes a Bhikṣuṇī; the Bhikṣuṇī, a Bhikṣu; the Śrāmaṇera, a Śrāmaṇerikā; the Śrāmaṇerikā, like the Śīkṣamāṇā,becomes a Śrāmaṇera; the Upāsaka,aṉ Upāsikā; and the Upāsikā, an Upāsaka, Now one cannot admit that a person, by changing his gender,abandons the former discipline and acquires a new one; the change of gender cannot have this inflaence. 
Thus the four female disciplines are indentical with the three male disciplines. 
Or rather do these disciplines, produced all of a piece, exist separately one from the other? 
They are not mixed, for in the parts that are common to them allUpāsakas, Śrāmaṇeras and Bhikṣus all renounce killing, stealing, ilicit sexuality, lying, intoxicating liquorsthe three dis ciplines have some distinct chaṟacteristics. 
Their differencs lie in the difference of the occasions of transgression. 
In fact,the person who undertakes the observation of a greater number of rules, avoids by this action itselfa greater number of occasions of intoxicationpride and of nondiligence ; he avoids, by this action, a greater number of occasions of transgression, killing, etc. 
Consequently the three series of renouncings are not identical with one another. 
If it were otherwise, ṭthatis,īf the disciplines of Upāsaka andŚrāmaṇera were integral to the discipline of aBhikṣu,then the Bhīkṣu who renounces the discipline of a Bhikṣu would renounce at the same time all three disciplines; a thesis that is not admitted. 
Hence the disciplines exist separately. 
But they do not contradict one another. 
They can coexist:by undertaking the following disciplines,one does not abandon the preceeding ones. 
Thus the fact that a Bhikṣu who renounces his quality of Bhikṣu remains in possession of the discipline of Upāsaka and Śrāmaṇera is explained. 
How does one become an Upāsaka, an Upavāsastha, a Śrāmaṇera, or a Bhikṣu? 
By undertaking the renouncing of the five things to avoid, of the eight, the ten, of all the things to avoid, one obtains the quality of Upāsaka, Upavāsastha, Śrāmaṇera, and Bhikṣu. 
By undertaking the renouncing of five items: 
murder, 2. 
illicit sexuality,4. 
1yng,and 5. 
intoxicating liquors,one places himself in the discipline of an Upāsaka. 
By undertaking the renouncing of eight items: 
killing, 2. 
anchastity,4. 
lying, 5. 
intoxicating liquors, 6. 
scents, garlands, and unguents; dances, songs, music; 7. 
high beds, broad beds, and 8. 
These make ten items, for one counts scents, garlands, and unguentsseparately from dances, songs, and music. 
By undertaking the renouncing of all the actions of the body and the voice which should be avoided, one is a Bhikṣu. 
kṣk The Pṛātimokṣa discipline is Morality, good conduct, action and discipline. 
Etymologically, because it cools , as it says in the stanza, Happy is the undertaking of morality, because morality does not burn. 
Good conduct, because it is praised by the wise. 
Action , because it is action by naṭure. 
How can aviñapti be action? 
Without doubt, the aviñapti makes the disciple, endowed with shame, to abstain from transgression; it is thus not doing. 
But it is action, according to the etymology riyata iti kriya. 
According to others,avifñapti is action because it is thecause and the effect of an action. 
4.Discipline ,because itdisciplines or constrains the body and the voice. 
The expression Prātimokṣa discipline designates all Pṛātimokṣa discipline since its origin. 
The Prātimokṣa is the first vñapti and the firstavijñapt; these are courses of action. 
The expression Prātimokṣa designates the first vrñapti and the fitst gvijñapti of the undertaking of the discipline. 
such is the efficacy of the first moment of the undertaking of discipline. 
They are courses of action, that is courses of action properly so called. 
There is no longer any Prātimokṣa in the moment which follows the first moment and iṇ the moments which follow, for the transgression is not rejected by the second moment, having been rejected by the first, there is prāti mokṣasañvara, that is, discipline of the Prātimokṣa type or discipline arisen from Prātimokṣa; there are no longer courses of action properly socalled, but solely consecative action. 
esksṣk Who possesses each of the three disciplines? 
Eight persons possess the Prātimokṣa. 
Eight persons, theBhikṣu,Bhikṣunī. 
the Upavāsatha, possess the Prātimokṣa discipline. 
Does this mean that nonBuddhists cannot possess a morality that they have undertaken? 
In fact, the morality that they undertake , tests on an idea of existence; even when they have in view, not a heavenly existence, but that which they call deliverance , they conceive of deliverance as a certain type of existence. 
Hence transgression is not absolutely rejected by them, nor can they be released through the discipline they have undertaken. 
kkāk He who possesses dḥyāna possesses the discipline which arises from dhyāna. 
Which arises from dhyāna , that īs, which arises from dhyāna or by means of dhyāna. 
Dhyāna, means not only the Four Principal Dhyānas, but also the absorptions which are close to them. 
In the same way, when one says, There is a field of rice or a field of wheat in this village, one means the village and its environs. 
kḥ The Āryans possess pure discipline. 
kksk We have seen, in the definition of sahabhhetu , that two disciplines accompaṅy the mind. 
The last two disciplines are concomitants of the mind. 
The discipline that arises from dhyāna and the pure discpline are concomitants of the mind; not of the Prātimokṣa discipline, for this latter continues to exist in a person whose mind is bad or neutral, or who is unconscious. 
In the nine nantaryamārgas of anāgamya these two disciplines,the discipline of dḥyāna and pure discipline, are abandoning disciplines , for through them one abandons immorality and the defilements which produce them. 
There are thus disciplines arisen from dhyāna which are not abandoningdiscipline. 
Four cases: 
Discipline arising from dhyāna, impure, with the exception of what arises from the ānantaryamārgas of anāgamya: 
discipline arisen from dhyāna which is not abandoning; ii. 
Pure discipline obtained in the ānantaryamārgas of anāgamya: 
Impure discipline in the ānantaryamārgas of anāgamya: 
dis cipline arisen from dhyāna which is abandoning; iv. 
Pure discipline arisen outside of the ānantaryamārgas of anāgamya: 
According to the same principles, one would establish four cases relative to putre discipline which is not abandoning, to abandoning which is not pure discipline, etc. 
kkk The Blessed One said, Good is discipline of the body, discipline of the voice, discipline of the mind, discipline in all things; and again, He lives disciplined through the discipline of the organ of sight. 
What is the nature of these two disciplines, discipline of the mind, and disciplipe of the organs? 
But on the contrary, Discipline of the mind and discipline of the organs are, each of them, two things: 
attentive consciousness and mindfuiness. 
In order that the reader should not come to believe that the first discipline is consciousness and the second mindfulness , the author says that each of them is two things. 
kḥrk Let us examine who possesses vñapts and avi ñapt and to what period these belong in each case. 
He who is in Prātimokṣa always possesses avsjñapti of the present moment, as long as the does not reject the gvijñapti. 
As we have said previously the person who dwells in thePrātimokṣa discipline ,always possesses presentavjñapti as long as he does not reject the avñapti which coṉstitutes this discipline. 
After the first moment, he also possesses avijñapti. 
After the first moment, which is designated by the expression Prṛātimokṣa , he also possesses earlier, past avjñapi: 
this of course, as long as he does not reject the discipline. 
As he who dwells in the Prātimokṣa discipline, So too is he who dwells in undiscipline. 
He who dwells in undiscipline , always possesses avijñapti of the present moment as long as he does not reject it; He who possesses discipline aṟisen from dhyāna always possesses past and future avsjñapti. 
He who possesses the discipline arisen from dhyāna always possesses avsjñapti of the past, and vijñapti of the future as long as he does not lose i1,. 
From the first moment when he acquires the discipline of dhḥyāna, he takes possession of the discipline of former dhyānas, either of this existence, or of a previous existence, that he had lost. 
The Āryan, at the first moment, does not posses past avijñapth. The Āryan possesses pure avijñapti, which constitutes his pure discipline, in the manner in which he who possesses the discipline arisen from dhyāna possesses the avijñapti arisen from dhyāna: 
he possesses his past and future vjñapti; but with the difference that, when in the first moment of the Way he takes possession of pure avijñapti fr the first time, he cannot, evidently, possess pure avsjñapti of the past. 
The person who is in a state of absorption, the person who is placed in the Way, possesses aviñapti of the present moment. 
The person who is absorbed , the person who is cultivating the Way , possesses, at present, the vijñaptiwhich is proper to him, arisen from dhyāna,and pure. 
medially, gvjñapti, when the avijñapti is produced. 
Medially means the present, situated between the past and the future. 
Action , or aviñapti created by an act of morality , or avijñapūi is cteated by some other good or bad acts, the worship of a Śtūpa, hitting and woundinghe possesses this aviñapti of the present, at the moment when it arises. 
Afterwards, of the present and the past. 
krḥṣḥ Can a disciplined petson possess bad avijñaptiz Can an un disciplined person possess good avijñp? 
And how long does the aviñapti last in these two cases? 
As long as he is endowed with faith or with very active defilements, the undisciplined person possesses good zvsjñapti, and the disciplined person possesses bad gvñapti. 
As long as there continues, in anundisciplined person, the strength of faith by which, accomplishing actions such as the worship ofa Stūpa, he has created goodavsjñapti; as longas there continues, ina disciplined persoṉ, the power of the defilements by which, accomplishing actions such as killng,hitting,binding,he has created badavjñapti, goodo bad avijñapii coṇtinues. 
At the moment of the action in question, the agent possesses avij ñapri of the present; then he possesses aviiñapti of the present and of the past. 
Those who have createdone viñapti possess it always, in the present. 
AIl those who accomplish a bodily or vocal action whether they aredisciplined, undisciplined, or intermediaries, so liong as they are accomplishing this action, possess it in the present. 
From the second moment onward, they possess vijñapti of the past, until the moment when they give it up. From the secondmmoment onward, that is,after the first moment. 
One cannot possess future viñapti. 
One does not possess past vjñapti of the nivṛta and anivṛśa classes. 
One does not possess these actions, once they are past, because the possession of a weak dharma, being weak itself, is not prolonged. 
Why is this dharma, a neutral action, weak? 
By reason of the weakness of the mind which gives rise to it. 
But then the possession of this mind too will not be prolonged. 
the case is not the same. 
The vijñapti, in effect, is stupid, for it does not know an object; furthermore it is dependent, for it depends upon the mind. 
Such is not the case with the mind itself. 
Thus the vijñapti producedby a neutral mind is weaker than this mind itself; the possession of the vjñapti is not prolongued, whereas the possession of the mind is prolongued. 
kkk We have spoken of an undisciplined person, one who is in undiscipline. 
Undiscipline, bad conduct, immorality, action, course of action. 
1.It is undiscipline,because there is no constraining of the body and voice. 
2.It is bad conduct,because it is blamedby wise men, and because it produces painful results. 
It is immorality, because it opposes morality. 
It is an action, as it is created by the body and the voice. 
It is a course of action, as it is included in the principal action. 
Four cases present themselves. 
The intermediary, acting with a weak volition, possesses a single vjñapti. 
He who is in neitherdisciplinenornondiscipline and who, with a weak volition, does good or bad action , possesses solely this act ,anddoes not possess any avñapti. 
Allthe more reason that there is no possession of aviñapti by an agent when his action is neutral. 
material meritorious works and 2. 
wWhen an Āryan has changed his existence or when he has not created vijñapi , or when he has lost the ufñapti , he pssesses only avijñapti , and not vsṝñapt;. 
The two other cases, the possession of vjñapti and avijñapti, and the nonpossession of either, are set up according to the same principles. 
kssk How does one acquire the disciplines? 
The discipline that arises from dhyāna is acquired by one thought of the sphere of the dhyāna. 
It is through one thought of the sphere of the dyāna, that īs,of the mauladhyāna and the sāmamtakas , and with an impure mind, that is, with a mind not forming part of the Way, that the discipline of dḥyāna is acquired; this is a discipline concomitant with this type of mind. 
Pure discipline, by the same mind, whean it is Āryan. 
Āryan meaṉs pure, forming part of the Way. 
We will explain below that the Āryan mind exists in six spheres of dhyāna,namely the Four Dhyānas, thedhyānāntaras and the anāgamya. 
Paravijñapana is informmative action to or from another: 
the candidate makes known something to another, avnd another makes something known to.him. 
Another is the Saṅgha, through the acquisition of the disciplines of Bhīkṣu, Bhīkṣuṇī, or Śikṣamāṇā; or a person , the acquisition of the five other prāimokś 
According to Viṇaya scholars of the Vaibhāṣika School, there are six types of ordination. 
In order to include them all within his definition, the author says, . 
Ordination by oneself, in the case of the Buddha and.the Pratyekabuddhas. 
Through entry into thePath , in the case of the Five, that is to say of Ājñatakauṇḍinya and his companions. 
Through the summons, Come, Oh Bhikṣu!, in the case of Ājñata. 
By recognizing the Blessed One as master, as in the case of Mahākāśyapa. 
By a messenger, as in the case of Dharmadinnā. 
8.By an official action as the fifth, that is,ordination beforea Saṅgha of five Bhikṣus, as in frontier lands. 
By ten Bhikṣus, as in Madhyadeśa. 
By repeating three times the formula of Refuge, as in the case of the sixty Bhadravargas, ordained in a group. 
One sees that, according to these scholars, the Pṛātimokṣa discipline is not necessarily acquired by means of a vjñapti, for example the ordination of the Buddha, etc. 
One undertakes the discipline for a lifetime or for a day and a night. 
wThe first seven categories of the Prātimokṣa discipline are undertaken for a lifetime; the fasting discipline is undertaken for a day and a night. 
Because there are two limits of time, the period of a lifetime, and the period of a day and a night. 
As for the forthnight and the other durations of time, they consist in additions of day and night periods. 
kksk What is the dharma that we term time ? 
When it is light in the four continents,it isdaytime; when it is dark it is night. Discussion: 
We admit, say the Sautrāntikas, that the Prātimokṣa discipline is solely produced for the duration of a lifetime.In fact,even if one were to undertake to observe these rules in.a future life, one would not now produce this discipline for this other life:.the person that one would become, would be different ; 2. 
he would not remember undertaking them. 
But if a petson assames the duties of a faster for more than a day and a night,for five days, or for ten days,.what obstacle would this be to his producing in himself many disciplines of the fast? 
It needs be that there wouldbe an obstacle since the Blessed One, in a Sīūtra, says that one undertakes the fast for a day and a night. 
did he think that the discipline of fasting could not be produced for a longer duration? 
He thought that persons in whom the senses are difficalt to subdue would be well capableof undertaking the fast for a day and a night.But, in truth, nothing is wrong with producing the discipline of the fast for more than one day. 
As the Blessed One does not speak of the fast as lasting any longer, the Vaibhāṣikas do not admit this manner of viewing the matter. 
esk What is the duration of undiscipline. 
There is undiscipline for a day and a night. 
Undiscipline never last longer than a day and a night, like the discipline of the fast,for it is produced by the acceptance of transgression for ones entire life. 
For, says the School, one does not undertake it thus. 
No one undertakes undiscipline in the manner in which one undertakes the fast, by saying, I wish to remain a day and a night in undiscipline. Rather, he carries out, in effect, shameful actions. Objection: 
No one undertakes undiscipline by saying, I wish to remain for my life undisciplined Thus one coes not undertake undiscipline for an entire lifetime. 
It is not in this manner, in fact, that one undertakes undiscipline. 
One does not undertake undiscipline by means of a ritual. 
One acquires undiscipline by acting with the intention of always acting badly; one does not acquire undiscipline by the intention of acting badly for a time. 
In the case of the fast, the intention is not for always; nevertheless one obtains the discipline through the force of the action which consists of saying, I wish to remain a day and a night in the discipline of the fast, and one accomplishes this action because one desires to acquire this discipline. 
If someone desires undiscipline, he could without doubt give himself over to undiscipline for this period of time. 
kksk Āccording to the Sautrāntikas, undiscipline does not exist in and of itself apart from volition. 
Undiscipline is the intention tō commit evil, that is, a certain volition with the traces which allow this volition. 
And, as long as this volition with its traces has not.been destroyed by a contrary volition, the person, even when he has a good thought, remains filed with undiscipline, a person undisciplined. 
kk How should one undertake the discipline ofa day anda night, or the discipline of the fast? 
One should undertake the fast in a humble attitude, speaking after, with ornaments removed, until the morrow, complete, the morning, from another. 
1.In a humble attitude,squatting or kneeling; with the hands joined in kapotaka or in the position of eñal;; except in the case of sickness. 
Without a respectful attitude, discipline is not produced. 
2.The candidate does not speak before the ordainer or the giver, the person who gives the fast; nor at the same time. 
In this way, it is from another that oneundertakes the fast; otherwise, there would be neither receiving nor a thing received. 
The candidate does not wear any ornaments; he wears his normal dress, because he does not draw forth vanity from it. 
The morrow, at the rising of the sun, since this is a discipline lasting a day and a night. 
When these rules are not observed, one has nevertheless done a good action ,but one does not obtain the discipline of the fast. 
When the rules are observed, the fast is even more useful for the person who commits transgressions by day and by night. 
The fast is termed pavāsa, because, embracing a way of life conforming to that of the Arhats, he places himself near the Arhats. 
Accoṟding to another opinion, it isbecause he places himself near the lifelong discipline. 
It has for its end procuring an increase of the roots of good of persons who have only small roots of good. 
As it procures an increase of good, the Blessed One said, It is called poṣadha. ksks Why is the discipline of the fast undertaken with eight parts? 
Part of morality , part of vigilence , parts of ascetic vows , have respectively four, one, three parts. 
Four parts:the renouncing of killing, stealing, adultery and lyingconstitute the parts of morality by which what is transgression by nature is abandoned. 
One part, the renounxing of intoxicating drinks, constitutes the rule of vigilence by which nonvigilence isarrested, For even if a person who has undertaken morality drinks intoxicating liquor, he will be noo vigilent. 
Three parts,:the renouncing of high beds, music,etc.,and meals at forbidden times,constitute the rule of asceticism, for they are favorable and conform to disgust. 
In order to avoid weakness of mindfulness and arrogance. 
When one drinks intoxicating liquor,one loses ones mindfulness of what one shouldand should not do. 
When one uses high and wide beds, when one attends dances, singing and music, the mind becomes arrogant. In both cases, one is not far from violating morality. 
When one observes the rule of eating at the proper times, and when one avoids eating outside of this time, one retains a mindfulness of the obligations of the fast, and disgust is produced. 
kakk i. 
Accotding to certain masters, the fast or pavāsa consists of the fast proper, and the renouncing of food at forbidden times; whereas the other renouncings are the rules or parts of the fast.The abstention fromfood is not a part; thus, with an end to the obtaining the number of eight parts, one should distinguish two parts in the seventh rule; first, the renouncing of dancing, singing, and music; and the second, the renouncing of perfumes, garlands, and unguents. 
This interpretation is not in accord with the Sūtra, ; for, according to the Sūtra, immediately after the renouncing of meals at forbidden times, the faster should say, By these eight rules,I imitate the rule,I conform myself to the rule of the Āryams, the Arhats.1ī ii. 
Then what would the fast be, distinct from its rules, and yet embracing eight parts? 
Accoṟding to theSautrāṇtikas, it is the very collection of parts which one says possesses parts; it is to this very collection that one attributes parts. 
The expression, a fast having eight parts should be understood in the same way as the expressions, a part of a carriage, a fouṟpart army , or a powder made up of five parts. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas, the abstaining from food at forbidden times is at one and the same time the fast and a part of the fast.In the same way that Right Views are at one and the same time the Pathand a part of the Path ; in the same way that Investigation into the Dharmas is at one and the same time Bodhi and.a part of Bodhi ; and in the same way way that Samādhi is at one and the same time dhyāna and a part of dhyāna. 
But we would say that it is impossible for Right Views, Investigation into the Dharmas, and Samādhi to be parts of themselves. 
Would you say that earlier Right Views, etc., are parts of later Right Views, etc.? 
This would be to admit that the first moment of the Path does not have eight parts. 
kkk Is the possession of the discipline of the fast kept only by Upāsakas? 
Others can possess the fast, but not without taking the Refuges. 
When a person who is not a Upāsaka, takes, in the same day and night, the Three Refuges before he undertakes the rules of the fast, then the discipline of the fast is produced within him. 
The Mahānāmasūtrasays,Oh Mahāṇāma, the layman with white clothes, male and possessing the male organ, who, after having taken refuge in the Buddha, in the Dharma, and in the Saṅgha, pronounces these words, Consider me as an Upāsaka: 
only through this does he become an Upāsaka. 
Does this mean that one becomes an Upāsaka by only taking the Three Refuges? 
The Kaśmīreans affirm that one cannot be an Upāsaka when one does not possess the Upāsaka discipline. 
But does this not contradict the Sūtra? 
Because The discipline is produced through the fact that he accepts the qualities of an Upāsaka. 
The discipline of the Upāsaka is produced in him by the mere acceptance of the quality of the Upāsaka, when he says, Consider me, from today onwards,for the rest of my life,as a prāṇāpeta Upāsaka. 
One should understand, prāṇātpātāpeta through ellipis, as free from killing, having renounced killing. 
Thus, by accepting the quality of an Upāsaka, one undertakes the discipline. 
Yet, in order that he understands the points of the rule , One explains them to him, as is also the case for a Bhikṣu. 
Your coreligionists will tell you the rest. 
The same holds for the Śrāmaṇpera. 
Thus one is not an Upāsaka without possessing the discipline of the Upāsaka.If allUpāsakas possess the discipline of the Upāsaka, how can an Upāsaka be an ekadefakāriṇ, etc.? 
If all Upāsakas place themselves within the discipline of the Upāsaka, why did the Blessed One describe four types of Upāsakas, the Upāsaka of one rule , of two rules , of three or four rules 0adbhhyaskārīn, and of five rules ? 
These terms, say the School, refer to the fact of observing the ruḹes. 
The Upāsaka who in fact observes one of the rules is said to practice this rule. 
Yet all the Upāsakas are equally placed within this discipline. 
Your doctrine contradicts the Sūtra. 
In what way does it contradict the Sūtra? 
You say that one acquires the discipline by the mere, fact of accepting the quality of a prāṇāpeta Upāsaka, Consider me. 
But, such is not the text of the Sūtra. 
In fac the Sūtra that interestsus is the Mahānāmasūtra which gives the definition of an Upāsaka, and not another Sūtra. 
You hold that you are authorized by another Sūtra, which has, From today, for the rest of my life,, risking my life , having taken refuge, believing perfectly.Now this text refers to persons who have seen the Truths, who have acquired the faith of intelligence , and who, as a consequence, adhere to the Good Law even at the price of their lives: 
We are incapable of abandoning the Dharma, even in order to save our lives. 
This text does not give a definition of the Upāsaka discipline. 
Further, the expression prāṇāpeta, npoṉ which you establish your theory, is nowhere to be found, either in the Mahānāmasūra, nor the Dṛṣṭasatyasutra. 
Who,based on faith in this expression, would admit that the Upāsaka has undertaken the five renouncings before he has undertaken them ritually? 
f the expression ekadeśakārṣnṉ designates a person who violates the discipline, thequestion raised in the Sūtra is not justified, nor its answer. 
In fact, who is it that, being acquainted with the discipline of an Upāsaka and knowing that it is made up of five rules, would be incapable of explaining, He who does not violate a rule observes a rule and so on. 
On the contrary, someone who does not know the extent of the discipline of an Upāsaka, seeing the persons capable of observing one, or two, or three, or all the rules, would he be able to pose the question, What does one do to become an Upāsaka of all the rules? 
If one were an Upāsaka without possess ing the discipline of an Upāsaka, one could also as well be a Bhikṣuor a Śrāmaṇera with an incomplete discipline. 
How can we know the extent, the number of the rules of the disciplines of the Upāsaka,theŚrāmaṇera,or theBhikṣu? 
Evidently through the teaching of the Master. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīr do not admit this opinion. 
All the disciplines are weak, etc., according to the mind. 
The weakness, the mediocrity, and the force of the eight rules depend on the weakness, on the mediocrity, or on the force of the mind through which one has undertaken them, But if such is the case, the Pṛātimokṣa discipline of an Arhat could be weak, and that of a Prṛthagjana could be strong. 
ṉ Is one an Upāsaka if one solely undertakes the discipline without.undertaking the Refuges? 
No; except in the case of ignorance by the person who gives and by the person who receives. 
kkṣk When a person takes refuge in the Buddha, the Dharma, and in the Saṅgha, what does he take refuge in? 
He who takes the Refuges takes refuge in the afukṣa dharmas which form the Buddha, in the two types of dharmas which form the Saṅgha, and in Nirvāṇa. 
He who takes Refuge in the Buddha takes refuge in the dharmasr of the Arhat which form a Buddha, the ḍharṇeas which are the causes of the designation Buddha, that is, the dharmas by reason of which, as principle cause, a certain person is called a Buddha; or rather the dharmas by the acquisition of which a certain person,understanding all things, is called a Buddha. 
As for the material body of the Buddha, that is not subject to modification through the acquistion of the quality of Buddha. 
Thus one does not take refuge in the material body of the Buddha which is, in fact, the material body of the Bodhisattva. 
Does one take refuge in all the Buddhas or in one Buddha? 
According to the nature of things, and in the absence of an explicit declaration, in all the Buddhas. 
He who takes Refuge in the Saṅgha takes refuge in both the Śaikṣa and the aśaikṣa ḍharmas, of the nonAṟhat and of the Arhat, which form the Saṅgha, that is,the dharmuas through the acquisition of which the Eight Saints become a Saṅgha; becoming unanimous they cannot be divided with regard to that which concerns the Path. 
Does one take refuge in all the Saṅghas or in one Saṅgha? 
for the Pathfollowed by the Saints is always the same. 
Without doubt, the Buddha said to the two merchants, Also take refuge in the Saṅgha which shall exist in the futre, but the Master expressed himself in this manner in order to exhault the qualities of the Jewel of the Saṅgha which would soon be visible to the merchants. 
He who takes Refuge in the Dharma takes refuge in Nirvāṇa, that is to say, inpratisakhyānirodha. 
He takes refuge inall Nirvāṇa, for Nirvāṇa has for its unique characteristic the cessation of the defilements and suffering of oneself and others. 
Discussion. 
If the Buddha is none other than the afxikṣa dharmas, the dharmas pertaining to an Arhat, how could the fact of wounding the Buddha with a bad thought constitute a mortal transgression ? 
The Vaibhāṣikas answer: 
When one wounds the materialelements which are the supportof these dbarmas, these dharmas themselves suffer injury. 
But the Śāstra does not say that the Buddha is solely ikṣadharmas.It says that the Buddbha is thedharmas that form a Buddha, that is to say, either the worldly or transworldly dharmas which are the object of the designation Buddha, are the Buddha. 
Thus the Śāstra does not deny that the ārayathe organism, the support made up of the five worldly sēxndhasforms part of the quality of Buddha. 
Hence the objection taken from wounding the Buddha is without value. 
If it were otherwise, if the Buddha was only asukṣadharmas, and if the Sañgha were only fxikṣaand aśaikṣadharmas,a person whose mind is presently worldly would not be able to be either a Buddha or a Saṅgha. 
And by virtue of these same principles, one would have to say that a Bhikṣu is only morality, the discipline of a Bhikṣu. 
In the same way that one who honors Bhikṣus, honors the morality which makes up the Bhikṣus. 
According to another opinion, one who takes refuge in the Buddha takes refuge in the eighteen āveṇikadharmas of the Buddha. 
śkkṣk What is the nature of the undertakings of the Refuges? 
They are vocal vñaptś. 
What is the meaning of Refuge ? 
The Three Refuges are so named because, by going to them for refuge one obtains definitive deliverance from all suffering. 
The Blessed One said in fact, Tormented by fear, persons most frequently take refuge in mountains, in forests, in woods, and in sacred trees. This is nota good refuge, the supreme refuge; it is not by taking refuge in these that one is delivered from all suffering. But one who takes Refuge in the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Saṅgha, when one sees through wisdom the Four Noble Truths,Suffering, the Arising of Suffering, the Extinction of Suffering, and the Holy Eightfold Path which leads to Nirvāṇa,this is the good refuge, this is the supreme refuge; by taking refuge in this, one is delivered from all suffering. This is why the undertaking of the Refuges is the enterance to the undertaking of all the rules of discipline. kedk The other rules of discipline contain the renouncing of all sexual activity ; but the discipline of the Upāsaka only contains the renouncing of sexualmisconduct. Why is this? 
Sexual misconduct, because it is much censured, because one easily abstains from it, because the Āryans have obtained abstention from it. 
Sexual misconduct is much censured in the world because it is the coṟṟuption of anothers wife, and because it leads to retribution in a painful realm of rebirth. 
2.It is easy for householders to abstain from it, but it is difficult for them to abstain from all sexual activity: 
householders do not leave the world because they are not capable of difficult things. 
The Āryans possess akaraṇasavara with regard to sexual misconduct, that is, they have obtained definite abstention from it; in fact, in their future existence, they will be incapable of violating this precept. 
As a consequence, the rules of discipline of the Upāsaka contain only the renuniation of sexual misconduct: 
it is inadmissible in fact that the Āryaṇns, in a susequent existence, would be capable of violating the discipline of an Upāsaka which could happen if this contained the renuncation of all sexual activity. 
kkk Has the man who marries after having undertaken the Upāsaka discipline, undertaken renouncing with regard to the woman whom he marries? 
Yes, answer the Vaibhāṣikas; for, in the contrary hypothesis, this man would have undertaken a restraining discipline. 
Ī They have acquired it as they have accepted the discipline; they have not accepted it with regard to some persons. 
They have acquired it as they have undertaken the discipline. 
They undertake it by saying, I renounce sexual misconduct, that is, I renounce all sexual activity with all prohibited females; they do not undertake it by saying, I shall refrain from all sexual activity with such persons. 
Consequently, they do not violate the discipline by getting married. 
kṣṅk Among the transgression of speech, why does the renouncing of lying constituteone of the rulesof the Upāsaka,whereas the renouncing of other transgressions of speech are omitted? 
For the same reasons: 
Because, having violated any other rule he would lie. 
, he would lie when he violates any other rule, saying, Īi have not done it. 
Consequently the Upāsaka should renonnce lying, thinking, I shall coṉfess what I transgress. 
kḥ Why are not the transgressions of disobedience included in the discipline of the Upāsaka? 
Oṉe renounces strong liquor, which is a transgression of disobedience, Why should the Upāsaka renounce a single transgression of disobedience and not others? 
In order that the other rules may be kept. 
One who drinks strong liquor will not keep the other rules. 
ī.The Ābhidhārmikas maintain that strong liquor does nothave the characteristic of being a transgression by its nature. 
A transgression by its nature is committed only by a person whose mind is defiled: 
now it happens that, as a remedy, one can drink strong liquor in a quantity where it is not inebṛiating. 
But the mind of one who drinks knowing that such a quantity is inebriating is defiled; the mind is not defiled when one drinks knowning that such a qnantity is not inebriating. 
To Upāli, who asked him, How should one attend to illesses? 
the Blessed One answered, Except, Upāli, by transgression of nature. 
Aṇd, the Blessed Oṉe did not permit strong liquors to sick Śākyans: 
Those who recognize me as their master should not drinkaṇy strong liquor, even a drop on the point of a blade of grass. 
The Āryans, even in a following existence, do not drink strong liquor, not any more than they would commit the other traṇṉsgressions of nature, killing, etc. 
Scripture,the Nandikasūra and eisewhere,places strong liquor among the misdeeds of the body. 
In general, the transgression of disobedience is permitted to the ill, as the answer to Upāli proves. 
But strong liquor is an exception: 
though solely a transgression of disobedience, it is forbidden to the ill, and this witha view to preventing theupleasant consequence of strong liquor, because its inebriating quantity is undetermined. 
M 2.Ifthe Āryans certainly abstain from strong liquor,itis not because it is a transgressionby its very nature,but because they are filled with the force of modesty; , this is because strong liqtor makes mindfulness fail, even if they do not drink a dtop, this is because the inebriating quantity is not determined,as for poison. 
Ścripture considers strong liquor as a bodily misdeed, because strong liquor is a cause of nonvigilence. 
This is not the case for the other transgressions: 
The Scripture says that one is reborn in hell through the practice of strong liquor. 
As a consequence of strong liquor, there is continual activity of a series of bad thoughts; from whence, there is either projection of a new action retribuable in hell, or else the entry into activity, at the moment of death, of an old action. 
Swrā is a fermented drink of rice; mzaireya is a fermented drink of various ingredients. 
Ata certain moment, the liquor is no longer inebriating; at a ceṛtain moment, it is no longer that; this is why the word adya has been added. 
Even the arecanut, the paspale are termed syrā and maireya when they inebriate. 
Strong liquor is only a transgression of disobedience. 
The formula thus contains the words pramādasthāna in order to have one understand that one should renounce strong liquor because it is the cause of all failures of mindfulness. 
One acquires the discipline of Kāmadhātu relative to all actiops, relative to the two types of beings and to the two types of actions, relative to things of the present. 
This discipline is relative to all actions, preparatory actions, actions themselves, and consecutive action. 
This discipline is relative to the transgressions by nature and to the transgression of disobedience, both of which are capable of relating to living beings or to nonliving beings. 
This discipline is relative to thingsskandhas, āyatanas and dhātusof the present, for the things of the past and of the future are neither living beings, nor nonliving beings. 
One acquires the discipline of dhyna and the pure discipline relative to actions themselves and to things of the three time periods. 
One acquires these two disciplines relative to actions themselves, not relative to preparatory actions or to consecutive action, and not relative to the transgression of disobedience; and relative to the skandhas, āyatanas aṅd dhāṭus of the past, present and future. 
There are thus some skandhas, āyatanas and dhātus relative to which one acquires the Pṛātimokṣa discipline and not the two others. 
Preparatory and consecutive actions, transgressions of disobedience, of the presentalluded to by the Prātimokṣa. 
Courses of actions of the presentalluded to by the three disciplines. 
for, when one undertakes the discipline, no bad course of action is present relative to which one could undertake the discipline. 
ikōk Does one acquirediscipline or undiscipline with regard to allbeings, relative to all of their parts, and by reason of all causes? 
One acquires discipline with regard to all beings; one must distinguish regarding the parts and the causes. 
One acquires discipline with regaxrd to all beings, not with regard to only some of them. 
The discipline of the Bhikṣu is acquired relative to all parts: 
The other disciplines are acquired relḹative to four parts: 
sttong mind, mediocre mind, weak mind. 
The discipline is acquired by reason of one of these three minds. 
There is a person abiding in discipline,disciplined with regard to all beings, but notdisciplined relative to all the parts, nor disciplined by reason of all causes: 
he who, through a strong, or mediocre, or weak mind, has acquired the discipline of the Upāsaka, the Upavāsastha or the Śrāmaṇera.2. 
There is a person abiding in the disipline,disciplined with regard to allbeings and relative to all the parts, but not disciplined by reason of all causes: 
he who has acquired the discipline of the Bhīkṣu through a sttong, mediocre, or weak mind. 
There is a person residing in discipline, disciplined with regard to all beings, relative to all the parts, by reason of all the causes: 
he who has acqnired each of the three disciplines of the Upāsaka, the Śrāmaṇera and the Bhikṣu through minds which are, respectively,weak, mediocre, and strong. 
There is a person residing in discipline, disciplined with regard to all beings, disciplined by reason of all the causes, but not disciplined relative to all the parts: 
he who has acquired each of the three disciplines of the Upāsaka, the Upavāsastha and the Śrāmapera through minds which are, respectively, weak, mediocre, and strong. 
No one abides indiscipline who is not disciplined with regard to all beings: 
he acquires the discipline through a good mind having for its object all beings. 
The person who makes a restriction is not completely rid of the intention of transgression. 
The Prātimokṣa discipline includes the absence of the fivefold reṣṭriction: 
with regard to beings, I renounce transgressions with regard to certain beings; 2. 
with regard to parts of the discipline, T renounce certain actions; 3. 
with regard to place, I renounce committing transgressions in a certain place; 4. 
with regard to time, I renounce transgressions for a month; 5. 
with regard to circumstances, I renounce transgressions except in the case of a quarreL He who undertakes such undertakings does not acqnire thediscipline; rather, he does a good action similar to the acquisition of the discipline. 
How can one acquire the discipline with regard to all beings? 
Because, we believe, one acquires the discipline through the intention of pot killing any being. 
The Vatbhāṣikas givea different explanation.If the discipline was acquired only with regard to beings who are within range, the discipline would be liable to augmentation and to diminution: 
The discipline would thus be acquired with regard to gods who become human, and lost with regard to humans who become gods, without there being any cause either of the acquisition, or of the loss of the discipline. 
For the discipline that oneundertakes with regard to grass neither increases nor diminishes when new grass arises, nor when old grass dries up. 
But when living beings enter into Nirvāṇa, they no longer exist, exactly like grass, so the discipline acquired with regard to living beings is subject to diminution. 
Thus the explanation of the Vaibhāṣikas is invalid. 
If one objects,In the case where the Prātimokṣa discipline wouldbe acquired with regard to all beings, then the discipline of later Buddhas would be reduced in comparason with that of former Buddhas, for it would not be relative to beings who have alteady entered into Nirvāṇa, to former Buddhas and their disciples, we would reply: 
all the Buddhas disciplineall beings; and if former Buddhas were to exist again, later Buddhas would be disciplined by them. 
Undiscipline, with regard to all, relative to all parts, and not by reason of all causes. Onṇe acquires undiscipline with rgard to all beings and relative to all courses of action. 
No one is undisciplined with an incomplete undiscipline. 
One is not undisciplined by reason of all causes, un discipline being undertaken by aweak,mediocre,or strong mind.Let us suppose that an undisciplined person has undertaken his undiscipline with a weak mind and commits a murder with a strong rmind: 
his undiscipline remains weak, but he is adorned with a strong vijfñapti, with a strong murder. 
The butchers of sheep, birdcatchers, the butchers of pigs, fisher maṉ, hunters, bandits, exceutioners, jailers, elephant hunters, the slaughterers of dogs, and the vāgurikas are all undisciplined. 
It also holds that kings, office holders, judges, etc., are undisciplined. 
A butcher of sheep is the person whose profession is to kill sheep.The same etymology holds for the names of the other professions. 
ii.We understand that discipline, undertaken with the intention of universal benevolence, would be acquired with regard to all beings. 
But the butchers of sheep do not have the intention of maltreating their parents, their children, or their servants; they would not want to kill them, even at the price of their lifes. 
How, , can one say that they are undisciplined with regard to all beings? 
Because they have the intention of killing with regard to their parents who have become sheep through trans migration. 
But they do not kill their parents who have become sheep knowing that they are their parents! 
hence the butcher is not undisciplined with regard to them. 
if the butcher is undisciplined with regard to his present parents because he willkill his parents who have become sheep, one would say as well that he is not undisciplined with regard to some other sheep since he is not disposed to kill the sheep which are reborn as humans, as his own children. 
But, he who does not have the intention of killing the sheep who bave become his children is certainly not undisciplined in their regard. 
how can the butcher who does not steal, who is not an adulterer, and who is mute, be undisciplined relative to all these transgressions? 
Because his intention is perverted. 
A mute can express himself through gestures. 
But what is there to say of a man who has accepted two or three parts of morality? 
For the Vaibhāṣikas, nondiscipline is never incomplete, that is, relative only to certain parts; nor is it partial, that is, including restrictions in the practice of a certain transgression. 
For the Sautrāṇtikas,discipline apd undiscipline with the exception of the Prātimokṣa discipline can be incomplete and partial. 
This depends on the manner in which one undertakes discipline or undiscipline: 
one binds oneself to a part of immorality, or to a certain part of morality. 
kk How does one acquire undiscipline? 
How does one acquire the avijñaptis which are neither discipline, bor undiscipline? 
One acquires undiscipline through action or through accepting it.! 
Persons born in a family of undisciplined petsons acquire un discipline when they accomplish the actions preparatory to kiling. 
One acquires the other gvijñaprisby reason of the field, of undertaking, of an action seriously undertaken. 
Ceṟtain persons axe a field of sucha nature that by offering thema garden, etc., one reduces v;jñapti. 
2.One produces viñapti by undertaking vows, for example,I shall not eat unless I have paid homage to the Buddha, I shall give alms food on the fast day, for a fortnight, for a month, for a year, etc. 
Action undertaken seriously, witha burning faith, with a burning passion , produces evṝñap. 
kḵsk How does one lose discipline? 
The Prātimokṣa discipline is lost through abjuration, through death, through hermaphroditism, through the cutting off of the roots, and by the night coming to an end. 
Excluding the discipline of the fast, the Prātimokṣa discipline is lost: 
through abjuration, intentionally renouncing the rule in the presence of a person capable of understanding it; 2. 
through the death or abandonment of the nkāyasabhāga ; 3. 
through the cutting off of the roots of good. 
The discipline of fast is iost through these four causes and, further, when night come to an end. 
Some say through a patanīya. 
According to the Sautrāntikas, the discipline of the Bhikṣu and the novice is also lost through any one of the four patanyas, or transgressions involving a falling away. 
Through the disappearance of the Good Law, say some other masters. 
According to theDharmaguptakas, the Prātimokṣa discipline is lost when the Good Law disappears: 
there are no longer any rules, any boundaries, nor any ecclesiastic actions. 
The Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmīr say: 
A monk guilty of a grave transgression, that is,of apaanīya,does not lose hisBhikṣu discipline.It is notadmissible that one loses the entire discipline by destroying only a part of the discipline. 
He who comrnits a transgression other than a patanya is not immoral. 
He who commits a paanya is at one and the ṣame time moral and immoral: 
as a person who has both riches and debts; but when this transgressor has confessed his transgression, he is no longer immoral,but solely moral: 
as a person who has paid his debts. 
But the Blessed One has said, He is not a Bhikṣu, he is not a monk; he no longer belongs to the sons of Śākya; he falls from the quality of Bhikṣu; his quality of monkhood is cut off, falen, eṟased, tumbled down, annihilated. 
The Vaibhāṣikas: 
In this text Bhikṣu signifies a true Bhīkṣu: 
An inadmissable explanation: 
you avoid the question that the Blessed One made in a clear sense: 
furthermore, you lead defiled persons to the practice of immorality. 
How can you prove that this quotation is of clear sense and should be taken liteṛally? 
The Blessed One has explained this himself. There are four Bhikṣus: 
, this refeṛs to a fifth Bhikṣu, namely a person who has been properly ordained but who, through patanya, loses this quality and this discipline; it is certainly not a question of his being a true Bhikṣu,an Arhat, for one capable of a patanāya is not a ttrue Bhikṣu,an Arhat,but is susceptible of losing the quality of being a true Bhikṣu. 
The aṟgument that one does not lose the entire discipline through the losing of one part of it,is refuted by theMaster himself who in fact compares a transgressor monk to a palm tree whose head is cut off, henceforth incapable of becoming green, of growing,of developing, or of growing larger: 
this means that, when one part of the discipline, the part which is the root of the discipline, is cut off, the rest of the discipline is incapable of growing. 
The patanhya or the maui āpatti is in contradiction to the state required of being a Bhikṣu; he embraces an extreme absence of fear of transgression ; he breaks off the root of discipline: 
all his discipline is lost. 
The Master excludes persons guilty of paanāya from all com merce with the Bhikṣus, he prohibits them from participating with them for even one mouthful of food, he forbids them from even setting one foot into the monastery. 
He says, He who is not a Bhikṣu but who has the aspect of a Bhikṣudestroy this tare, uproot this rotten tree, drive out this plant without seed! 
What indeed can be the Bhikṣu quality of this criminal? 
He possesses the quality which consists of his quality of Bhikṣu. 
For the BlessedOne said, Cunda, there are four monks and not a fifth: 
Does one not speak of burning wood, of a driedup pond, of a parrotṇose , of rotten seed, of a ciṛcle of fire, or of a dead being? 
One does not lose the quality of monkhood through pataniya, since the Blessed One admits a monk guilty of unchastity as a penitent. 
We do not say that any Bhikṣu guilty of unchastity is a pārājka, a fallen or destroyed Bhikṣu. 
But whoever is a pārājña is no longer a Bhikṣu.It is the idea of hiding the crime which is decisive here: 
if, thanks to the excellence of his moral dispositions, thanks to the excellence of his series, the guilty one does not have the thought of concealing his fault for en instant, then the King of the Law admits him as a penitant. 
If a pārājñka is no longer a Bhikṣu, why is he not again admitted to ordination? 
Because he is susceptible to discipline: 
Also, even if he had renounced the rules , he cannot be ordained again. 
To what good does this discussionlead? 
If a similar Bhikṣu is aBhikṣu, we pay homage to this quality of Bhikṣu. 
When the Good Law disappears, all ecclesiastical acts become impossible, and as a consequence also all acqnisition of the discipline. 
But he who possesses the discipline will not lose it. 
kkīk How does one lose the discipline of dhyāna and the pure discipline? 
The good of the sphere of dhyāna is lost through a change of state and through falling. 
All of the good of the sphere of dḥyāna, that is, material and nonmaterial good, is lost through two causes: 
through arising in a superior or inferior stage: 
through falling away: 
when the ascetic falls away from this absorption. 
One should add a third cause, the Pṛthagjana loses certain gooddharmas throughdeath even whenhe is reborn in the same heavenly stage from whence he died. 
The same for the good of Ārūpyadhātu. It is lost through the changing of the stage or through falling away. Note that discipline does not exist in this sphere. 
Pure good is lost through the obtaining of a resuit, through perfection of the faculties, or through falling away. 
By obtaining a result, the Āryan abandones the good dharrmas of the path of the candidate ; 2. 
when he perfects his faculties , he abandons the path of weak faculties; and 3. 
when he falls, he abandons the result or the path of a superior result. 
Undiscipline is lost through the acquisition of discipline, through death, or through hermaphroditism. 
The discipline of dhyāna cuts off undiscipline, being a threefold change hostile to undisciplipe. 
An undisciplined person who rejects the tools of his work,dagger and net, even with the intention of no longer committing murder, does not by this cut off his undiscipline if he does notundertake the discipline. 
Iiness does not improve without medicine, even though one may avoid the causes of illness. 
Does an undisciplined person who undertakes the discipline of the fast remain undisciplined when he departs from the fast, or rather, does he find himself in the intermediary state, neitherdisciplinednor undisciplined? 
Opiniops differ. 
For some, he is found to be undisciplined, for the petson who undertakes the fast does not have the intention of definitively renouncing transgressions: 
a mass of iron turṇed red retuṟns to its original state. 
For others, once an undisciplined person has departed from the fast, he is no longer undisciplined, for the acquisition of indiscipline supposes a physical or vocal action. 
kii How does one lose avjñap which is neither discipline nor undiscipline ? 
Intermediate avijñapti is lost through the catting off of the force, the undertaking, the action, the object, the life,and the roots, We have seen how one acquires vjññapti which differs from discipline and from indiscipline. 
This avijñapti is lost by reason of six causes: 
when the intense force of faith, or the defilements which have projected the avjñapti, come to an end. 
Example: 
Good nonmaterial action, of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, is lost through the cutting off of the roots, and througharisingina superior sphere.ē We have explainedhow material action, namely bodily action, vocal action, and the avjñapati, is cat off. 
Good nonmaterial action of Kāmadhātu is lost thorough the cutting off of the roots of good, and through birth in Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu. 
That which is defiled and nonmaterial is lost through the arising of its opposite. All that which is defiled, of whatever sphere, is lost through the arising of the Path which opposes this defilement. 
This refers toa path of abandoning which can be Seeing or Meditation, and which can be worldly or transworldly. 
This Path causes the abandonment of a certain category of wpakleśa and, with it, all its attendant prāptis, etc. 
xc What beings are susceptible to discipline and to undiscipline? 
Humanswith the exception of the two categories of eunuchs, hermaphrodites, and the Kurusare susceptible of undiscipline; the same for the discipline which pertains also to the gods. 
Undiscipline exists only among humans. 
One must furthermore except ṣaṇḍhas and paṇḍakas, hermaphrodites and beings in Uttarakuru. 
Discipline exists among humans, with the abovementioned exception, and among the gods: 
thus, it exists in two realmns of rebirth. 
this results from the Sūtra, ŚOh Mahānāma, white clothed laymen, male and possessing the male oṟrgan. 
, and from the Vimaya, One must expel such a person. 
Why is this? 
Because they possess, to an extreme degree, the defilements of the two sexes; because they are incapable of the reflection necessary to combat these defilements; and because the vigor of respect and fear is absent in them. 
Why are they not susceptible to undiscipline? 
In the painful realms of rebirth there is no vigor of respect and fear: 
now a vigorous respect and fear are necessary for discipline; in order for there to be indiscipline, it is necessary to destroy respect and fear. 
Neither discipline nor undiscipline can arise in the bodies, or in the persons, of eunuchs, hermaphordites, and beings in the realms of painful rebirth, for these bodies are similar to soil saturated with salt wherein there can neither grow wheat, nor bad herbs. 
The Sūtra says, OhBhikṣu, there isa Nāga boṟṉ froman egg which, each eighth day of the fortnight, leaves its dwelling, and comes to undertake the eightfold fast.. 
Discipline exists thus solely among humans and among the gods. 
The three disciplines exist among humans. 
Discipline of dḥyāna exists among the gods of Kāma dhātu and Rūpadhātu. 
Not in higher spheres. 
So too the pure discipline, with the exception of the gods of the intermediate dhyāna and the Asajñisattvas; and also in Ārūpyadhātu. 
It exists in Rūpadhātu with the exception of the dhyānāntarikas of beings arisen in intermediate dhyāna, and the Asajñisattvas; and in Ārūpyadhātu. 
The gods of Ārūpyadhātu never in fact manifest this discipline, since discipline is matter, rpa; but they can possess it.19 Following the exemination of action, the author now defines the diverse categories of action which are taught in different Sūtras. 
keṭk There are three actions, g0od, bad, and neutral. 
Good action is salutary, bad action is pernicious, and action differing from good and bad isdifferent from the salutary and the pernicious. 
Such is the definition of good action, etc. 
Good action is salutary, because it is of agreeable retributionandas a consequence it protects one from suffering for a time ; oṟ rather, because it brings about the attainment of Nirvāṇa and, as a consequence,definitively protects one from suffering. 
Bad action is pernicious: 
this is action of disagreeable retribution. 
Action concerning which the BlessedOne does not say whether it is good or bad, that is, morally neutral action, is neither salutary nor pernicious. 
There are three actions: 
meritorious action, demeritorious action, and nonagitated action. 
action of agreeable feeling, action of disagreeable feeling,and action of neither disagreeable nor agreeable feeling. Meritorious action is a good action in Kāmadhātu; non agitated action is a good action above there. 
Good action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu is called meritorious action, because it purifies, and because it produces an agreeable retribution. 
Good actionabove there, that is to say, of the two higher spheres, is called nonagitated. 
1 But did not the Blessed One say that the first three Dhyānas are agitated? 
Did he not say that the Āryans say that the viarkita and the vicaria of the First Dhyāna are agitation? 
The Blessed One said in fact that the first three Dhyānas are agitated, but he is saying this from the point of view of the corrupted characteristics of these dyānas ; their vices are what agitate them. 
But in the Iījiasūra, the Blessed One declared that these dhyānas are nonagitated because he considerd them a pathway favorable to nonagitation. 
But why term that which is agitated nonagitated? 
t Because, with regard to that which concerns its retribu tio, action of the domain of the higher stages does not vary. 
Action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu is agitated in its retribution. 
one action which produces, naturally, a certain realm of rebirth, can be retributed in another one; an action which produces a heavenly realm of rebirth can be rettibuted in another heavenly realm of rebirth. 
In fact t happens that actions which produce power, a good figure, beauty, or objects of enjoyment, instead of being retributed in a heavenly realm of rebirth, are retributed in a human, animal, or Preta realm of rebirth through the efficacy of certain causes. 
But no cause can make an action of the sphere of Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu be retributed in any but the sphere which is proper to it. 
Bad action is demeritorious. 
As for actions of agreeable feeling, etc.: 
Good action, up to the Third Dhyāna, is of agreeable feeling. Agreeable sensation ḍdoes not exist above the Third Dhyāṇas: 
Hence the retribution of good action is of agreeable feeling up to the Third Dhyāna. Action having such a retribution is called of agteeable sensation. 
There only remains the sensation of indifference, which is the only retribution of good action retributed above the Thitrd Dhyāṇna. 
Bad action, here below, is of disagreeable sensation. 
Bad action is of disagreeable sensation. 
kṣksk Is the result of all these actions only sensation? 
No; they also have the apparatus of sensation as their result. 
According to some, intermediary action also exists below. 
some say that the retribution of dḍhyānāntara action is the seṇsation of pleasure of the dhyāna itself; some others say that the retribution of this action is not sensation,.! 
These two opinions are in contradiction to the Śāstra , Does it happen that an action is solely mental sensation? 
Yes, the retribution of a good action which was free from vsitarka. 
Because it is admitted that the retribution of the three types of action takes place at the one and same time. 
The Śāstra says in the same place, Does it happen that there is at oṉe and the same time retribution of the three types of action? 
There can take place at the same time: 
the retribution of an action of agreeable sensation, namely of materialdharmas, ; the retribution of an action of disagreeable sensation, namely the mind and the mental states ; the retribution of an action of neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensation, namely thedbarmas dissociated from the rnind,. 
Now, the three types of action cannot be retributed simultaneously outside of Kāmadhātu, for the retribution of action of disagreeable sensation takes place only in Kāmadhātu. 
pkkḥ Is the action of neither agreeable nor disagreeable sensation good or bad? 
It is good, but of weak force. 
But didnt you say that good action, up to the Third Dhyāṇna, is of agreeable sensation ? 
This definition refers to cases in general. 
ksk:k But how can one say that action is of agreeable sensation? 
Action, by its nature, is not sensation. 
One expresses oneself in this way because action is favorable to agreeable sensation; or rather, because its retribution is agreeably sensed. 
In the same way that one calls bathing clothes, snānāyakāṣāya, the clothes with which one bathes, in that same way one terms to be sensed action through which one senses a retribution. 
There are five ways of being vedanīya, sensed, ex perienced: of itself, through sensation, as an object, by being retributed, and by the fact of its presence. 
Sensation, by its nature, is feeling. 
Agreeable sensation is agreeable experience, etc. 
Contact is feeling because it is associated with sensation: 
contact of agreeable sensation, etc. 
The six objects of the six organs are feeling in the role of object , Seeing color with the eye, he experiences, he feels the color, but he does not feel the color with affection. 
Color is thus the object of sensation. 
Action is feeling in its role of being retributed, an action experienced in the present existence. 
Sensation is feeling through the fact of its appearance. 
When he feels, when he experiences agreeable sensation, two sensations, the disagreeable and the neutral, are then found to be obstructed by it: 
hence when agreeable sensation is functioning, there is no other sensation through which one would feel it. 
Thus if one says that this sensation is to be felt , this is because it is present. 
This action is determinate or indeterminate. 
The action that we have just described is either determinate, that is, which will necessarily be felt, or indeterminate, which will not be necessarily felt. 
Determinate action is of three types, to be experienced in the present life, etc.1 Determinate action is: 
to be experienced in the present life; to be experienced after having been reborn, in other words in the next immediate life; and to be experienced later. 
By adding indeterminate action, this makes, from the point of view of the modality of retribution, four types. 
According to one opinion, action is of five types. 
that which is indeterminate with regard to the period of its retribution, but whose retribution is in any case certain; and that which is indeterminate with regard to its retribution, which can be not retributed. 
kkk Action experienced in the present life is action which ripens or is retributed in the same existence in which it was accomplished. 
Action experienced after being reborn is action which is retributed in the existence which follows that in which it was accomplished. 
Action experienced later is action which is retributed ina latet existence, from the third existence on. 
But, some other masters, , cennot admit that a very strong action has a weak retribution. 
Consequently, the retribution of an action experienced in the present life can continue into other existences; yet, as this retribution begins in the present life, this action i said to be experienced in the present life. 
The Vaibhāṣikas do not accept this way of looking at it. 
There is, they say, some actions whose results are near, and some actions whose results aṟe distant. 
In the same way flax bears its fruit after two and a half months, but wheat and godhāma after six months. 
Others distinguish four alternatives. The Dārṣṭāntikas distinguish four cases: 
Action determined with regard to the period of its retribution, but indeterminate with regard to its retribution. 
this is njyatavedanīya, but ansyaṭavipāka action. 
Action determined with regard to its retribution, but indeterminate with regard to the period of its retribution. 
nyabavipāka,but ansyatavedanīya.. 
nyatavipāka and niyatavedanāya. 
Action indeterminate from two points of view: 
aniyatavipāka and aniyatavedanṅīya. 
According to this system there are eight types of actions: 
action experienced in the present existence and of certain retribution, 2. 
action which can be experienced in any existence and of only possible retribution. 
kkk Does it happen that a person produces or projects all four types of actions at one and the same time? 
Three types of actions project existence. 
Action experienced in the present existence does not project the present existence ; this has been projected by a former action. 
kkṣk How many types of action can be produced in the different spheres of existence and in the different realms of rebirth? 
In the three spheres of existence and in all of the realms of rebirth the four types of good or bad action can be produced. 
But this general rule has some restrictions. 
In the hells, one can produce good action to be experienced in the next existence, good action to be experienced in a later existence, and good action which is indeterminate; but no good action to be experienced in the present existence, for there is no agreeable retribution in the hells. 
When he is detached from a certain stage, that is, when he is delivered from attachment with regard to a certain plane of existence , in this stage he never produce action to be experienced in his next rebirth. 
When he is firm, the Saint does not produce, in the stage from whence he is detached, any action to be experienced either in the next existence or in a later existence. 
In fact,the Pṛthagjana incapable of fallingaway is not reborn, in the next existence, in the stage from whence he is detached; end a Saint incapable of falling away is never reborn at this stage. 
Both produce, relative to the stage wherein they are born, actions to be experienced in the present existence, and indeterminate action. 
The Āryan, not firm, when he isdetached fromKāmadhātu or from Bhavāgra, the same. 
Even when they are subject to fallingaway, that is to say,susceptible of losing the results obtained, these Saints do not produce action to be experienced in the next existence, nor in a subsequent existence, either in Kāmadhātu or in Bhavāgra. 
We shall explhain how the Saint, subject to falling away, always reacquires the results before dying. 
Does the intermediate being produce any actions? 
The intermediate being, in Kāmadhātu, produces twenty two types of actions. 
The embryo passes through five states,kalala, arbuda, pesin, ghana, and praśākhā.A hbuman being passes through five states,as an infant,an adolescent, a grown person, a mature person, and an old person. 
In this same way he produces eleven indeterminate actions. These actions bear their results in the present existence. The eleven determinate actions of the intermediate being belong to the category to be experienced in the present existence. 
The intermediate existence and the ten states which follow it are projected by a single action. 
Thus one does not distinguish en action to be experienced in the intermediate existence: 
this is projected, in fact,by the action itself which is to be experienced in the life which follows the intermediate existence. 
kksk By virtue of what characteristics is an action determinate, that is to say, necessarily retributed? 
Action accomplished through intense defilement or through intense faith, with regard to the field of qualities, continually, and the murdering of a father and a mother, are determinate. 
Actioṉ accomplished with regard to these fields, even in the absence of an intense thought of defilement or of faith, or of continuity, is determinate, whether it is good or bad. 
The same for the murder of ones father or mother, with whatever intention it was committed. 
kkḥ By virtue of what characteristic is an action experienced in the present existence? 
Action bears result in the present existence by reason of certain characteristics of the field and the intention. 
By reason of the excellence of the field, even though the intention may be weak: 
for example, the Bhikṣu who becomes a woman through having insulted the Saṅgha, You are nothing but women! 
By reason of the excellence of the intention: 
for example the eunuch who delivered bulls from the danger of being castrated, and so regained his own sexuality. 
When a person is definitively detached from a ceṟtain stage , he cannot anymore be reborn in this stage: 
as a consequence, action retributable in this stage, but in another existence,whether it is good or bad, changes its nature and becomes retributable in the present existence. 
this action will be retributed in the present life. 
the person for whom actions should be retributed, in this first rebirth, in a certain stage, cannot be definitively detached from this stage. 
As for action nondeterminate with regard to the retribution itself, it will not be retributed if one detaches himself from the stage where it could have been retributed. 
kskk Which field confers on an action which is in a relationship with it, the quality of being necessarily retributed in the present existence? 
In general, it is the Saṅgha of Bhīkṣus having at its head the Buddha; to enumerate its persons, there are five types of persons: 
in this absoṟption he has obtained an extreme tranquility of thought, for this absorption is similar to Nirvāṇa. 
When he leaves it,it is as if he had gone to Nirvāṇa and has returned from it. The person who leaves the absorption which arrests the defile meants of another : 
in this absorption, his mental series is endowed with the intention of placing an infinite ṉnumber of beings into the absence of defilement; when he leaves it, his series is penetrated with an intense and measureless merit. 
in this absorption, his series is endowed with the intention of increasing the wellbeing of an infinite number of beings; when he leaves it, his series is penetrated with an intense and measureless merit. 
The person who leaves the Path of Seeing the Ttuths: 
in this Path, he has abandoned all the defilements which are abandoned through Seeing the Truths. 
When he leaves it, his series is thus pure, since his personality has just been renewed. 
The person who leaves the result of Arhat, that is to say, who has just acquired the result of Arhat; he has just achieved the abandoning of all the defilements which are abandoned through Meditation on the Truths. 
His series is pure, since his personality has just been renewed. 
This is why good or bad actions, well or badly done, with regard to these five persons, bear a result in the present existence. 
The Paths of Meditation through which one obtains the results of Sakrdāgāmin and of Aṇāgāmin, are incomplete in themslves and in their result. 
Can the retribution of a certain action be excusively mental senṣation, and not bodily sensation ? 
And can the retribution of a certain action be bodily sensation, and not mental sensation? 
Sensation, the result of good action free from viarka, is exclusively mental. 
Actions of the the sphere of dhḥyānāntara, the interval between the First and Second Dhyānas , and the actions of the higher stages are free from vitarka. 
Like bodily sensation, that is to say, associated with the five sense consciousnesses, which always embraces vitarka and vicāra , it cannot be the reṣult of a retribution of an action free from vñarka. 
Sensatioṉ, which is the result of a bad action, is exclusively physical. 
A sensation, the result of retribution of a bad action, is painful; painful mental sensation is what is termeda sensation of dissatisfaction. 
We have established that dīssatisfaction is never the result of retribution. 
Mentaltrouble is produced in the mental consciousness. 
The expression that the Kārikā uses, manascita, mental thought, is equivalent to the expression wanovijñāna, mental consciousness, coṉsciousness of the anas. 
The five sense consciousnesses cannot be troubled because they are free from imagining, inquiry and memory, and mental trouble is the imagining of that which does not exist. 
It arises from the retribution of actioṇ. 
Mental trouble arises from the retribution of action. 
Through fear, the attack of demons, irritation of the elements, and fear. 
Demon beings, with hoṟrible features, will approach such a person: 
seeing them, the person is frightened and his mind is troubled. 
Furious at the evil conduct of humans, demon beings willhit them in their vital parts. 
the wind, heat and liqnid will be irritated. 
Fear also troubles the mind, for example in the case of Vāsiṣṭhī, etc.2 kṣksk But, one would say, if mental trouble, or trouble of the mental consciousness, arises from the retribution of action, how can one say that this mental sensation is not retribution? 
We do not say that trouble of the minda troubled mindis retṛibution of action, but that it arises from the retribution of action. 
The primary elements in a state of disequilibrum are retribution: 
the troubledmind proceeds from it; t thus arises from retribution. 
Onessays that the mind s troubled when,by reason of the disequilibrium or the irritation of the humors, which results from action,.the mind is deranged, anarchic, devoid of mindfuiness. 
The mind troubled without being disturbed: 
the mind undefiled but troubled; 2. 
the mind disordered without being troubled: 
the mind defiled, but tranquil; 3. 
the mind troubled and disordered;. 
kskḵ Among whom is trouble of the mind produced? 
Among the gods of Kāmadhātu, there are two madnesses; all the more so is there madness among humans, Pretas, and animals. 
Beings in hell always have troubled minds: 
their vital parts are incessantly hurt by thousands of different torments; they are crashed down by suffering; they do not recognize themselves, so they do not distinguish that which they shoulddo and that which they shouldavoid. 
We give as an example a being in hellwho laments by saying, Ah! 
With the exception of the Buddha, the Āryans are not free from trouble of the mind: 
their thoughts can be troubled following the disequilibriim of the elements.But their disequilibrium of the elements is never retribution: 
for determinate actions where retribution could produce trouble of the mind are retributed before they have obtained the Path, and indeterminate actions will not bear their results due to : 
the fact that the Path is obtained. 
Neither terror, nor the attack of demon beings, nor fear can trouble the mind of the Āryaṇms, for theyare above the five fears, they do no disobedient actions which excite the fury of demon beings,for they cmpletely know the nature of things. 
ṅtk The Sūtra teaches that there are three ctookednesses, crookedness of the body, speech, and mind; and thus three corruptions and three stains. 
What is termed crookedness, corruption, stains, is action arisen from hypocrisy, hatred, and attachment. 
Action of the body, speech, and mind which arises from hypocrisy, proceeds from crookedness, and is called crookedness ; action which arises from hatred, proceeds from hatred, and is called coṟruption; and action which arises from attachment, proceeds from staiṉ, and is termed stain. 
Action is of four types, white, black, etc. 
The Sūtra teaches that action is of four types: 
black, of black retribution; white, of white retribution; blackwhite, of blackwhite retribution; neither black nor white, without black or white retribution; and that which destroys the other actions. 
60.Bad actions, good action of Rūpa, good actions of Kāma, are, respectively, black, white, blackwhite; action which destroys the other actions is pure action. 
Bad action, being defiled, is absolutely black; retribution, being painful, is black. 
2.Good action of the sphere of Rūpadhātu, not mixed with the bad, is absoḻutely white; its retribution, being agreeable, is white. 
Objection: Why not say the same for good action of the sphere of Ārūpyadhātu? 
Because the qualification white applies only to action which has two retributions , aṇd which is threefold, bodily, vocal andmmental. 
Good action of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, being mixed with the bad, is blackwhite; its retribution is mixed, so it is thus blackwhite. 
There is no action which is blackwhite, nor any retribation which is blackwhite, which would be a contradiction. 
Butbad action is also mixed with whiteaction, hence bad action should be defined as blackwhite. 
Bad action is not necessarily mixed with good action; whereas, in Kāmadhātu, good action is necessatrily mixed with bad, because, in this sphere, the bad is stronger than the good. 
Pure action destroys the other three types of action. 
Not being defiled, it is not black; not being retributiion, it is not white. 
It is nonwhite. 
the Blessed One wishes to oppose pure action to white action; but, speaking in the Mahāśūnyatāsūśra of thedharmas proper to the Arhat, he expresses himself thus, The dbarmas of the Arhat, Oh Ānanda, are absolutely white, absolutely good, absolutely irreprochable. 
And one reads in the Treatise, What are the white dharmas? 
The good dharmas and the neutral dharmas? 
Pure action does not have any retribution, for it is not of the domain of the spheres of existence; in fact,it aṛrests the process of existence. 
Does any pure action destroy all the actions of the first three categories, black, white, or blackwhite? 
A volition may be of twelve types, namely the volition of the dharmakṣāṇtis andof the first eight paths of abandoning in the detachment of Kāmadhātu: such is the action which destroys black action. 
Four volitions correspond to the four dharmakṣāntis of the Path of Seeing the Truths; eight voiitions correspond to the fitst eight paths of abandoning in thedetachment of Kāmadhātu: 
inall twelve volitions,all pure actions which destroy bad actions. The volition of the ninth is the action which destroys blackwhite action. 
The volition which corresponds to the ninth path of abandoning in the detachment of Kāmadhātu is the pure action which causes the abandoning of blackwhite action and black action, for at this moment one abandons, in its entirety, good action of Kāmadhātu and the ninth and last category of bad action. 
Volition which arises in the last paths of abandoning of the detachment of the dhyānas destroys good action. 
The volition of the ninth and last path of abandoning which produces detachment of Kāmadhātu with regard to each dhyāna is fourfold volition which destroys white action. Objection: Thefirst eight paths of abandoning in the detachmentof Kāmadhātu destroy black action. 
But you attribute the power to destroy whiteblack and white action solely to the ninth path of abandoning. 
There is not, propetly speaking, abandonment of any good dharmas, for even if they are abandoned, the good dharmas can reappear; but when the defilement which has thisdharrna for its object is destroyed this dharma is said to be abandoned. 
Therefore as long as the last category of defilement which can grasp it as its object is not destroyed, this gooddharma is not considered abandoned. 
According to others, the action which should be experienced inhell is black action; action which should be experienced elsewhere in Kāmadhātu, in addition to hell, is black white action. 
Infernal retribution is produced exclusively through bad action: 
as a consequence, action which should be experienced in hell is black action. 
Retribution in Kāmadhātu, with the exception of hell, is exclusively produced by goodbad action. 
Accoṟding to others, arisen in Kāma, actions are black when they can be abandoned through Seeing the Truths; they are blackwhite in the contrary case. 
According to other masters action which is abandoned through Seeing the Truths, not being mixed with the good, is black. 
AIl other actions of Kāmadhātu, namely action which is abandoned through Meditation, is blackwhite, that is, good mixed with bad. 
k The Sūtra says, There are three silences, silence of the body, voice, and of the mind. 
60 Afaikṣa, that is, an Arhats, actions of the body, voice and mind, are, in this order, the three silences. 
Silence of the body and silence of the voice is bodily and vocal action which belongs to the Arhat. 
Silence of the mind is the mind or thought which belongs to an Arhat; this is not mental action. 
Why is this? 
Because the mind is the true Silent One, the trne Muni. 
The Vahāṣikas say that one knows through inferenceby reason of the actions of the body and voicethat the mind is afaikṣa. 
But silence is abstention, thus the mind itself which abstains receives the name of silence. 
Why does only the mind of the Arhat receive this name? 
Because the Arhat is the true Silent One through the cessation of all muṟrmnuring of his defilements. 
kksḵ The Sūtra says, There are three purifications, purification of the body, purification of the voice, and purification of the mind. 
The threefold good practice in its entirety is the threefold purification. All the good practices of the body, pure or impure, are a purification of the body, because, either for a time or in a definitire manner, they efface the impurity of the defilements and bad practices. The same holds for the voice and mind. 
This teaching has for its goal the instruction of persons who take a false silence for silence, and a false purification of purification. 
kkk The Sūtra says that there are three bad practices. 
The bad actions of the body, speech and mind are regarded as being the three bad practices. 
Bad actions of thebody are the bad practices of the body and so on. 
Even though greed, wickedness, anger and false views are not actions, they constitute a threefoldbad practice of the mind. 
greed, wickedness or harm, and false views. 
The Dārṣṭāntikas say that greed, wickedness and false views are, in fact, mental actions, for the Sacetanāyasñra considers them as actions. 
In this hypothesis, defilements and actions would be the same thing. The Dārṣṭāntikas: What harm do you see in that? 
The Vaibhāṣikas: 
As for the Sacetanāyasra to which you allude, it is volition itself that it designates when it says greed, because volition comes into play under the influence of greed. 
Because these produce a painful retribution, and because they are condemned by good persons, these practices of the body, speech and mind are bad; they are thus termed bad practices. 
good actions of the body, speech, and mind; further, nongreed, nonwickedness and right views. 
kksḥ How can false views or right views by regarded as bad, or good??2 In fact, the firstdoes not contain an intention to do evil, and the second does not contain an intention to do good to another. 
By taking, among these practices, the most evident, one defines the ten coutses of action, good and bad respectively. 
The Sñtra defines ten courses of actin: good coutses of action, by taking the most important,.:which are the easiest to seefrom among the good practices;and bad courses of action,by taking the gravest from among the bad practices. 
kkk What practices, bad or good, are not included in the courses of action? 
A part of thebad practices of the body,namely preparatoṟy aṇd consecutive actions of bodily courses of action ; and certain defiled actions of the body, for example,drinking alcohol, hitting,binding, etc. 
, ate not incuded among the coutses of action, because these practiees are not extremely grave, Among the bad practices of thebody are courses of action which deprive another of his life, of his goods, or of his wife: 
one must absoḻutely abstain from them. 
That which is very grave among bad practices of speech, is, for this same reason, declared to be a course of action, not preparatory, consecutive, or minor actior1. 
One part of the bad practice of the mind, volition, is also excluded from the bad courses of action. 
The good courses of action do not include 1. eithera part of the good practice of the body: 
preparatory or consecutive; abstention from inebriating drinks,etc.; alms, worship,etc. 
or one part of the good practice of speech, affectionate words, etc.; 3. 
or one part of the good practice of the mind, good volition. 
kkk Among the courses of action, Six bad courses of action can be exclusively gviñapti. 
When one has six courses of actionmurder, stealing, lying, maliious speech, harmful speech, or inconsiderate speechperformed by another, then these six courses of action are only avsjñapiHe who had these actions carried out is lacking the principle vijñapti, that is, the act of killing itseif, etc. 
One bad course of action is always of two types. 
When one has it committed by another, he does not procure the same pleasure. 
Śix, when one caṟries them out himself, are of two types When one executes them himself, the six courses of action specified above are atone and the same time vñapt andavjñapt; if death takes place at the same moment as the vjñapti ; if death takes place later, there is only gvijñapti. 
ksksk Among the good courses of action, Seven good courses of action are of two types. 
In fact the morality that one undertakes depends on one vrjñapti. 
They are only zvrñapti when they have arisen from absoṟrption. The courses of action which are included in āharmasia, that is, in the discipline of dhyāna and in the pure discipline, are qualified as arisen from absorption. These two disciplines depend on a single thought: 
the courses of action are thus not vsjñapti, Is this also the case for preparatory and consecutive actions as for the principle action or the course of action proper? 
They are always viñapti. They may or may not be avij ñapti. 
When they are accomplished with a great violence of passion ,or with an extreme strength of faith , they are avijñapt;. 
If not, then no. 
The opposite concerning consecutive action. 
Consecutive actions are, on the contrary, necessarily gvijñapti:They are viñapti whenṉ,having accomplisheda course of action, one continues to commit actions analogous to the course of action. 
k What is it that constitutes preparatory action, the course of action proper, and consecutive action? 
A maṇ, desiring to kill an animal, rises from his bed, takes some silver, goes to the market, feels the animal, buys the animal, leads it, pulls it, makes it enter, mistreats it, takes a sword, strikes the head once or twice: 
At the strokeby which he deprives the animal of its lifethat is,at the moment when the animal diesthe vñapts of this moment and the aviñapti which is simultaneous to this viñapti, are the course of action proper. 
For it is by reason of two causes thatone is touched by the transgression of murder: 
by reason of the preparatory action and by reason of the achievement of the result. 
The moments that follow, the moments of viñapti cteated by the killing, are the consecutive action; the series of the moments of viñapti are also consecutive action: 
moments that constitute pulling the hide off the animal, washing it, weighing it, selling it, cooking it, eating it, and congratulating oneself on it. 
In the same way one can explain, with the necessary changes, the other six courses of bodily and vocal action. 
There is no reason to distingnish preparatory and consecutive action for greed, wickedness and false views: 
at the moment when they manifest themselves, by the sole fact of their presence, they are couṟses of action proper. 
A question is raised. 
at the moment when the animal is in varapa bhava, ṭthat is,at the moment when the animal dies? 
Or is the vjñapti and the avjjñapti of the moment when the animal is in rtabhava, that is, when it is dead? 
If you accept the first hypothesis, a person would be guilty of the transgression of killing when he kills at the very moment when the killed animal dies: 
but your system does not admit this. 
And in the second hypothesis, you have rightly said that, at the stroke by which he deprives the animal of its life, the viñapti of this moment and the svjñapti simultaneous to this vifñapti, are the course of action proper. 
Further, if you accept the second hypothesis, you contradict the explanation that the Vaibhāṣikas give to the phrase,while the prayoga has not yet disappeared, that one reads in the Mlasfāstra. 
This Śāstra says, Can it be the case that a living being has already been killed but that murder has not yet occured? 
Yes, when the living being has already been deprived of life, but when the prayoga has not yet disappeared. 
The Vaibhāṣikas explain this text by saying that the word prayoga which normally signifies pteparationhere has the meanin of consecutive action. 
Now you contradict this explanation since, placing the course of principle action at the moment when the animal dies, it is indeed the course of principal action which, according to you, has not disappeared at the moment when the animal dies. 
You interpret the word prayoga of the Śāstra in the sense of the principal action. 
But how could the vñapt of the moment when the animal is already dead be the principal course of action? 
Why would it not be? 
Because it is ineffective. The Vaibhāṣikas: 
It is not their efficacy which makes a vjñaptś 
ḥk Can it be the case that one course of action is either a preparatory action or a consecutive action of another couṟse of action? 
For example the ten courses of action can be a preparatory action for murder. 
A man desires to kill his enemy; in order to assure the success of this enterprise, he takes the goods of another and offers an animal in sacrifice; as a means to this same end, he committs adultery with the wife of his enemy in order to make her an accomplice; through lying, malicious, injurious, and frivolous words, he causes a falling out between his enemy and his friends who would be able to defend him; he coveṭs the goods of his enemy; he wishes to do evil to his enemy; he nourishes false views with regard to the murder that he wants to commit. 
In this same way the ten courses of action can be the consecutive action of muṟder. 
But, greed, wickedness and false views are never preparatory actions, for they are not the beginning of an action; nor are they preparatory actions, for they are solely a production of the mind. 
kkṣk The Sūtra says, There are, Oh Bhikṣus, three types of killing: 
killing arisen from desire, killing arisen from hatred, and killing arisen from ignorance, and thus following to, There are, Oh Bhikṣus, three types of false views. 
All the courses of action are not indifferently achieved by desire, hatred, or ignorance; but Preparatory action arises from three roots. 
The preparatory action of all of the courses of action can indifferently arise fromm the three roots. 
The BlessedOne,by expressing himself as we have seen, refers to the first cause, the cause which gives rise to the course of action. 
1L.Killing arisen from desire: 
killing in order to seize a ceṛtain part of an animal; killing in order to seize some goods; killing for pleasure; killing in order to defend oṉeself, or ones friends. 
Killing arisen from hatred, in order to satiate hostility. 
Killing arisen through ignorance. 
To consider the sacrifice as a pious action andso to kill, when a king, according to the authority of the legalists kills through duty, The first of the meritorious actions of the king is to punish evildoets; when the Persians say, One should kill ones aged and sick parents; when one says, One should kill serpents, scorpions, and ryambuka flies , etc., because these creatures are poisonous; one must kill game, cattle, birds, and buffalos in order to nourish oṇeself.? 
And finally killing which is provoked by false views: 
murder committed by a person who denys a future life and whom nothing can stop. 
2.Stealing arisen from desire. 
Either one steals the object desired, or one steals in order to then gain possession of another object, to acquire honor and respect, or in order to defend oneself and ones friends. 
Stealing arisen from hatred, in order to satiate hostility. 
Stealing arisen from ignorance. 
A king, upon the authority of the legalists, seizes the goods of evildoers.The Brāhmins say, All things have been given to the Brāhmins by Brahmā; and it is through the weakness of theBrāhmins that the Vrṣalas enjoy it. 
Consequently, when a Brāhmin steals, he takes that whichbelongs to him; he eats what is his, wears what is his, and gives what is his. 
And yet, when Brāhmins take, they indeed have the notion of the goods of another. 
Stealing provoked through false views is also stealing from ignorance. 
TIicit sexuality arisen from desire. 
Sexual intercourse with the wife of another, either through love, or in order to obtain honor and respect, or in order to defend oneself and ones friends. 
Illicit sexuality arisen through hatred, in order to satiate hostility. 
The Persians, etc., have intercourse with their mothers and other forbidden womer.. 
In the gosava sacrifice, a Brāhmin drinks water in the manner of an animal, grazes through the grass, has intercourse with his mother,his sister,ora woman of his gora; he must copulate with them wherever he finds them: 
And such too are those that say, Women are like rice mortars, flowers, fruits, cooked food, ladders, roads, and ferryboats: they are there to be used. 
Lying and other vocal transgressions arisen from ignorance and from hatred, as above. 
Lying arisen from ignorance. 
Oh King, playful lying, lying to women, in marriage,or indanger of death, does not hurt: one says that these five lies are not transgressions. 
This is lying provoked by false views. 
Malicious words and other vocal transgressions arisen from ignorance. 
These are provoked through false views. 
How do greed, wickedness and false views arise out of desire, etc.? 
Greed and the other two mental courses arise from the three roots because they appear subsequent to these roots. 
When they appear immediately after desire, they arise from desire; kck We have explained the bad courses of action in their relationship with the roots. 
As for the good courses of action, Good actions, with their preparatory and consecutive actions, arise fron nondesire, nonhatred, and nonignorance. 
Good courses of action, with their preparatory and consecative actions, have a goodmind for theiroriginating cause. 
This good mind,being necessarily associated with the three roots, arises from the three roots. 
Ñ The renouncing of a preparation of a bad course of action is a preparation of a good course of action; the renouncing of the action proper which constitutes a bad coarse of action is itself a good course of actioṉ; the renouncing of a consecative action of a bad course of action is a consecutive action of a good course of action. 
the ordination of a novice. 
From the moment when the novice enters into the nānāvasa, salutes the Saṅgha,addresses his request to the Upādhyāya, uṇntil the first or second karmavācana, this is the preparatory actior. 
At the achievement of the third armavācana there takes place a viṝñapti, and an avijñapti simultaneous to this vēupti, which constitute the course of action itself. 
kkk We have seen that bad courses of action were not indifferently achieved by the three roots. 
Killing, wickedness, and injurious words are achieved through hate. Solely by hate. 
They are achieved when one thought of murder, or one thought of violence manifests itself. 
Adultery, greed, and stealing are achieved through desire. 
Adultery is illicit sexuality. 
False views, through ignorance. 
Through an extreme ignorance. 
The others, by the three. 
The other courses of action,.lying, malicious words, and in considerate words,are achieved either through desire, hatred, or ignoraṇce. 
The courses of action, which have just been divided into four sections, three , three, one and three, have respectively for their Object: 
Living beings are the objects of killing, wickedness and injurious speech; the objects of enjoyment are the objects of adultery, greed and stealing; nāmarūpa, that is, the five skandhas, atre the object of false views; nāman, that is,thenāmakāya is the object of lying and the other two transgressions of the voice. 
kkṣk When one has decided to kill someone, and if the murderer dies either before the intended victim, or if he dies at precisely the same momentas the victim,is therea principal courseof action for the author of the murder?Jf one dies before or at the same time, there is no principal course of action. 
When a person has made the preparation for killing, can itbe that, at the moment when the result of this preparation is achieved, thiśs person is not touched by the transgression of killing? 
Answer: 
Yes, when the murderer dies before or at the same time. 
The reason is cleat: 
as long as the victim is living, the murderer is not touched by the trans gressioṅl of murder; and when the victim dies, he no longer exists if he died at the same time or before. 
Because a new body has come into existence. 
The bodythe personalityby whom the preparation had been accomplished, the body of the murderer, is destroyed; the murderer takes up a new body which belongs to another niāyasabhāga : 
this body did not make the preparation, is not prayoktar and, as a consequence, cannot be touched by the transgression of murder. 
When many persons are united with the intention to kill, either in war, or iathe hunt,or inbanditry, who is gnitty of mutder, if only one of them kills? 
As soldiers, etc., concur in the realization of the same effect, all are as guilty as the one who kills. 
Having acommon goal, all are guilty exactly as he who among them kills, for all mutually incite one another, not through speech, but by the very fact that they are united together in order to kill. 
But is the person who has been constrained through force to join the army also guilty? 
Evidently so,unless he has formed the resolution, Even in order to save my life, I shall not kill a living being. 
kkṣk What does he do in order that he who kills should commit the course of actin? 
Same question for the other transgressions up to and including false views. 
Murder is to kill another, consciously, without making an iiA When a personkills by thinking, I am killing such a one, and kilis this same person, and not another through error, then there is murḍder. 
But is there murder when a person kills, doubting if he hits a living being or a thing, or if he hits another? 
This person possesses the certitude, This is certainly him; he hits him; and as a consequence, there is the thought of parityāga. 
How can therebe murder, or destruction of the prāṇa , since the skandhas are momentary? 
Prāna, the vitalbreath, is a wind whose existence depends on the body and the mind. 
This prṇa is annihilated by a murderer in the same way in whichone annihilatesa flame or a sound of a bell, that isto say, by obstructing the continuation of its reproducing itself. 
Or rather, prūṉa is the vital oṟgan : 
when a person creates an obstacle to the arising of a new moment of the vital organ, he annihilates it, and is touched by the transgression of killing. 
But to whom do you attribute the vital organ? 
Who do you say is dead when life is absent? 
Let us observe that the Blessed One said, When life, heat and consciousness leave the body, it lies abandoned, like a piece of wood, deprived of feeling One says that the body lives when it isendowed with the organs; and that the body is dead when it is devoid of them. 
kesk According to theNirgranthas, transgression results for the doer from killing, even comrmitted without knowing it, or without desiring it,in the way that contact with fire results inburning. 
But if this is the case, then one is gnilty when one sees, or touches, without wanting to, the wife of another; he who trims the hair of the Nigranthas is guilty; the master of the Nirgranthas is guilty since he preaches terrible austerities; he who gives the Nirgranthas food which provokes cholera and death is also guilty. 
The mother and the embryo which are both the cause of suffering,are guilty; guilty aiso is the person killed, for he is bound to the action of killing as the object killed: 
and fire burns its own support. 
But on the other hand, he who has murder committed by another is not guilty, for one is not himself burned when one has another person touch the fire. 
Since you do not take intention into consideration, wood and other materials, even though lacking consciousness, are guilty of murder when a house collapses and living beings perish. 
kkḵ Stealingtaking what is not givenis to appropriate to oneself the goods of another through force or in secret. 
The reservation above holds: 
with the condition that there has been no eṟṟor. 
To appropriate to oneself, through force or in secret, that which is possessed by another, when one does not confuse the person from whom one wants to steal with another person, constitutes stealing. 
for, at the moment of Nirvāṇa, the Blessed One accepted, appropriated to himself all the gifts made to Stūpas. 
According to others, this is to take a thing which has not beengiven by the guardians of the Stūpa. 
To take a thing that does not have an owner is to take what is not given by the ruler of the country. 
To take the goods, the robes, etc.,of an deceased monk, is to take what is not given by the Saṅgha of the parish,? 
in the case when an ecclesiastical action has not been done; in the opposite case, this is to take what is not given by all the disciples of the Buddha. 
Illicit sexuality, fourfold, is intercourse with a woman with whom one should not have intercourse. 
Intercourse witha forbidden woman, that is, the wife of another, onesmother, onesdaughter, or ones paternal or maternal elations; 2.Intercourse withones own wife through aforbidden way;3. 
at an unsuitable time: 
when the wife is pregnant, when she is nursing, or when she has takena vow. 
Some say: 
when she has taken a vow only with the consent of her husband. 
The reservation relative to killing, with the condition that there has been no error,also extends to illicitsexuality,and there is no course of action when one has intercourse with the wife of another if one thought that he was with his own wife. 
Opinions differ on whether there is a coutse of action when one takes the wife of a certain one for the wife of another one. 
For some, yes, for it isthe wifeof another who was the objectof the preparatory action; it isalso the wifeof another thatone enjoys. 
With regard to whom is intercoutse with Bhikṣuṇis ilcit sexuality? 
With regard to the master of the land, who is not disposed to tolerate it. 
As for the master of the country himself,if his spouse, when she has undertaken a vow, is forbidden to him, all the more reason are nuns so forbidden. 
Intercourse with a young gitl is illicit with regard to the Inan to whom she is engaged, and, if she is not engaged, with regard to her guardiam; if he has no guardian, then with regard to theking. 
Lying is discourse held, with differing thoughts, with a person who understands the meaning, 1. 
Lying is discourse held, with thoughts different from the sense expressed, with a person who understands the meaning. 
When the person addressed does not understand, such discourse is only frivolous words. 
2.Discourse is sometimes made up of numerous syllables. Which will be the course of action? Which will be lies? 
The last syllable, which is viñap and which is accompanied by avijñapti.Or rather, the syllable whose hearing causes the meaning to be understood. 
The preceeding syllables are a preparation for the lie. 
How should one interpret the expression arthābhijña, a person who understands the meaning? 
Does this refer to the moment when the person addressed understands the meaning? 
Does it refer to a person. 
addressed capable of understanding the meaning? In the first hypothesis, you admit that the course of action takes place when the person addressed has understood the meaning; it follows then that the course of action is solely viiñapti: 
for the person addressed understood the meaning through mental consciousness, which is consecative to auditory consciousness; and the vjñapt, oṟ vocal action, peṟishes at the same time as the auditory consciousness. 
There is no longer any viṝñapti at the moment when the person addressed understands. 
But what must one do in order that the person addressed is capable of understanding the mean ing? 
The person who knows the language and in whom auditory consciousness has arisen is capable of understanding the meaning. 
One must interpret the text in a manner in which it will not give rise to criticism. 
ksksk The Sūtra teaches that there are sixteen yocal actions, eight of which are bad: 
tosay that one has seen what one has not seen, to say that one has heard, cognized, or known what one has not heard, cognized, or known,; to say that one has not seen when one has seen; and to say that one has not heard, cognized, or known when one has heard, cognized, or known; and eight are good: 
to say that one has not seen when one has not seen. 
What is the meaning of the words seen , heard , cognized , and known ? 
75.What is perceived through the visual consciousness, through the auditory consciousness, through the mental consciousness, and through three consciousnesses, is called, in order, seen, heard, cognized, and known. 
What is perceived through the visual consciousness receives the name of seen,..what is perceived through the consciousness of smell, taste, and touch, receives the name of known. 
How do you justify this last interpretation? 
The Vaibhāṣikas say that odors, tastes and tangible things, being morally neutral, are as dead ; this is why they are called mmākā. 
The Sautrāntikas: 
According to the ūtra,andby virtue of reasoṇing. 
The Sūtra says, What do you think,Oh Mālakīmātar, the visible objects that you have not seen, that you have not seen formerly, that you do not see, about which you do not think Would that I could see them, do you have, by reason of them, any longing, lust, desire, affection, attachment, appetite, or searching out? 
No, Lord. 
Oh Mālakīmāta:, with regatd to the subject seen, you will only think, Śit is seen, with regard to the subject heatd, cognized,and known, you will only think, it is heard, cognized, known. 
The words seen,heard, and cognized, certainly refer to visible things, to sounds, and to the dharmas: 
hence the word ata refers to smells, tastes, and tangible things. 
If it were otherwise, the experience relative to smells, tastes and tangible things would notbe refered to inthis teaching of the Blessed Oṇne. 
This Śūtra does not have the meaning that you beiieve it does, and is does not confirm your interpretation of the word maia.The Blessed One does not aim to define the characteristics of the four experiences, having seen, having heard, having cognized, having mata.His mind is evidently, In the fourfold experience, seeing, etc., each of which beats on the sixfold objects, visible things, sounds, smells, tasṣtes, tangible things and dharmas,you maintain only that this experience takes place, that you see, etc., without attributing to the object the characteristic of disagreeable or agreeable. 
Then what should one thus understand by seen, heard, mata and cognized? 
According to the Śautrāntikas, that which isimmediately perceived by the five material organs, is seen, dṛṣṭ4; that the consciousness of which is transmitted to us by another, is heard, frux; what is admitted by reason of correct reasoning, is zaśa,known; and what is perceived by the mental organ is cognized, vñāta. 
such is the fourfold experience that the Sūtra refers to. 
It is thus false that, in the hypothesis where.aadoes notdesignate odors, tastes, and tangible matter, the experience relative to these objects would be omitted in the Sūtra: 
thus the argument of the Vaibhāṣikas does not hold. 
According to former rnasters, seen is what is perceived by the oṟgan of seeing; heard is what is perceivedby the organ of hearing and what one learns from another: 
known is what is personally accepted or experienced; and cognized is what one feels in and of oneself. 
kksk Does he who, by means of his body and not by means of speech, causes to be understood what is not in his mind, comrmit lying? 
The Śāstra says in fact,Question: 
Can one be touched by the transgression of killing, without acting, without attacking bodily? 
Answer: 
Yes, when one acts vocally. Question: 
Can one be touched by the transgression of lying without vocal action? 
Answer: 
Yes, when one acts bodily. 
Can one be touched by the transgression of murder, by the transgression of lying, without either bodily or vocal action? 
Answer: 
Yes, for example the Ṛṣis, guilty of murder through their anger,Ś and a Bhikṣu, guilty of lying through his silence in the confession ceremony. 
hence there is no viñapti; and avsjñapti of the sphere of Kāmadhātu cannot exist where vjñapti is absent. 
This is a difficulty that must be resolved. 
Malicious or slanderous speech is the discourse of a person with a defiled mind with a view to dividing. 
The discourse that one has, with.a defiled mind, with a view to dividing others and creating enmity, is malicious speech. 
The restrictions formulated above, when the person addressed understands, when there is no confusion of persons, applies here. 
Injarious woṟds are abusive discourse. 
All defiled discoutse is inconsiderate speech. 
The Kārikā has all defiled. ; but it refers here to discourse. 
All defiled discourse is inconsiderate speech; one who utters it is thus aninconsiderate speaker; but the Kārīkā has bhinnapralāpitā in place of sabhinnapralāpa. 
According to others, inconsiderate speech is the defiled discourse which differs from the others. 
the name inconsiderate speech is reserved for the defiled speech which is neither lying, nor malicious, nor injurious. 
For example, boasting, singing, declamations; for example, bad commentaries. 
For example, a monk boasts about himself in order to obtain alms, etc.; through frivolity some others sing; in the course of plays or dances, the dancers, in order to entertain the public, hold inconsiderate discourse; adopting the doctrines of bad philosophers, nonBuddhists read bad commentaries. 
And in addition, there are lamentations and loquaciousness, caṟried out with a defiled mind but which differ from lying, malicious speech and injurious speech. 
But is it not true that, in the period of a Cakravartin King, there are songs that do not have inconsiderate words? 
In this period, songs are inspired by a spirit of detachment, not by sensuality. 
Oṛ, according to another opinion, there is, in this period, inconsiderate words, since one speaks of āvāha, of vivāha, etc.; but this inconsiderate speech does not constitute the course of action of this ṉame. 
Greed is the desire to appropriate to oneself, by illigitimate means, the goods of another. 
To desire to appropriate to oneself the goods of another in an illegitimate manner, in an unjust manner,by force or secretlyWould that the goods of another were mine! 
is the course of action called greed, abhidhyā. 
According to another opinion, 2bhihyā means all desire of the sphere of Kāmadhātu, for the Sūtra of the Five Nīvaraṇas, on the subject of kāmacchanda, expresses itself thusly, Having abaṇdoned abhidhyā. 
But, say other masters, Cakravartin Kings and the Uttarakurus are not guilty of the course of abhdhyāactioṉ,and yet they are not delivered from desire of the sphere of Kāmadhātn. 
Let us admit thatall desire of the sphere of Kāmadhātu is bhidhyā: 
but all abhidhyā is not a course of action. 
Only the most notable among the bad practices are included among the courses of action. 
Wickedness is a hatred of living beings. 
It is a hatred of living beings, by which one desires to harm the person of another. 
False view is the opinion that there is neither good nor bad.t As it is said in the Sūtra, There is no gift, no sacrifice, no oblation, no good action, nobadaction. 
there are no Arhats in the world. 
False view, as this Sūtra shows, consists of negating action, its reṣults, and the existence of Āryans. 
The Kārikā only indicates the beginning. Such is the definition of the ten bad courses of action. 
kṣkṣk What is the meaning of the expression cou1se or pathway of action ? 
Three are courses of action; seven are also action. 
Greed, wickedness and false views are courses of actioncourses of action that one terms volition. 
it moves by their outgoing. 
A similar composition is justified by the rule of asarāpāṇām apy ekaśeṣaḥ: 
A single meaning is maintained even when the terms of a compound are different. 
In the same way one should understand the good courses of action, the renouncing of killing, etc., non etc. 
kksk Why are not preparatory and consecutive actions considered as courses of action ? 
And finally, courses of action are actions the augmentation and dirinution of which have for their result the augumentation or the diminution of things and living beings. 
strk The Sautrāntikas do not recognize volition as a mental action; for them, there is no mental action outside of greed, etc. 
How then do they explain the fact that the Sūtra gives the name of course of action to greed etc.? 
This is a question they must answer. 
The response is not difficult. 
Greed, wickedness and false view are mental actions and they are pathways leading to bad realms of rebirth; or rather they are both courses of action, for greed sets into motion wickedness and false view, and vice versa. 
kīk The ten bad courses of action are in complete contradiction with the good dharmas. 
The view of negation cuts off the roots of good. 
The cutting off of the roots.of good takes place through the false view of the ninth degree, strongstrong. 
Objection: You affirm that only false view cuts off the roots of good, but the Treatise says, What are the strong roots of evil? 
They are the roots of evil which cut off the roots of good, the roots of evil which are initially adandoned when one acquires detachment from Kāmadhātu. 
Only false view cuts off the roots of good; but false view is brought about by the roots of evil: 
hence the Treatise attributes to these last the operation which more properly belongs to false views. 
In the same way that one says that bandits burn a village because it is they who light the fire that burns the village. 
kksk What roots of good are cut off? The innate roots of the sphere of Kāmadhātu. 
The roots of good of the sphere of Kāmadhātu are cut off when one cuts off the roots of good; for one who cuts off the roots of good of Kāmadhātu is not endowed with the roots of good of Rūpadhātu or Ārūpyadhātu. 
If this is so, how should one understand this text of the Prajñāpti, What cuts off this persons roots of good of the three spheres?. 
This text means that, at this moment, the aoquisition of the roots of good of the superior spheres become distant, because this person, who was formerly fit for these acquisitions, ceases to exist through the cutting off of the roots of good of Kāmadhātu. 
It refers to the innate roots of good: 
for one who cuts off the roots of good has already fallen from the acquired roots of good. 
What is the objectof the false view which cuts off the roots of good? 
The false view which negates cause and result. 
Negation of cause is to think, There is neither good nor bad action. 
Negation of result is to think,There is no retribution, no result of good or bad action. 
According to another opinion, these two false views,that which negates cause, and that which negates result,contribute to the cutting off of the roots of good in the same way as ānantaryamārga and vimukiimārga contribute to the cutting off of the defilements. 
In fact, the negation which bears on the pure or the higher spheres is weak, because it is in relation with these objects only by association. 
Completely. 
The roots of good are cut off completely by false view, whether this tefers to cause or result, pure or impure, Kāmadhātu or the higher spheres. 
kskḵ Some say that the nine categories of the roots of good, weakweak roots of good, weakmedium, weakstrong, mediumweak, etc., are cut off all at once through one moment of false view, in the same way that the defileaments which are abandoned by Seeing into one Truth are, in all their categories,abandoned through the Seeing of this Ttuth. 
Gradually. 
The roots of good are cut off in the manner in which the defilements to be abandoned through Meditation on the Truths are abandoned: 
this means that the strongstrong root of good is cut off by a weakweak false view, and thus following to the weakweak root of good which is cut off by a strongstrong false view. 
This theory is not in agreement with the text, What are the small and concomitant roots of good. 
They are those which are abandoned lastly to the cutting off of the roots of good; those through the absence of which a person is termed onewhohastherootsof. 
If the cutting off is gradual, how should one understand the text, What are the strongstrong roots of evil? 
The roots of evil through which one cats off the roots of good? 
This text refers to the achievement of the cutting off of the roots of good, for it is through the strongstrong roots of evil that the roots of good totally disapear. 
As long as the last category of the roots of good, the weakweak, is not cut off, it can determine the reappearance of the others. 
According to certain masters, the cutting off of the riine categories takes place at one time, without interruption, like the abandoning of the defilements through the Path of Seeing into the Truths. 
According to certain masters, the abandoning of discipline preceeds the cutting off of the roots. 
But the Vaibhāṣikas say that the discipline is lost when one loses the mind of which this discipline is the result. 
kkk What beings are capable of cutting off the roots of good? 
Only humans cut them off; not the creatures in the painful realms of rebirth; for their discernment , whether defiled or not, is not firm; not the gods, for the reṣult of action is manifest to them. 
And only humans of the three continents cut them off, bot those of Uttarakuru, for they do not possess bad āśayas. 
According to another opinion, only humaṉs in Jambudvīpa cut off the roots of good. 
But this is in contradiction with the text, The inhabitants of Jambudvīpa possess a minimum of eight organs; the same for the inhabitants of Pūrvavidena and of Avaragodānīya. 
Men and women cut off the roots. 
According to another opinion, women do not cut off the roots because their will and their application are weak. 
But this is in contradiction with the text, Whoever possesses the female organ necessatily possesses eight organs. 
The sensualistdoes not cut off the roots of good because his āfaya is in movement; the only one who cuts them off is The rationalist. 
Because his āfzya is bad, fitm, and hidden. 
By virtue of thesesame principles,eunuchs, etc.,do not cut off the roots of good, because they are counted among the sensualists, and because their discernment, like that of the creatures of painful realms of rebirth, is not firm. 
What is the nature of the cutting off of the roots of good? 
The cutting off is nonpossession. 
When the possession of the roots of good is obstructed in rearising, in continuing, then ten nonpossessions , or nonendowed ments arise. 
When aprāpi has arisen, there is a catting off of the roots of good. 
It can happen that a person whose roots of good have been cut off produces, relative to cause and result, either doubt or insight into their existence, which is Right View. 
When Right View has arisen, then one says that the roots of good have arisen, because the possession of these roots is henceforth present. 
The roots arise in their nine categories; but they willonly gradually manifest themselves, in the same way that one initially regains ones health and then, gradually, ones strenṇgth. 
Other persons who have cut off the roots of good can take them up again in this life,but not one guilty of an āvantarya transgression who has thus cut off the roots of good. 
It is with regard to this transgressor that it is said, This person is unfit to again take up the roots of good in this life; but he certainly will take them up either by dying in hell, or bybeing born. 
By being born means to be found in an intermediate state. 
By dying meanms disposed to die. 
The roots of good are taken up by being born since they have been cut off by the force of the cause; and by dying, since they have been cut off by the force of a condition. 
Same difference when they have been cut off by ones own force, or by the force of another. 
The person who is āfayavipannathat is to say, lost by the fact of his false viewcan take up again the roots of good in the present existence. 
The person who is both āśayavipaṇṇa and prayo gavipannathat is, one who is furtherrmore lost through the fact of his. 
ānantarya transgressiontakes up the roots again only after the destruction of his body.. 
One can cut off the roots of good and not be destined to hell. 
Four cases: 
Ajātaśatru; 3. 
Devadatta; and 4. 
persons who have not cut off the roots and who have committed an ānantarya transgression. 
keksk Volition is the principal action. 
We shall explain with how many courses of action volition can coexist. 
With regard to the painful realms of rebirth, volition can coexist at most with eight courses. 
Volition caṇ coexist with one course of action, as when either greed, anger, or a false view manifests itself, without any material course of action having taken place; or rather the person who has prepared one of the material courses of action finds himself to have a nondefiled, that is,a good or neutralmind, at the moment when, on his instigation, this course of action is perpetuated. 
Volition can coexist with two courses of action, as when a person with an angry mind kills; or when a person who is prey to greed steals, or commits adultery, or speaks in an inconsiderate manner. 
Volition can coexist with three courses of action, as when a person with an angry mind kills and steals at the same time. 
But havent we seen that stealing is only achieved by desire alone ? 
This testriction refers to the achievement of stealing com mitted by a person who only thinks of stealing, Volition can coexist with three.courses of action, as when greed is present at the moment when two material courses of action are completed that one has committed by another. 
Volition can coexistwith four courses of action, as when one lies or when one injures with the intention of dīviding: 
there is one mental course f actionand three vocal courses of action. 
Oṟ rather, when the mind is in the prey of greed, etc., at the moment when three material courses are completed. 
Volition can coexist with five, six, or seven courses of actioṉ, as when the mind.is in the prey of greed, etc., at the moment when four, five, or six material courses of action are completed. 
Volition can coexist with eight courses of action, as when a person has made the preparatoṟy action of six courses of action, murder, etc.; at the moment when these six courses of action are completed, he is in the prey of greed and commits adultery. 
Volition cannot coexist with nine courses of action, or with ten courses, because greed, anger, false view are not simultaneous. 
Concerning good courses of action, volition can coexist with ten. The ten good courses of action can be simultaneous to volition. 
Volition does not coexist with one, eight, or five couṟses of action. 
Volition can coexist with two courses of actions,as when a person in the absorption of Ārūpyadhātu, in possession.of kṣayajñāna or anutpādajñāna : 
his five consciousnesses are good. There are thus two courses of action: nongreed and nonanṇger. 
Volition can coexist with three courses of action, as when the mental consciousness is associated with Right View and when the seven good material courses of action are absent. 
Volition can coexist with four courses of action. 
Ī Volition can coexist with six courses of action, as when, the five consciousnesses being good, one undertakes the same disciplines: 
Volition can coexist with seven courses of action. 
When, with a good mental consciousness, one undertakes the same discipline, add Right View. 
Oṟ rather, when, with a bad or neutral mind, one undertakes the discipline of Bhīkṣu: 
Volition can coexist with nine courses of action. 
One undertakes the discipline of a Bhikṣu, the five consciousnesses being good: 
Right View is absent; one undertakes this same discipline at a momenṭ when, in an absorption of Ārūpya dhātu, one possesses kṣayajñāna oṟ anutpādajñāna. 
Volition can coexist with ten good courses of action. 
when one undertakes the discipline of a Bhikṣu with a good mental coṉsciousness, except in the case of ṣzyajñāna and anutpāda fñāṇa; and all volition concomitant with the discipline of dḥyāna and pure discipline when this volition is not associated with hbṣaūn oṟ anutpādajñāna. 
When one renounces a transgression and when one has a mind different from thatwhich provokes this renouncing, that is,a defiled ot ṉeutralmind; 2. 
this good mental consciousness includes the three mental actions to which is added two renouncings, two material actions; and 3. 
when,under the same conditions, whenone renounces five transgressions. 
ākik What are the courses of action which exist, either in fact or as potentiality, in the different realms of rebirth?Inconsiderate words, injurious words, anger, of two types, exist in hell. 
Inconsiderate words exist in hell, forbeings in helllament; injurious words, for beings in hell mutually reproach one another; and anger, because they hate one another for the duration of their lives. 
Greed and false views, as potentiality. 
Beings in hell possess greed and false views, but these do not actually exist in hell: 
because of the absence of any object to which one could become attached, and because the result of action is manifested. 
In hellkilling isabsent, for beings in helldie through the exhaustion of their actions ; stealing and adultṛy are absent, for beings in helldo not have property or objects of property, or women,; lying isabsent, for it is useless; and malicious words are useless, for beings in hell are at a distance and are always separate from one another. 
Three exist in Uttarakuru. Greed, anger and false views exist in Uttarakuru in the sense that the inhabitants of Uttarakuru are in possession of a potentiality for greed, anger and false views. 
The seventh course exists there in fact also. 
Because bad āśzya is absent there; because the duration of ones life is determined there ; and because no one possesses any property or object of property, or women, and also through its lack of usefulness, killing and the other courses of action are absent in Uttarakuru. 
If the men of Uttarakuru do not have wives, how can they have uṅchaste behavior? 
They take the women with whom they desire to enjoy pleasure by the hand and go to a tree. 
If sex with this woman is allowable, the tree covers up the couple with its branches; in the contrary case, the tree does not cover up the couple. 
The ten bad courses of action exist elsewhere in Kāma dhātu. 
The ten bad courses of action exist in fact in Kāmadhātu with the exception of hell and Uttarakuru. 
Does killing exist among the gods? 
The gods do not, amongst themselves, kill one another, but they kill beings belonging to other realms of rebirth, Pretas, etc. 
According to another opinion, the gods also kill bycutting the head or the body. 
Three good courses of action exist everywhere, as potentiality and in fact. Everywhere, in the three spheres of existence and in the five realms of rebirth, nongreed, nonanger and Right Views exist both as potentiality and in fact. 
In the Ārūpyas, among the Unconscious Ones, seven courses of action exist as potentiality. Amonghe beings of Ārūpyadhātu aṇd the Asāmjñisattvas , the seven good material courses of action, bodily and vocal, exist solely as potentaility. 
In fact, Āryans who are born in Ārūpyadhātu possess the past and future discipline of pure morality, and the Unconscious Oṇes possess the discipline of hyāna under the same conditiops. 
The past pure discipline that the Āryan who is in Ārūpyadhātu possesses, has for its base of support the stage or stages which he has produced and destroyed; the future pure discipline that he will possess, has on the contrary the five stages for its base of support. 
For the rest, good courses of action also exist in fact, with the exception of beings in hell and the Uttarakurus. The rest, that is, in the other spheres of existence, and in the other realms of rebirth. Beings in hell and the Uttarakurus do not undertake any morality. 
Elsewhere the seven good material courses of action exist in fact. 
One must make a distinction. 
Among the animals and Pretas, the good courses of action are never necessarily connected with discipline; in Rūpadhātu, they are always necessarily connected with discipline; elsewhere they can be of one or the other category. 
All the other courses of action have retributive results, outflowing result, and predominating results. 
Good or bad, the ten courses of action have a threefold result. 
Such is the retributive result. 
2.If a transgressor is rteborn in a human existence, through murder he will be of brief lifespan; through stealing he will be poor; through llicit sexuality,he will have an unfaithful spouse; through lying, he will be slandered; through malicious speech, his friends will become enemies; through injurious speech, he will only undertand disagreeable speech; through inconsiderate speech, his words will not come to be believed; through greed, he will have great desires , through anger, he will have great hate; and through false views, he will have great ignorance, for ignorance is great in false views. 
Such is the outflowing result. 
But, one would say, a human existence, even if it is short, is the retṛibution of a good action. 
How can one regard it as an outflowing result of murder? 
We do not say that this existence is the result of murder; we say rather, that a murderer will have a short life by reason of the murder; murder is the cause which rends a human existence short, an existence otherwise caused by a good action. 
By reason of the intense practice of killing, external things plants, the sun, etc.,are of little vitality; by reason of stealing, they are crushed by rains of stones, dust and acid; by reason of illicit sexuality, they are covered by dust or acid; by reason of lying, they are of bad odor; by reason of malicious speech, they are in a hole or on a hill; by reason of injurious speech, the land and the sun are impregnated with saltand are sterile, and the plants are detestable and pernicious; by reason of inconsiderate speech, the seasons are reveṛsed; by reason of greed, fruits are small; by reason of anger, fruits are sour; and by reason of false views, ftnits are very few, or are totally absent. 
Such is the pre dominating result. 
Existence in hell is a retributive result,whereas shortness of life isan outflowing result of the killing. 
According to others, existence in hell comes from the preparatory action of killing; the fact of having a short life comes from the action itself. 
It is true that the Sūtra speaks of killing as the cause of existence in hell, but itunderstands by killing, not only killing, but killing with all the actions thataccompany it.What is called outflowing result does not here exist separately from the retributive result and the predominating result. 
It is called outflowing by reason of the resemblance between the cause and its effect. 
kksk Why is the result of the courses of action threefold? 
One who commits murder causes the victim to suffer, causes him to die, and destroys his vigor: 
Because one causes suffering, there is a retributive result, that is, suffering in hell; because one makes him die, there is an outflowing result, that is, his life is short; and because one destroys his vigor, there is a predominating result, that is,external things are of little vigor. 
The same for the other courses of action. 
kksk The same for thethree results of the good coutses of action: 
through having practiced, cultivated, and developed the renouncing of killing, one is reborn among the gods; if one is reborn down here in human condition, one will have a long life. 
Is this to say that wrong livelihood is separate from wrong speech and wrong action? 
It does not exist separately: 
Bodily and vocal actions whicharise from attachmentare wrong manner of livelihood; itconstitutes a separate category, because it is difficult to purify. 
Bodily action and vocal action arising from hate and ignorance are, respectively, wrong actrion and wrong speech. 
Āttachment is by its nature,a bandit: one watches withdifficulty the mind of the actions which provokeattachment. 
Consequently, since the mananer of livelihood is, as long as one lives, difficult to purify, the Blessed One, with an end that one should apply himself to purifyiDg it, made a separatecategory of wrong livelihood. 
There is a stanza,! The layman purifies his views with difficulty, for he is always in the prey of multiple views; the monk purifies his manner of livelihood with difficulty, for his subsistance depends on others. 
If one says that it is solely action issued from attachment to the resources necessary for life,no; for this is incontradiction with the Sūtra. 
If someone thinks that to dance, to sing, etc.,for ones own pleasure is not a wrong manner of livelihoodbecause wrong manner of livelihood is only bodily and vocal actions inspired by attachment to the means of subsistance,we would answer: 
In fact, the Blessed One, in the Śīūaskandhikā, taught that looking at elephant fights, etc., isa wrong manner of livelihood. 
Because this is to enjoy bad objects. 
xkk We have seen that there are five results, predominating results, results of virile activity, outflowing results, retributive results, and disconnection or liberation. 
How many results are included in the different types of action? 
Impure, in the path of abandoning, action embraces the five results. 
The path of abandoning is so called because it has abandoning for its goal, or because the defilements are abandoned due to it. 
Action which forms part of the impure path of abandoning, includes the five results: 
retributive result: 
an agreeable retribution which belongs to the same stage as the action; 2. 
an outflowing result: 
dharmas arisen from the absorption, similar to theaction,and lateṛ 
than it; 3. 
a discoṇnective result: 
thedharmas that this action gives rise to, namely the path of deliverance , the coexisting dharmas, the future dharmas of which this action causes one to obtain possession, and the abandoning itself; and 5. 
a predominating result: 
all the conditioned dharmas with the exception of the action in question, and with the exception of the dharmas already arisen. 
Pure, it includes four results. 
The preceding ones, with the exception of the retributive result. 
The rest of pure action and neutral action, three results. 
The same two results are absent also in neutral action, whether it is defiled nor not. 
kkk What is the naturegood, bad, or neutral,of the results of different actions? 
The good,bad, neutral dharmnas, constitute four, two, and three results of good action. 
Outflowing results, discoṇnnective results, virile activity, and pre dominating results of good action are good dharmas.Retributive results are neutral by nature. 
Virile activity and predominating results of good action are bad dharmas. 
Good, bad, neutral dharmas, constitute, respectively two, three, and four results of bad action. 
The expressionanukraman signifies yathākraman. 
Three resultsby ornitting retributive results and disconnective resultsare bad dharmas. 
Four resultsby omitting disconnective resultsare neutral dharmas. 
How is this? 
namely of the universal defilements which one abandons through the Seeing of Sufferingand Arising, and of the defilements of the rāga class, etc., which one abandons through the Seeing of Suffering. 
The same dharmasgood, bad, nēutral harmasmake up two, three, and three results of neutral action. 
Three resultsby omitting retributive results and disconnective resultsare bad dharnas. 
Three resultsthe same as aboveare neutral. 
All the āharmas or some dharmas of all types, that is, past, present and future, cen constitute four of the results of past action. 
One must exclude the disconnective result which is outside of time. 
Some future dharmas constitute four results of median action. 
Median action, that is, present action, has four resultoby excluding disconnectionwhich are future dharmas. 
There are two which are median dharmas. 
Some presentdharmas are predominating results and virile activity of median action. 
For action not yet arisen, there are three results made up of future dharmas. 
Future action does not have outflowing results. 
Some dharmas of the same stage constitute four results, whereas some dharmas of another stage constitute three or two results. 
An action of a certain stage produces four resultsby exclding disconnectonwhich are dharmas of its own stage. 
Some pure dharmas belong to a stage different from that of the the action which constitutes three results of this action: virile activity, predominating result and also outflowing tesult, after the rule gīven in ii53. 
Some impure dharmas belong to a stage different from that of the action which constitutes virile activity and the predominatiṇg result of this action. 
Some Śaikṣa harmas, etc. 
constitute three results of Śaikṣa actioṉ. 
The same for dharmas characteristic of the Ārhat. 
914 Śaikṣa dharmas, etc., constitute one result, three results, and two results of Aśaikṣa action, etc. 
Aśaikṣa dharmas aṟe a predominating result, an outflowing result, and virile activity of this action. 
NeitherŚaikṣanorAśaikṣa dharmas are predominating results and virile activity of this action. 
Some Śaikṣa dharmas, etc., constitte two results, two tesults, and five results of actrion diffeting from the two preceeding. 
Some Śaikṣa dharmas and some Aśaikṣa dharmas are virile activity and predominating results of this action. 
Some neitherŚaikṣanorAśaīkṣa dharmas are five results of this action. 
Dharmas susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing the Truths , susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation ,and not susceptible of being abandoned , constitute three results, two results, one result of action susceptible of being abandoned through Seeing the Truths. 
Some bhāvanāheya dharmas are four results of this action: 
excluding disconnection. 
Some apraheya harmas are predominating results of this action. 
The samedharmas constitute two, four, and three results of action susceptible of being abandoned through Meditation. 
Darśanaheya dharmas are virile activity and predominating results of bhāvanāheya action. 
Bhāvanāheya dharmas are four results of this action: 
excluding disconṉection. 
Apraheya dharmas are virile activity, predominating results, and disconnection of this action. 
The same ḍharmas constitute, respectively, one result, two results, and four results of action not susceptible of being abandoned. 
Darśanaheyadharmas are predominating results of apruheyaaction. 
action. 
Some apraheyadharmas are four results of this action: 
omitng the retrṛibutive result. 
Such is,in effect,the process of abbreviation. 
kksk In the teaching of the doctrine of action the following question is again posed: 
What is the meaning of these three actions? 
Improper action is defiled action; according to some, irregular action also. 
Some say that improper action is defiled action, because this proceeds from a wrong judgment. 
when a person walks, stands still, eats, or dresses himself in a manner other than that which he should, this actionwhich is undefiledneutralis improper, for this person acts contrary to received usage. 
this is either good action, ot good and regular action. 
Action which differs from proper action and improper action is neitherpropernorimproper action. 
kkk Does one action project one birth or many births? 
Do many actions project one birth or many births? 
According to the system of the School One action projects one arising. 
By arising, anmam, one should understand, not merely birth , but an existence. 
He who comes into an existence is said to be born. 
This thesis is in contradiction with what the Sthavira Aniruddha says, Through the retribution of this single alm , after baving been born up to seven times among the Thirtythree Gods, I am finally born in the family of the rich Śākyaṇs. 
Aniruddha, through this alm, obtained a great prosperity; he obtaineda memory of his past lives; and he accomplished many new meritorious works. 
By expressing himself as he did, he intends to indicate his point of departure. 
It is thus that a person who had acquired a sum of one thousand by means of a single penny, could say, It is through one penny that I have acquired this fortune. 
One answers again: 
By reason of his alm, Aniruddha produced many streams of volition: 
one result appeared to each volition. 
for if this were the case, the projection of existence would take place in parts. 
But admitting that one existence is projected by a single action, Many actions complete an existence. 
The same way that a painter with one stroke delineates the outline of an image, and then fills in this image: 
so too, even though their quality of being a human is the same, certain humans have perfect organs, major and minor members; certain humans are beautiful through the excellence of their hue, figure, shape and power, whereas, in certain humans this or that is lacking. 
It is not solely action which projects one existence: 
all retributive dharmas, namely sensation, etc., also project it. 
However Neither the two absorptions of unconsciousness nor the prāptis project. 
Even though they are retribution, the two absorptions of un consciousness do not project an existence, because they do not coexist with action. 
The prāptis do not project an existence, because they do not have the same result as does the action with which they coexist. 
ḵkk The Blessed One said that there are three āvaraṇas oṛ 
obstacles: the obstacle of action , the obstacle of the defilements , and the obstacie of retribution. 
What are the three obstacles? 
dnantarya actions; chronic defilements; and bad realms of rebirth, and Asajñisattvas and Kurus, are the threefold obstacle. 
The obstacdle which consists of action are the five mortal transgressions: 
Defilement is of two types, chronic and violent: 
chronic defilemet is continual defilement, and violent defilement is strong defilement. 
Chronic defilement constitutes an obstacle, as is the case, for example, among eunuchs. 
Defilements which surge up from time to time, even if their impulse is strong, can be overcome, but not continual defilement, even though it is at rest. 
The person inwhom this is found does not find the time to make an effort to overcome it. 
From being small, they become mediurm sized; and from medium sized, they become strong: 
thus they form an obstacle. 
The obstacle which consists of retribution is the three painful realms of rebirthexistence in hell, animal existence, and Preta existenceand one part of the good realms of rebirthhuman existence in Uttarakuru, and heavenly existence amoṅg the Un conscious Ones. 
What does obstacle mean? 
That which causes an obstacle to the Way and to the roots of good preparatory to the Way, wṣmagatas, etc. 
One should mention as actions forming obstacles other categories of actions besides mortal transgressions. 
Actions which necessrily produce painful realms of rebirth, etc., which produce birth in eggs, birth in sweat, birth as a woman, or an eighth birth, form obstacles. 
Only actions easily discernible by others and by the agent himself:and that from five points of vieware mentioned here. 
from five points of view, action which is mortal transgression is easy to discern. 
Among the obstacles, the gravest is the obstacle of defilement, followed by the obstacle of action. 
For these two obstacles rend one incapable of health, not only in the present existence, but also in the next existence. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas , the obstacle of defilement is the gravest because it produces the obstacle of action; the obstacle of action is heavier than the obstacle of retribution because it produces this obstacle. 
Or rather a person guilty of a mortal transgression is reborn, after this life, immediately in hell; the gailty person is thus entara, one without intermediate ; thus the dharma the possession of which makes the guilty one an nantara is called ānantarya, like one terms śrāmaṇya the dḍharma which makes someone a Śrāmaṇa. 
Mortal transgressions exist in the three continents. 
The inhabitants of Uttarakuru and living beings which are not humans are not capable of mortal transgressions. 
And, among humans, only men and women can commit mortal trans gressions: 
It is not admitted that eunuchs, etc., are capable of this traṇsgression, because of the mediocrity of their kindness and respect. 
For the same reasons that rend eunuchs, etc., incapable of indiscipline ; and, further, because their parents, having given to the eunuch only an incomplete body and having only a mediocre affection for their son, are mediocre benefactors; because, on the other hand, the eunuch does not experience a strong respect for his parents the destruction of which would render him guilty of a mortal transgression. 
For the same reasons then, Pretas and animals, if they were to kill their parents, are not guilty of mortal transgressions. 
Nevertheless, the Bhadaṇta said that animals in whom intelligence is lively, for example, the gāneya horse, are capable of mortal transgressions. 
For the same reasons, a human born of demon parents does not commit a mortal transgression in killing them. 
The other two obstacles exist in the five realms of rebirth. 
Birth in Uttarakuru is an obstacle of retribution for humans; birth among the Asajñisattvas is such for the gods. 
kksṭ What are, by their natures, the different actions of mortal transgression? 
Four are bodily action; one is vocal action; three are killing; one is lying; and oṉe is the preparation for murder, for the Tathāgatas cannot be killed by the attack of another. 
sksḥ We say that schism is lying, and that this lying is the fourth mortal transgression. 
If we make schism a mortal transgression, this is because we give the name of schism to lying which is the cause of schism; or rather the word schism should be explained s that which the divides Saṅgha. 
In fact, Schism is, by its nature, disharmony; this is an undefiled neutral dharma disassociated from the mind. 
4 Schism, that is, disharmony, is a saṇhskāra not associated with the mind , and is undefiledneutral: 
As much as it is a person who divides the Saṅgha, the schismatic is not in possession of the schism. 
On the the contrary It is the Saṅgha which possesses the schismn. 
It is that which is divided, and not the schismatic, which possesses the saskāra called division of the Saṅgha. 
But what does the schismatic possess? 
The transgression of schism is lying; it belongs to the schismatic. 
The schismatic possesses the transgression of schism, which is This lyingarises at the same time as the schism itself;, it consists of vocal vjñapti and avijñapti. 
Possessed of this lying, The schismatic falls into Avīci for a katpa. 
He falls into the great Avīci hell for an intermediary period. 
Those guilty of other mortal traṉsgressions are not necessarily in Avīci. 
Yet all mortal transgressions are retributed in the next existence: what would happen if a person is guilty of many mortal transgressions? 
Suffering growsby reason of supplementary transgression. 
A person guilty of many moral transgressions possesses in Avīci a large body and very tender flesh by which he feels twofold, threefold, fourfold, or fivefold, and his torments are extrememly numerous and insupportable. 
kkrḵ Who is capable of dividing the Saṅgha? 
A Bhikṣu who is an intellectual, who is virtuous, divides. 
It is a Bhikṣa who divides, not a layman, not a nun, etc. 
This Bhikṣu should be an intellectual, not a sensualist; he should be viṛrtuous, not immoral: 
for the words of an immoral Bhikṣu lack authority. 
kksk Where does schism take place? 
Schism is impossible where the Master is to be found, for the Tathāgata cannot be conquered and his word is full of authority. 
Only fools and not Āryans, for Āryans see the Dharma with direct insight. 
According to another opinion, the schismatic can no longer divide possessors of kṣāati. 
kōkḵ What does the Saṅgha do that it is divided? 
When it admits another Master, or another Path, it is divided. 
Once it is divided, how long does it remain divided? 
A night of the same day. 
When the Saṅgha is divided, infallibly, the Saṅgha will again be in concord at sunrise. 
The schism that we have just described, and which is a mortal transgression, Is what we understand by breaking the WheeL The Wheel of the Law of the Blessed One is then broken, because the progress of the Path is hindered As a consequence there is, at the same time, both bbreaking of the Wheel and a division of the Saṅgha. 
Where is breaking of the Wheel produced? 
In Jambudvīpa. 
Not in the other continents where the Buddhas do not appear. 
The Saṅgha susceptible of being divided counts at a minimum eight Bhikṣus; the ninth monk necessatry is the schismatic. 
ktḥ Another type of schism, different from the breaking of the Wheel and which is not a mortal transgression results from a division in eccesiastical actions: 
when, in one parish , the monks divide themselves in order to perform ecclesiastical actions, posadha, etc. 
Ritual schism in three continents. 
Only there where the Religion exists. 
This schism supposes eight Bhikṣus or more. 
It is necessary to form two groups of four Bhikṣus; but, here, there is not one schismatic who declares himself a Master. 
kiik At six periods, the schism of the breaking of Wheel cannot take place. 
The breaking of the Wbeel is impossible at the beginning; at the end; befoṟe the abscess; before a pair; when the Sage is extinguished; or when a parish has not been delimited. 
At the beginning, that is, when a little time has passed since the setting into motion the Wheel of the Law; and at the end, that is,at the period of the Parinirvāṇa of the Blessed One: 
in these two periods the Saṅgha is penetrated by a single sentiment.Ś In the interval, breaking is impossible before the appearance of an abscess: 
as long as the abscess of precepts and the abscess of views does not appear in the dispensation.It is also impossible before the apparition of a pair: 
Breaking is impossible when the Sage is extinguished, for, once the Master has entered into Parinirvāṇa, a schismatic would have no opponent. 
Finally, when a parish has not been delimited, for oṉe says that the Saṅgha is divided when there two parties in one parish. 
All Buddhas do not have their Wheels broken as does Śākyamuṇi: 
this depends on their former actions. 
kskk Why are the trensgressions enumerated above, matricide, etc., mortal transgressions to the exclusion of other transgressions? 
Because they destroy or hurt a field of benefaction, or a field of qualities. 
Matricide and patricide are mortal transgressions because they destroy a benefactor. 
How does the murderer destroy them? 
By killing themn. 
The murder of an Arhat and the last two mortal transgressions are mortal transgressions because an Arhat, the Saṅgha and the Buddha are fields of qualities. 
Even if their gender changes, there is morral transgression in killing him who was the mother, and in killing her who was the father. 
It is said in fact , Caṉ a petson be guilty of a mortal transgression killing a man who is not his father, or who is not an Arhat? 
Yes, if he kills his mother whose gender has changed. 
Can a person be guilty of a mortal transgression by killing a woman who is not his mother, or who is not an Arhat? 
Yes, if he kills his father whose gender has changed. 
When the embryo of a woman falls out and when another woman deposits it in her womb, which of these two women is reputed to be the mother whose murder constitutes a mortal transgression? 
The mother is the woman from whose blood one is born. 
The second woman takes up the offices of a mother: 
she is the one who gives the child liqguid to drink, who nourishes it, and who raises it. 
kskokḵ There is no mortal transgression if, wanting to kill ones mother a person kills someone else; there is no mortal transgression if, wanting to killanother person, a person kills his mother. 
For example, a man who kills his mother stretched out ona bed where hebelieves there isa man asleep, and the child of the laundryman who kills his father wanting to kill a mosquito, do not become guilty of mortal trans gressions. 
If a man kills his mother and another person with the same stroke, there are two avijñaptis, an avijñapti of simple murder, and an evijñapti of a mortal transgression; but the vñapti is solely of the mortal traṉsgression, by reason of the force of the mortal transgression. 
Yet, according to Ghoṣaka , there are two vijñaptis, fot a viñap is made up of atoms. 
The person who kills an Arhat without knowing him to be an Arhat, thinking only to definitely kill such a person, does not have any discrimination with respect to the person to be killed. 
The person who kills his father, when his father is an Arhat, is guilty of only one mortal transgression,namely thekilling of an Arhat: for the father and the Arhat make up only a single person. 
Objection: 
Tell Śikhaṇḍin that he has committed two mortal transgressions, patricide and the murder of an Arhat. 
Rudrāyaṇa means that his son commmitted a mortal transgression through two causes of mortal transgression; or rather Rudṛāyaṇa said two mortal transgression in order to doubly condemn the conduct of his son. 
Does the person who, with a bad mind, cause the blood of the Tathāgata to fiow, necessarily commit a mortal transgression? 
He comrmits a mortal transgression when he has the intention to kill: 
No, when he only had the intention of striking the Buddha. 
Is a person guilty of a mortal transgression when he injures to death a person who becomes an Arhat after being injured? 
No, with regard to the person who became an Aṛrhatafter the blow. 
In fact, the preparation for murder had for its object a person who was not an Arhat. 
kkṣk Can a person who made preparation for a mortal transgression, obtain detachment and its result by arresting it? 
Detachment and its results are impossible for one who has made preparation for a mortal transgression. 
Because there is an absolute contradiction between the intention of a mortal transgression and the acquisition of detachment or a result. 
A person who enters the Pathafter havingdone the preparation for anṇy other evil deed, will not produce this deed, by reason of the absoḻute contradiction between his new personality and the deed. 
skksḥ What is the gravest of the mortal transgressions? 
Lying with a view to schism is considered the gravest transgression. 
A person who, knowing what is Dharma and nonDharma, lies with a view to dividing the Saṅgha and teaching falsely, by this makes himself quilty of the gravest transgression among all misdeeds. 
In fact, he wounds the Dharma body of the Tathāgatas, he creates an obstacle to temporal wellbeing and to the deliverance of creatures. 
As long as concotd is not established in the Saṅgha, there is hindrance to entry into the Path , to the acquisition of ṛesults, to the acquistion of detachment, and to the destruction of the defilements: 
all actions relative to dhyāna, study and reflection are also aṟrested; the worlds of gods, Nāgas and humans are troubled and saddened, they are not masters of themselves, and misguided. 
This is why the retribution for this crime lasts a cosmic age and takes place in Avīci. 
Among the other mortal transgressions, the fifth, the third and the first are, in descending order, the heaviest. 
Patricide is the lightest. 
Objection: 
The Blessed One said that mental daṇḍa is the most culpable of the threedaṇdḍus; he saidalso that false view is the gravest among all the transgressions. 
Oṇe must understand that, among the mortal traṇsgressions, schism is the gravest transgression; that mental deṇḍa is the gravest among the three actions; and that false view is the gravest among the bad views. 
Or rather schism is the gravest transgression if one considers the extent of its retribution; vanodaṇḍa, if one considers the number of persons destroyed by it; and false view, if one considers the roots of good which false view alone cuts off. 
Among the good worldly dharmmas, a volition for Bhavāgra bears the greatest result. 
This action is the most fruitious of good worldly actions, for its retribution is a perfect tranquility for twentyfour thousand cosmic periods. 
TThis is anderstood from the point of view of its retributive results. 
From the point of view of its disconnective result the most fruitious action is volition associated with Vajropamasamādhi , for this volition has for its tesult the cutting off of all the bonds. 
This is why the Kārikā says, Among the good worldly dhar ksksk Is itonly througha mortal transgression thata person is necessarily rṛeborn in hell? 
Others add: 
but not immediately s0. 
106 To defile ones mother, to defile an Arhantī; to kill a predestined Bodhisattva; to kill a Saikṣa; and to steal the goods of the Saṅgha are transgressions similar to mortal trans gressions; the fifth is the destruction of a Stūpa. 
These five transgressions, in this order, are similar to mortal transgressions: 
to defile ones mother, to defilean Aṛhantī , to killa predestined Bodhisattva ; to kill a Saint who is not an Arhat ; to rob the Saṅgha of its means of substance ; and to destroy a Stūpa. 
kik Other actions embracing retribution are impeded in three cir Zcumstanhces: 
He absolutely impedes actions by the acquisition of Kṣānti, the quality of Anāgāāmin, and the quality of Arhat. 
When, upon leaving the stage of mrdhānas, he obtains the stage called patience , the actions which should be retributed in painful reelms of rebirth, being impeded, remain below, because he passes beyond the state of retribution of these actions. 
In the same way the creditors of the man who is about to emigrate from his country rise up. 
When he obtains the quality of Anāgāmin , the actions which should be retributed in Kāmadhātu, being impeded, remain below,with the exception of those which should be retributed in the present existence. 
The same for the actions which should be retributed in Rūpadhātu and Ārūpyadhātu when he obtains the quality of Arhat. 
kkḵ We have seen that the killing of a Bodhisattva is a quasimortal traṉsgression. 
Since when is one a Bodhisattva? From what momenton does one receive the name of Bodhisattva? When he begins to cultivate actions which produce the marks, : 
Starting from the moment when he begins to cultivate actions which have for their retribution the thirtytwo marks, he is predestined. 
From this moment onward, he always Has good realns of rebirth; he is born into noble families; he possesses all the organs ; he is a male; he remembers his past lives; and he does not desist. 
One says that he is srgati , because his rebirth realms. 
are excellent, for he is born among gods and humans. 
He is born in the wealthy families of Kṣatriyas, Brāhmaṇas, and Grhapatis, not in humble familes. 
He is always male, never female, and, even more so, never non sexual. 
In ali of his existences, he remembers his past births. 
in fact, with an end to being useful to all cteatures, he is not cast down by all sorts of sufferings, or by any outrages. 
He is called the slave not purchased by the world,indeed the Bodhisattva: 
ktksk He cultivates actions which have the marks for their retribution. 
In Jambudvīpa, being a male; in the presence of the Buddhas, thinking of the Buddhas; having their origin in reflection; in the course of one hundred supplementary cosmic ages. 
The Bodhisattva cultivates actions which ripen in the marks solely in Jambudvīpa, not elsewhere, for the inhabitants of Jambudvīpa are of lively intelligence; he is a male and not a female, for he has already gone beyond the state of female; and he is only in the presence of Masters, for his volition has the Buddhas for its object. 
These actions have their origin in reflection, not in hearing or in the absorptions. 
The Bodhisattva accomplishes these actions in the course of one hundred supplementary cosmic ages, and not during a longer time. 
Nevertheless the Blessed Śākyamuni, through the purification of his energy, leaped over nine of these cosmic ages and caṟried out the actions ripening in marks in the coutse of ninetynine cosmic ages so that, in this way,one hundred werecompleted. 
This is why, speaking to Aśibandhaka, he said, Oh village chief, remembering ninetyone cosmic ages from now, I do not see any family that has been impoverished or inconvenienced by the giving of cooked foods. 
The Blessed One expressed himself in this way because his natural memory bore on this number of cosmic periods. 
Former masters say It is when he finished the first cosmic age that the Bodhisattva abandoned the four defects and obtained the two qualities. 
Of the marks Each arises from one hundred merits. 
What is the measure of each of these one hundred merits? 
According to some, it is equal to the merit which has for its result the pleasure of allbeings, with the exception of the Bodhisattva close to Bodhithat is to say, accomplishing actions which ripen in marks. 
According to others, it is equal to the collective action of all beings, which, through its predominating result , produces the creation of the world. 
According to others, only the Buddhas know the measure of this ṛnerit. 
k How many Buddhas did the Blessed One venerate when he was a Bodhisattva? 
In the course of the first asamkhyeya kalpa, he venerated seventy five thousaṇd Buddhas; seventysix thousand in the course of the second; and seventyseven thousand in the course of the third. 
In the period of the perfect and complete Buddha Ratnaśikhin, he completed the first asekhyeya kalpa; in the period of the Blessed Dīpakara he completed the second; and in the period of the Tathāgatha Vipaśyin he completed the third. 
kikk Of all the Buddhas that he venerated The first was Śākyarnuṇi. 
It was an ancient Śākyamuni , a peṛfect Buddha, under whom the Blessed One, the then Bodhisattva,formulated for the first time the vow of Bodhi by saying, Mey I too become a Buddha in all ways similar to yon! 
This Śākyamuni, as ours, appeared during a bad age of the world; also his Law lasted only one thousand yeats. 
kkk How did the Bodhisattva complete each Pāramitā ? 
When he gave everything to everyone, even to his eyes and the marrow of his bones, out of compassion, without desiring any happiness for himself, he completed the virtue of Giving. 
When, even though he was not detached, he was not at all irritated when his limbs were broken,he then completed the virtues of Morality and Patience. 
The Blessed One, when he was a Bodhisattva, saw the Tathāgata Puṣya who had become incandescent in the interior of a cave in a mountain. 
He praised him for seven days and seven nights, standing, rṛepeating the stanza,Neither in heaven nor on earth, nor in this world, ṉor in the abode of Vaiśravaṇa, nor in the palace of the Marus, nor in other celestial abodes, nor in any of the ten directions, would one find, Oh Chief of Men, an ascetic who is your equal, even if one were to traverse, if one wished, the entire worṟld, with all of its people, with its mountains and with its forests. 
Then, according to this School, he was found to have fulfilled the virture of Energy and nine cosmic ages were passed over. 
At the moment of Vajropamasamādhi, immediately before Bodhi, he accomplished the virtues of dhyāna and prajñā. 
The Pāramitās receive the name of pāramitā because they have aṟrived at the other shore of the other shore of the totality of the perfectons proper to each of them. 
ksksk The Sūtra teaches that there are three items of meritorious work , which coṉsist of Giving, Morality, and Meditation. 
How are Giving, Morality,and Meditation items of meritorious work? 
Three are merit, action, occasions of the exercise of action, as in the case of deeds. 
These three,;Giving, Morality, and Meditation,:each according to its nature, are merit, action, or occasion of exercise, either in combination, or in isolation; the same way that the deeds are either at one and the same time actions and deeds, or only deeds. 
To consider first the item of meritorious work which consists of Giving,one mustdistinguish: 
1.bodily and vocalaction which is an item of meritorious work on three grounds: merit, because its retribution is agreeable; action, because it is action by nature; and an occasion for the exercise or an object of the volition of giving which provokes it; 2. 
the volition of giving, which is merit and action; 3. 
and the dharmas which accompany bodily and vocal action, and which aṟe solely merit. 
The item of meritorious wotk which consists of Morality is exclusively bodily and vocal action; it is necessarily merit, action and occasion of exeṟcise of actior. 
For the iterm of meritorious work which consists of Meditation, let us consider the Meditation of Compassion : 
this mediation is merit; it is also an occasion for the exercise of a meritorious action, namely that of a volition associated with compassion; 2. 
the volition in question is merit and action. 
the other dharmas concomittant to this Meditation are solely merit. 
According to another opinion, puṇyaukriyā is, to speak precisely, good volition; Giving,Morality andMeditation are its vasx, an occasion for the exercise of this volition. 
xṅ What is Giving, dāna? 
Without doubt, dāna in general is what is given , but here Giving is what gives. 
But one gives through fear, or with the hope of reciprocity, or through attachment, etc.: 
now this does not refer to this type of giving. 
Consequently, in order to specify, the author says, Giving is what gives. 
Through the desire to render homage or service. 
What is it that gives? 
It is bodily and vocal action and that which produces this actio. 
this collection and this action give. As the stanza says,When a person, with a goodmind gives what belongs to him, then one says that the good skandhas give. It has for its results great joys. 
The puṇyakriyāvastu which consists of Giving has great joys as its result. 
The suffix aya, which we translate which consists of, should be understood as having as its nature, the same way that one says, a house made of grass , or a vase made of leaves. 
Giving is beneficial to oneself, to others, to both or neither. 
A gift made to a Caitya is not useful to another; but it is useful to him who gives when he is an Āryan not detached from desire, or a Prthagjana detached or not detached. 
This gift is only useful to another. 
The gift thata nondetached Āryan makes to another, to a detached or nondetached Pṛthagjana, is useful both to himself and to another. 
The gift that a detached Āryan makes to a Caityawith the exception of the case when this gift willripen in the present existence is not useful either to himself, or to another. 
This gift has for its effect only the expression of homage and recognition. 
kkrk We have said, ina general manner, that giving produces great joys: 
Giving is excellent by the excellence of the giver, of the object given, and of the field. 
The giver is excellent through his faith, etc. 
The giver is excellentwhen he isendowed with faith, with morality, with learning, with generosity, with wisdon, with few desires, etc. 
When the giver is excellent, the gift is excellent; when the gift is excellent, its result is excellent. 
He gives with respect, etc. 
Such a giver gives with respect, by his hand, at the right timne, without doing evil to anyone , to ones master, or to other benefactors. 
Example: 
the Jtakas of the bear, of the antelope, etc. 
A field is excellent through its qualities. 
The BlessedOṉe said, A retribution one hundred thousand times greater than a gift made to a person who upholds the necessities. 
and so on. 
kks Among all the gifts,The best is the gift from a delivered person to a delivered person. 
The Blessed One said that a gift given by a detached person to aṉother detached person is the best of material gifts. 
Or rather, the gift that a Bodhisattva gives for the welfare of all beings; this gift, although given by a nondetached person to other nondetached persons, is the best gift. 
kikōk With the exception of the gift from the Bodhisattva, Or the eighth. 
The eighth among the eight gifts that the Blessed One taught. 
What are the eight gifts? 
An āsadya gift; 2. 
a gift through fear; 3. 
a gift made because he gave to me; 4. 
a gift made because he gives to me; 5. 
a gift made because my fathers and my grandfathers gave ceti dāṇam, compare Jāpaka, 444.52, vol. 
iv, 34; 6. 
a gift made in order to adorn ones mind ; in order to fillthe mind ; in order to equip it with a view to yoga; and in order to acquire the supreme goal. 
What is an āsadya gift? 
Some ancient masters explDain this as an immediate gift to those who are near, who approach one. 
A gift through fear is a gift that a person makes who sees that the object is going to perish: 
Better it should be given, he thinks. 
kkk The Sūtra says, An incalculable retribution proceeds from a gift made to a srotaāpannaphalaprats pannaka; an even more incalculable retribution proceeds from a gift made to a ṛrotaāpanna.But there are also five persons who, even though Prthagjanas, confer an incalculable retribution on the offering that is made to them: 
Even though they are not Āryams, offerings made to ones father and mother, to a sick person, to a preacher, to the Bodhisattva in his last birth are without measure. 
These offerings are without measure from the point of view of their retribution. 
kksk In order to appreciate the lightness and the gravity of actions, one should, in short, take into consideration six causes: 
Accordingly as these causesconsecutive, field, adhisṭhāṇa, preparation, volition, or intentionare small or large, action also is small or large. 
Consecutive: after having done the action, that is, consequential action. 
the person to whom one does good or evil. 
bodily or vocal action with a view to the preceding. 
Volition: that through which the deed is achieved. 
to project the thought, I shall do this or that to them; then I shall do this or that.t It happens that an action can be grave only by reason of its consecutive action, for example, when this confers on the retribution the character of necessity. 
It happens that an action can be grave by reason that, if the field is the same, a certain adhiṣṭhāna rendets an action grave while another adhiṣṭhāna makes it light: 
for example, tokill ones father and mother is a grave action but to steal from ones father and mother, to lie to them, etc., is not grave by comparison. 
One can explein in this same way the gravity resulting from the preparation, etc. 
What are the characteristics and conditions of accumulated action? 
Action is termed accumulated by reason of its intentional character, by its completion, by the absence of regret and opposition, by its accompaniments, and by its retribution. 
By reason of its intentional character:Action done volḻuntarily or intentionally is accumulated action; action done involuntarily or unconsciously, and action not done in haste, even if it is voluntary, is action that is done. 
By reason of itscompletion: 
Some go to painful realms of rebirth thtrough misdeeds; some by two; some by three ,; some through one deed, through two, through three..through ten. 
Since it s a rule that a person goes to a painful realm of rebirth through a certain quantity of actions, if this measure is not completed, the action is done, but not accumulated; but when this measure is completed, it is accumulated, By reason of theabsence of regretand opposition When remorse is absent,or when opposition,confession, etc,is absent, action is then termed accumulated. 
By reason of itsaccompaniments: 
When an action isbadand has a bad escort: 
it is By reason of its retributin: 
Action is accamulated which necessarily gives forth retribution. 
Action which does not present these characteristiss is done, but is not accumulated. 
kkk We have seen that a gift made to a Caitya by a person not detached from desireis a gift of benefit for him who made it. 
But no one emjoys the thing given: how can this gift be meritoriaṇs? 
The merits of the gift are of two types: 
merit produced by abandoning, that is, the merit which results from the sole fact of abandoning; 2. 
merit produced by its enjoyment, the merit which results in joy in the object given, by the person who receives. 
The merit of a gift to a Caitya is merit produced by abandoning. 
How can the gift produce merit when no one receives it? 
We would answer this objection by asking why would the gift produce merit whensomeone receives i,and why itwould not produce merit when no one receives it? 
If the satisfaction of a person who receives is a condition for merit, you then deny that the Immeasurable Mediations and the Meditation of Right View are meritorious. 
The gift to a Caitya thus produces merit, Even though no one receives it, as is the case with compassion, etc. 
In the case of the Meditation on Compassion, no one receives, n0 one is satisfied, and yet merit arises for the compassionate person, through the very force of his thoughts of compassion.In the same way, even though the Excellent Being has passed away, a gift to a Caitya made with devotion to him is meritorious by reason of the thought of the believer himself. 
Should we conclude then that material offerings and worship are superfluous? 
No, for the devotion which produces these actions very much outweighs the devotion of a person who worships and who gives in mind only. 
When a person who has the intention of killing his enemy, contintes his bodily and vocal actions on the dead body of his enemy which this intention provokes, thinking,This is my enemy, that is to say, he thinks, This enemy is not yet dead, he obtains dermerit very much greater than he would have through merely the intention; in the same way, even though the Master has passed away, the person who does actions of giving and worship inspired through devotion obtains a much greater merit than he would have only through devotion. 
kskk If a seed given to a good field bears an agreeable result, should we think that it bears a disagreeable result if given to a bad field? 
Even seeded into a bad field, the gift bears agreeable results, for there is never opposition between the result and the seed.i From the seed of the vine, there arises solely the sweet fruit of the vine; from the seed of the vmba there arises only the sour fruit of the vwba: 
even seeded into a bad field, the seed bears the result which is appropriate to it.In the same way, this seed which is the gift of a person who has the intention of being useful to another, even if placed into a bad field, can only produce an agreeable result. 
Bat, through the evil of the field, the result will be small or almost nil. 
We have explained meritorious work which consists of Giving, together with its related questions. 
kkōk We must now explain meritorious work which consists of the Precepts. 
Immorality is bad rpa. 
Morality is the renouncing of immorality. 
Bad rūpa is calledimmorality. 
The renouncing of immorality, which is morality, is f two types. 
This renouncing is also vijñapti and aviñapti.He who has undertaken to observe the rules and who then violates them, commits immorality. 
The morality that we have just described, in short, is Pure, when it is endowed with the four qualities. 
Morality endowed with the four qualities is pure; itis impurein the contrary case. 
Not troubled by immorality, by the causes of im morality; it takes as its support the opposite of immorality and Not troubled by immorality we have described; not troubled by the causes of immorality, that is,by the eśar and upaklefas ,it takes as itssupport the opposites ofimmorality, becausejt relies oa the four smrṛtyupasthānas ; and it relies on peace, not on rebirth in celestial realms, because it is directed to Nirvāṇa. 
According to another opinion, five causes make morality pure: 
the purity of thedeed itself ; 2. 
the purity of their attendants ; . 
the absence of disturbance from the vurus , 4. 
its supervision through mindfulness ; aṉd 5. 
its application to Nirvāṇa. 
According to another opinion, morality is of four types: 
the morality of fear, which one observes from the fear of the loss of the resouEces necessary to life, from fear of a bad reputation, froṃ fear of chastisement, from fear of bad realms of rebirth; 2. 
mercenaty morality, which one observes from attachment to agreeable realms of existence, to pleasures, to honots; 3. 
a morality suitable to the parts of Bodhi, which persons who possess Right View possess, with a view to their deliverance; and 4. 
pure morality, which, being free from stains, is free from vices. 
We have explained morality. 
kkk Good absoṟption or good in absorption, is bhāvanā, meditation, soaking in, or impregnation. 
What do we understand by samāhita, absorbed? 
That which is absorption by its nature, and that which coexists with what is absorption by nature. 
Why does good absorption receive the name of bhāvanā? 
Good absorption impregnates the mind to an extreme degree, because it grasps the qualities of this good, in the same way as sesame seeds are impregnated by fliowers in their grasping the odor of these flowers. 
kkk We have said that the result of giving consists of joys. 
What result does one obtain from the precepts and from meditation? 
Essentially, the precepts have heaven for their result; meditation has disconnection for its reṣult, Giving also has heaven for its result, but the precepts are the principle, normative cause of it. 
Disconnection, or Nirvāṇa, has meditation for its cause, which, in the path of abandoning immediately produces disconnection from the defilements; but the precepts contribute to it, since stilling and insight presuppose the precepts. 
kīfik The Sūtra says that four persons produce Brahmin merit, brāhmapnṇya. 
What is this merit? 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas , this is the merit which has been defined above in order that we might know th measure of theaction which has the marks of theBodhisattva for its result. 
The ancient masters said: 
Four possess Brahmin merit, because they are happy in the heavens for a kalpa. 
The merit of sucha measure thatone is happy inheaven for a apa is the Brahmin merit, for the lifespan of theBrahmapurohitas is a alpa. 
And in another Canon, one reads, He engenders Brahmin merit, he is happy in the heavens for a alpa. 
kkrḥ We have studied material giving. 
The gift of the Dharmas is the correct teaching, not defiled, of the Sūtras etc. 
The gift of the Dharma is to teach, correctly and with a mind not defiled, the Śūtra and the other parts of Scripture. 
Consequently, those who teach the Dharma either falsely, or with a defiled mind, through a desire or gain, for respect,and for reputation, destroy the great merit which would otherwise fall to them. 
cṅtk We have explained the three types of good according to the distinction of the three items of meritorious work. 
Furthermore, Good is threefold, merit, Nirvāṇa and penetratiorn Good merit, or good favorable to merit is the good which leads to an agreeable retribution. 
The good which is deliverance is the good which, when it arises, becomes a dharma of Parinirvāṇa. 
It is recognized that whoever, understanding the sermons concerning the defects of Sasāra, the nonself, and the qunalities of Nirvāṇa, has his hairs stand on end and who pours forth tears, possesses the mokṣgabhāgīya rtoot of good; in this same way, one knows that there was a seed in the khalabila, when, in the rain, one sees a plant put forth shoots. 
The good of penetration is fourfold, urmagatas, etc.; it will be explained later. 
kkṣke What is the nature of what is popularly caled writng, carving , eloquence, poetry , and calculation? 
An industrious action, of the body, of the voice or of the mind, with that which gives rise to it, are such things as writing, caṟving, eloquence, poetry, and calculation. 
Iṇḍustrious, that is, due to a certain technique. 
Threefold action is bodily, vocal, and mental action. 
Writing and carving are bodily actions, industrious, together with what gives rise to this action, namely the collection of the mind and its mental states. 
Eloquence and poetry are vocal actioṉs, Consequently, writing, carving, eloquence, and poetry, are by their nature, the five sēanṇdbas. 
Calculation is mental action; this refers to the mental eṇumera tion.of the dharmas. 
Defiled dharmas are sāvadya, nivrta, and hṇa. Some synonyms of defiled are: tvadya, associated with vadya, ot bad; nvrta, that is, covered by the defilements: 
and the defilements themselves are covered by other defilements; hṉa, or ignoble, because they are low or abandoned by the Āryans. 
Good and pure dharmas are praṇīta. 
Praṇīta, excellent, s a synonym for śubha, that s, kuśala, good,and of amala, immaculate oOr anāsrava. 
Good conditioned dharmas are sevya. Sevya, to be cultivated is synonymous with good and con ditioned. 
It then follows that other dharmas, some unconditioned, others conditioned but defiled or nondefiledneutral, are not to be cultivated. 
now, it is with a view to a result that one cultivates. 
Deliverance is the highest. These is nothing which outweighs Nirvāṇa. 
Nirvāṇa, being eternal and good, outweighs all. 



	Oṃ Homage to the Buddha. 
	Oṃ Homage to the Buddha. 
	
	
Desiring to compose a treatise, with the intention of making known the greatness of his master, the author undertakes to render him homage and to first present his qualities. 
	
"He has destroyed all blindness," that is to say, by him or through him blindness with respect to all things is destroyed. 
"He has destroyed all blindness," that is to say, by him or through him blindness with respect to all things is destroyed. 
"Blindness" is ignorance, for ignorance hinders the seeing of things as they truly are. 
But they do not know the qualities proper to the Buddha, objects very distant in space or time, nor the infinite complex of things; therefore, they have not destroyed blindness in an absolute manner, for the ignorance freed from the defilements is active in them 
Having thus praised the Blessed One from the point of view of qualities useful to himself, the author praises him from the point of view of qualities useful to others: 
Having thus praised the Blessed One from the point of view of qualities useful to himself, the author praises him from the point of view of qualities useful to others: 
"He has drawn out the world from the mire of transmigration." 
"He has drawn out the world from the mire of transmigration." 
Transmigration is a mire, because the world is bound up in it, and because it is difficult to traverse. 
Transmigration is a mire, because the world is bound up in it, and because it is difficult to traverse. 
The Blessed One, having pity on the world which finds itself drowned without recourse in this mire, has pulled it out, as much as possible, by extending to each one the hands of the teaching of the Good Law. 
The Blessed One, having pity on the world which finds itself drowned without recourse in this mire, has pulled it out, as much as possible, by extending to each one the hands of the teaching of the Good Law. 
"I render homage," by prostrating myself even to my head "to this teacher of truth:" teacher of truth," 
"I render homage," by prostrating myself even to my head "to this teacher of truth:" teacher of truth," 
because he teaches in conformity with that which is, without error. 
because he teaches in conformity with that which is, without error. 
By thus qualifying the Blessed One, the author indicates the manner in which the Blessed One is useful to others. 
By thus qualifying the Blessed One, the author indicates the manner in which the Blessed One is useful to others. 
It is by the true teaching that the Blessed One, the teacher, has pulled the world out of the mire of transmigration, not by his supernatural powers, nor by the granting of favors. 
It is by the true teaching that the Blessed One, the teacher, has pulled the world out of the mire of transmigration, not by his supernatural powers, nor by the granting of favors. 
After having rendered homage to this teacher of truth, what will the author do? 
After having rendered homage to this teacher of truth, what will the author do? 
"I shall compose a treatise." 15 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 
"I shall compose a treatise." 15 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 
A treatise is that which instructs disciples. 
A treatise is that which instructs disciples. 
Which treatise? The Abhidharmakosa. 
Which treatise? The Abhidharmakosa. 
What is Abhidharma? 
What is Abhidharma? 
Abhidharma is pure prajñā with its following. 
Abhidharma is pure prajñā with its following. 
prajñā which will be defined below (ii.24, vii.l) is the discernment of the dharmas. 
prajñā which will be defined below (ii.24, vii.l) is the discernment of the dharmas. 
Pure prajñā is undefiled prajñā 
Pure prajñā is undefiled prajñā 
The "following" of prajñā is its escort, namely the five pure skandhas which coexists with prajñā 
The "following" of prajñā is its escort, namely the five pure skandhas which coexists with prajñā 
Such is the absolute meaning of Abhidharma. 
Such is the absolute meaning of Abhidharma. 
It is also prajñā, and the Treatise which brings about the obtaining of pure prajñā. 
It is also prajñā, and the Treatise which brings about the obtaining of pure prajñā. 
In common usage, the word Abhidharma also designates all prajñā which brings about the obtaining of Abhidharma in the absolute sense of the word; 
In common usage, the word Abhidharma also designates all prajñā which brings about the obtaining of Abhidharma in the absolute sense of the word; 
defiled prajñā whether it is innate or natural, or whether the result of an effort, the result of hearing, reflection, absorption, receives, 
defiled prajñā whether it is innate or natural, or whether the result of an effort, the result of hearing, reflection, absorption, receives, 
along with its following, by convention, the name of Abhidharma. 
along with its following, by convention, the name of Abhidharma. 
One also gives the name of Abhidharma to the Treatise, for the Treatise also brings about the obtaining of pure prajñā: it is thus a factor in Abhidharma in the absolute sense of the word. 
One also gives the name of Abhidharma to the Treatise, for the Treatise also brings about the obtaining of pure prajñā: it is thus a factor in Abhidharma in the absolute sense of the word. 
The Abhidharma is called abhi-dharma because it envisions (abhimukha) the dharma which is the object of supreme knowledge, or the supreme dharma, Nirvana; or rather it is so-called because it envisions the characteristics of the dharmas, both their self-characteristics and their common (or general) characteristics. 
The Abhidharma is called abhi-dharma because it envisions (abhimukha) the dharma which is the object of supreme knowledge, or the supreme dharma, Nirvana; or rather it is so-called because it envisions the characteristics of the dharmas, both their self-characteristics and their common (or general) characteristics. 
Why is the present work called the Abhidharmakośa? 
Why is the present work called the Abhidharmakośa? 
The present work is called the Abhidharmakosa because the Abhidharma enters into it through its meaning; or because the Abhidharma constitutes its foundation. 
The present work is called the Abhidharmakosa because the Abhidharma enters into it through its meaning; or because the Abhidharma constitutes its foundation. 
Or rather as the Abhidharma is the point of support of this work, 
Or rather as the Abhidharma is the point of support of this work, 
one can say that this work is drawn from out of the Abhidharma, as from a sheath 
one can say that this work is drawn from out of the Abhidharma, as from a sheath 
it is thus called the Abhidharmakosa, "the work which has the Abhidharma for a sheath." 
it is thus called the Abhidharmakosa, "the work which has the Abhidharma for a sheath." 
Why was the Abhidharma taught? 
Why was the Abhidharma taught? 
By whom was the Abhidharma originally taught? The answer to these two questions will tell us why the author piously undertakes the writing of the Abhidharmakosa. 
By whom was the Abhidharma originally taught? The answer to these two questions will tell us why the author piously undertakes the writing of the Abhidharmakosa. 
Apart from the discernment of the dharmas, there is no means to extinguish the defilments, 
Apart from the discernment of the dharmas, there is no means to extinguish the defilments, 
and it is by reason of the defilements that the world wanders in the ocean of existence. 4 Ejima: hetor ata 32 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 So it is with a view to this discernment that the Abhidharma has been, they say, spoken [by the Master]. 
and it is by reason of the defilements that the world wanders in the ocean of existence. 4 Ejima: hetor ata 32 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 So it is with a view to this discernment that the Abhidharma has been, they say, spoken [by the Master]. 
Apart from the discernment of dharmas, there does not exist any means for the extinguishing of the defilements 
Apart from the discernment of dharmas, there does not exist any means for the extinguishing of the defilements 
and these are the defilements which cause the world to wander in the great ocean of transmigration. 
and these are the defilements which cause the world to wander in the great ocean of transmigration. 
This is why, say the Vaibhāṣikas, with a view to the discernment of the dharmas, the master, the Buddha, the Blessed One, spoke the Abhidharma. 
This is why, say the Vaibhāṣikas, with a view to the discernment of the dharmas, the master, the Buddha, the Blessed One, spoke the Abhidharma. 
For, without the teaching of the Abhidharma, a disciple would be incapable of discerning the dharmas 
For, without the teaching of the Abhidharma, a disciple would be incapable of discerning the dharmas 
However, the Vaibhasikas explain, the Blessed One spoke the Abhidharma in fragments. 35 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 
However, the Vaibhasikas explain, the Blessed One spoke the Abhidharma in fragments. 35 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 
And in the same way that the Sthavira Dharmatrāta made a collection of the Udanas scattered throughout the Scriptures,—the Udānavarga—in this same way the Āryan Kātyāyāniputra and the other Saints established the Abhidharma [by collecting it into the seven Abhidharmas]. 
And in the same way that the Sthavira Dharmatrāta made a collection of the Udanas scattered throughout the Scriptures,—the Udānavarga—in this same way the Āryan Kātyāyāniputra and the other Saints established the Abhidharma [by collecting it into the seven Abhidharmas]. 
What are the dharmas of which the Abhidharma teaches the discerning? 
What are the dharmas of which the Abhidharma teaches the discerning? 
The dharmas are impure, "in a relationship with the defilements," or pure,"with no relationship to the defilements." This is the complete teachings of all the dharmas. 
The dharmas are impure, "in a relationship with the defilements," or pure,"with no relationship to the defilements." This is the complete teachings of all the dharmas. 
What are the impure dharmas? 
What are the impure dharmas? 
Conditioned dharmas, with the exception of the Path, are impure. 
Conditioned dharmas, with the exception of the Path, are impure. 
With the exception of the Path, all conditioned dharmas are defiled. 
With the exception of the Path, all conditioned dharmas are defiled. 
Why is this? 
Why is this? 
They are impure because the defilements adhere to them. 40 | P a g e 2013TRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 
They are impure because the defilements adhere to them. 40 | P a g e 2013TRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 
Without doubt certain defilements, for example false views, can have the Path or the unconditioned dharmas, for their object. 
Without doubt certain defilements, for example false views, can have the Path or the unconditioned dharmas, for their object. 
This does not make the Path or these dharmas impure, or in a (necessary) relationship with the defilements, because the defilements do not adhere to them. 
This does not make the Path or these dharmas impure, or in a (necessary) relationship with the defilements, because the defilements do not adhere to them. 
This point will be explained later in the Fifth Chapter. [01501-01506] 
This point will be explained later in the Fifth Chapter. [01501-01506] 
What are the pure dharmas? 
What are the pure dharmas? 
The undefiled truth of the Path and the three unconditioned things are pure. 
The undefiled truth of the Path and the three unconditioned things are pure. 
What are the three unconditioned things? 
What are the three unconditioned things? 
Space and the two types of extinctions 
Space and the two types of extinctions 
The two extinctions are pratisaṅkhyānirodha extinction due to knowledge, and apratisaṅkhyānirodha* extinction not due to knowledge. 
The two extinctions are pratisaṅkhyānirodha extinction due to knowledge, and apratisaṅkhyānirodha* extinction not due to knowledge. 
The three unconditioned things and the truth of the Path are pure dharmas 
The three unconditioned things and the truth of the Path are pure dharmas 
because the defilements do not adhere to them. 
because the defilements do not adhere to them. 
Space is "that which does not hinder." Space has for its nature not hindering matter which, in fact, takes place freely in space; 
Space is "that which does not hinder." Space has for its nature not hindering matter which, in fact, takes place freely in space; 
and also of not being hindered by matter, for space is not displaced by matter. [01701-01710] 
and also of not being hindered by matter, for space is not displaced by matter. [01701-01710] 
Pratisaṅkhyānirodha is disjunction. 
Pratisaṅkhyānirodha is disjunction. 
(Conscious) disjunction (visamyoga, ii.57d) from the impure dharmas is pratisaṅkhyānirodha (ii.55) [or Nirvana]. 
(Conscious) disjunction (visamyoga, ii.57d) from the impure dharmas is pratisaṅkhyānirodha (ii.55) [or Nirvana]. 
Pratisaṅkhyāna or pratisaṅkhyā signifies a certain pure prajñā, the comprehension of the Truths. The "extinction" of which one takes possession by this prajñā is called pratisaṅkhyānirodha', we 50 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 could say pratisaṅkhyā- [prajñā-nirodha, "the extinction obtained through pratisaṅkhyā, "but the middle word (i.e., prajñā) is elided,] 
Pratisaṅkhyāna or pratisaṅkhyā signifies a certain pure prajñā, the comprehension of the Truths. The "extinction" of which one takes possession by this prajñā is called pratisaṅkhyānirodha', we 50 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 could say pratisaṅkhyā- [prajñā-nirodha, "the extinction obtained through pratisaṅkhyā, "but the middle word (i.e., prajñā) is elided,] 
as in the expression "oxcart," and not "cart hitched to oxen" (goratha = go-[yukta]-ratha). 
as in the expression "oxcart," and not "cart hitched to oxen" (goratha = go-[yukta]-ratha). 
Is there but one single pratisaṅkhyānirodha from all of the impure dharmas? No. Why is this? 
Is there but one single pratisaṅkhyānirodha from all of the impure dharmas? No. Why is this? 
Each [disjunction occurs] separately. The objects of "disjunction" are as numerous as the objects of "junction." 
Each [disjunction occurs] separately. The objects of "disjunction" are as numerous as the objects of "junction." 
If it were otherwise, if pratisaṅkhyānirodha were single, then a person who has experienced the extinction of the defilement which is abandoned by seeing the Truth of Suffering, would have obtained at the same time the extinction of the defilements which are abandoned by the Seeing of the other Truths, and by Meditation. 
If it were otherwise, if pratisaṅkhyānirodha were single, then a person who has experienced the extinction of the defilement which is abandoned by seeing the Truth of Suffering, would have obtained at the same time the extinction of the defilements which are abandoned by the Seeing of the other Truths, and by Meditation. 
It would be useless for him to cultivate the part of the Path which is opposed to these defilements. 
It would be useless for him to cultivate the part of the Path which is opposed to these defilements. 
This means that extinction does not have a "cause corresponding to its effect (sabhāgahetu)" and that it is not a "cause corresponding to its effect" 
This means that extinction does not have a "cause corresponding to its effect (sabhāgahetu)" and that it is not a "cause corresponding to its effect" 
A different type of extinction, which consists of the absolute hindering of arising, 
A different type of extinction, which consists of the absolute hindering of arising, 
is called apratisaṅkhyānirodha. 
is called apratisaṅkhyānirodha. 
Apratisaṅkhyānirodha is an extinction which is different from "disjunction;" 
Apratisaṅkhyānirodha is an extinction which is different from "disjunction;" 
it consists of the absolute hindering of the arising of future dharmas. It is so called because it is obtained, not by the comprehension of the Truths, 
it consists of the absolute hindering of the arising of future dharmas. It is so called because it is obtained, not by the comprehension of the Truths, 
but by the insufficiency of the causes of arising 
but by the insufficiency of the causes of arising 
For example, when the organ of sight and the mental organ are occupied with a certain visible matter, other visible things, sounds, odors, tastes and tangibles pass from the present into the past. It follows that the five sense consciousness, the visual consciousness, etc., which have had for their object other visible matter, sounds, odors, tastes and tangibles, cannot arise, for the sense consciousnesses are not capable of grasping their object when the object is past. 
For example, when the organ of sight and the mental organ are occupied with a certain visible matter, other visible things, sounds, odors, tastes and tangibles pass from the present into the past. It follows that the five sense consciousness, the visual consciousness, etc., which have had for their object other visible matter, sounds, odors, tastes and tangibles, cannot arise, for the sense consciousnesses are not capable of grasping their object when the object is past. 
There is thus an absolute hindering of the arising of the said consciousnesses, by reason of the insufficiency of the cause of arising 62 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 
There is thus an absolute hindering of the arising of the said consciousnesses, by reason of the insufficiency of the cause of arising 62 | P a g eTRANSLATION OF ABHIDHARMAKOŚAM BHĀṢYAM 2013 
1. solely pratisaṅkhyānirodha of the impure dharmas, past, present, and destined to arise; 
1. solely pratisaṅkhyānirodha of the impure dharmas, past, present, and destined to arise; 
2. solely apratisaṅkhyānirodha of pure, conditioned dharmas, not destined to arise; 
2. solely apratisaṅkhyānirodha of pure, conditioned dharmas, not destined to arise; 
3. pratisaṅkhyānirodha and apratisaṅkhyānirodha of impure dharmas, not destined to arise; and 
3. pratisaṅkhyānirodha and apratisaṅkhyānirodha of impure dharmas, not destined to arise; and 
4. neither pratisaṅkhyānirodha nor apratisaṅkhyānirodha of pure dharmas, past, present or destined to arise. 
4. neither pratisaṅkhyānirodha nor apratisaṅkhyānirodha of pure dharmas, past, present or destined to arise. 
We have said that the impure dharmas are the conditioned dharmas,. 
We have said that the impure dharmas are the conditioned dharmas,. 
minus the Path 
minus the Path 
What are the conditioned dharmas? 
What are the conditioned dharmas? 
Conditioned things are the fivefold skandhas, matter, etc 
Conditioned things are the fivefold skandhas, matter, etc 
These are the aggregate of matter, the aggregate of the sensations, the aggregate of ideas, the aggregate of mental formations, and the aggregate of consciousness. 
These are the aggregate of matter, the aggregate of the sensations, the aggregate of ideas, the aggregate of mental formations, and the aggregate of consciousness. 
Samkṛta, conditioned, 
Samkṛta, conditioned, 
is explained etymologically as "that which has been created (kṛta) by causes in union and combination." There is no dharma which is engendered by a single cause 
is explained etymologically as "that which has been created (kṛta) by causes in union and combination." There is no dharma which is engendered by a single cause 
Even though the expression samskrta signifies "that which has been created . . ," it also applies to future dharmas and to present dharmas, as well as to past dharmas\ in fact, a dharma does not change its nature by changing its time period. In the same way, one calls milk in the udder dugdha, "that which has been drawn," and kindling indhana, or "wood to be burned." 
Even though the expression samskrta signifies "that which has been created . . ," it also applies to future dharmas and to present dharmas, as well as to past dharmas\ in fact, a dharma does not change its nature by changing its time period. In the same way, one calls milk in the udder dugdha, "that which has been drawn," and kindling indhana, or "wood to be burned." 
Conditioned things are the paths; 
Conditioned things are the paths; 
they are the foundations of discourse; they are "possessed of leaving;" they are "possessed of causes." 
they are the foundations of discourse; they are "possessed of leaving;" they are "possessed of causes." 
Or rather conditioned things are called paths (adhvari) because they are devoured (adyante) by impermanence [02201-02205] 
Or rather conditioned things are called paths (adhvari) because they are devoured (adyante) by impermanence [02201-02205] 
Discourse (kathā), means words, or speech (vākya); discourse has names or words (nāman, ii.36) for its foundation. 
Discourse (kathā), means words, or speech (vākya); discourse has names or words (nāman, ii.36) for its foundation. 
Should one take literally the definition given by the stanza, and say that conditioned things are words? No. By "foundations of discourse" one should understand "the foundations of discourse, that is, words, together with that which the words signify." 
Should one take literally the definition given by the stanza, and say that conditioned things are words? No. By "foundations of discourse" one should understand "the foundations of discourse, that is, words, together with that which the words signify." 
	
	
If we understand "foundations of discourse" to be only words, we would be at variance with the Prakaraṇagrantha which says; "The kathavastus, the foundations of discourse, are embraced within the eighteen dhātus." 
If we understand "foundations of discourse" to be only words, we would be at variance with the Prakaraṇagrantha which says; "The kathavastus, the foundations of discourse, are embraced within the eighteen dhātus." 
Niḥsāra signifies "leaving" (sāra = niḥsarana) which is the Nirvana of all conditioned things. 
Niḥsāra signifies "leaving" (sāra = niḥsarana) which is the Nirvana of all conditioned things. 
As one should depart from conditioned things, one qualifies them as "endowed with leaving” 
As one should depart from conditioned things, one qualifies them as "endowed with leaving” 
Conditioned things are dependent on causes; they are thus qualified as savastuka, that is, "having causes." 
Conditioned things are dependent on causes; they are thus qualified as savastuka, that is, "having causes." 
The Vaibhasikas believe that, in the expression savastuka, vastu signifies cause (hetu). 
The Vaibhasikas believe that, in the expression savastuka, vastu signifies cause (hetu). 
Such are the diverse synonyms of "conditioned things." 
Such are the diverse synonyms of "conditioned things." 
Desiring to compose a treatise, with the intention of making known the greatness of his master, the author undertakes to render him homage and to first present his qualities. 
He refers to the Buddha, the Blessed One. 
He has destroyed all blindness, that is to say, by him or through him blindness with respect to all things is destroyed. 
Blindness is ignorance, for ignorance hinders the seeing of things as they truly are. 
By this, the Buddha, the Blessed One is sufficiently designated, for he alone, through the possession of the antidote to ignorance , has definitely destroyed all ignorance with respect to all knowable things, so that it cannot rearise. 
But the Pratyekabuddhas and the Śrāvakas have also destroyed all blindness, for they are freed from all ignorance defiled by the defilements. 
But they do not know the qualities proper to the Buddha , objects very distant in space or time , nor the infinite complex. 
Having thus praised the Blessed One from the point of view of qualities useful to himself, the author praises him from the point of view of qualities useful to others: 
He has drawnout the world from the mire of transmigration. 
Transmigration is a mire, because the world is bound up in it, and because it is difficult to traverse. 
The Blessed One, having pity on the world which finds itself drowned without recourse in this mire, has pulled it out, as much as possible, by extending to each one the hands of the teaching of the Good Law. 
I render homage, by prostrating myself even to my head to this teacher of truth: 
By thus qualifying the Blessed One, the author indicates the manner in which the Blessed Oxe is useful to others. 
It is by the true teaching that the Blessed One, the teacher, has pulled the world our of the mire of transmigration, not by his supernaturaḻ powers, nor by the granting of favors. 
After having rendered homage to this teacher of truth, what will the author do? 
Which treatise? 
The Abhidharmakośa. 
What is Abhidharma? 
Prajñā which wili be defined below is the discernment of the dharmas. 
Pure prajñā is undefiled prajñā. 
it is thus a factor in Abhidharma in the absolute sense of the word. 
sḥk Why is the present work called the Abhidharmakośa? 
The present work is called the Abhidharmakośa because the Abhidharma enters into it through its meaning; or because the Abhidharma constitutes its foundation. 
The Treatise that bears the name of Abhidharma enters by its meaning into this work, which is thus the Abhidharmakośa, the sheath of the Abhidharma. 
Or rather as the Abhidharma is the point of support of this work, one can say that this work is drawn from out of the Abhidharma, as from a sheath; it is thus called the Abhi dharmakośa, the work which has the Abhidharma for a sheath. 
So it is with a view to this discernment that the Abhidharma has been, they say, spoken. 
Apart from the discernment of dharmas, there does not exist any means for the extinguishing of the defilements , and these are the defilements which cause the world to wander in the great ocean of transmigration. 
This is why, say the Vaibhāṣikas, with a view to the discernment of the dharmas, the master, the Buddha, the Blessed One, spoke the Abhidharma. 
For, without the teaching of the Abhidharma, a disciple would be incapable of discerning the dharmas. 
And in the same way that the Sthavira Dharmatrāta made a collection of the Udāṇas scattered throughout the Scriptures,.the Udānavarga,in this same way the Āryan Kat yāyāniputra and the other Saints established the Ābhidharma. 
What are the dharmas of which the Abhidharma teaches the discerning? 
Conditioned dharmas, with the exception of the Path, are impure. 
With the exception of the Path, all conditioned dharmas are defiled. 
Why is this? 
What are the pure dharmas? 
The undefited truth of the Path and the three uncondi tioned things are pure. 
What are the three unconditioned things? 
Space and the two types of extinctions. 
The three unconditioned things and the truth of the Path are pure dharmas because the defilements do not adhere to them. 
Space is that which does not hinder. 
Space has for its nature not hindering matter which, in fact, takes place freely in space; and also of not being hindered by matter, for space is not displaced by matter. 
Pratisakhyānirodha is disjunction. 
disjunction from the impure dharmas īs pratisaṃkhyānirodha . 
The extinction of which one takes possession by this prajñā is called pratsakhyānirodha; we could say pratisaṃkhya nirodha, the extinction obtained through pratisaṃhkhyā, but the middle word is elided, as in the expression 0x caṟt, and ṉot cart hitched to oxen ratha. 
Why is this? 
The objects of disjunction are as numerous as the objects of jvnction. 
If it were otherwise, if pratitakhyānirodha were single, then a person who has experienced the extinction of the defilement which is abandoned by seeing the Truth of Suffering, would have obtained at the same time the extinction of the defilements which are abandoned by the Seeing of the other Truths, and by Meditation. It would be useless for him to cultivate the part of the Path which is opposed to these defilements. 
This means that extinction does not have a cause corresponding to its effect , and that it is not a cause corresponding to its effect. 
A different type of extinction, whichī consists of the absolute hindering of arising, is called epratisankhyānirodha. 
Apratisaṃkhyānirodha is an extinction which is different from disjuṇction; it consists of the absolute hindering of the arising of future dharmas. 
It follows that the five sense consciousness, the visual consciousness, etc., which have had for their object other visible matter, sounds, odors, tastes and tangibles, caanot arise, for the sense consciousnesses are not capable of grasping their object when the object is past. 
There is thus an absolute hindering of the arising of the said consciousnesses, by reason of the insafficiency of the cause of arising. 
Here we have a fourfold alterṇative : 
solely pratisahkhyānirodha of the impure dharmas, past, present, and destined to arise; 2. 
solely apratisakhyānirodha of pute, conditioned dharmas, not destined to arise; , pratisañkhyānirodha and apratisaṃkhyānirodha of impure dharmas, not destined to arise; and 4. 
neither pratisaṃkhyānirodha nor apratisakhyanirodha of pure dharmas, past, present or destined to arise. 
We have said that the impure dharmas are the conditioned dharmas, mirus the Path. 
What are the conditioned dharmas? 
Conditioned things are the fivefold skandhas, matter, etc. 
These are the aggregate of matter, the aggregate of the sensations, the aggregate of ideas, the aggregate of mental formations, and the aggregate of consciousness. 
Saṃbrṛta, conditioned, is explained etymologically as that which has been created by causes in union and combination. 
There is ṅṉo dharma which is engendered by a single cause. 
Conditioned things are the paths; they are the founda tions of discourse; they are possessed of leaving; they are possessed of causes. 
Conditioned things are pathsthat is to say, the time periods, the past, present and futurebecause they have for their nature heving gone, of going, of shall be going. 
Or rather conditioned things are called paths because they are devouted by impermanence. 
Discourse , means words, oṟ speech ; discourse has names or words for its foundation. 
Niḥsāra signifies leaving which is the Nirvāṇa of all conditioned things. 
As one should depart from conditioned things, one qualifies them as endowed with leaving. 
Conditioned things are dependent on causes; they are thus qualified as savasuka, that is, having causes. 
The Vaibhāsikas believe that, in the expression savastuha, vastu signifies cause. 
When they are impure, they are upādānaskandhas. 
The upādānaskandhas are so called because they proceed from the defilements, as one says grass fire or straw fire; or rather because they are governed by the defilements, as one says the kings man; or rather because they give rise to the defilements, as one says flowerbearing tree or frnitbearing tree. 
The defilements are of battle because they injure oneself and others. 
Impure conditioned things are qualified of battle, in a relationship with battle, because the defilements of battle adhere to them; equally, as we have seen, they are qualified as impure, possessing impurity,because the defilements adhere to them. 
They are also suffering, arising, the world, the locus of false opinions, existence. 
Suffering, because they are odious to the Saints. 
Arising, because suffering arises from them. 
World, because they are in the process of decomposition. 
Rūpa, or matter, is the five sense organs, five objects, and avijñapti. 
The five organs are the organs of sight, hearing, smell, taste and touch. 
The five objects of the five organs are visible matter, sounds, odors, tastes aṅd tangibles. 
And avñapti ; such is rūpaskandha. 
ks We have enumerated five things, visible matter, sound, etc. 
The points of support of the consciousnesses of these things, namely the subtle material clements, aṟe the five oṟgans, the organ of sight, etc.! 
The five which are the point of support of the consciousnesses of visible matter, sounds, odor, taste and tangibles, and which consist of the suprasensible subtle mmaterial elements, are, in this order, the oṟgans of sight, hearing, smell, taste, and touch. 
The Blessed One said in fact, The eye, Oh Bhikṣus, an internal āyatana, a subtle matter derived from the primary elements. 
Or rather, the points of support of the visual consciousness, or eye consciouspess, etc. 
What is the oṟrgan of sight? 
It is the subtle matter which is the support of the coṇsciousness of sight. 
kṭck Let us now examine the five objects beginning with visible matter, rūpāyatana. 
Visible matter is twofold. Visible matter is color and shape. 
Color is fourfold: blue, red, yellow, white; other colors proceed from out of these four colors. 
Shape is eightfold: 
Oṟ twentyfold. 
Some make a color of the firmament ; this would give us the number twentyone. 
Even signifies of even shape; uneven is the opposite; mist is the vapor which rises from the ground and from water; hot light is the light of the sun; light is the light of the moon, the stars, fire, grasses and gems; shadearisen from an obstacle to lightis where formns still rernain visible; darkness is the opposite. 
blue, red, yellow, white, shade, hot light, light, darkness. 
There can be shapes without there being color: that part of the long, of the short, etc., which constitutes bodily action. 
There can be color and shape at oṉe and the same time: all the other categories of visible matter. 
Some other Masters maintain that only hot light and light are exclusively color; for blue, red, etc., present themselves to the sight under the aspect of long, short, etc. 
Sound is eightfold. 
It is fourfold: having for its cause present primary elements forming part of the organs, having for its cause other primary elements , belonging to liv ing beings, and not belonging to living beings. 
First categoṟy: sound caused by the hand or by the voice. 
sound of the wind, of the trees, of water. 
According to other masters, one sound can belong to the first two categories at one and the same time, for example, a sound produced by the coming together of a hand and a drurm. 
But the School does not admit that one atom has for its cause only two tetrades of the primary elements; thus one cannot admit that one atom is produced by the four primary elements of a hand and the four primary elements of a drum. 
Taste is of six types. 
Sweet, sour, salty, pungent, bitter, and astringent. 
Odor is fourfold. 
But, according to the Prakaraṇa , odot is threefold: 
The tangible is of eleven types. 
Eleven things are tangible things: the four primary elements, softness, hardness, weight, lightness, cold, hunger, and thirst. 
Softness is smoothness; hardness is roughness; weight is that by which bodies are susceptible of being weighed ; lightness is the opposite; cold is what produces a desire for heat; hunger is what produces a desire for food; thirst is what produces a desire for drinking. 
the cause is designated by the name of the effect. 
In the same way that it is said The appearance of the Buddha is happiness; the teaching of the religion is happiness; happiness, the harmoṇṉy of the commnunity; happiness, the austerities of monks who are in agreement. 
Both huṇger and thirst are lacking in Rūpadhātu, but the other tangibles are found there. 
It is true that bothersome cold is lacking in Rūpadhātu but beneficent or pleasing cold is found there: 
when such a distinction is lacking; for example, when one sees the multiple colors and shapes that an army or a pile of jewels present at a distance and bunched together. 
The same remark is applicable to the auditory consciousness, the olfactory consciousnesses, etc. 
But one touch consciousness arises from only five things at most, namely the four primary elements and one another of the other tangibles, soft, hard, etc. 
But, according to another opinion, one touch consciousness can arṟise from eleven tangibles at one and the same time. 
When the organs of touch and of taste attain their object at the same time , which consciousness is the first to arise? 
ksṣk We have explained the objects of the five organs of sense consciousness, and how these objects are preceived. 
One whose mind is distracted is one who has a mind different from the mind that provoked the zvñapti,for example, a bad mind i when the avijñapti has been provoked by a good mind. One without mind is one who has entered into one of the absorptions of nonconsciousness called asarjñisamāpati . 
Pure or impure means good or bad. In dependence on the primary elements: this in order to distinguish the gvijñapt; seties from the prāpti series. 
This is called the avijñapti in order to indicate the reason for the name avjñapti. 
This serial continuity, while being by its nature matter and action,.like vjñapti, bodily and vocal action,.nevertheless does nothing by way of informing another as vjñapti does. 
Is called, in order to show that the author here expresses the opinion of the Vaibhāṣikas, and not his own. 
In short, avjñapti is a rūpa, good or bad, arisen from vijñapti oṟ from absorption. 
ksik because they aṟe the point of support for allderived matter. 
Or it is because they assemble on a large scale in the mass of the earth, the water, the fire and the wind, where their modes of activity are manifested together. 
What activity establishes the existence of these dhātusr, and what is their nature? 
They are proven to exist by the actions of support, etc. 
1i They are solidity, humidity, heat and motion. 
As for their natures, the earth element is solidity, the water element is humidity, the fire element is heat, and the wind element is motion. 
Motion is what causes the series of states which constitutes a thing to reproduce itself in different places; in the same way that one speaks of the motion of a flame. The Prakaraṇa and the Sūra say: What is the wind element? 
What is the difference between the earth element, and earth, etc? 
In common usage, what is designated by the word earth is color and shape. 
That is, when one sees earth, one sees its color and its shape. 
As is the case for the earth, The same for water and fire. 
Wind is either the wind element, But the wind element is simply called wind in the world. 
What is called wind in the world is also the wind element; in fact, one speaks of black wind, or circular wind. 
Why do all these dharmas, from visibles to avijñapti, teceive the name pa? 
The Blessed One said: 
By what it is broken? 
It is broken by contact with the haṇd. 
By deteriorating, by being transformed. 
According to other mmastets, the quality that makes physical matter rpa, namely rūpaṇa, is not cutting off, deterioration, but rather impenetrability, impact or resistance, the obstacle that a rūpa opposes to.its place being occupied by another rpa. 
If this is so, the rāpa that constitutes an atom, a moṇad, will not be rūpa, for a monad, not susceptible to deterioration or resistance, is free from rāpaṇa. 
Avijñapti is not rūpa, for it is devoid of resistance. 
For avijñapii is not subject to modifications; further, in order that the comparison be exact, the gvjñapi should perish when the vijñapti perishes, as is the case for the shadow and the tree. 
This response is not valid. 
Avijñapri exists dependent upon the primary elements, as a shadow exists dependent on a tree, as the brilliance of a jewel exists dependent upon the jewel. 
The visual consciousness is not dependent upon an organ which is solely the cause of its arising. 
That the shadow, or the brilliance of a jewel exists dependent upon the tree, or on the jewel, is a hypothesis that does not conform to the principles of the Vaibhāṣikas. 
The Vaibhāṣikas hold that each one of the atoms of color which constitute shade and brilliance, exists dependent upon a tetrad of primary elements. 
The shadow is dependent upon the tree, since the shadow is dependent on the primary elements which are proper to it, and these are dependent upon the tree,the comparison to the shadow and avḍñapti is inadmissible. 
Thus, from the fact that avjñapti is called rūpa because its point of support is rpa, one cannot conclude that visual consciousness should be called rāpa. 
sicsk The organs and objects which have been defined as rāpaskandha, These same oṟgans and objects are regarded as ten āyataṉas, teṉ dhātus. 
kāyādhatu, spraṣṭavyadhātu. kṣk We have explained rpaskandha and how it is distributed into āyataṇṉas aṅd dhātus. We must now explain the skandhas. 1l Sensation is painful impression, etc. 
Vedanāskandha is the threefold mode of feeling or experiencing sensation which is painful, pleasant, neitherpainfulnorpleasant. 
One should distinguish six classes of sensations: those which arise from the contact of the five material organs, the oṟrgan of sight, etc., with their object; and those which arise from contact with the mental organ. 
Ideas consist of the grasping of characteristics. 
The grasping of the dīverse naturesperceiving that this is blue, yellow, long, short, male, femnale, friend, enemy, agreeable, disagree able, etcis sajñāskandha. 
One can distinguish six types of sarṅjña, accoṟding to organ, as for sensation. 
Sakāraskandha are the saskāras different from the other four skandhas. 
It is true that the Blessed One said in a Sūtra, The savṇhskā raskandha is the six classes of volition; but this definition excludes from saskāraskandha 1. 
Also the Blessed One said, The upādānaskandha called sanskāra is so called because it conditions conditioned things, that is to say, because it creates and determines the five skandhas of future existence.? 
Now the Blessed One said, If there is a single dharma which is not known and penetrated, I declare that one cannot put an end to suffering. And again If there is a single dharma which is not abandoṇṉed. 
These three skandhas, with avijñapti and unconditioned things, are the dharmāyatana, the dharmadhāta. 
Vedanāskandha, sajñāskandha, saskāraskandha, plus avijñapti and the three unconditioned things , are seven things which are called dharmāyatana or dharmadhāta. 
Consciousness is the impression relative to each object. 
Vijñāṉarkandha is six classes of con sciousness, visual, auditory, olfactory, taste, touch, and mental consciousness. 
Considered as āyatana , It is the mental organ. 
Considered as dhatu , It is seven dhāṭus. 
What are the seven? 
The six consciousnesses and the aanas. 
We have seen that there are five rkandhus, twelve āyataṉas, and eighteen dhāṭus. Rāpaskandha is ten āyatanas, ten dhātus, aṇḍ avijñapti. The dharmāyatana, or dharmadhātu is vedanā, sajñā and saskārāskanṇha; avijñapti and the anconditioned things. 
Vijñānaskandha is the manaāyatana, it is seven dhātṭus, namelḻy the six classes of consciousness and the mental oṟgan. 
Could a manas or manodhātu be distinct from the six classes of consciousness, distinct from the sense consciousness and from the mental consciousness? 
There is no manas distinct from the consciousness. 
The Dhāsus 75 Of these six consciousness, the one which continually passes away, is the manar. 
All consciousness which has just perished receives the name of manodhātu; in the same way, a man is both son and father, the same vegetable element is both fruit and seed. 
.If the six consciousnesses which make up six dhātus constitute the anas, and if the manas is not a thing other than the six consciousnesses, then there would be either seventeen dhātus,by excluding the anas which is cofunctional with the six conscious nesses,or else twelve dhātus, by excluding the six consciousnesses which are cofunctional with the anas,supposing of course that you want to enumerate distinct things and not mere designations. 
This is true; but Onṉe counts eighteen dhātus with a view to assigning a point of supposrt to the sixth consciousness. 
The first five consciousnesses have.for their point of support the five material organs, organ of sight, etc. 
Consequently, with a view to attributing a point of support to this consciousness, one calls manas or manodhātu, or again mana āyabana aṅṇd manaindriya, that which serves it as its point of support, that is to say, any one of the six consciousnesses which depend on these six points of support, and six objects. 
If it is not followed by a new mind, namely the consciousnessofconception of a new existence , this is not related to its nature; rather, this results from the absence of other causes, actions and defilements, necessary to the production of a new thought. 
All conditioned dharmas are included within the totality of the skandhas ; all of the impure dharmasr are included within the totality of the xpādānaskandhas ; and all the dharmas are included within the totality of the āyatanas and the dhatus. 
But, more briefly, All the dharmas are included in one sēandha, one āyatana, aṇd oṉe dhāṭu. 
A dharma is included in its own nature. 
Why is this? 
For it is distinct from the nature of othets. 
For example, the organ of sight is included within the rūpaskandha, being rūpa by its nature; within the cakṣurāyatana and within the cakṣurdhāta, for it is the cakṣurāyatana and cakṣurdhātu, within the Truth of Suffering and Arising, for it is suffering and aṟising; but it is not included within the other rkandhas, āyatanat, etc., for it is distinct by its nature from that which is not itself. 
there is therefore tagraha of oṉe thing by a thing different from it. 
The organs of sight, of hearing, and of smell, although twofold, form only, in pairs, one dhātu, for their nature, their sphere of activity, and their consciousnesses are common. 
The two organs of sight have a community of nature, for they areboth of themthe organ of sight; community of sphere, for they both have visible matter for theit sphere; and community of con sciousness, for they are both the point of support of the visual coṉsciousness. 
Consequently the two oṟgans of sight form a single dhātu. The same holds for the organs of hearing and smell. 
It is for beautys sake that they are twofold. 
With but a single eye, a single ear, or a single nostril, one would be very ugly. 
ksksṣk What is the meaning of the terms skandha, āyatanra, and dhātu? 
Skandha signifies heap, āyatana signifies gate of entry, gate of arising, and dhāṣu signifies lineage. 
future, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or excellent, far or near, if ope puts together all this pa, that which is past, etc., one has that which is called rpaskandha. 
past rāpa is rpa destroyed by impermanence, future rpa is rūpa which has not arisen, and present rūpa is rūpa which has arisen and which has not been destroyed; rūpa is internal when it forrs part of the series called me ; all other rūpa is external; or rather the terms internal and external are understood from the point of view of āyatana: 
This objection is invalid, for terms of comparison do not vary: 
when a rūpa is gross in relation to another rāpa, it is not subtle in relation to this same other rūpa: like father and son. 
Inferior rpa is defiled rāpa; excellent rpa is nondefiled rūpa; past and future pa are distant; present pa is near. 
According to the Bhadanta, gross 7pa is that which is perceived by the five organs; all other rāpa is subtle;. 
past rpa, etc., has already been designated by its ncme. 
The same for sensation; it is far or neaṟ according to whether its point of support is visible or iavisible; it is gross or subtle according to whether it is corporeal or mental. 
Etymologically, āyatana is that which extends the entry of the mind and of the mental states. 
In the same way that the place, the mountain, where there are many families of gems,iron, coppet, silver, goldis said to have numerous dhātus, in this same way in the huiman complex or series, there are eighteen types of families which are called the eighteen dhātus. 
Let us say that they are the mine of the mind and mental states. 
According to another opinion, dhātu signifies species. 
The specific nature of the eighteen dhātus is what is understood by the eighteen dhātus. 
As an atom in this hypothesis cannot have the qnality of being a heap, do not say that skandha signifies heap. 
According to another opinion , skandha signifies that which bears the burden, namely its effect. 
1 Or else skandha signifies part, section, as one says in the world, I will lend you three sandhas, if you promise to return them to me. 
These two explanations are not in conformity with the Sūtra. 
Whatever rpa there is, past, ptesent, or future, if one puts together all this rpa. 
all rēpa,past rūpa, future rūpa, etc.,.is, individually, called ṛandha, the same way that it teaches that hair, etc., is earthelement ; thus each real element of past rpa, future rāpa, etc., receives the name of skandha. 
Thus the skandhas have real existence and not merely nominal existence. 
if one puts together all this pa, one has that which is called rūpaskandha. 
When the Ābhidhārmikas take into coṉsideration the fact that the term sandha is only the denomimation of a heap, they say that an atom is part of a dhātu, an āyatama, and a skandha; when they do not take this fact iato consideration, they say that an atom is a dhātu, an āyatana, skandha. 
In fact, one metaphorically designates the part by the whole; for example, The robe is burned, for One part of the robe is burned. 
Why did the Blessed One give skandhas, āyatanas and dhātus as the triple designation of the dharmas? 
The teachings of the skandhas, etc., because error, faculty, joy are threefold.1 1. 
Eṟṟor is threefold: 
three catagories, sharp, mediocre, duḻl 3. 
The two mental states, sensation and ideas, are defined as distinct sandhas because they are the causes of the roots of dispute, because they are the causes of transmigration, and also by reason of the causes which justify the order of skandhas. 
There are two roots of dispute: attachment to pleasure, and aṭtachment to opinions. 
Sensation and ideas are, respectfully, the principal causes of these two roots. In fact, if one becornes attached to pleasures, it is because one relishes the sensation; if one becomes attached to opinions, it is by reason of erroneous or false ideas. Sensation and ideas are the causes of traṇsmigration: those who are greedy for sensation and whose ideas are erroneous transrmigrate. 
The reasons which justify the order of the rkandhas will be explained below. 
22ab Unconditioned things are not named with respect to the ṛkandhas, because they do not coṟrespond to the concept. 
Unconditioned things cannot be placed within any of the five skandhas, for they are not matter, nor sensation. 
, one has that which one calls the a asaskṛtaskandha, for the distinctions of past, etc., do not exist with respect to unconditioned things. 
According to one opinion, the same way that the end of a jug is not a jug, in this same way unconditioned things, which are the end or cessation of the skandhas, ate not skandhas. 
The order of the sēandhas is justified by their grossness, their defilement, the characteristic of the jug, etc., and also from the point of view of their spheres of influence. 
Matter, being subject to resistance , is the grossest of the skandhas. 
In the course of external transmigration, men and women are mutually infatuated by their bodies because they are attached to the pleasures of sensation. This attachment proceeds from erroneous ideas , which are due to the defilements which are saskāras. 
The srbkandhas are thus arraṇged according to the process of their defilement. 
Matter is the pot, sensation is the food, ideas are the seasoning, the ramskāras are the cook, and the mind is the consumer. 
The first four skandhas coṉstitute the field; the fifth constitutes the seed. 
There are thus five rkandhas, no more, no less. 
they are grosser than the other saskāras; they are the cause of the process of defilement; they are the food and the seasoning;.and they reign over the two spheres of existence. 
ksksk One should now explain the order in which the six āyatanas or dhātus which are the six organs.of consciousness, the oṟgan of sight, etc., are enumerated: 
Five, beginning with the organ of sight, are called the first, because they bear only on present, simultaneous objects. 
The first four are the first because their object is solely derived or secondary matter. 
sometimes primary elements, sometimes derived matter, sometimes both at the same time. These four are arranged according to the range and speed of their activity. 
Their activity is at a distance, at a greater distance, very rapid. 
The organ of sight and the organ of hearing bear on a distant object. 
But the activity of smell is more rapid than that of taste. 
The organ of smell perceives the odor of food before the organ of taste perceives its taste. 
The point of support or the place of the organ of sight, that is to say, the eye, is the highest; below that, the place of the organ of hearing; below that, the place of the oṟgan of smell; below that, the place of the organ of taste. 
Among the ten āyatanas included within vāpaskandha, only one receives the name of rāpaāyatana. 
Anṅd although all the āyatanas are dharmas, only one is called dharmaāyatana. 
A single āyatana is called rūpaāyatana with a view to diīstinguishing it from the others, and by reason of its excel lence. 
The āyatana which does ṉpot bear any of these nine names, and which is matter, is sufficiently designated by the expression tūpaāyatana, without there being any need to give it another name. 
being subject to resistance, it is deteriorated through contact with the hand, etc.; by reason of deśanṉidarśfana : 
that which one understands in the world by rāpa, is visible matter, color and shape. 
It incldes numerous dharmas, sensations, ideas, etc.; it includes the best dharma, that is to say, Nirvāṇa. 
According to another opinion, visible matter is called rūpā yatana because it includes twenty varieties , and because it is the sphete of three types of eyes, a fleshy eye, the divine eye, and the wisdom eye. 
The Sūtras name other skandhas,other āyataṉas, aṇḍ other dhātus. 
The eighty thousand dharmaskandhas thet the Muni promulgated, depending on whether one regards them as voice or as name, are included within the rāpaskaṇdhūi oṛ 
For the teachers who say The word of the Buddha ss, by its nature, voice, these skandhas are inctuded within the rāpaskandha; for those who consider the word of the Buddha as name, these rhandhas are included within the se?skāraskandha. 
Accoṟding to some, a dharmaskhandha iīs of the dimension of the Treatise. 
t That is to say, of the dimension of an Abhidharmma Treatise known by the name of Dharmaskandha, which is six thousand stanzas long. 
The exposition of the skandhas, etc., constitutes so many dharmaskandhas. 
Eighty thousand dharmaskandhashave been preached by the Blessed One in order to cure them. 
In this same way the other skandhas, āyatanas and dhātus should be suitably arranged within the skandhas, āyatanas and dhātus as described above, by taking into account the charac teristics that have been attributed to them. 
the first forms part of the rūpaskandha, the others of the saskāraskandha. 
The first eight kṛsṇāyatanas , being by their nature absence of desire, form part of the dharmāyatana. 
If one considers them along with their following, they are by their nature five skanṇdhas, and they are included within the manaāyatana and the dharmāyatana. 
The five gates of entry into deliverance aṟe, by their nature, speculative knowledge ; they are thus included within the ḍdharmāyatana. 
In this same way the sixtytwo dhātus enumerated in the Bahudhā zuka should be arranged within the eighteen dhātus by taking their natuṟe into coṉsideration. 
Is the space elernent the same thing as all space, the first of the unconditioned things ? 
Is all consciousness the consciousness element? 
Cavities are called the space element, it is, one says, light and darkness. 
According to the School , the void of the space element is light or darknessthat is to say, a certain type of color, of matteṛ 
, for that which one perceives in a cavity is light or darkness. 
Being by its nature light or darkness, the void will be day or night. 
The void is called aghasāmantaka rāpa. 
Oṉe should thus understand ggha as solid, agglomerated matter. 
void is agha because other matter does not stṛike it; it is at the same time close to other matter; it is thus both agha and samāntaka. 
The consciousness element is an impure consciousness. 
Why is it not called pure? 
Because these sīx dhātus are The support of arising. 
The six dhāus are given in the Sūtra as support, as the raison dere of arising, that is to say, of the mind at conception, and of all existence until the mind at death. 
Of these six dhātus, the first four are included within the tangible, the fifth is incloded within visible matter, and the sixth within the seven dhātus enumerated above 1. 
tssk Among the eighteen dhātus, how many are visible, capable of being pointed out? 
Only rāpadhātu is visible. 
The ten dhātar which are exclusively material are capable of being struck. 
The ten dhātus which are included within the rāpaskandha are capable of being struck. 
the quality that belongs to a body of making an obstacle to the aṟising of another body in the place where it itself is found; impenetrability. When a hand strikes a hand or a rock, when a rock strikes a rock or a hand, it is counterstruck or repelled. 
There is an eye, an organ of sight, which is sttuck by water and not by dṛyness, namely the eye of a fish; there is an eye which is struck by dryness and not by water, namely, the eyes of humans in general, ; there is an eye which is sttuck by water and by dryness, namely, the eye of a ctocodile, a crab, a frog, or fishermen; there is an eye which is neither struck by water nor by dryness, namely the eyes which are not of the preceeding categories. 
There is an eye struck by night, namely the eye of a bat, an owl, etc; there is an eye which is struck by daylight, namely the eye of humans in general, ; there is an eye which is struck by the night and by daylight, namely the eye of a dog, jackal, a horse, a leopard, a cat, etc. 
there is an eye which is not struck by either night or daylight, namely the eyes which are not of the preceeding categories. 
Alambanapratighāta, the striking of the mind and mentat states with their object. 
Viṣaya is the place where the organ exercises its activity, seeing, hearing, etc., āambana is what is grasped by the mind and the mental states. 
Why terrm striking or evolving the activity of the organ or the mind with respects to its viṣaya or ālambana? 
Are the dharmas which are sapratigha through striking the sphere of action, also sapratigha through impenetrability? 
Four alternatives: 
Let us now answer the second term of the question: 
the dharmas which are sapratigha through striking the objectare also sapratigha through striking the sphere of action; but there are dharmas which are sapratigha through striking the sphere of action without being at the same time sapratigha through striking the object, namely the five organs. 
kssk Among the eighteen dhāṣus, how many are good, how many are bad, and how many are morally neutral ? 
What are the eight? 
These are the ten dhāus which are character ized as sapratśigha , Minus visible matter and sound. 
the five material ogans, odor, taste and the tangible, are neutral, not being defined as good or bad; or rather, according to another opinion, not being defined from the point of view of retribution. 
The others are of three types. 
The other dhātus can be, according to the case, good, bad, or neutral. 
The seven dhātus. are good when they are associated with the three good roots , bad when they are associated with bad roots, and neutral in all other cases. 
The dharmadhātu includes the good roots, the dharmas associated with these roots, the dharmas that issue from these roots, and pratisakhyānirodha or Nirvāṇa; the bad roots, the dharmas associated with these roots, the dharmas that issue from these roots; and neutral dharmuas, for example space. 
Rūpadhātu and śabdadhātu, the visible matter and the audible, are good or bad when they constitute a bodily or vocal action that issued from a good or bad mind. They are neutral in all other cases. 
kskṣk Among the eighteen dhātus, how many exist in each sphere of existence, Kāmadhātu, Rūpadhātu, and Ārāpyadhātu ? 
All exist in Kāmadhātu. 
Fourteen exist in Rūpadhātu. 
There are fourteen dhāeus in Rāpadhātu. 
With the exception of odor, taste, the consciousness of odor, and the consciousness of taste. 
Odor and taste are lacking there, for they are morselfood and no one is born into Rūpadhātu who is not detached from this food. 
Tangible things should be lacking also, for it is also tangible food by the mouthful. 
No, for tangible things are pot exclusively food. 
One can reason in the same way with respect to odor and taste. 
Odor and taste have no function outside of eating; they are of no use to beings detached fromn food. 
We think that, if odor and taste are lacking in Rūpadhātu, the oṟgans of smell and taste should also be lacking, for they do not serve aay purpose. 
The nose, support of the subtle matter that constitutes the organ of smell, suffices for beauty ; the tongue, the place of the oṟgan of taste, suffices for elocation. 
The members:nose and tongue,which support the organ, cannot be deprived of this organ. 
One can well conceive that the sexual member is lacking when the sexual organ is lacking, for, stripped of this organ, it serves no function; but the nose and the tongue are useful independent of the organs of smell and taste. 
But an organ can arise without having any use, for example the organs of beings destined to perish in the womb. Agreed! The arising of an oṟgan can be without usefulness: but it is never without a cause. 
Thus there is no reason for the organs of smell and taste to appear among beings who are reborn in Rūpadhātu, since these beings are detached from odors and tastes. 
The sexual organ is a cause of ugliness. 
Moreover, it is not by reason of its utility that the sexual organ arises, but rather by reason of its cause. 
Given its cause, it will arise, even if it is ugly. 
The Sūtra teaches that beings of Rūpadhātu possess, complete, all the organs: 
Although odor and taste are lacking there, the organs of smeil and taste exist in Rūpadhātu. 
Thirst enters into action with regard to these six oṟgans of consciousness, not by reason of the object of these six organs, but by reason of the person himself. 
In Ārāpyādhatu, there is a mental organ, an object of the mental consciousness, and the mental consciousness. 
Beings detached from matter arise in Ārūpyādhatu, thus the ten dhātus which are material, namely the five organs and their objects, and the five consciousnesses which have for their point of support and for their objects a material dhāu , are lacking in Ārūpyādhatu. 
The three dhātur which have just been named can be pure or impure. 
The others are impure. 
The other dhātus, fifteen in number, are solely impure. 
Five consciousnesses aiways include viarka and vicara. 
The last three dhāṭus are of three types. 
The other dhātus are free from the one and the other. 
The other dhātus are the ten material dhātus. Not being associated with the mind, they are free from both vitarka and vicāra. 
ksḵ But, if the five sense consciousnesses are always accompanied by viṭarka and vicāra, how aṟe they defined as free from vkalpa? 
As for the other two vkalpas: They are dispersed mental pvajñā, mental mernory whatever it may be. 
Mental prajñā, that is, the discernment of the dharmas associated with the mental consciousness, but dispersed, that is to say, not concentrated, not in the state of absorption , is either vikalpa of examination or by definition. 
sksḵ How many dhātus have an object, that is to say, are the subject of consciousness? 
And also one part of the dharmadhātu. 
That part which consists of the dharmas associated with the mind. 
The other dhātus, namely the ten material ḍhātus and the part of the dharmadhātu which is not associated with the mind , do not have an object. Īt How many dhātus are nonappropriated? 
How many are appropriated? 
Nine are nonappropriated. 
What are these nine? 
The seven that have been mentioned which have an object, together with onehalf of the eighth. 
The eight that have been mentioned, and sound. 
the seven dhātus of mind , the dharmadhātu , and sound are never appropriated. 
for example, the physical matter,color and shape, of hair, body hair, pails and teeth.with the exception of their roots, which are bound to the body or to the organ of touch; color and shape of excrement, urine, saliva, mucus, blood, etc.; the color and shape of eaṟth, water, fire, etc. 
What is the meaning of the expression appropriated? 
That which the mind and the mental states grasp and appropriate to themselves in the quality of a support is called approprated. 
Matter that the Abhi dharma calls appropriated, is called in common language, saceśanā or sensitive matter. 
The tangible is of two types. 
Tangibles are the four primary elements, solidity, fluidity, heat, and motion ; and sevenfold secondary matter, the soft, the hard, etc. 
The other nine material dhātus are solely secondary matter. 
The other material dhātus, the five organs and the objects of the first four organs, are solely secondary matter. 
As is the part of the dharmadhātu which is materiaḻ. 
The same for avñapti , which forms part of the dharma dhātu. 
According to the Bhadanta Buddhadeva, the ten āyatanas, that is, the five organs of consciousness and their objects, are solely primaty matter. 
The Sutra teaches, in a limited manner, that there are four primary elements, and it defines them in a limited manner as being solidity, fludity, etc.,. 
Oh Bhikṣus, the eye, the internal source of consciousness , a subtle matter derived from the primary elements, material sources, invisible, capable of being struck, and so on with respect to the four other material organs which are described in the same terms. 
With respect to the first four objects: The visible matter is an external sources of consciousness, deriving from the primary elements, material, visible, capable of being struck. 
The same with respect to odor and taste. 
Tangibles are an external source of consciousness, the four primary elements and matter deriving from the four primary elements. 
Eveṟything that is in the eye, a ball of flesh, is solid, resistant. 
Here the Sūtra refers to the ball of flesh which is not separable from the organ of sight, and not to the organ itself. So be it. 
In fact, the Sūtra then says that a person is the six points of support of the mental dharma called contact , that is to say, the six oṟgans. 
Would one maintain that the mental states are the mind, and as a consequence are included within vrñānadhātu? 
One cannot, for the Śutra says Sensation and ideas are dharmas which are mental states, dbharmas associated with the mind, having the mind for their point of support; and the Sūtra speaks of a mind possessing desire; thus desire, which is a mental state, is not the mind. 
Among the eighteen dhātus, how many cut, and how many are cut; how many burn, and how many are burned; and how many weigh, and how many are weighed? 
Four external dhātus cat, are cut; Visible matter, smell, taste and tangible cut, when they bear the name of axe, etc.; they are cut, when they bear the name of wood, etc. 
What is the dharma that is called to cut? 
To cut is to produce the sectioning of the procress of an agglomeration the nature of which is to continue itself in an uninterrupted series. 
The organs cannot be cut off. For ekample, when all of the parts of the organ of touch or the body are cut off, they are not, for all this, muḻtiple: 
the members which have been cut, that is to say, seperated from the trunk, do not possess touch. 
The organs themselves do not cut, by reason of their translucidity, like the sparkle of a jewel. 
The same are burned and weighed. 
Four external dhātus alone are burned. 
According to some, the same four external dhāur burn and are weighed. 
According to othets, only the primary element of fire burns, when it menifests its own manner of being in the flame; only weight, which is one type of secondary matter , is weighed: 
How many are conjoined with material substances? 
Five internal dhātus are of fruition and accamulation. 
Vipākaṭa, f frnition, or literally, arisen from fruition instead of arisen from the cause of frnition , by ommis sion of the middle word, the same way that one says oxcart for oxdrawṇ cart. 
Or else, in the expression vipākaja, arisen from vpāka, the word vipāka designates not the fruition, but the ripened action, the action aṟṟiving at the time period when it gives forth its fruit. 
That which arises from ripened action, namely the fruit of retribution, is called arisen from vipāka. The fruit is furthermore also called vipāka, because it is cooked. 
In fact, a cause is often designated by the name of its effect, the same way that an effect is often designated by the name of its cause: 
The present six oṟgans are past action. 
Aupacayika, of accamulationṉ, that is to say that which is accumulated nearby through certain foods , certain actions , certain sleep, or ceṟtain absoṟptions. 
Matter of accumulation protects the matter of retribution as a wall does, by surrounding it. 
The Prajñaptifāstra says, This mark of the Mahā puruṣa which is called the voice of Brahmā rsults from the perfect practice of abstaining from harrmful language. 
The eight dhātus free from resistance are of outflowing and also of fruitioṇ. 
unṉiversal causes , retribution when they are produced by retributive causes. 
The others are of three types. 
kōksk A single dhātu s real. 
The unconditioned forms part of the dharmadhātu ; the dharmadhātu is thus the single hātu which contains a real thing. 
The last three dhātus are momentary. 
The last three dhātus are the mental organ, the object of mental consciousness, and the mental consciousness. 
This is why these three dhātus are called momentary, because, for a moment, they do not proceed from this type of cause. 
In the group under consideṟation, the mind to which the kṛāṇti is associated is anodhātu aṇd manovijñānadhātu; the dharmas which coexist with this mind are dharmadhātu: 
Does he who obtains possession of the organ of sight where he had previously been lacking it, also obtain possession of the visual consciousness? 
And does he who obtains possession of the visual consciousness where he was previously lacking ir, also obtain possession of the organ of sight? 
He can obtain the otrgan of sight and the visual consciousness either separately or together. 
a being of Kāmadhātu whose organs progressively appear , for, before the organ of sight appears within him, he is already in possession of his past and future visual consciousness ; aṉd a being who dies in Ārūpyadhātu and who is reborn in the heavens of the three higher Dhyānas, where the visual consciousness is lacking although the organ of sight exists there. 
Is one who is endowed with the visual organ also endowed with visual consciousness? 
Four cases are possible: 
these three categories of beings are endowed with both the organ and the consciousness; all other beings.2beings of Ārūpyadhātu,.are devoid of both the organ of sight and visual consciousness. 
The taking possession of and possessien, simultaneous or not, of the organ of sight aṇd visible matter, of the visual consciousness and visible matter, of the organ of hearing and sound, etc., shall be defined, as fitting, in each case. 
sksk How many are external? 
Twelve are personal What are these twelve? 
With the exception of visible matter, etc. 
Twelve dhātus are personal, the six organs and the six conscious nesses; six dhātus are external, the six objects of consciousness, visible matter, etc. 
Ī The mind is the object of the idea of self, the mind is what persons falsely grasp for their self. 
But can one say that the six consciousnesses are the point of support of the mind? 
When the consciousnesses, having perished, becomes the point of support of the mind, it is indeed these consciousnesses themselves which become the point of support; thus, before becoming a point of support, they are not foreign to the quality of point of support. 
If it were otherwise, the mental organ would be solely past; it would be neither present nor future. Now it is well understood that the eighteen dhātus belong to the three time periods. 
Moreover, if the present or future consciousness does not have the characteristic of vanodhātu, it is absurd to attribute this character istic to it once it is past. 
The dhātu called dharmas is sabhāga. 
An object of consciousness is qualified as sabhāga when the consciousness which constitutes its proper sphere arises or is destined to atise with respect to it. 
Now there is no dharma with respect to which an unlimited mental consciousness has not arisen or is destined to arise. 
All the Saints in fact necessarily produce the thought All dharma are impersonal. It is true that this thought bears neither on itself, nor on the dharmas which are coexistent with it ; but this thought and the dharmas which are coexistent with it are the object of a second moment of a thought of universal irmpersonality; all the harmas are thus included within the object of these two moments of thought. Therefore the dharmaa dhātu, the proper object of the mental consciousness, is, in its totality, sabhāga, active as an object. The other ḍhātus are also tatsabhāga. 
When they do not do their proper work. 
they are sabhāga when they do their proper work. 
The oṟrgan of sight which has seen, does now see or shall see visible matter, is teṟmed sbhāga. 
According to the Vaibhāṣikas of Kaśmiīr, the organ of sight is ṭasabhāga in four cases: the organ of sight which has perished, which is now perishing, which will perish without having seen, and the oṟgan of sight destined to arise. 
Visible matter, which has been seen, which is now seen, or which will be seen by the organ of sight, is sabhāga. 
The organ of sight which is sabhāga or tatsabhāga īs such for everyone, foṛ the petson to whom this organ belongs, and for other persons. 
But a certain visible thing is sabhāga for the person who sees it. 
In fact, the visible matter that a person sees can be seen by many, for exrample, the moon, a stage performance, or a contest, whereas two peṛsons do not see by means of the same oṟgan. 
Consequently, since one organ of sight is not general, it is though relationship with one person that it will be qualified as sabhāga or tatsabhāga; the organ of sight is sabhāga when he sees a visible thing, even though he has not seen, does not now see, or will not see another visible thing. 
Granted, one would say, with respect to sound which, like visible mmattet, is perceived at a diṣtaṅce and can be perceived by many persons. 
Consequently smells, tastes and tangibles should be compared to visible matter and sounds. 
What is the meaning of the expressions sabhāga and atsabhāga? 
That which is not sabhāga, but is nevertheless analogous to sabhāga, is called tatsabhāga, that is to say analogous to that , that is, analogous to sabhāga. 
How many ḍhātus can be abandoned by Seeing the Truths, in other words, by the Path of Seeing or through Seeing ? 
How many can be abandoned by Meditation or repeated consideration of the Ttuths, in other words, by the Path of Meditation or by Meditation? 
Ten and five aṟe abandoned through Meditation. 
The ten material dhātus, orgaṉs and objects, and the five sense consciousnesses, ate abandoned through Meditation. 
The last three are of three types. 
Eightyeight anuśayas , with their coexistent dharmas whether these coexistents be of the sarprayukta class or of the viprayukta class are abandoṉed by Seeing, with the prāptis of the said nṉuśayas abd the said coexistents, with their following of the said prāptīs. 
The other impure dharmas are abandoned by Meditation; 1. 
Now the quality of Prthagjana and the action which causes a bad realm of rebirth are in contradiction with the Path of Seeing the Truths. 
Thus, according to us, both are abandoned through Seeing. 
Neither the undefiled, nor matter, are abandoned by Seeing the Truths., 1. 
Nothing that is defiled, that is bad, nor defiledpeutral , and nothing that is material, can be abandoned by the Seeing of the Truths. 
Further, if the quality of Pṛthagjana were abandoned by Seeing, it would follow that it would exist in the first state of the Path of Seeingwhich is incoṟrrect. 
Arisen from the nonsixth is what has arisen from an oṟgan different from the sixth organ, that is to say, what has arisen from the five organs, the organ of sight, etc. 
ṣkṅk Among the eighteen dhāus, how many are view, how many are not view? 
The organ of sight and part of the dharmadhātu are view. 
Eight parts. 
The five false views, of which the first is belief in a self and Worldly correct views, that is to say, prajñā associated with the mental consciousness, good but impure. 
In the manner in which visible matter is seen at night and in the daytime, on a cloudy day and on a clear day, in this same way the dharmas are seen by defiled worldly views.five false opinions; by nondefiled worldly view or worldly coṟrrect views; by Śaīkṣī views; and by noṉAśaikṣī views. 
Why are coṟrect worldly views understood solely as prujñā associated with the mental consciousness? 
The prajñā which arises with the five sense conscious nesses, is not view because it is not judgment after deliberation. 
Now the prajñā which arises with the five sense consciousnesses does not present this characteristic. Thus it is not view. 
For the same reason, it happens that prajña, even though mental, defiled or nondefiled, is not view when it is purely intuitive. 
View is understood here as the seeing of visible matter. 
It is the organ of sight which sees visible matter. 
If an organ sees, then the organ of a person occupied with hearing or touch consciousness, would see. 
When it is sabhāga. 
The oṛgan of sight sees when it is sabhāga , that is to say, when it is conjoined with visual coṉsciousness. 
But then, that which sees is indeed the consciousness which is supported by the organ of sight. 
For obscured visible matter is not seen. Such is the opinion of the Vaibhāṣikas. 
visible matter, obscured by a wall or any other screen, is not seen. 
Thus, if the visual consciousness were to see, it would see even the visible matter obscured by a screen. 
The visual consciousness does not aṛise with respect to obscured visible rmatter; not arising with respect to them, it does not see them. 
But why does it not arise with respect to these visible things? 
In this hypothesis I would understand that the organ of sight, being capable of being arrested, does not see obscured visible matter. 
you do not then have the right to say that, being capable of being arrested, it does not see obscured visible matter. 
Moreover, one sees obscured visible matter through a glass, a cdloud, a cṛystal and water: how would you explain this fact? 
I would say then that the visual consciousness sees, it arises with respect to obscured visible matter when the screen does not form an obstacle to light; it does not arise in the contrary case. 
The Sūtra says, Having seen visible matter through the organ of sight. 
now this organ, being past , does not discern; it is through the mental consciousness that one discerns; therefore, if the text says through the mental organ, it means by supporting itself on the mental organ, the point of support of mental consciousness. 
The same for sight and the organ of sight. 
Oṇne can also admit that the Sūtra attṛibutes to the point of support, to the organ, the action which belongs to that which grasps this point of support, that is to say, to the consciousness. 
We read that agreeable and disagreeable visible rmatter is discerned by the organ of sight. 
The Sūtra also says The oṟgan of sight, Oh Brahmiṇ, is the gate of the sight of visible matter. 
This text proves that the visual consciousness sees by this gate which is the organ of sight. 
You would not maintain that gate signifies sight, for it would be absurd to say The organ of sight is the sight of the sight of visible matter. 
If the visual consciousness sees, what it is that discerns ? 
If the organ of sight sees, what is then the separately existing action of seeing that you attribute to this organ, the agent of this action? 
In the same way that you would have it that the consciousness discerns, without admitting any differ ence between the agent and the action, in that same way we hold that an oṟgan sees. 
According to another opinion, it is the visual consciousness which sees; but, as the organ of sight is the point of support of this consciousness, one says that it sees, the same way one says that the bell rings, because it is the point of support of the sound. 
But, according to this principle, one should also say that the organ of sight discerns, for it is the point of support of the visual conṇsciousness. 
For in the world one agrees to give the name of seeing to the visual consciousness; in fact, when this consciousness is produced, one says The color is seen; one does not say that the color is discerned. 
And the Vibhāṣā confirms;: One terms seen that which is attained by the organ of sight, that which falls within its line of vision and is perceived by the visual consciousness. One says then in the world that the organ of sight sees, because it is the point of support of the viṣual consciousness which sees; one does not say that it discerns, because the function attributed to the visual consciousness is seeing and not disceṛnment. 
One means that the consciousness discerns by itself, that it is in and of itself diṣcernment, in the same way that one says that the sun creates the day. 
By reason of the organ of sight and of visible matter there arises the visual consciousness: 
The eye sees, and the consciousness discerns. But one should not cling to these metaphors. 
The Blessed One has said that one should not take them in the manner of popular speech, that one should not setiously grasp an expression in use in the world. 
According to the system of the Vaibhāṣikas of KaśmīT, the oṟgan of sight sees, the organ of hearing hears, the organ of smell smells, the organ of taste tastes, the organ of touch touches, and the mental oṟgan disceṟns. 
Is visible matter seen by one eye or by both eyes? 
Visible matter is seen by the two eyes also, as the clarity of sight demonstrates. 
The Ābhidhārmikas say: 
Seen also by the two eyes; the two eyes being open, sight is clearer. 
Furthermore, when one eye is covered and the other half closed, oṉe perceives two moons; but not when one completely closes or half closes that which was open, or when one opens or completely closes that which has been half closed. 
One should not conclude that the visual consciousness is twofold from the fact that its point of support is twofold, for the consciousness is not material like pa; not having a mass it is not situated in a place. 
The organ of sight, the organ of hearing, and the mental organ know their object without attaining it. 
The organ of sight sees visible matter at a distance: it does not see the eyesalve placed on the eye; the organ of hearing hears distant sounds. 
If the organs of sight and hearing must necessarily enter into a close relationship with theit object, then ascetics in dḥyāna would not attain divine sight or divine hearing, in the same way that they do not attain a divine sense of smell. 
Why does a magnet not attract all iron? 
why does the organ of sight not see the eye salve, the brush, and all the objects with which it is in close relationship? 
According to certain rnasters, from the fact that one hears noise from the interior of the ear, one can conclnde that the oṟgan of hearing hears the sound with which it is ia close relationship, as it also hears distant sound. 
The other three organs, smell, taste, touch, perceive an object with which they are in close relationship. 
What does one mean when one says that the nose attains its object, knows its object after having attained it? 
But, if there is no contact among the atoms, how is sound produced? 
if atoms were to touch one aṉother, a hand in collision with a hand would dissolve into it, a rock in collision with another rock would dissolve into it, as gum dissolves into gum. 
But if atoms do not touch one another, why does an agglomeration of atoms not fall to pieces when it is struck? 
Because the wind element holds it together. 
A certain wind element has dispersion for its function, for example the wind of the period of the destruction of the world; a certain wind element has coṇcentration for its function, for example the wind at the period of creation. 
This is also what is meant by to attain, Furthermore, as agglomerations have parts, there is no difficulty in agglomerations touching one another. 
Anḍ, fromn this point of view the definitions of the Vbhāṣā are justified: 
Does a thingincontact arise having for its cause a thingin contact, or does it arise having for its cause a thingoutsideofcontact? 
Sometimes a thing outsideofcontact arises from a thingincontact, as when a thingin contact falls to pieces. 
Śometimes a thingincontact arises from a thingoutsideof contact, as when agglomerations come together. 
And sometimes a thingoutsideofcontact arises from a thingoutsideofcontact, for example the particles of dust suspended in the void of a window. 
The Bhadanta Vasumitra says: If atoms touched one another, they would therefore endure two moments. 
In fact, if atoms were to allow an interval between themselves, since this interval would be empty, what would hinder the progress of atoms into this interval? 
If you admit spatialdivision to the atom, then an atom certainly has parts, whether it enters into contact or not. 
it is evidently thus when one sees the circle of fire delineated by an ember;:or else do the organs indifferently grasp an object of their dimension and of a different dimension? 
The three organs of which the organ of smell is the first, grasp an object of their dimension. 
The same for sound; one hears the buzzing of a mosquito, the noise of thunder, etc. 
The atoms of the organ of sight are arranged on the pupil like the flower of the cumin, that is to say, on the surface; they are covered again by a membrane, of translucent colot, which prevents them from dispersing. 
According to another opinion, they ate arranged in depth, iike a pill; being translucent, like crystal, they do not obscure one another. 
The atoms of the organ of hearing are arranged in the interior of the bhūrja, that type of birch leaf which is found within the ear. 
The atoms of the organ of smell are arranged within the interior of the nostril. 
The atoms of the organ of taste are arranged on the upper surface of the tongue in the form of a halfmoon. In the middle of the tongue a space the dimension of the end of a hair is not occupied by the atoms of the organ. Such is the opinion expressed in Scripture. 
The atoms of the organ of touch have the shape of the body. 
The atoms of the female oṟgan are like a drum. 
The atoms of the male organ are like a thumb. 
The atoms of the organ of sight can be sabhāga in their totality; asabhāga in their totality; some sabhāga, others tatsabhāga. 
But, it does not occur that the atoms of the organ of touch are all sabhāga; even when the body is enveloped in the flames of Pratapana hell , an infinite number of atorns are tatsabhāga; for, says the School, the body would fall to pieces if all the atoms of touch were to work at the same time. 
It does not occur that consciousness is produced by one atom of organ, or by one atom of object. In fact the five categories of consciousness have agglomerations for their support and their object. 
It results from thiis that atoms are not perceived; they are thus imperceptible. 
The object of the fitst five consciousnesses is simultaneous with them; the object of the sixth consciousness is either eaṟlier than īit, simultaneous with it, or later than it; in other words, it is past, present, or future. 
No, it does not. 
The sole point of support of the mental consciousness is the mental oṟgan, this is, the consciousness which has just perished. 
The point of support of the first five is also simultaneous. 
the sense organ, organ of sight, etc., which is simultaneous with consciousness; and 2. 
the mental organ, which is past at the moment when the consciousness arises. 
The five consciousnesses thus have two points of support. 
ls that which is the point of support of the viṣual consciousness at the same time the immediately antecedent and parallel cause of this consciousness? 
Four cases: 
the organ of sight, which is solely a poiat of support; 2. 
sksk Visual consciousness depends on the organ of sight and on visible matteṟ. 
When the organ of sight is the object of attention ; when it is injured by dust, etc.; when it is alert; when it is sluggish and weak, consciousness reproduces modality: 
Why is it designated by the name of its organ eye consciousness. 
the organ of a certain person is the point of support of the visual consciousness of this person alone. 
Visible matter, on the contraty, is general, for a certain visible thing is perceived by both the visual consciousness and the mental coascious ness, by one person and by another person. 
We conclude that the consciousness is named according to its organ because the organ is its point of support, and because the organ is its own thing. 
Do the body, the orgen of sight, visible matter and consciousness belong to the same stage or to different stages? 
All can belong to different stages. 
When a being born in Kamadhātu sees, by means of an organ of sight of his stage, visible matteṛ 
When this being sees visible matter of his stage, by means of an oṟgan of sight of the First Dhyāna, then the body and visible matter are of Kamadhātu, but his organ and consciousness are of the First Dhyāna; if he sees visible matter of the First Dhyāna by means of the same oṟgan, then only the body is in Kāmadhātu; the other three are of the First Dhyāna. 
When this being sees visible matter of Kāmadhātu by means of an organ of sight of the Second Dhyāna, then the body and visible matter are in Kāmadhātu, the organ is in the Second Dhyāna, and conscious ness is in the First Dhyāna; if he sees, by the same organ, visible matter of the Second Dhyāna, then the body is in Kāmadhātu, the oṟgan and visible matter are in the Second Dhyāna, and consciousness is in the First Dhyāna. 
Oṇṉe would explain in the same way these cases where a being born in Kāmadhātu sees, by the organ of sight of the Third or Fouṟth Dhyāna, visible matter of these same stages or of a lower stage. 
When a being in the First Dhyāna sees visible matter of his stage by means of an organ of sight of his stage, then body, organ, visible matter and consciousness are of the same stage; if he sees visible matter of a lower stage by the same oṟrgan, then the body, organ, and consciousness are of his stage, the First Dhyāṇa. 
When this being sees visible matter of his stage by means of an organ of sight of the Second Dhyna, then three are of his stage , but the organ is in the Second Dhyāṇna; if he sees, by the same organ, visible matter of Kāmadhātu, then the body and con sciousness are of his stage , visible matter is in a lower stage, and the organ is in the ŚSecond Dhyāna; if he sees visible matter of the Second Dhyāna by the same organ, then the body and consciousness are of his stage , but the organ and the visible matter are in the Second Dhyāna. 
According to these same principles, we can explain those cases where a being in the Second, Third or Fourth Dhyāṇa, sees, by means of an organ of sight of his stage or of a different stage, visbble matter of his stage or of a different stage. 
The organ of sight is not inferior to the body. 
The body, the organ of sight, and visible matter can belong to five stages: Kāmadhātu, aṇd the Four Dhyānas. The consciousness of sight is of two stages only: Kārmadhātu and the First Dhyāṇna. 
Thus stated, the organs of sight which a certain being uses can be of the stage to which the body of this being belongs, that is, of the stage where this being has arisen; it can be of a higher stage; but it caṉ never be lower. 
Visible matter and consciousness, through relationship to the organ, is either of the same stage or lower, but never of a higher stage. 
Visible matter is not higher than the oṟgan. 
Visible matter of a higher stage cannot be seen by an oṟgan of sight of a lower stage. Nor coṉsciousness. 
Visible matter, in relation to consciousness, and visible matter as well as consciousness, through relation to the body, is of all types. 
Visible matter, through relationship with the visual consciousness, is either equal, or higher, or lower. 
Visible matter and the visual consciousness, through relationship to the body, are as visible matter is through relationship to the consciousness, this is to say, equal, higher, or lower. 
The same holds for the organ of hearing. 
The organ of hearing is not lower than the body, sound is not higher than the organ of hearing, nor is auditory consciousness; sound, through relationship to this latter, and sound and consciousness through relationship to the body, can be of all types. 
Three oṟgans belong to their own stage. 
After having formulated this general rule, the author mentions one exception. 
The consciousness of touch is of its own stage or of a lower stage. 
The body, the organ of touch and tangibles are always of the stage where the being is born. 
There is no restriction with respect to the mental organ. 
Sometimes the mental organ is of the same stage as the body, the dharmadhātu and the mental consciousness; sometimes it is lower or higher. 
If a body belongs to the first five stagesKāmadhātu and the Four Dhyānas, then the mental organ, the dharmadhātu, and the mental consciousness can be, in absoṟption or at conception, of any stage, all the stages not being moreover the same in each case. 
We shall not speak here of this for the sake of brevity, the profit being small and the pains great. 
kxkṣk There are eighteen dhāus aṇd six consciousness. 
Which dhātu is discerned by which consciousness? 
Five external dhātus are discerned by two types of coṉsciousness. 
Visible matter, sounds, odots, tastes and tangibles are known respectively, by the consciousness of sight, hearing, smell, taste, and touch. They are all discerned by the mental consciousness. 
The thirteen other dhātus, not being of the sphere of the sense coṉsciousness, are discerned by a single mental consciousness. 
How many of the dhātus are eternal? 
No dhātu is totally eternal. 
Thus one part of the dharmadhātu is eternal. 
The twelve internal dḥātus and one part of the dharma dhātu are indriyas. 
A Sūtra eṇumerates twentytwo ndriyas: 
organ of sight, 2. 
faculty of memory, 18. 
They do not place the mental organ after the organ of touch, but after the vital organ, for the reason that the mental organ, the same as the oṟgans of sensation , also have an ālambana and not solely a visaya as do the organs of sense consciousness.! 
The five remaining dhātus and one part of the dharmadhātu are not ndriyas. 
What is the meaning of the word ndriya? 
According to the School, five are predominate with regard to things; i. 
The organs of smell, taste, and sensation are predominating influences with regard to beauty, as above; with regard to protection, through the consumption of solid foods ; with regard to the production of their three coṉscious nesses; and with regard to their special activities, i.e., perceiving smells, tasting tastes, and touching tangibles. 
Four ndriyas, pamely the two sexual organs, the vital organ, and the mental organ are each a predominating influence with regard to two things. 
The five ndriyas of sensation and the eight indriyas of faith, and the three pure faculties, ii.10 c. 
Five and eight with regard to defilement and to purification. 
are, tespectively, predominant with regard to defilement and to purification. 
Faith and the seven other faculties are predominant with regard to purification, for it is by them that one obtains purity. 
According to other masters , the sensations are also predominant with regard to purification, so that the Sūtra says: 
swkhiasya citta samādhīyate, duḥkhopaniṣacchradḍhā aṇṉ naiṣkramyāfritaḥ saumamasyādhayaḥ Such is the explanation of the Vaibhāsikas. 
the sense organs, the eyes, etc, are not predominant with regard to the protection of the petson. 
By reason of their predominance with regard to the perception of their special object, with regard to all objects, six organs. 
The five organs, the first of which is the organ of sight, are predominant through their affinity to the five sense consciousnesses, visual consciousness, etc., each one of which distin guishes its own object, visible things, etc. The mental orṟgaṉ is predominant with regard to the mental conscionsness which dis tinguishes all objects. It is in this way that the six sense organs are predominant. 
But, we might say, the sense objects, visibles, etc., are also predominant through their affinity to the consciousness, and as a consequence, should they not also be considered as ndriyas? 
The same holds for the other sense organs and their objects. 
It is by reason of their predominance in masculinity and femininity that one must distinguish two sexual organs within the body. 
There are two separate sexual organs within the kāyendriya, or the oṟgan of touch. 
These two organs are not distinct from the kāyendriya: they too cognize tangible things. But there is a part of the kāyendriya that receives the name of male organ or female organ because this part exercises predominance over masculinity or femininity. 
Femininity is the physical form, the voice, the hearing, and the dispositions ptoper to women. The same for masculinity. 
Since the differences of these two natures are due to these parts of the body, we know that these two paxts are predominant through their two natures. 
It is by reason of their predominance with regard to the duration of existence, to defilement, to purification, that one considers the vital organ, the sensations, and the five the first of which is faith, as ndriyas. 
The five sensations are predominant with regard to defilement, for the Sūtra says, Lust finds its shelter in the sensation of pleasure; hatred, in the sensation of displeasure; confusion,in the sensation of indifference. 
By reason of their predominance with regard to ascending acquisitions, with regard to Nirvāṇa, etc., the anājñātamājñās yāmīndriya, the ajñendriya, and the āgñātāvīndriya, are likewise. 
For there is no Patinirvāṇa when the mind is not delivered. 
The word et cetera indicates that there is another explanation: 
The first is predominant with regard to the extinctions of the defilements which are abandoned through Seeing the Truths. 
The third, with regard to blessednessinthislife, that is, the experience of the satisfaction aṇd the wellbeing that comes from deliverance from the defilements. 
If you regard a pre dominating influence as an indriya, ignorance and the other parts of pratityasamutpāda would be ṉdriyas, for these causes are predominant with regard to their effects. 
In the same way, the voice, hands, feet, the anus, and the penis are predominant with regard to words, grasping, walking , exctetioṉ, and pleasure. 
The support of the mind consists of the six organs of consciousness, from the organ of sight to the mental organ. These are the six internal yatanas which are the primary constitu ents of a living being,. 
This sixfold support is differenciated by reason of the sexual oṟgans. It lasts for a time by reason of the vital organ. It is defiled by reason of the five sensations. Its purification is prepared by the five moral faculties, faith, etc. 
It is purified by the three pure faculties. The dharmas that possess the characteristic of being predominant with regard to the constitution, the subdivision, etc. 
Or rather there are fourteen ndriyas, support of transmigra tion, origin, duration, enjoyment of this support; the other indriyas have the same function with regard to Nirvāṇa. 
The expression or rather introduces the explanation of other mastets. 
The six organs , from the oṟgan of sight to the mental organ, are the support, the raison detre of sasāra. 
It is through the vitaḻ oṟgan that the saḍāyatanas last. 
It is through the five sensations that the saḍāyatanas eṉjoy. 
The voice is not predominant with respect to words, for woṟds suppose a certain instruction; 23. 
Hands and feet are not pre dominant with regard to grasping and walking, for grasping and walking are simply the hands and feet arising a secood moment in another place and with a new figure. 
On the other hand, we see that hands and feet are not indispensable for grasping and walking, for example with snakes. 
If you consider the hands, the feet, etc., as ṉdriyas, you must then place the throat, the teeth, the eyelids, and the joints, whose function it is to swallow, to chew, to open and close, to fold up and to extend the bones, among the ndriyas. 
We shall examine here the organs of sensation and the pure faculties which are not found anywhere else. 
Disagreeable bodily sensation is the ṉdriya of pain. 
Disagreeable is that which does harm. 
Agreeable is that which does good, which comforts, is beneficent. 
In the Third Dhyāna, agreeable mental sensation is also an nriya of pleasure. 
Āgreeable mental sensation of the Third Dhyāna is also called sukhendriya, an indriya of pleasure. 
This name, moreover, is reserved for agreeable bodily sensation; but in the Third Dhyāṇna, bodily sensation is absent because the five sense consciousnesses are not there. 
Moreover, it is satisfaction. 
Moreover, that is, in the stages below the Third Dhyāna, in Kāmadhātu and in the first two Dhyānas, agreeable mental sensation is satisfaction or the ndriya of satisfaction. 
In the Third Dhyāna, agreeable mental sensation is calm and tranquil, because the ascetic, in this Dhyāṇna, is detached from joy: hence it is pleasure and not satisfaction. 
Joy, is not distinct frorn satisfaction. 
Disagreeable mental sensation is dissatisfaction. 
Intermediate sensation, which neither comforts nor harms, is the sensation neitherpainnorpleasure. 
Is this seṇsation bodily or mental? 
It is both. 
For it has no vikalpana. 
Accordingly as the agreeable or disagreeable sensations are bodily or mental, they do good or harm according to a mode of operation that is special to them, and they are not felt in the same way. 
Nine ndṛiyas, in the Paths of Seeing, of Meditation and of the Aśaikṣa, constitute three ṉdriyas. 
On the Path of Meditation on the Truths, the saint does not have anything new to know, he is a wise one or 4iña. 
But in order to cut off the defilemeats which remain in him, he newly knows and often repeats the Truths that he already knows. 
he obtains the knowledge that the Truths are known. 
Possessing ājñātaava, he is an ājñātāviṉ, and his indriya is called the jñātāvīndriya. 
in fact, when the saint has obtained kṣayajñna aṇḍ anutpādajñāna , he knows in truth, Pain is known; I have nothing more to know and the rest. 
We must explain their different natures: 
How many are pure? 
Three are clean; ī. 
The material organs, the vital oṟgan and the two painful sensations are imputre; The material organs are seven in number: 
the five organs, of seeing, etc, plus the two sexual organs, for all these seven organs are included in rūpaskandha. 
Nine are of two types. 
The mental oṟgan, the sensation of pleasure, the sensation of satisfaction, the sensation of equanimity, and the five moral facalties are nine ṉdriyas that caṉ be either pure or impure. 
This text is not proof, for the Blessed One is speaking here of a person in whom the five pure moral faculties are absent. 
Hence he is referring to only the five moral faculties belonging to the Āryans, that is, pure. 
Finally, the Blessed One said: If I do not know truly the origin, the disappearance, the advantages, the disadvantages, the escape of the five faculties of faith, foṛce, etc., I shall not be liberated, gone out, disassociated, delivered from the world of gods, Māras, and Brahmās, of a worId wherein there are Brahmins and monks; I shall not reṣide with a mind free from error. 
Among the ndriyas, how many are retribution , and how many are not retribution? 
The vital energies that a Bhikṣu Arhat stabilizes or increases, are evidently the vital organ. 
An Arhat in possession of supernormal power , in possession of the mastery of mind, ie., one who is asamayavimukta , gives, either to the Saṅgha or to a person, things useful to life, clothing, pots, etc. 
May this action which should produce a retributioninjoy be transformed and produce a retribution inlifeP Then the action which should produce a retributioninjoy produces a retributioninlife. 
How does a Bhiksu cast off the vital energies? 
Along with the Sautṛāntikas, we say that the Arhats, through their mastery in absorption, cause the projection of the constitutive primary elements of the organs for a certain period of duration, a projection due to previous actions, to cease; inversely, they produce a new projection, born of absorption. 
Why does the Arhat prologue his vital energies? 
He sees that his life is going to end; he sees that others are incapable of assuring these two ends. 
Why does the Aṛhat cast off his vital energies? 
he sees that his dwelling in this world has only a small utility for the good of others, and so sees himself tormented by sickness, etc. As the stanza says: If the religious life has been well practiced, and the Way well cultivated, at the end of his life, he is happy, as at the disappearance of sickness. 
In the three Dvīpas , male or female, a asamayavimukia Arhat who possesses prāntakoṭika Dhyāna : 
According to the Sūtra, the Blessed One, after having extended the jīvita saskāras, casts off the saskāras of āyus One asks 1. 
what difference is there between the sarskāras of jāvita and of āyus; and 2. 
Accoṟding to certain masters, there is no difference. In fact, the Mūlaśāṣṭra says: 
What is the vital organ? 
It is the 5 in the Three Dhātus. 
According to others the expression āyuḥsaskāras designates life which is the result of actions in a previous life; the expression jāvitasaskāras designates life which is the result of actions in this life. 
According to other masters, the āyuḥsaskāras are that by which existence lasts; the jñvitasaskāras are that by which life is prolonged for a little while. On the second point: The Sūtra uses the pluraḻ because the Saint extends or casts off many saskāras. There is no advantage, in fact, in extending a moment, or in casting off a moment: 
According to another opinion, the pilural condemns the teaching according to which the jāvita or the āyus is an entity susceptible of duratioṉ. 
Why does the Blessed One cast off and extend ? 
With the aim of showing that he possesses mastery over death, he casts off death; with the aim of showing that he possesses mastery over life, he extends it. 
Any Bhikṣu who has well cultivated the four supernorrmnal powers , can live, if he so desires, a ēalpa or more. The Vaibhāṣikas say: 
Twelve are of two types. 
Which twelve? 
With the exception of the last eight and dissatisfaction. 
With the exception of the vital organ, which is always retribution, and of the nine that will be mentioned below which are never retribution, the remaining twelve are of two types, sometimes retribu tioṉ, and sometimes nonretribution. 
The seven material orgaṇs are not retribution to the extent that they arise from accumulation. 
But, we would say; how can one affirm that dissatisfaction is never retribution? 
In fact, the Sūtra says, There is an action liable to reṣult in satisfaction, there is an action liable to result in dissatisfaction, and there is an action liable to result in a sensation of equanimity. 
Hence davrmanasyavedanīya action is action with which a sensation of dissatisfaction is associated. 
It follows that a sarmanasyavedanīya action is an action with which the sensation of satisfaction is associated, not an action liable to retribution in satisfaction; and it foḻlows that as a consequence, the sensation of satisfaction is not retributioṉ. 
One could admit your interpretation of the Sūtra if there were no other issue, that is, if it had been rationally established that dissatisfaction is not retribution. 
this is the case for satisfaction which wiḻl consequently not be retribution. 
If, as you maintain, dissatisfaction is retributio, when a person has committed a serious transgression and then experiences, with regard to it, dissatisfaction and remorse , one could say that the transgression has already brought forth a ripened resultwhich is inadmissible. 
But you admit that satisfaction is retribution, and we would reason as you have just done: when a person has accomplished a meritorious action and thereby experiences satisfaction, then this action immedi ately brings forth a reṣult of retribution. 
Persons detached from desire do not possess the ndriya of dissatisfaction; now, they possess the indriyas which are retṛbbution, the organ of sceing, etc; hence the indriya of dissatisfaction is not retribution. 
The fact is that persons so detached possess the ivriya of satisfaction, which can be the nature of this ndriya, whether it be retribution or not, whereas dissatisfaction is never produced among them. 
Hence, the Vaibhāṣikas conclude, the indriya of dissatisfaction is not retribution. Eight indriyas;:the five organs of sense consciousness, the vital organ, and the sexual organs,are, in a good rebiṛth, the retribution of good action; in a bad ṛebirth, they are the retribution of bad action. 
The sensations of pleasure, of satisfaction, and of equanimity are retribution for good actions. The sensation of dislike is the retribution for a bad action. 
To an androgyne, in a good rebirth, both organs are the retribution for good action, but the quality of being an androgyne is obtained through bad action. 
How many are without retribution? 
Dissatisfaction always has retribution, for, on the one hand, it is never neutral, being the result of a concept ; but, on the other hand, it is never puṟe, never being produced in a state of absoṟption. 
Ten are twofold. 
The mental oṟrgan , and faith and its following; 3. 
The mental organ, the sensations of pleasure, satisfaction, and indifference, have retribution when they are bad or goodimpure; they are without retribution when they are neutral or.pure. 
Eight are good; Eight, faith, etc., the anājñāṭamājñasyāmīndāriya, etc., are only good. 
Dissatisfaction is of two types; Dissatisfaction is good or bad. 
The mental organ, and the sensations,with the excep tion of dissatisfactionare of three types. 
The others, of one type. 
ksksk Among the twentytwo indriyas, how many belong to each of the three spheres of existence? 
Thus nineteen ndriyas, excluding the last three, are in the sphere of Kāmadhātu. 
The sexual oṟgans and the two disagreeable sensations are absent from Rūpadhātut 2. 
Nevertheless the Sūtra says: That a female being is Brahmā such does not happen, that is impossible. That a male being is Brahmāsuch happens, that is possible. 
The sensation of suffering is absent from Rūpadhātu because of the fluidity oṛ 
transparency of the body, from whence there is absence of pain produced by hurt; and because of the absence of bad actions liable to retribution, from whence the absence of suffering arisen from retribution.. 
And all the material organs and the two agreeable sensations are absent from Arūpyadhātu. 
How many through Meditation? 
How many are notabandoṇed? 
The mental organ, the sensations of pleasure, satisfaction and equanimity, are of three types. 
Dissatisfaction is abandoned through Seeing and through. 
Nine aṛe abandoned through Meditation alone; 3. 
Five are either abandoned through Meditation or are not abandoned; 4. 
The five indriyas, the first of which is faith, are not soiled, and hence are tot abandoned through Seeing; being able to be pure, they are able to be not the object of abandoning. 
Three are not abandoṉed. 
The last three are not aban doned, because they are pure, and dharmas without defects are not to be rejected. 
l In the Kamas, beings possess from their origins two indriyas that are from retribution, The organ of touch and the vital organ. 
With the exception of apparitional beings. 
Why is not the mental organ and the sensation of equanimity counted herein? 
How many do apparitional beihgs possess? 
Some possess six; 2. 
Or seven. 
But can apparitional beings be bisexual? 
In Rūpadhātu, six; Kāmadhātu is called the Kāmas, because of the primary role that belongs, in this sphere, to the āmaguṇas or objects of desire. 
Rūpadhātu is called the Rūpas, because of the primary roḷle of the rāpas. 
These calm deliverances, beyond the rpas. 
In Rūpadhātu, beings, from their origins, possess six indriyas which are from retribution, like apparitional beings without sex in Kāmadhātu. 
Above, one. 
In this sphere of existence, beings initially possess one indriya which is of retribution, the vital organ. 
Now how many ndriyas perish at death? 
In Ārūpyadhātu,dying destroys the vital organ, the meṉtal organ, and the sensation of indifference; in Rūpadhātu, it destroys eight indriyas;, In Rūpadhātu one must add the five organs of sense consciousness, the organ of sight, etc. 
In fact, apparitionai beings are born and die with all their organs.1n Kāmadhātu, ten, nine, eight; In Kāmadhātu, death takes place either at one stroke or gradually. 
Oṟ four when death is gradual. 
In the second case four ndriyas die lastly and together; the oṟgan of touch, the vital organ, the mental organ and the organ of indifference. 
These four ndriyas die at the same time. 
The preceding concerns the case where the mind of the dying person is soiled or notsoiledneutral. 
In the case of a good death, add all five ṉ4riyas. 
If ones mind is good, one should, in the three spheres of existence, add the five moral feculties, faith, etc. 
One obtains the two highest results through nine ndriyas, The highest results are the.resuilts of Śrotaāpanna and Arhat, for these two results are the first and last. 
The result of Srotaāpanna is obtained through nine indriyas: 
it is through these two indriyas that one obtains the result of Śrotaāpaṇna, for the first encourages the possession of disjunction from the defilements ; the second supports and makes firm this possession. 
The result of Arhat is obtained through nine ndriyas: the mental organ, either satisfaction, pleasure or indifference, the five moral faculties, 4ñendriya and ājñātavīnāriya. 
The two intermediary results through seven, eight or nine. 
In the fixst case, he possesses seven indriyas: 
The bhāyovūarāgawho is a Prthagjanaobtains the result of Sakrdāgāmin by means of nine idriyas. 
The ānupārvaka obtains the result of Anāgāmin through seven or eight ndriyas, according to whether he uses the worldly path or the Pure Path, as the above ānuprvaka obtains the result of Sakrdāgārmin. 
The vīarāga obtains the result of Anāgāmin through the com prehension of the truths, through nine ṉdriyas, as the above bhāyovī tarāga obtains the result of Sakrdīgāmin. 
When he expels the defilements through the pure path, that is, through Meditation on the Truths, one must add the āgñendriya as a ninth jnriya. 
Through how many indriyas is the quality of Arhat obtained? 
By eleven. 
The Śāstra answers, By eleven, for it does not speak with reference to the acqnisition of the quality of Arhat, but with respect to the person who acquires this quality. 
It is said that the quality of Arhat is obtained through eleven ṝndriyas, because a determined person can so obtain them. 
But the three ṉdriyas never coexist. 
The case is different. 
It does not hold that the saint, fallen from the result of Anāgāmin, gains it again by means of the indriya of pleasure. 
He who possesses the mental organ or the vital oṟgan or the organ of equanimity necessarily possesses three indriyas. 
He who possesses these three orgaṅs may or may not possess the others. 
A being born in Ārūpyadhatu does not possess the organs of seeing, hearing, smelling, or taste. 
A being born in Ārūpyadhātu does not posses the organ of touch. 
A being born in Ārūpyadhātu or Rūpadhātu does not possess the female organ. 
A being born in Kāmadhātu cannot possess it when he bad not acqnired it or when he has lost it. 
A Prṛthagjana boṟṉ in the Fourth Dhyāna, in the Second Dhyāna, oṟ in the Ārūpyas, does ṉot possess the oṟrgan of pleasure. 
A Prthagjana born in the Fourth Dhyana, in the Third Dhyana, or in the Ārūpyas, does not possess the organ of satisfaction. 
6.4.being born in Rūpadhātu or in Ārūpyadhātu does not possess the organ of displeasure. 
A detached person does not possess the organ of dissatisfaction. 
A person who has cut off the roots of good does not possess the five moral faculties, faith, etc. 
Neither a Prṛthagjana nor a Saint in possession of a result possesses anājñātamājñāsyāmīndāriya. 
The Pṛthagjana and the Śaikṣas do not possess ājñātavīndriya. 
He who possesses the organ of pleasure or the organ of touch certainly possesses four organs. 
He who possesses one of the organs of sense conscious ṉess necessaṟily possesses five oṟgans. He who possesses the organ of sight also possesses the vital organ, the mental organ, the organ of indifference and the organ of touch. 
The same for him who possesses the organ of hearing, etc. 
But, one would ask, what sort of organ of pleasure can a being possess who is born in the heaven of the Second Dhyāna and who does not therein cultivate the absorption of the Third Dhyāna? 
i He possesses the organ of defiled pleasure of the Third Dhyāṇna. 
18d Whoever possesses the female organ, etc., necessarily possesses eight organs. 
He who possesses a sexual organ necessarily possesses, in addition to this organ, seven oṟgans, which have been specified in 18cd, for this being evidently belongs to Kāmadhātu. 
He who possesses the organ of dissatisfaction necessaly pos sesses, in addition to this organ, these same seven oṟgans. 
He who possesses one of the moral faculties can be born in any of the three spheres of existence; he necessarily ṇossesses the five moral faculties, which are seen together, plus the vital organ, the mental organ, and the organ of indifference. 
He who possesses ājñendriya ot ājñatavīndriya becessarily possesses eleven oṟgans. 
These are the vital organ, the mental organ, the organs of pleasure, satisfaction, and equanimity; the five moral faculties; and the eleventh, which is either ājñendriya or ājñātavīndriya. 
He who possesses ājñsyāmīndriya ṅeceṣsarily possesses thirteen oṟgans. 
kskṣk What is the smallest number of organs it is possible for a being to possess? 
A being who is lacking any good at all possesses a minimum of eight organs, the organ of touch, sensations, the vital organ, and the mental organ. 
A being who is lacking good is one who has cut off the roots of good. 
He possesses eight organs, namely, equanimity, life, the mental oṟgaṉ, and the good orgaṉs. 
The good organs are the moral faculties, faith, etc. 
He is not detached; he can possess the moral faculties; and he can possess all the organs of sense consciousness. 
thus he necessarily lacks the pure organs. 
The Āryan, not detached, can possess all the organs, The Āryan who is not detached, and hence a Śaikṣa and not an Arhat, possesses at most nineteen oṟgans. 
With the exception of a sexual organ and two pure organs. 
In Kāmadhātu, an atom into which there is no entry of sound, and into which there is no entry of any organ, is made up of eight substances; By paramāṇu, we do not understand here a paramāṇu in its proper sense, a dravyaparamāṇu, an atom or monad which is a thing, a ṣsubstance , but a saghātaparamāṇu, a molecule, ie., the most subtle among the aggregates of matter, for there is nothing, among the aggregates of matter, which is more subtle. 
In Kāmadhātu, the molecule into which sound does not enter, and into which no organ enters, is made up of eight substances, but of 1n0 less than eight: 
namely the four primary elements , and the four derived elements,visibles , odors, tastes, and tangibles. 
When the organ of touch enters into it, it is made up of nine substances; 2. 
The molecule into which sound does not enter, but into which the organ of touch enters, admits of a ninth substance, the dravya which is the organ of touch. 
When any other organ enters into it, it is made up of ten substances. 
The molecule into which sound does not enter, but into which all other organs other than the organ of touch enter, consists of a tenth substance, the dravya that is this other organ : 
in fact, sound which is produced by the primary elements that form part of the organism does rot exist independently of the organs. 
If the four primaty elements, earth element, etc., are never disassociated, but coexist in every aggregate or molecule, how is it that, in any given aggregate, one perceives either solidity, or viscosity, or heat, or movement, and not these four substances or characteristics at one given time? 
In the same way, when one touches a pile of pieces of plants and needles,9 one perceives the needles; when oṉe eats some salted soup, one perceives the taste of salt. 
According to another opinion, that of the Bhadanta Śrīlabha, the aggregates aṟe made up of the four primary elements, since, given the action of certain causes, solid things become liquid, etc.! 
The fire element exists in water, since this latter is more or less cold, a fact which is explained by the presence of the element of fire in a more or less great quantity. But, we would say, whether cold is more or less active does not imply that there has been a mixture of a certain substance , the coḻd, with its opposite, heat. So too sound and sensation, even though homogeneous, vary in intensity. 
According to another opinion, the primary elements which are not perceived in a given aggregate exist in the state of potentiality, and not in action, and not in and of themselves. 
Thus ṛthe Blessed One was able to say , There are many dhāus or miṉeral substaṅces in this piece of wood. 
How does one prove the presence of coloṟ in wind? 
1 This is an object of faith , and not of reasoning. 
Or rather physical matter exists in the wind, since one perceives smell by reason of the contact of the wind with an object possessing an odor; now odor is never disassoci ated from physical matter. 
We wil have six, seven, or eight substances, and when sound intervenes, seven, eight, or nine. 
